<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20298 </DOCNO>
<HT>  "jpcar021___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<H1>   JPRS REPORTS </H1>
<H2>  April Reports </H2>
<AU>  JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  23 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL </F>
<F P=101> GENERAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   U.S. Interests in New Pacific Community Discussed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    U.S. Interests in New Pacific Community Discussed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0194A Shanghai GUOJI ZHANWANG [WORLD OUTLOOK] in Chinese 
No 2, 23 Jan 94 pp 25-26 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0194A </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai GUOJI ZHANWANG [WORLD OUTLOOK] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Liu Xiaojun (0491 1420 6511): "What Are the U.S. </F>
Motivations in Promoting a New Pacific Community?"] 
  [Text] In his speech at Waseda University in Japan in July 
of 1993, Clinton raised the concept of a new Pacific Community. 
The Clinton government believes that the future of the United 
States lies in broader, deeper and more focused participation in 
the affairs of the Pacific rim region and that there is a need 
for a "community based on a foundation of shared strength, 
shared prosperity and joint responsibility for democratic 
values." Ultimately, this community would include all the 
members of the Asia Pacific Economic Cooperation forum [APEC] 
and of NAFTA. The strong U.S. support for the informal meeting 
of APEC leaders in Seattle was one step in the pursuit of this 
plan. What is the ultimate motivation behind the U.S. enthusiasm 
for a new Pacific Community? 
  1. Hitting Two Targets With One Arrow on the Economic Front. 
  The two economic goals considered by the U.S. in promoting a 
New Pacific Community are obtaining economic advantages and 
exerting influence. 
  The concept of a New Pacific Community is an important 
strategic step in the implementation of an adjustment in U.S. 
policy towards the Asian Pacific. From the point of view of 
obtaining economic advantages: 1) It could rejuvenate the 
domestic economy. The United States has a large trade deficit, 
and economic recovery has been slow. Clinton entered the White 
House on the banner of solving domestic economic problems. He 
feels that one method of solving this thorny problem is to 
increase foreign exports, because American prosperity depends to 
a large degree on international trade which constitutes one 
fourth of the U.S. GNP. Stagnated export markets increase the 
difficulty of domestic economic recovery, and it is the Asian 
Pacific region which can expand the scope of American foreign 
trade. Clinton says that the Asian Pacific region is "an 
unlimited source of employment, income, partner relationships, 
and economic growth." The Asian Pacific region has rapid 
economic growth and great development potential. Maintaining and 
expanding relations with this region can open new markets for 
American products and capital and provide hope for U.S. 
employment opportunities and labor exports and thus allow the 
U.S. to cast off these economic difficulties. 2) It can create a 
foundation for entering the Pacific century. U.S. leaders and 
experts recognize that the 21st century will be the "Pacific 
century." It will be more challenging and more prosperous than 
the Atlantic century. If the U.S. clings to "Eurocentrism," it 
will be excluded from the tide of development in the Asian 
Pacific. Christopher said, "As we approach the next century, the 
U.S. must keep its sights turned to Asia, on the future of the 
Pacific." The Asian Pacific has 40 percent of the world's 
population and a 70 billion U.S. dollar GNP, or 25 percent of 
the world GNP, and a 7 percent annual growth rate. U.S. trade 
with this region is up to 344 billion U.S. dollars, or one third 
of U.S. foreign trade. Every one percent increase in exports 
from the U.S. to the Asian Pacific region adds 53,300 job 
opportunities to the U.S. economy. Five of the United States' 
ten most important trading partners are members of APEC. The 
proposal to establish a new Pacific Community is an important 
step for the U.S. in entering the Asian Pacific market. An essay 
by the U.S. Heritage Foundation said that Clinton's concept of a 
Community would, after 30 years, allow for APEC and NAFTA to 
combine into a unified, broad-based, Asia-America free trade 
alliance which would be the largest free trade zone in the 
world. The task to be done at this phase is to transform APEC 
into an economically integrated regional framework which would 
establish a foundation for links between the U.S. and Asia. 3) 
It could facilitate the signing of a Pacific free trade 
agreement. Beginning with the Bush administration, an important 
strategic concept underlying the U.S. proposals for a Pacific 
community, later expanded to the New Pacific Community, has been 
the eventual signing of a Pacific free trade agreement. The Asia 
Pacific economic community proposal suggested by Clinton at the 
Seattle meeting is a specific step towards a New Pacific 
Community, the goal being to transform APEC into a regional 
organization for multilateral trade negotiations. With this as a 
lever to promote liberalized investment, eliminate trade 
barriers, and use liberalized trade to expand investment 
opportunities for U.S. enterprise, the Asian Pacific region is 
to be transformed into a free market with strong U.S. 
involvement. With trade barriers eliminated, the United States 
will then use every means possible, leading with aircraft, 
electronic communications, finance and other areas where the 
United States has competitive confidence, to allow U.S. 
enterprise to penetrate the Pacific market. By strengthening 
close economic ties with Asian Pacific countries within the 
scope of a community, the United States can then rely on its own 
superiorities and the standards and systems of multilateral 
structures to exert influence on other countries. The United 
States is accustomed to using relevant legal provisions to exert 
pressure on other countries. The United States is attempting to 
use APEC as a springboard to reaffirm the influence of the 
United States in this region. Another aspect is that, after the 
end of the cold war, U.S. influence in the Asian Pacific 
declined. The economic power of Japan, the ASEAN countries, and 
other Asian Pacific countries strengthened. The United States 
is concerned that Japan will use economic methods to establish 
the "Greater East Asia Co-Prosperity Sphere" that military 
methods failed earlier to achieve. To maintain the leadership 
role and influence of the United States in the Asian Pacific 
region after the end of the cold war, the United States has 
emphasized the need to create a new mechanism for cooperation 
and to develop a new policy towards the Asian Pacific region 
which is consistent with the new reality and has "coalescing 
power." The U.S. Assistant Trade Negotiator stated, "if we are 
to continue to have competitive leadership in the Asian Pacific 
region, we must bring together a constructive alliance with the 
Asian Pacific countries." 
  2. Killing Two Birds With One Stone on the Security Front 
  The two security goals of the United States in promoting a 
New Pacific Community are to maintain stability in the Asian 
Pacific region, thus protecting the security of the United 
States, and to urge other countries to share some of the defense 
burden. 
  The U.S. view is that, after the end of the cold war, the 
factors most contributing to instabaility in Asia have been the 
widespread military buildup in many Asian Pacific countries, the 
suspicion that North Korea and other countries have developed 
nulear weapons, and the possibility of regional conflict among 
the coastal countries due to the lack of clearly defined borders 
and economic waters. Of the five remaining Communist-controlled 
countries in the world, four are in Asia. In order to establish 
a stable situation in the Asian Pacific region, the New Pacific 
Community should perform a security function, the focal points 
of which would be to continue stationing troops in Asia to 
project a threat and achieve victory in any conflict; prevent 
nuclear proliferation, and conduct new regional dialogue. The 
United States believes that maintaining appropriate military 
strength in the Asian Pacific region will contribute to 
stability and economic growth in the region. The United States 
will continue to maintain military alliances with Japan, South 
Korea, Singapore, the Phillipines, and Australia and strengthen 
strategic relations with ASEAN so that the U.S. can use 
Southeast Asian military facilities at any time. Decreases in 
the U.S. defense budget will be mainly in Europe rather than in 
Asia. The United States continues to maintain 15 percent of its 
military strength in Asia to prevent the emergence of a power 
vacuum and a new hegemonist force. The U.S. military believes 
that the establishment of a multilateral military framework in 
the Asian Pacific is still a matter for the rather distant 
future, because this can only be brought about after the 
"process of establishing a community" is carried out. Currently 
only APEC can exercise a security function. The United States 
will be able to perform a positive function in an organization 
for multilateral dialogue like APEC. 
  The United States sees the discussion of a joint approach to 
the challenges of defense in the region as a priority issue, 
because the Americans feel that it is a difficult burden to 
maintain the region's stability single-handed. President Clinton 
has called for cooperation in establishing joint defense, joint 
prosperity and democratic values in the Pacific region. The 
United States intends to link the provision of a security 
function in the Asian Pacific market with the bilateral security 
treaties maintained between the United States and Pacific region 
countries. With regard to security strategy in the Asian Pacific 
region, the United States will no longer put its efforts into 
seeking new military bases but on conducting regional security 
dialogue. Utilizing the forum of a community and establishing 
bilateral and multilateral dialoque mechanisms will cause more 
countries to be concerned and share the responsibility for 
regional defense. U.S. defense authorities have indicated 
clearly that Japan should assume greater responsibility in the 
joint defense of the Asian Pacific region and has also urged 
South Korea to make greater contributions to defense. 
  3. Two for One on the Political Front 
  The political motives behind the U.S. enthusiasm for a New 
Pacific Community are to promote American values and also to 
provide for the strategic containment of certain countries. 
  The countries of Southeast Asia and some other countries in 
Asia still have differences with the United States on Western 
democracy and human rights concepts . The United States has 
always wanted to conduct "open dialogue" with Asian countries on 
the issue of human rights but also does not want the human 
rights issue to damage relations with the countries of this 
region. The establishment of a type of community would create an 
ideal forum for carrying out this task. The United States also 
wants to use APEC to exert pressure on North Korea on the 
nuclear issue. Another important motive for the U.S. promotion 
of a New Pacific Community is the containment of Asian countries 
especially China as well as to make the activities of APEC serve 
U.S. strategy. The U.S. view is that China presents the greatest 
current and future threat to the United States in the Asian 
Pacific region. Hence the Clinton government wants to adopt a 
more subtle policy towards China than that of the Bush 
government. They wish to use the context of a community to bind 
the hands and feet of China and eliminate this potential 
"threat." Their method is to urge China to develop towards a 
free market economy and get China to participate in an 
integrated economic and security mechanism to prevent the 
possibility of China conducting "outward expansion." The U.S. 
also hopes to use the Asia Pacific community to contain the 
divergent tendencies of Japan and the ASEAN countries. 
  4. Future Prospects 
  The U.S. plans to implement the New Pacific Community in 
three phases. The first phase is to sign a communique promoting 
the elimination of trade barriers. The second phase will be to 
discuss and delineate long-term goals at a summit meeting. The 
third phase will be to establish a community. The U.S. thinking 
is to first make APEC into an organization for multilateral 
negotiations and then, in one set of successful negotiations, 
make APEC and NAFTA into one combined unit. 
  Although the United States has spared no effort in promoting 
the New Pacific Community, the future prospects are not 
optimistic. There are differences in values between the U.S. and 
Asian countries. There are serious gaps in economic, security 
and human rights issues. Several Asian countries, especially the 
ASEAN countries, have expressed unhappiness with U.S. attempts 
to control APEC and do not approve of making APEC into a 
negotiating organization. The Malaysian premier did not 
participate in the Seattle meeting because of this. Thus it will 
be very difficult for the United States to manifest its concept. 
A New Pacific Community will not emerge in the Asian Pacific in 
the near future. The United States will, however, become more 
and more agressive surrounding the question of a New Pacific 
Community as well as in protecting U.S. national interests and 
grasping for leadership in the economic development of the Asian 
Pacific region. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20299 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar021___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  11 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Journal Sees `Serious Challenges' in 1994 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Journal Sees `Serious Challenges' in 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0158A Beijing ZHENLI DE ZHUIQIU [PURSUIT OF TRUTH] in 
Chinese No 1, 11 Jan 94 pp 2-4 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0158A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHENLI DE ZHUIQIU [PURSUIT OF TRUTH] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Journal Commentator: "Hope for the Coming New </F>
Year"] 
  [Text] The new year is here, to our broad readership we 
send our warmest greetings! 
  In the coming new year, Chinese people follow our cultural 
traditions to discard the old and welcome the new, and sincerely 
look forward to the party and government to carry on the party's 
fine traditions, wash away the harmful filth which has stained 
the institutions of the party and government, and achieve better 
results in the various tasks of building socialist modernization. 
  We highly endorse the suggestion of a high-ranking Chinese 
leader that in implementing a socialist market economy, we 
should study well what socialism means and wear the "socialist" 
hat properly. That is to say that if we are truly working toward 
socialism, we should not view socialism simply as a matter of 
wearing, or not wearing a hat by that name. In fact, there are 
some cadres who fail to clearly differentiate socialist market 
economy from capitalist market economy to the extent that in 
words or deeds they often toss aside the socialist "hat." There 
are also those who, having other objectives in mind, openly 
advocate steps which will greatly weaken and even dismantle the 
collective economic system and, using open or covert tactics, 
attempt to carry out privatization. Such theories and actions 
are harmful to building socialist modernization; these, along 
with the unhealthy tendencies manifested in the party and the 
increasingly serious corruptions seen in the society during the 
last few years, all show a trend that, if allowed to develop 
unchecked, will lead to considerable dangers and therefore 
cannot be treated lightly. 
  To China and its people, 1994 should be a glorious year as 
well as a year of serious challenges. It is a glorious year 
because the anti-corruption struggle launched under the party 
and central government's leadership will gradually penetrate to 
the grass-root levels; because the "Decisions on Certain Issues 
Pertaining to the Establishment of a Socialist Market Economic 
System" promulgated by the 3rd plenum of the 14th CPC Congress 
will extend reform to the lower levels; and particularly because 
the publication and subsequent organized studies of the third 
volume of "Deng Xiaoping's Selected Works" will raise the 
ideological consciousness among the broad masses of cadres and 
people who, armed with such a weapon, will counter and overcome 
the various unhealthy tendencies and launch a forceful struggle 
against the reactionary forces which utilize peaceful overture 
tactics against China in the international arena. If all party 
and government cadres, particularly the leader cadres, 
thoroughly study and completely understand the ideological 
viewpoints of comrade Deng Xiaoping, they will in their work be 
able to emphasize the good points, correct any shortcomings, and 
carry out the party's basic line in a concrete, correct and 
comprehensive manner, and the result will certainly be greatly 
elevating the party's prestige among the masses and 
strengthening the close relationship between the party and the 
people. 
  Why do we say that the coming new year is also a year of the 
most serious challenges? Because in terms of economics, 
politics, ideology and other areas, numerous serious problems 
still require solutions, and some of these urgently, such as 
sharp drop in production, trade abnormalities, monetization out 
of control and increasing inflation; we must pay close attention 
to such problems and guard against their impact on the entire 
process of economic construction, reform and opening up. In 
restructuring the economic system and accelerating economic 
development by intensifying reform, we should aim to speed up 
the pace of making adjustments while maintaining stability, for 
we cannot afford to allow chaos to develop by accelerating 
development. In restructuring state-owned enterprises and 
establishing a modernized enterprise system, we should protect 
the primacy of the collectivized system, particularly the 
central core of state-owned enterprises from being weakened or 
dismantled. In summary, stable economic development is the 
foundation for political stability and unity, and must therefore 
be managed effectively. 
  With respect to the anti-corruption struggle currently 
underway, this is a difficult major task which runs into much 
resistance, particularly because in many large and major cases, 
the people and projects involved are very complex, which make it 
very difficult not only in indictment and investigation but also 
in sentencing and punishment. In many localities, departments 
and work units, there are cases of malfeasance, corruption, 
abuse of authorities, embezzlement, giving and receiving bribes 
on the part of some cadres and working personnel; the fact is 
that such corrupt behaviors and activities which violate the law 
and regulations have become habits after many years, and some 
guilty persons not only are not ashamed, but are proud of their 
activities of making more and more money, using clever tactics 
and spending lavishly. In the anti-corruption struggle, such 
people not only feel no remorse and admit no guilt but on the 
contrary try to resist punishment by seeking assistance from 
their superiors and subordinates, friends and colleagues. At the 
same time, many trades and businesses act irregularly or 
illegally in apportioning costs, levying penalties, collecting 
fees, raising prices and using all kinds of ways to defraud and 
take advantage of the people; although some regulations have 
been issued to deal with these problems, because of the size of 
China and its population, these abuses cannot be controlled or 
stopped outright. Therefore, in the anti-corruption struggle, we 
must be resolute in our determination, and must concentrate all 
possible strengths, extend a helping hand to the masses, and 
adopt severe and thorough measures to overcome the many 
difficulties, before we can achieve greater results. 
  We will need to be more forceful in establishing the 
ideology 
of communism and in firmly supporting the party's ideological 
political work which is at the heart of the socialist system. In 
recent years, the ideological trend of bourgeois liberalization 
has not disappeared but rather has intensified in certain 
respects, and it retains the danger of once again polluting the 
country; but yet, there are some stubborn supporters of 
liberalization who, under the slogan of intensifying reform, 
spread the harmful viewpoints of privatization and total 
westernization among the masses, and serve the cause of the 
Western reactionary forces which attempt to bring about changes 
in China's system of socialism under the pretext of peaceful 
evolution. 
  The above has demonstrated that many serious and urgent 
problems still confront us, and that we must accept these 
serious challenges and, through testing by them, continue to 
make forward progress. 
  To solve the above-mentioned series of important problems is 
not only the hope of the Chinese people but also the desire of 
the rank and file cadres. If leader cadres of our party and 
government, particularly the high-ranking leaders, themselves 
share the hope and desire of the broad masses of people and 
cadres, they need only to solve the problems people are 
dissatisfied with and do well the things which benefit the 
people, they will have accomplished their missions. 
  An ancient proverb states that one anticipates danger while 
living in peace. For a nation, even when the economy is 
developing, the political situation stable and the people well 
off, [the government] should from time to time consider whether 
any disasters, emergencies or dangers which escaped detection 
may be threatening. The proverb is a warning to those in 
political power not to be proud of or self-satisfied with what 
they may have achieved, [a point which] many elderly 
revolutionary leaders of our party have also earnestly 
admonished us in the past. Today's situation and the tasks at 
hand are very much more complicated than ancient times, the 
changes are much more rapid, and we must constantly maintain a 
very alert frame of mind, not overestimating what we have 
accomplished or overlooking problems which still remain, but 
making due assessment of the difficulties we face, if we are to 
gain the benefits and avoid the pitfalls. 
  Communist Party cadres must anticipate danger while living 
in 
peace, not only because many yet to be resolved problems still 
confront us as we go forward, but also because in the world at 
large, class struggle has by no means disappeared, only the 
methods of struggle have changed. In our relationship with the 
monopolistic capital classes in the West, we now emphasize unity 
as well as struggle. In economics, cooperation and unity are the 
key: More exchanges, more businesses, the more we learn from 
them the good things we ourselves can use, the better; but in 
terms of ideology and politics, struggle unfortunately cannot be 
avoided, and our struggle is directly mainly against the 
reactionary forces that try to eliminate communism in China, for 
the eyes of the reactionary forces are sharply focused on 
Chinese Socialism, and they will not be satisfied unless and 
until the Communist movement is completely destroyed within this 
century; these reactionary forces will intensify pursuit of 
their peaceful evolutionary strategy, and the Chinese people 
must constantly and strictly guard against and resolutely resist 
their open tactics and covert schemes and the various types of 
attack. Naturally, because of the costs and benefits involved, 
different developed capitalistic countries in the West have 
different attitudes toward China, and we cannot treat them all 
as one group. 
  When we talk about anticipating danger while living in 
peace, 
we are following the principle of seeking truth from facts; we 
should neither exaggerate the difficulties involved nor make up 
dangers where none exists and consequently lose our faith. At 
the same time, after considering all possible dangers, we should 
redouble efforts in our struggle to correct all mistakes and 
shortcomings, do well in all the things that need to be done by 
overcoming various difficulties, and make the party even 
stronger in terms of ideology, politics and organization; 
proceeding from an effective system of law, we should strengthen 
management, increase efficiency and heighten the prestige of 
democratic dictatorship of the people. At the same time, by 
vigorously strengthening the conditions for ideological 
political work, we should mobilize the enthusiasm for building 
socialism among the broad masses of people, popularize again the 
traditions of struggling against all hardships and preserving 
against all odds, and help the people sweep away the unhealthy 
ideology of money worship, extreme individualism, 
self-indulgence, making of large gains from little labor and all 
kinds and manners of corrupt behaviors and practices that are 
being promoted in today's society. From this it can be seen that 
our demand is not only to anticipate dangers, but to get rid of 
these dangers and restore stability and peace. 
  In the new year, with joint efforts by the entire party and 
all the Chinese people, given the prerequisite political 
stability, we should strive to maintain forward progress and 
momentum in the tasks of building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20300 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar021___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  11 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Unresolved Problems in Construction of Socialism </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Unresolved Problems in Construction of Socialism </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0159A Beijing ZHENLI DE ZHUIQIU [PURSUIT OF TRUTH] in 
Chinese No 1, 11 Jan 94 pp 5-11 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0159A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHENLI DE ZHUIQIU [PURSUIT OF TRUTH] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Mei Xing (2734 5887): "Several Issues Concerning </F>
the Construction of Socialism -- Thoughts Inspired by The 
Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping: Volume 3"] 
  [Text] The publication and organized studies of The 
Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping, Volume 3, are a major 
event in China's political life today. When the masses of 
cadres, especially the high-ranking party and government leading 
cadres, acquire a thorough knowledge of the theories in this 
work, it will indeed ensure unity in thinking; reinforce our 
conviction; and facilitate active, comprehensive, and correct 
implementation of the Party's basic line. 
  Comrade Jiang Zemin spoke at the study report meeting and 
gave an incisive exposition of the theme of The Selected 
Works of Deng Xiaoping: "Only socialism can save China; 
only socialism can develop China. The socialism we uphold is a 
socialism with Chinese characteristics." The quintessence of 
this theory is its liberated ideas and its practical and 
realistic approach which are inherently unifying in nature. 
Through extensive practice and in the course of probing, 
studying, formulating, and perfecting this theory, we should 
discard some principles and some bookish, dogmatic ways we 
understand Marxism as well as some unscientific and even 
distorted interpretation of Marxism, and we should abandon 
incorrect ideas that are beyond the early stage of socialism. On 
the other hand, we must firmly oppose those erroneous viewpoints 
that basically reject socialism but insist on using a dialectic 
materialist and historical materialist world-outlook and 
methodology to analyze and solve problems. Comrade Jiang Zemin's 
exposition no doubt will play an important role in guiding our 
study of The Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping. 
  When we study The Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping, of 
course we must first study the original and understand its gist, 
but we must also link it to reality, including today's reality 
and the practices of the past decade or so, for only then can we 
learn and apply what we have learned and actively, 
comprehensively, and correctly implement the party's basic line 
and accomplish various socialist modernization tasks and in turn 
forge a closer relationship among the party, the government, and 
the masses and acquire high esteem to lead the masses to 
struggle for our new cause. 
  While studying The Selected Works of Deng 
Xiaoping, Volume 3, I thought about some of the basic 
knowledge we have accumulated in practice over the past several 
decades and the work we have done in the last 10 years or so in 
the course of constructing a socialism with Chinese 
characteristics. Here, I want to discuss some of my own crude 
and simplistic viewpoints, and I welcome criticisms and comments 
from the readers. 
  The first matter that requires proper handling is the 
relationship between politics and economics. Economics is the 
base, and politics is the centralized manifestation of 
economics. Politics is built on, but also counteracts on, the 
economic base, and under certain conditions, politics can even 
decide a nation's economic rise or fall. In his later years, 
Engels once wrote a letter in which he talked about the 
counteraction of politics (state power) on economic development. 
He said politics could make the economy develop faster, but it 
could also cause the economy to collapse (see Selected 
Works of Marx and Engels, vol 4 pp 483 and 486.) In 
practice, we often have trouble handling the relationship 
between politics and economics, and we often have disagreements 
and arguments. In essence, the focus of contention over the way 
the Eighth National Party Congress worded the country's major 
contradictions at that time and questioned whether the party's 
central task should be shifted was also on the relationship 
between politics and economics. The opinion that the party's 
central task should be gradually shifted to concentrate our 
energy on developing the productive forces was a correct one at 
that time. But in 1957, the year after the Eighth National Party 
Congress ratified the decision, the anti-rightist struggle 
expanded: In early 1958, the so called "criticism of people who 
stood against rash advances" became a political issue. Later, 
serious mistakes were made in the Great Leap Forward and in the 
commune system when we attempted to speed up the development of 
the productive forces and change the productive relationships. 
That was followed by the Lushan Conference during which Comrade 
Peng Dehuai's correct ideas were criticized as rightist 
opportunism and anti-socialist thinking. A massive 
counter-rightist movement ensued. These approaches not only did 
not protect or develop the productive forces but actually ruined 
them, just like Engels had said; it brought the economy to the 
brink of collapse. In 1963, when we just began to overcome our 
economic difficulties, just when agricultural and industrial 
productions were recovering and were going to move forward 
again, we were interrupted by the "Four Clean-Up" movement 
[clean up politics, ideology, organization, and the economy.] By 
the time of the "Cultural Revolution," the two 
counterrevolutionary groups under Lin Biao and Jiang Qing used 
politics as an excuse to greatly exaggerate the class struggle. 
They also tried in vain to ruin the economy and cause the social 
productive forces to stall and move backwards and widen the gap 
between us and the Western capitalist nations. One of the root 
causes of China's erroneous "leftist" guiding ideologies in 
those 20 years was the mixed-up relationship between politics 
and economics. Practices that only stressed politics and 
alienated economics, or we should say the method of using 
politics that violated the laws of economics to direct the 
economy, seriously jeopardized the development of the social 
productive forces. It was a very profound lesson. 
  History has already drawn for us the following simple 
conclusion: Politics that do not follow the laws of economics, 
and politics that do not serve the economy do not facilitate and 
can even jeopardize the development of the social productive 
forces and in turn obstruct the reinforcement of the socialist 
system. After the proletariat obtains political power and 
stabilizes the political situation, it should stand firm and 
concentrate its strength on developing society's productive 
forces. But history has also provided us with experience of 
another kind: If economic development deviates from the correct 
political leadership, it can lose its way and embark on the 
wrong road, a winding road, or a crooked road, producing many 
social problems which can turn around to cause political harm 
and hurt the leadership. 
  The greatest victory of the Third Plenary Session of the 
11th 
Party Central Committee was its firm decision to shift the focus 
of the party's tasks and the attention of the nation's people to 
the socialist modernization process. In a little more than a 
decade, China's socialist modernization has obtained glorious 
results and has displayed its own characteristics. This is an 
integral part of correct political leadership. The two basic 
points determined by the party's basic line, namely, the four 
basic principles and reform and opening up, give expression to 
unity of politics and economics and to their ability to promote 
each other and restrain each other, and the party is correct on 
this. But we must also point out that because of weakened 
political ideology education, and because of the abuse of power 
for personal gains and other improper behavior among party and 
government cadres and among workers in various trades and 
industries, extreme individualism, money worship, hedonism, 
money-before-everything mentality, and other improper ideas have 
sprung up within the party and in society. Bourgeois liberalism 
ran amuck on several occasions, economic development surged and 
plummeted, the industrial structure deteriorated, and profit 
fell and so on, and all these have an adverse effect on the 
comprehensive and correct implementation of the party's basic 
line. It is clear that the basic problem lies in the 
inconsistent handling of the relationship between politics and 
economics. Before the Third Plenary Session of the 11th Party 
Central Committee, everything had been politically-oriented to 
the point of ignoring the economy, but in the last decade or so, 
the economy has taken precedence and politics has been slighted 
or even ignored. In opposing the one-sided approach of letting 
politics determine the economy, some comrades go to the other 
extreme to produce another kind of one-sidedness, which is to 
overlook the active counteraction of politics on the economy and 
to deny that under certain conditions, politics can play a 
leadership role or even commanding role in the economy. The 
substantive manifestation of this role is the party's unified 
and correct leadership, and the concrete work it performs is 
strong and effective education in political ideologies. After 
the "4 June" disturbance, Comrade Deng Xiaoping hit the nail on 
the head when he pointed out that, "If a mistake has been made, 
it would be our lack of consistency in upholding the four basic 
principles and our failure to make that our basic thinking in 
educating the people, the students, and the entire body of 
cadres and communist members. The nature of that incident was a 
contention between bourgeois liberalization and the four 
upholds." (see The Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping 
Vol 3 p 305.) 
  An extension of the relationship between politics and 
economics is the question of how to correctly handle the 
relationship between material civilization and spiritual 
civilization when constructing socialism. Upon obtaining 
political power, it has been the theme of the Communist Party 
members to develop the social productive forces and construct a 
material civilization at a rate faster than that of the 
capitalist nations. A nation without economic power will have no 
place in this world and eventually will be subjugated by those 
who subscribe to hegemonism. But to develop the productive 
forces at high speed, we need two things: First, the party and 
the state must have a correct construction line and a set of 
general and specific policies. Second, the masses of cadres and 
the people must be willing to engage in arduous struggle for the 
sake of socialist modernization. To attain the second condition, 
we must focus on the construction of the spiritual civilization. 
Of the great economic powers in the world today, some nations, 
such as the United States, rely mainly on their superior natural 
conditions, the rich endowment left by their ancestors, and 
their control and exploitation of the third world nations. 
Others, such as Germany and Japan, who were defeated in the war, 
rely mainly on their own people's arduous struggle and advanced 
science and technology and management methods. China's natural 
conditions are fairly good, and we have a fine national 
tradition of arduous struggle and self-reliance. So long as we 
have the above two conditions, and if we truly unite, overcome 
hardship and learn, and do some hard and solid work for a few 
decades, we will be able to catch up with the economic powers. 
Of course, they too are developing, and to catch up with or even 
surpass them, we must work many times harder. 
  With respect to the idea of focusing on the two 
civilizations 
at the same time, Comrade Deng Xiaoping has already talked about 
it at a meeting with the central delegation from India's 
Communist Party (Marxist Party) back in April of 1983. His 
famous words are, "To construct a socialist spiritual 
civilization, it is fundamental that the masses of people share 
the communist ideal and have morals, culture, and discipline" 
(The Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping Vol 3 p 28.) To 
let the readers understand why the Party Central Committee put 
so much emphasis on strengthening spiritual civilization back 
then, we should cite a passage from a written speech delivered 
by Comrade Chen Yun in June 1985: "When constructing the 
socialist material civilization, if we do not construct a 
socialist spiritual civilization at the same time, our material 
civilization may deviate from the right direction. If a unit or 
a leading comrade forgets or relaxes his grip on the 
construction of the socialist spiritual civilization, we will 
not succeed in constructing the material civilization. Even more 
serious is that we may deviate from the socialist and communist 
ideals. That can be very dangerous." (The Selected Works 
of Chen Yun (1956-1985) p 301.) 
  We were forewarned, and with sincere words and earnest 
wishes 
too, but the facts were, back then bourgeois liberalism was 
beginning to run rampant and was getting a certain amount of 
support from the party general secretary, Comrade Hu Yaobang, 
who continuously diminished the construction of spiritual 
civilization and curtailed political ideology education. To 
those elements who were dissatisfied with the socialist system 
at that time, compared to the dazzling world and pleasures of 
Western capitalism, socialist and communist ideals were but 
illusions of the primitive men. They found no redeeming value in 
the then flourishing Chinese socialist modernization, and they 
believed that everything the Western world had to offer was 
perfect, and as a result, talks of all-out Westernization began 
to appear and words demanding the abolition of the communist 
leadership also spread; opinions that encouraged eating, 
drinking, and the pursuit of happiness and even the pursuit of 
money also appeared in the newspapers. In fact they were 
abandoning the spiritual civilization whose goal was to pursue 
communist ideals, morals, and discipline. This kind of bourgeois 
liberalism which rejected the ideologies of the four basic 
principles and wholeheartedly yearned for capitalism indeed 
poisoned the minds of the party members and cadres and the 
masses in a broad and profound way. In particular, when Zhao 
Ziyang was general secretary, he blatantly supported and 
indulged this kind of thinking and surrounded himself with many 
mainstay elements. The most striking evil consequence was the 
political upheaval and counterrevolutionary disturbance that 
erupted in the capital in 1989. 
  Ideology may seem abstract, but it, like the political 
system, is the superstructure built on the economic base; its 
counteraction on the economy is strong, and it also plays an 
important role in guiding the political direction. To the 
communists and revolutionaries, the communist ideology we often 
speak of is the supreme value outlook; it is also the 
outstanding feature that separates them from other people. 
Communist party members must discipline themselves, propagate 
this most noble of ideologies among the people, conduct 
effective political ideology education, and get rid of some of 
society's unhealthy ideologies and workstyle and traditional 
practices. We still have a long way to go before achieving 
communism, but we must not abandon that ideal, for if we do, our 
nation will be like a body without a soul; it will quickly decay 
and will be rendered beyond help, and eventually we will be 
trampled by those who believe in hegemonism and will become the 
laughing stalk of the world. 
  The above is the second issue, that is, we must emphasize 
material civilization and spiritual civilization at the same 
time, and if more problems should emerge in our spiritual 
civilization, we must make a even greater effort to strengthen 
that area. 
  The third matter below has to do with the relationship 
between the productive forces and productive relations. 
  The productive relations must adapt to the development of 
the 
productive forces. As the productive forces develop, the 
original productive relations must change; otherwise, they will 
obstruct the development of the productive forces. In the course 
of our socialist construction, we have inadvertently produced 
two erroneous tendencies: First, we believed that by 
continuously changing the productive relations, the productive 
forces would develop at high speed. The successful completion of 
the three transformations of socialism led people to have 
unrealistic ideas, and very soon after the start of the "Great 
Leap Forward," the nation began to install the commune system, 
believing that it would greatly improve the productive relations 
and speed up the development of the productive forces. The 
result was total disaster. But for a long period thereafter, 
there was another kind of erroneous tendency: We ignored any 
improvement in the productive relations and stuck to old 
conventions, and as a result, China's economy stalled. The 
general policy of reform and opening up proposed after the Third 
Plenary Session of the 11th Party Central Committee in essence 
wanted China's productive relations to adjust to the development 
of the productive forces and promote a high rate of economic 
growth. Facts show that this decision by the Party Central 
Committee was entirely correct; the results have been 
outstanding. 
  China proceeded with step-by-step reform and opening up, 
first in the rural areas, and upon gaining some experience, 
shifted the focus to the urban areas, slowly paving the road to 
a socialist modernization with Chinese characteristics. We still 
have a long way to go, but we have a lot of experience which we 
must continuously review and sum up. The Selected Works of 
Deng Xiaoping, Volume 3, discussed this in detail and gave 
it a highly theoretical summation. 
  Changing the productive relations is a very complicated 
matter. It involves the administration of political power and 
the workings of the economic system and often can trigger sudden 
changes in the overall situation. That is why on this matter we 
must oppose conservative tendencies that reject changes and 
encourage complacency, but we must also oppose rash moves and 
impatient approaches. The laws of development of all things 
require deep probing, repeated tests, and extensive practices, 
and only then can we understand the laws of their internal 
relationship. Many important people in the world have discovered 
the objective laws of natural science and social sciences. They 
have all struggled long and hard and have experienced many 
failures before succeeding. Whether our reform will succeed or 
fail is not determined by our subjective will; we must go 
through the test of actual practice, and we must go through 
repeated tests before drawing conclusions. This means we must 
constantly review our experiences, acquire more knowledge, and 
let knowledge set us free and not just think that things are 
inevitable. In other words, we must comply with the gist of 
Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of constructing a socialism with 
Chinese characteristics and unify liberated thinkings with 
practicality and reality, and only in that way can we succeed in 
restructuring various systems and avoid mistakes. 
  The fourth matter we want to discuss here is about upholding 
the public ownership system as the primary system among the 
socialist market economic mechanisms we set up in the early 
stage of socialism. In simple terms, the capitalist market 
economic mechanisms are built on the foundation of the private 
ownership system. It utilizes the law of value to regulate 
supply and demand and market prices. The socialist market 
economic mechanisms are built on the foundation of the public 
ownership system. In essence, we should use both planning and 
the market as means of regulation to guide the economy along the 
socialist path. 
  For many years, the capitalist nations have been utilizing 
indirect planning and regulation, economic measures, and 
administrative interventions to supplement the market economy 
and ease the conflict between socialized production and private 
ownership of means of production, and in terms of organization, 
they have used enterprise groups and economic integration and 
other ways to concentrate their economic strength and in turn 
reduce the crisis elements in the market economy. This is 
progress in the way the capitalist nations control the way their 
economic system works. Ours is a socialist nation. From the 
beginning, we have implemented a highly centralized planned 
economic system, and back then, that system indeed played an 
effective role in promoting the rapid development of the 
productive forces. The First 5-Year Plan successfully 
centralized the financial and human resources to lay a tentative 
foundation for our socialist industrialization. That success was 
an integral part of the highly centralized planned economic 
system. But even back then, our party had already realized that 
over-centralization was not good for the economy, and it 
prompted them to suggest putting large projects under planning 
while giving small undertakings a free hand. Comrade Chen Yun 
spoke at the Eighth National Party Congress held in 1956 and 
proposed relaxing market control. He subsequently was 
responsible for drafting the provisions on improving the 
industrial, commercial, and financial management systems. They 
were never carried out because of the Great Leap Forward 
Movement. In 1979, Comrade Chen Yun spoke in no uncertain terms 
on the idea of using market regulations to supplement economic 
planning. That in fact marked the beginning of the restructuring 
of China's single-track planned management system. Of course, in 
the several years after reform and opening up began, we first 
combined economic planning and market regulations and then we 
decided to implement the socialist market economic system. It 
has been a gradual, step-by-step process. But it should also be 
pointed out that making a decision in principle with respect to 
a system and the actual practice of that system are two 
different matters. It takes time for the cadres to grasp the 
principles and apply them, and in practice, there are many 
things we must probe, experiment with, understand better, and 
continue to improve. In short, today's popular idea of getting 
rid of planned regulations completely is not right and can even 
be harmful, because if we did that, wouldn't we be returning to 
the early form of capitalist economic management? Shoudn't we 
give the confusion in our economic life caused by the relaxation 
of macro regulation and control in the last two years some 
serious thoughts? 
  On this matter, there is another important thing we want to 
point out, and that is, today, some people are directly or 
indirectly advocating replacing the public-ownership system as 
the main system in the socialist market economy and minimizing 
the share of the state-owned economy. A handful of economists 
even believe that the public-ownership system is but a means 
while developing the productive forces is the true goal, which 
can be achieved by any other means. According to such theory, we 
do not need any kind of ownership system with respect to the 
means of production, because it matters not who owns them. To 
put it plainly, they want to abandon socialism to set up a 
market system for the early-to-intermediate stage of capitalism. 
As we said earlier, even the capitalist nations are utilizing 
indirect planning as means to regulate the economy. On this 
matter, neither The Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping 
nor the party Central Committee's resolution has ever abandoned 
the principle that the public ownership system must be the main 
system during reform and opening up. If the public-ownership 
system is not the primary system, and without the state-owned 
enterprises serving as mainstay in particular, what will be left 
of socialism? Where will reform and opening up be heading? 
  Some people want to diminish and even disband the large 
state-owned enterprises, saying that they are inefficient, that 
they lose money, and that they are a heavy burden and should be 
discarded. We have many large state-owned enterprises. We began 
setting them up under the First Five-Year Plan; it has been more 
than 30 years, and during this long period, has anyone bothered 
to figure out how much money they have made for the state and 
how much they have contributed? Old workers who went through 
fire and water from the early days of the founding of the nation 
to just before the Cultural Revolution and who toiled night and 
day to lay the foundation for today's socialist economy have 
given their lives to the state and to the people. Shouldn't the 
state take care of them now? Today, there are some so called 
communist party members and state cadres who call themselves 
revolutionaries who won't find ways to curb the problem of 
people wining and dining on billion yuan's worth of public funds 
a year; they don't worry about how to stop the draining of state 
funds to the tune of 100 million yuan a day. Instead they want 
to get rid of the millions of old retired workers who have 
worked all their lives but who are getting a very small pension 
today. They don't think about the 80 million peasants and 
herdsmen in the poverty-stricken areas who don't have enough to 
eat or to keep them warm. They even boast that "state-run 
businesses are not as good as collectives, and collectives are 
not as good as privately-own businesses, and private businesses 
are not as good as wholly foreign-owned or joint venture 
businesses." Isn't it clear what these people want? Is it 
realistic to ask them to serve the people with all their hearts 
and minds? 
  People who want to diminish or remove the primary role of 
the 
public-ownership system and attempt to change the nature of the 
state-owned enterprises, regardless of how they feel 
subjectively, are in fact trying to topple socialism. Practice 
is the only criterion in testing the truth. What kind of 
conclusion will history draw about these people? Everything will 
become clear in practice. 
  Here we must say something about centralization and 
decentralization of power. In the past, power was 
over-concentrated in the hands of the central government, and 
all human and material resources were controlled by the relevant 
government departments. These defects have been in existence all 
along. In recent years in particular, abuse of power for private 
gains and the trading of power and money and other ill winds 
have swept the country, and many cadres, including a few leading 
cadres, who have a lot of power are making a lot of money and 
those with a little power are making a little money, and even 
those without power are taking advantage of the situation. Thus, 
handing down power to the localities and enterprises may be a 
necessity, but the question is how, how much, and whether the 
devolution of power will truly mobilize the proper kind of 
enthusiasm among the cadres and the masses. Here, we must put 
"proper" before "enthusiasm," because the lesson from the Great 
Leap Forward is that without proper leadership and strict 
control, enthusiasm can become recklessness. If this kind of 
recklessness should run amuck in the country, if the capital 
construction projects are jeopardized, if we pursue an realistic 
rate of growth, if we set up development zones regardless of 
conditions, and if we do what we want to draw up our own 
policies and rules and regulations, it will lead to chaos and 
jeopardize the central government's unified leadership. China is 
a vast country; unification is hard to come by, but localism and 
decentralism can spread quickly. If the decentralization of 
power is allowed to develop without restraint, it will be very 
dangerous. If we are not careful, everybody will set up 
blockades and engage in separatism, and then not only will we 
fail to create a market economy but there can be unimaginable 
political consequences. 
  In summing up our war experience, Comrade Mao Zedong said, 
"If what should be centralized is not centralized, then those in 
high places must be derelict of duty and their subordinates are 
usurping their authority. This is not permissible in any kind of 
relationship between a superior and his subordinates, especially 
in military matters. If what should be decentralized is not 
decentralized, then those in high places must be hoarding power 
and their subordinates are without initiative. This too is not 
permissible in any kind of relationship between a superior and 
his subordinates, especially in a relationship of command in 
guerrilla warfare." (Selected Works of Mao Zedong, 
2nd Edition, Volume 2, pp 436-437) Comrade Mao Zedong's correct 
viewpoint on centralization and decentralization which puts 
strategies under central command while making the subordinates 
responsible for actual deployment in battle can also be used to 
guide our economic construction. What makes a modern economy 
different from a natural economy is that the former is more 
centralized and facilitates centralized command, which means we 
must emphasize macro regulation and control. Of course this kind 
of centralized command or macro regulation and control must be 
coordinated with the socialist market economic mechanisms, that 
is, we must work on public finance and taxation, banking and 
credit, interest rates and prices, the scope of capital 
constructions and key construction projects, 
industrial-agricultural and urban-rural relationships, regional 
distributions, the balance between the public and private 
economies, and the allocation of national income and so on. 
  If things are very lively at the micro level, control must 
be 
tightened at the macro level. This may seem contradictory on the 
surface, but in fact, this is dialectics. If we tighten control 
at the top and bottom, we will stifle the economy; if both are 
let loose, it will lead to chaos. There are many lessons of this 
kind. Some cadres have trouble accepting macro regulation and 
control. The root cause of that is their inability to consider 
the whole situation. They do not take the whole economic 
situation into consideration and worry only about their own 
struggle for power and profit. This means the Party and the 
state must always take the whole situation into consideration 
and get rid of the improper, localized interferences and focus 
their attention on solving problems that affect the overall 
situation. 
  Finally, I want to mention one more thing. Comrade Mao 
Zedong's famous saying, "Strategically we should ignore our 
enemies, but tactically we must focus attention on the enemies," 
not only can be applied to politics and to past struggles in the 
world but can also be applied to the economy and to today's 
tasks, because this is a fundamental principle. To retreat in 
the face of problems is not the proper attitude of a Communist 
Party member, but to ignore problems and charge ahead recklessly 
will not bring success either. 
  I have only begun to study The Selected Works of Deng 
Xiaoping, Volume 3. Here I am only offering some crude and 
superficial opinions based on my own past practical experiences. 
I welcome criticisms. Where there are disagreements, there can 
be discussions, because contention and debate broaden people's 
minds, and of course, ultimately who is right or wrong can only 
be determined through practice. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20301 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar021___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  11 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Insists `Public Ownership' Remain </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Article Insists `Public Ownership' Remain </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0157A Beijing ZHENLI DE ZHUIQIU [PURSUIT OF TRUTH] in 
Chinese No 1, 11 Jan 94 pp 12-15 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0157A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHENLI DE ZHUIQIU [PURSUIT OF TRUTH] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Li Pingshi (7812 1627 4258): "There Can Be No </F>
Wavering From `Public Ownership As the Mainstay'"] 
  [Text] As we implement opening and reform and develop the 
socialist market economy, keeping public ownership in its 
dominant position is an important component of comrade Deng 
Xiaoping's theory of building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics, as well as one of the fundamental spirits of 
the 14th National Congress of the CPC. Discussing this topic in 
the 14th Party Congress report, comrade Jiang Zeming pointed out 
that, "The orientation of economic reform is based on 
maintaining public ownership and distribution according to work 
as the mainstays; other economic sectors and means of 
distribution may supplement these, in order to establish and 
perfect the socialism market economy system." He also noted 
that, "The socialist market economic structure is combined with 
the basic structure of socialism." If public ownership is not 
taken as the mainstay, the basic socialist structure will suffer 
serious damage, perhaps even a quantitative change. This is 
self-evident. 
  Therefore, in reforming the economic system and developing 
the market economy, persistence in taking public ownership as 
the dominant sector and nonpublic forms of ownership as 
supplements should become a common understanding and unified 
guidance for the nation. However, some people believe there 
seems to be some incompatibility between insistence on taking 
public ownership as the dominant sector and establishing the 
market and developing productive forces; so they always advocate 
reducing and weakening publicly-owned economy. Not long ago, it 
was reported in the newspapers how some economists had met to 
discuss the question, "Whether public ownership is the objective 
or the means." Some people at the meeting held that we must 
correct the "lopsided view that takes public ownership as the 
mainstay," that we "must rethink taking public ownership as the 
mainstay," and believed that "taking public ownership as the 
mainstay need "not necessarily be an absolute numerical quota, 
but should be manifested chiefly in quality". After the meeting, 
an economist also wrote to advocate that the rate of public 
ownership should "not necessarily occupy over 50 percent." For 
if so, it will be unfavorable to developing the market economy 
and productive forces. Some people even think that it would be 
fine if the level of public ownership could be kept at about 20 
percent, controlling some key industries and a very few large 
enterprises. 
  Under the precondition of insisting on taking public 
ownership as the mainstay, we believe that the crux lies in just 
how much should each economic sector occupy, one that demands 
continuous study and control. But if we artificially reduce 
public ownership to less than 50 percent, in a situation where 
the other economic sectors enjoy favorable policies, the 
dominant position of public ownership must be weakened, and may 
even be hard to maintain. It is surprising, but people who hold 
this opinion are forgetting the simple truth that "every mass 
must be expressed in a certain quantity." Their motivation 
aside, the fact remains that it must weaken and shake the 
dominant position of public ownership. 
  We really should discuss the necessity of insisting on the 
dominant position of public ownership under the socialist 
system, both theoretically and practically. 
  First of all, is public ownership or private ownership more 
suitable to the need to develop modern socialized productive 
forces? 
  Marx and Engels resolved this question long ago, but since 
some people often dispute the point, I must take time to discuss 
it again. Marxism tells us that the historical unfolding of the 
basic contradictory movement possessed by capitalism's 
production has to lead to "incompatibility between socialized 
production and capitalist ownership". This contradiction 
contains the "seeds of all conflicts" in modern capitalist 
society, and "forces the capitalist class to treat productive 
forces more like the productive forces of society within all 
possible limitations inside the capital relationship." 
(Selected Works of Marx and Engels, Volume 3 pp 311, 
317). To completely resolve this contradiction, "it has to admit 
the social nature of modern productive forces, so make 
production, occupation, and exchanging patterns appropriate to 
the social nature of the productive materials. This can be 
accomplished only by the public and direct occupation by society 
of the productive forces which have developed to a situation of 
being unsuitable to other management than social management." 
(Selected Works of Marx and Engels, Volume 3 pp 
318-319). That is, replacing capitalism with socialism, 
replacing the private ownership of capitalism with the public 
ownership of socialism. The objective necessity and historical 
justification of establishing and developing socialism is rooted 
in this. Practices shows that the public ownership of socialism 
matches and impels the development of modern socialized 
productive forces more than the private ownership of capitalism 
does. The former Soviet Union rapidly accomplished national 
industrialization in just 10 years; in addition, the great 
achievements of modernization construction since the 
establishment of new China 40 years ago, and especially in the 
past decade, all prove that only the public ownership economic 
relationship of socialism is the vital economic system which 
suits and impels the development of modern socialized productive 
forces. It also should be the scientific belief and practical 
principle of all Marxists. 
  Second, insistence on the dominant position of public 
ownership must be in deed as well as word, not merely admitting 
orally that "public ownership is in the dominant position," 
while shaking and damaging its dominant position. 
  China is a socialist country; we must conduct its economic 
system with public ownership of the means of production, for 
without public ownership, we will be unable to protect the 
working class's leadership of the nation (through the Communist 
Party of China), since its power to lead will lose its economic 
base. So, to adhere to socialist public ownership, we must 
consolidate and develop public ownership, and absolutely not 
damage it. Now, some people in the backs of their minds 
constantly view public ownership as an obstacle to developing 
the market economy and productive force, they try everything 
they can to weaken and nibble away at public ownership, which 
causes considerable loss to state-owned assets. There are 
estimates that at present, more than 100 million yuan in 
state-owned assets are being lost every day, "changing from 
public assets to private." Some cadres and economists believe 
that state-owned enterprises are burdensome, basing this view on 
such things as low economic efficiency and serious losses 
brought on by such things as unfair economic competition, and 
try hard to abandon them, urging their number be reduced. The 
idea of a so-called reduction in public ownership to less than 
50 percent comes from this background. These comrades have not 
analyzed the complex reasons for state-owned enterprise losses, 
they do not seriously study countermeasures, they make no 
attempt change the operational system to create a modernized 
system of public ownership of enterprises. Actually, they simply 
conclude that the reason why these enterprises suffer loss is 
that public ownership itself is no good, concentrating their 
hopes and excitement on privately-owned enterprises. So, as such 
situations appear, some economists and responsible cadres even 
advocate auctioning off State-owned enterprises on a large scale 
to display their "ideological liberation" and "bold reforms". In 
April of last year, the mayor of a large city publicly announced 
that "except for those enterprises which the State must control, 
most enterprises can be auctioned off." The director of the 
system reform committee in that city said, concerning the 
question of auctioning enterprises, "not only enterprises which 
suffer losses can be auctioned, but efficient enterprises as 
well; not only small enterprises but the larger state-owned 
enterprises also." Further, "as long as there are buyers, it 
doesn't matter whether they are Chinese businessmen or foreign 
businessmen, natural persons or legal persons." This daring to 
auction off state-owned enterprises is really wild! Of course, 
for that portion of state-owned enterprises which are 
inefficient, small scale, and appropriate for distributed 
operation, we can change the operational system through leasing, 
contracts, and auctions of property rights. But it is really 
difficult to agree with those who advocate selling the great 
majority of state-owned enterprises, including even the 
efficient and large scale ones. We have to ask what right have 
they to shake and damage public ownership's dominant position as 
they please? 
  It must be obvious that if we cut the rate of the public 
ownership economy to less than 50 percent, the nature of China's 
economy will change. Not only will it be impossible to maintain 
the dominant position of public ownership, but the socialist 
nature of the economy will change as well. If private 
enterprises occupy more than half of the gross social assets and 
gross social output, that means the majority of social surplus 
labor will be occupied by the private sector. In such 
circumstances, can we still say the working people have been 
liberated from the labor hiring system? Can we still say that 
the exploiting class has been wiped out? Can we still talk about 
eliminating polarization, and growing prosperous together? 
Moreover, if a private ownership economy possesses more than 
half of the private assets in the gross social assets, it must 
automatically result in division and concentration under the law 
of value, which then must produce a privately run enterprise 
clique with great economic power. In this situation, what kind 
of administrative and legal regulations does the state have 
which is strong enough to stop the emergence of an exploitative 
class? Can the people's regime remain in the hands of the 
people? Obviously, if a socialist nation permits the privately 
owned economy to exceed the power of the public ownership 
economy, the economic, political, and social consequences 
brought on by this will be dreadful to contemplate. 
  Therefore, adherence to the dominant position of public 
ownership both quantitatively and qualitatively is the 
economical base and major framework of socialism with Chinese 
characteristics. We can say that if public ownership is not in 
the dominant position, there can be no socialist market economy, 
nor can there be socialism. We should have no wavering and 
concessions on this point. All expressions and practices which 
will weaken and shake the dominant position of public ownership 
must be rejected. 
  Third, adherence to "taking public ownership as the major 
body" while confirming and maintaining the "supplementary" 
status of the nonpublic ownership economy are two related 
aspects of guaranteeing that our socialist economic structure is 
equitable. 
  For more than a decade, carrying out reform and opening 
while 
adjusting the economic structure has resulted in considerable 
development of the individual economy, the privately-run 
economy, and the foreign capital economy, and these have played 
a necessary and good "supplementary" role. We can anticipate 
that in the distant future, these non-public ownership economies 
will have greater development. Based on forecasts by relevant 
departments, given the current developmental trends of the 
non-public ownership economy, by the year 2000 there will be 25 
to 30 million individual industrial and commercial families, and 
privately-run enterprises. These will have as many as 50 million 
employees, as much as 350 billion yuan in self-owned capital, 
and will occupy over 20 percent of the gross industrial output. 
Annual retail sales value of social goods will be more than 600 
billion yuan, occupying over 30 percent of the gross social 
retail sales value. So we can see that in China the 
developmental trend of nonpublic ownership is very swift and 
strong. 
  Meanwhile, it is clear that in addition to its positive and 
necessary supplementary role, the nonpublic ownership economy 
also trends to self-development. Non-public ownership 
enterprises, especially a few large-scale privately owned 
enterprise groups which grow more mature by the day, are calling 
for the maximum possible extension of their economic power. They 
are dissatisfied with their "supplementary" status as compared 
to public ownership's dominant, and seek to "exceed" that 
position; as a theoretical reflection of this economic demand, 
some people employ such terms as "diversified economic 
structure," "diversified investment," and "diversification of 
the main entity of interest" to describe the current situation 
of China's economical life. In fact, statements of this sort are 
demands that the nonpublic ownership economy have equal status 
with the public ownership economy. This is an implied challenge 
to public ownership's dominant position. But some of our 
economists have rationalized the content of this kind of 
"challenge," even advocating 50 percent or more nonpublic 
ownership. If the system of nonpublic ownership "exceeds its 
position" it will mean that the main body of the public 
ownership system will "lose its position." Question: when the 
economic power of non-public ownership exceeds over half of the 
whole economy, can you still regard it as a "supplement" to the 
socialist economy? When the private ownership economy occupies 
the greater part of national production and operations, where is 
the "major" position of the public ownership economy? 
  Fourth, public ownership enterprises should play a leading 
role in the entire domestic economy in quantity, mass, and 
function. The state-owned big and medium-sized enterprises 
should control key departments and the advanced, new technical 
industry and basic industries, play both an advanced and a 
leading role in technical development and applications. They 
must have advanced enterprises rules and scientific management, 
and they must have higher productivity and good economic 
efficiency. The state-owned big or medium sized enterprises 
usually have the advantages of large scale, strong capabilities, 
advanced facilities and a concentration of talented people, so 
they should be capable of fulfilling the role of backbone and 
model. Of course this leadership work can be accomplished only 
in fair market competition. At present, for reasons which are 
very complicated, and due largely to a rigid system and an 
unfair competitive economic environment, some state-owned big or 
medium-sized enterprises are in difficult straits, with 
declining economic efficiency, a talent drain, poor sales, and 
shortages of capital. All of these problems can be improved 
gradually, but only through accelerated change in the 
operational system to create modern, public ownership 
enterprises rules and creating a fair competitive environment 
which suits the requirements of a market economy. It is only by 
carrying out further reform, facing the markets, strengthening 
scientific management, and pushing scientific and technical 
progress will the public ownership enterprises regain their 
youth and vitality. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20302 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar021___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  23 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Review of 1993 Economy </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Review of 1993 Economy </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0320A Beijing ZHONGGUO JINGJI TIZHI GAIGE [CHINA'S 
ECONOMIC STRUCTURE REFORM] in Chinese No 12, 23 Dec 93 pp 14-16 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0320A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO JINGJI TIZHI GAIGE [CHINA'S 
ECONOMIC STRUCTURE REFORM] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Review of 1993 Economy] </F>
  [Text] The Chinese economy continued its rapid growth in 
1993 with a projected GDP gain of about 13 percent for the 
entire year. Macroeconomic regulation and control was highly 
effective and economic disorder has begun to correct itself. 
Overall things were moving in the right direction. 
  -- Macroeconomic regulation and control has begun to pay 
off. 
The national economy continued its fast growth. 
  The year 1993 of dramatic change for the Chinese economy. A 
previously over-extended macroeconomic climate gradually gained 
some breathing room as it achieved a state of equilibrium. At 
the beginning of the year, everybody was overflowing with 
enthusiasm, jockeying for opportunities, scrambling for fast 
growth, and trying to get its projects off the ground. The scale 
of construction was over-stretched and the economy raced ahead; 
the GDP expanded 14.1 percent in the first quarter compared to 
the same period a year ago. All social reproduction sectors 
showed signs of strong growth. At the same time, there were 
signals of stress in the macroeconomic climate. The government 
budget was out of balance, as were banking, materials supply, 
and foreign exchange. There was anxiety in every quarter that 
the economy had become overheated. In the second quarter, the 
economy continued its feverish growth, propelled by the twin 
engine of high investment and an inflated money supply. It was a 
time when things were happening fast and big. All leading 
economic indicators shot up. Meanwhile, inflationary pressures 
intensified and market prices climbed 10 percent, a sign that we 
had entered the danger zone. There was a feeling in all quarters 
that the economy had deviated from the right track. 
  Since the beginning of the third quarter, the central 
government unveiled a string of emergency measures designed to 
tighten macroeconomic regulation and control, which soon were 
having some effects on economic life as demonstrated mainly in 
these three ways: 
  1) Economic disorder has been corrected somewhat. The 
macroeconomic climate achieved a measure of stability and 
speculation of all kinds was beginning to be dampened. To begin 
with, the financial order improved and the financial situation 
stabilized in the course of time. Savings deposits rose notably, 
indiscriminate inter-bank borrowing and fund-raising and the 
arbitrary establishment of financial institutions have been 
checked. Second, there were improvements on the budget and tax 
collection front. The drive to enhance revenue was making 
headway. Revenue grew 11.4 percent in the first 3 quarter 
compared to 1.4 percent in the first two quarters of the year. 
Third, the circulation order also improved; the prices of 
capital goods stabilized, with some actually drifting downward. 
At present the prices of steel used in construction have dropped 
to 3,050 yuan from 4,100 yuan per ton in June and the falling 
trend continues to hold. Fourth, the stock market, futures 
market, real estate market, and development zones were put under 
more regularized management. The number of development zones in 
the eight coastal provinces, regions, and municipalities fell 
from 1,200 to a little over 200. Real estate prices in the 
coastal areas dropped 20 percent or so. 
  2) The overheated economy began to cool off while continuing 
to grow at a brisk pace. Industry, which was expanding at the 
explosive rate of 30.2 percent in June, grew 25.2 percent in 
July, 23.4 percent in August, and a mere 19.1 percent in 
September. Second, the investment explosion has been brought 
under control. The scale of investment has now been reduced to 
11 billion yuan or so. Third, the market is stable but active. 
Total social commodity retail sales rose 23.8 percent and 21.6 
percent in August and September, respectively, down from 28.4 
percent and 26.5 percent, respectively, in June and July. The 
decline in sales was even more striking in the capital goods 
market. In the first half of the year, capital goods sales rose 
almost 50 percent. In the third quarter; however, sales were 
expanding at just 27.3 percent. Fourth, government spending was 
being held under check. Total government expenditures increased 
12.5 percent in the first half of the year and 1.3 percent 
between July and September, bringing the increase rate for the 
entire first three quarters to 7.3 percent. Fifth, the growth of 
the money supply slackened markedly, indicating a softening of 
latent inflationary pressures. The money supply was actually off 
by 19.2 billion yuan between July and September compared to the 
same period in the preceding year. 
  3) Reform and the open policy deepened steadily. First, 
reform was in full swing. The macroeconomic reform plan was 
under way across the nation. Market reform was making striking 
progress nationwide. The transformation of the enterprise 
operating mechanism has begun,. Market regulation is now playing 
a much bigger role. Institutional construction is being 
intensified. Second, the open policy is alive and well. The 
utilization of foreign capital is growing and more foreign firms 
are investing in China. Both exports and imports increased 
steadily, amounting to $129.5 billion in the first three 
quarters, up 17.7 percent from the same period a year ago. 
Momentum remained strong on the tourism front, with both the 
number of foreign tourists visiting China and the amount of 
foreign exchange earned up sharply. 
  -- But China still faces severe economic problems today, 
notably in these three areas: 
  1) Market prices continued to rise rapidly in 1993, the 
third 
year since reform began that the inflation rate topped 10 
percent. At the moment prices are still surging ahead even as 
economic growth is slackening. This is why: 
  a) Prices are a delayed indicator. The current surge in 
prices is a delayed and synergistic reflection of what happened 
earlier--the feverish growth of the economy, a liberal monetary 
policy, and bold, extensive steps in price reform. First, the 
price level is related to whether the economy is up or down. 
This happens in developed nations as well as developing ones. 
Every time the economy picks up steam, so does inflation. 
Turning to the money supply, the money supply narrowly defined 
(M1) increased more than 30 percent in 1988. Correspondingly, 
prices rose sharply also. In 1990, when M1 expanded less than 10 
percent, price increases also moderated. Beginning in 1992, as 
M1 started ballooning at 20 to 30 percent, peaking at 41 percent 
in April this year, price increases followed suit as well. By 
August the expansion of the money supply had slowed to 19.7 
percent, a trend which is expected to be reflected in the price 
level beginning in the second quarter of next year. As for the 
magnitude of reform, by late last year 90 percent of the prices 
of consumer goods, 80 percent of the prices of capital goods, 
and 95 percent or so of the prices of import and export 
commodities on the market were regulated by the market. 
Commodity price reform, it can be said, was basically completed. 
When reform is this far-reaching, it will inevitably have an 
impact on the price level at some point in the future. As price 
reform slows down, its delayed effects will also moderate, along 
with its pressure on market prices. 
  b) The current market price situation is inseparable from 
the 
structural differences in commodity price increases resulting 
from the differences between commodity consumption elasticity 
and consumption pattern. On the one hand, consumer goods differ 
in consumption elasticity and hence the magnitude of price 
increases. On the other hand, differences in the consumption 
pattern also impact prices. As incomes rise, the pattern of 
consumption goes upscale. Judging from the market these days, it 
is the prices of commodities at the upper end of the market, 
including novelty items and new-style and new-design products, 
such as name-brand color television sets and fashion, that have 
risen the most, mainly as a result of high-consumption by 
high-income groups. People get the feeling that prices are 
rising rapidly and substantially. The two factors mentioned 
above reflect both cost-driven increases and demand-led 
increases. 
  c) The substantial depreciation of the renminbi. Early in 
the 
year the renminbi was changing hands at the rate of about $1 to 
7 yuan. By June, it was $1 to 11 yuan. At the moment the 
exchange rate has stabilized at $1 to 8.8 yuan or so. 
Depreciation is one of the reasons behind the latest round of 
sharp price increases. With the costs of imports rising sharply, 
people lose confidence in the Chinese currency and the market 
becomes jittery, driving up prices. In short, price increases 
these days are the result of both normal and abnormal factors 
that call for careful detailed analysis. 
  2) The adverse effects of macroeconomic regulation and 
control are making themselves apparent, primarily in these four 
ways: 
  a) Enterprises are strapped for funds and the shortfall is 
substantial. Since last June enterprise deposits have been 
slipping month after month. Between June and July deposits fell 
73.3 billion yuan. By the end of August enterprise deposits had 
risen 4.1 percent, close to the danger point. 
  b) There was a dissociation between production and sales and 
more and more bills were not being paid on time. 
  c) More and more enterprises have stopped production in part 
or in whole. Not only are large- and medium-sized state 
enterprises operating under capacity, but a number of small 
enterprises also do not have enough orders to fill their books. 
The idling of production capacity is a problem common to both 
the processing industry and raw materials industry. 
  d) Declining profitability. Nationwide profits realized by 
state enterprises within the budget dropped 22.1 percent in 
August from the level a month ago and fell another 10 percent at 
least in September compared with August. The proportion of 
money-losing enterprises rebounded to 36.7 percent. 
  3) The imbalance in economic development remains pronounced 
and progress in structural adjustment has been less than obvious. 
  a) Unevenness in regional development widened further as 
east 
China continued to pull ahead significantly of central and 
western China in terms of production, construction, consumption, 
and income. In the first three quarters, the coastal region 
accounted for over 60 percent of the increase in production, 
construction, and consumption nationwide. 
  b) Different sectors of the economy continued to develop at 
a 
markedly uneven pace. Still mired in stagnation, agriculture 
remains proportionately out of balance with industry. In 
transportation, energy, and other major raw materials 
industries, demand continue to outstrip supply. The "bottleneck" 
industries continue to hamper national economic development. 
  c) The inequitable distribution of income between urban and 
rural households deteriorated. The incomes of rural households 
inched upward and the rural market was not yet a reality. In 
contrast, at a time when "eating off the big rice pot" is still 
with us, township residents "eat off two rice pots"--the state 
and the enterprise--and profit themselves at the expense of the 
public in a variety of imaginative ways. Their incomes continue 
to soar, widening the gap with their rural counterparts. 
  d) The imbalance in international payments worsened. On the 
one hand, exports grew only modestly while imports shot up, 
exacerbating the gap between exports and imports and giving 
China its first trade deficit since 1990. The deficit from 
January through September amounted to $7 billion and, barring 
any effective actions, the nation's trade deficit for the entire 
year will certainly be even bigger. 
  The variety of imbalances mentioned above leaves no doubt 
that irrationalities in the economic system and operating 
mechanism are still marked. Not only will these imbalances 
hobble economic development in a big way in the near future, but 
they are also a hidden danger that may destabilize the entire 
economy. If they are not adjusted in time but are allowed to 
grow unchecked, they may greatly jeopardize the sustained, 
rapid, and healthy development of the Chinese economy and 
undermine social stability. 
  Overall assessment: The national economy stabilized and 
cooled off in 1993. There was no sign, however, of a sharp 
deceleration as it continued to grow at a fast pace. The economy 
expanded 13 percent or so for the entire year, investment grew 
by more than 40 percent, and social commodity retail sales rose 
over 20 percent. Correspondingly, retail prices jumped more than 
10 percent, probably about 13 percent, and China may end the 
year with its international payments on the minus side. In a 
word, the overall pattern of economic development in 1993 can be 
summarized as the "double thirteen," that is, a growth rate of 
about 13 percent and an inflation rate also of 13 percent. 
  Looking ahead toward 1994, the national economy will 
continue 
to grow strongly because the four basic factors driving the 
Chinese economy will remain. First, a large population gives the 
national economy a necessary boost in the form of a huge 
domestic demand. Second, the imbalance between the different 
sectors of the economy and the relative backwardness of the 
basic industries and the infrastructure mean that there is an 
urgent need for accelerated construction, which is a powerful 
engine of economic development right now and will also create 
the conditions for continuous economic growth further down the 
road. Third, reform will continue to be a major boost to the 
economy during the transition from the old system to the new. 
Production potential suppressed under the old system will 
continue to be released for some time to come. Fourth, the 
fundamental national policy of opening to the outside world. By 
further integrating the Chinese economy into the international 
economy, we will be able to continue to import and assimilate 
advanced foreign technology and managerial experience and absorb 
institutional resources to make up for our shortcomings, thus 
enhancing the domestic economy's development capacity. The 
economy is projected to continue to grow at more than 10 percent 
in 1994, with market prices rising 10 percent or so as well. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20303 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar021___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Characteristics of Consumer Goods Market Reported </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Characteristics of Consumer Goods Market Reported </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0356A Shanghai SHANGHAI JINGJI BAO in Chinese 15 Feb 94 
p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0356A </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai SHANGHAI JINGJI BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed report: "Five Major Characteristics of the </F>
Functioning of the Consumer Goods Market Nationwide"] 
  [Text] 1. The trajectory of the movement of the total 
volume of retail sales is wavelike. Business is not really slack 
during slack seasons and is booming in busy seasons. A prolonged 
peak-selling period is a prominent characteristic of the 
consumer goods market as a whole. Last year the total volume of 
retail sales of the country as a whole was 1,359.3 billion yuan, 
an increase of 23.6 percent over the previous year, thus growing 
6.8 percentage points faster than the previous year. An 
adjustment of the figure for inflation shows that the amount of 
physical goods increased by around 9 percent. In terms of 
development dynamics, the growth rate was 16.2 percent for the 
first quarter, 27 percent for the second quarter, 23.9 percent 
for the third quarter, and 26.9 percent for the fourth quarter. 
  2. The consumer goods market is basically characterized by a 
situation in which supply exceeds demand, and selecting good 
merchandise to purchase has become people's usual consumption 
behavior. According to domestic trade agencies' ranking of the 
supply and demand situations of 680 commodities in the second 
half of 1993, supply and demand were in basic equilibrium or 
supply exceeded demand in the cases of 91.6 percent of the 
commodities; supply was smaller than demand in the cases of 8.4 
percent of the commodities. The supply of light industrial 
products and most agricultural and sideline products is 
abundant, mainly because the continued growth of industrial 
production and the steady development of agricultural production 
in 1993 has resulted in a situation in which the supply of goods 
for the market is abundant and in which the total supply of 
goods exceeds the total demand for goods. For the year, the 
value of output of light industry increased by 22.3 percent over 
the previous year, and the ratio of the total volume of retail 
sales to the value of output of light industry was 1:1.24, 
slightly higher than a normal year. 
  3. The rapid growth in effective demand on the domestic 
market has invigorated the consumer goods market. According to 
estimates, the per capita living-expense income of the urban 
residents for the year was 2,323 yuan, representing a 10 percent 
growth in real terms after being adjusted for inflation; the net 
per capita income of the rural residents was 880 yuan, 
representing a growth of around 2 percent in real terms after 
being adjusted for inflation. The rapid growth in people's 
income has led to strong demand on the market. Urban markets 
have continued to boom. "Stressing nutrition in regard to 
eating, stressing comfort in regard to clothing, and stressing 
having high-grade goods in regard to articles for daily use" 
have become a consumption trend prevalent among urban residents. 
The quality of consumption has been markedly raised, and the 
transition from the quantity type to the quality type is very 
obvious. 
  4. All kinds of market actors are developing rapidly, and 
the 
regulating role of the market has been further enhanced. With 
the increasingly important role of the market mechanism in the 
circulation sphere, market competition has intensified, and the 
various sectors' shares of business have continued to change. A 
prominent manifestation of the change is the decreasing of the 
state commerce sector's share of business and the increasing of 
the nonstate commerce sector's share of business. The pace of 
price reform has quickened. Currently procurement and selling 
prices of grain and oil have been decontrolled in over 90 
percent of the regions. Prices for services such as those 
provided by hotels, bathhouses, and barber shops and repairs 
have also been further decontrolled, and the market-regulated 
proportion has continuously increased. According to statistics, 
the share accounted for by market-regulated prices of the total 
volume of retail sales has increased to around 95 percent; 
state-set prices account for only 10 percent of the total volume 
of agricultural products sold by the peasants. 
  5. Policy factors have large impacts on the consumer goods 
market. Since the beginning of last year, the state has adopted 
some consumption-stimulating measures, such as decontrolling 
grain and oil prices in most regions, raising the merchandizing 
business tax, and adjusting exchange rates; as a result prices 
of some goods have increased, and people have again demonstrated 
the consumption mentality characterized by an inclination to 
purchase goods for value-preservation purposes; media 
discussions of the postponement of "the resumption of GATT 
membership" have released the purchasing power which has been 
accumulated over a long time. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20304 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar021___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  5 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   State Issues Policy Adjustments on Enterprise Groups </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    State Issues Policy Adjustments on Enterprise Groups </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0356B Nanjing XINHUA RIBAO in Chinese 5 Feb 94 p 6 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0356B </F>
<F P=104>  Nanjing XINHUA RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed report: "The State Issues Policy Adjustments </F>
Regarding Enterprise Groups"] 
  [Text] Recently the relevant agency of the state issued 
five adjustment policies on enterprise groups: 
  1. The central government directly regulates and controls 
the 
enterprise groups with separate plans nationwide, breaking down 
the preexisting confines resulting from enterprise groups' being 
owned by the various sectors and localities. 
  2. The leadership system of enterprise groups in cities with 
separate plans assumes three forms: first, the state establishes 
its representative bodies such as boards of directors and 
management committees which will exercise leadership over the 
collectives with separate plans; second, enterprises based on 
the joint stock system may use the system of general manager 
responsibility under the leadership of the board of directors; 
and, third, enterprises based on all-people ownership may use 
the system of general manager responsibility under the 
leadership of the board of directors. 
  3. The state will give some financial means to enterprise 
groups which are covered by the trial operation of the separate 
plan system. Those enterprises which meet the requirements may 
create financial companies, and may issue bonds and stocks 
domestically with the necessary approvals. 
  4. Enterprise groups covered by the trial operation of the 
separate plan system are granted some autonomy regarding foreign 
trade operations. 
  5. The top executives of enterprise groups covered by the 
trial operation of the separate plan system have the right to 
give approvals on matters of production, business operation, and 
circulation. (Excerpted from XINXI DAGUAN BAO) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20305 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar021___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  18 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PROVINCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   GATT Potential Impact on Shanghai Industries </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    GATT Potential Impact on Shanghai Industries </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0354C Shanghai SHANGHAI JINGJI BAO in Chinese 18 Feb 94 
p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0354C </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai SHANGHAI JINGJI BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by reporter Zhen Minwei and correspondent Wang </F>
Qingqiu: "An Authoritative Study Shows: The Resumption of GATT 
Membership' Will Have a Strong Impact on Shanghai's Industries"] 
  [Text] The footsteps of "the resumption of GATT membership" 
which was once likened to a "wolf" can finally be heard clearly 
now. The time of "dancing with the wolf" is no longer far away. 
If so, what impact will "the resumption of GATT membership" have 
on Shanghai's industries which account for 60 percent of 
Shanghai's GNP? The result of an authoritative study, conducted 
in Shanghai, of "the resumption of GATT membership" shows: that 
"the resumption of GATT membership" will have a strong impact on 
Shanghai's industries. 
  The Group Studying the Impact of "the Resumption of GATT 
Membership" on Shanghai's "Industries and the Policy on Dealing 
With the Impact," composed of experts from the city's economic 
commission, foreign trade and economic relations commission, and 
customs administration and 12 industrial bureaus as well as 
other institutions, believes: From a long-term perspective, "the 
resumption of GATT membership" is beneficial to Shanghai's 
industries. However, its impact and disruptive effects will be 
very strong, and the intensity involved should arouse great 
attention from all sectors. 
  According to an analysis of 286 major products produced by 
the 12 industrial bureaus, because of the effects of tariff 
reductions and the abolishing of import licenses, there will be 
disruptive effects and impacts on 72 percent of those products. 
The most severe disruptive effects will be on such products as 
the Sontana passenger car and computers and their peripheral 
equipments. There will be beneficial effects on the development 
of 80 products, mainly giving them price advantages. 
  Also, according to an analysis of 1,074 state-owned 
enterprises which are supervised by the 12 industrial bureaus 
(corporations) and covered by the local budget, there will 
basically be no impact on 46.83 percent of the enterprises, and 
there will be impacts of different intensity on 29.42 percent of 
the enterprises; there will be very severe impacts on 9.86 
percent of the enterprises, some of which will even close down 
as a result. Those enterprises are mainly concentrated in such 
industrial bureaus as the Light Industry, Textile, Medical 
Supply, No 2 Light Industry, and Instrument Bureaus. 
  According to an investigation of 48 industries, "the 
resumption of GATT membership" will have beneficial effects on 
23 percent of the industries including the diesel engine, 
light-industry machinery, metal-cutting machine tool, threaded 
steel, refractory materials, electric lighting equipment, small 
household electric appliance, and household hardware industries. 
There will be large adverse impacts on such industries as the 
automobile, radio and television, communication equipment, 
engineering machinery, bearing, stainless steel, refrigerating 
and air-conditioning equipment, wire, chemical fertilizer, 
electronic parts, automation instrument, clock and watch, 
household chemicals, paper-making, refrigerator, copper product, 
and aluminum product industries. 
  Based on comprehensive and in-depth investigations, the 
authoritative study group reached its conclusion on the overall 
impact of "the resumption of GATT membership" on the industries: 
From an overall perspective, "the resumption of GATT membership" 
will be beneficial to Shanghai's industries. This mainly refers 
to the prospects that after "the resumption of GATT membership" 
a number of Shanghai's industries which are competitive can 
increase their exports; that there can also emerge a more 
extensive resource-allocation environment with regard to the 
provision of energy and raw materials which have all along been 
in short supply; and that it will also be possible to make 
stepped-up efforts to develop high- and new-technology and high 
value-added industries in the next few years by exploiting the 
provisions for protecting infant industries and the 
most-favored-nation treatment. Even more important, "the 
resumption of GATT membership" will stimulate Shanghai's 
industries to accelerate their becoming capable of meeting 
international standards with regard to product prices, operating 
mechanisms, technological standards, and industrial structure, 
thereby speeding up the movement of Shanghai's industries toward 
modernization. 
  It is unavoidable that the high- and new-technology 
industries and priority-development industries will encounter 
severe challenges. Shanghai's high- and new-technology 
industries and priority-development industries started late, and 
are not yet in a situation characterized by economies of scale; 
some of them may die young. 
  That long-range impacts and disruptive effects are more 
severe than near-term ones will become a fact. In the near term, 
Shanghai's labor-intensive products will retain some competitive 
advantages on the domestic and external markets; the patents on 
most imitation-based goods have already expired, and therefore 
such goods can continue to be produced; some high- and 
new-technology products will receive protection for a time, but 
once time is up there will be growing disruptive effects on 
those industries and their products. 
  There will be a double disruptive impact on the basic parts, 
accessary, and raw materials industries. This is, on the one 
hand, because of the disruptive effects on them produced by the 
impact of "the resumption of GATT membership" on the main parts 
industries, and, on the other hand, because of the disruptive 
effects on them produced by the importation of parts, 
accessaries, and raw materials after "the resumption of GATT 
membership." 
  Nevertheless, the intensity of the disruptive effects 
produced by "the resumption of GATT membership" will in the end 
change with the development of the market economy. This is the 
final conclusion presented by the report on that authoritative 
study, carried out in Shanghai, of "the resumption of GATT 
membership." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20306 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar021___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  8 January 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PROVINCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shanxi Economic Performance, Plans </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shanxi Economic Performance, Plans </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0324A Taiyuan SHANXI RIBAO in Chinese 8 Jan 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0324A </F>
<F P=104>  Taiyuan SHANXI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Correspondents Ding Jinchuan (0002 2516 1557) </F>
and Fan Jianghong (2868 3068 3163): "Provincial Economic Work 
and Rural Work Conference Convened Yesterday. Provincial CPC 
Committee Secretary Hu Fuguo (5170 1381 0948) Attends 
Conference. Acting Provincial Governor Su Wensheng (1327 2429 
4141) Makes Report. Deputy Provincial Governor Guo Yuhuai (6753 
5940 2037) Relays Spirit of National Economic Work Conference"] 
  [Text] A provincial economic and rural work conference was 
convened on 7 January at Taiyuan for the purpose of implementing 
the spirit of the National Economic Work Conference and the 
recently concluded Seventh Plenary Session of the Sixth 
Provincial CPC Committee, as well as to define the general 
outlines of economic development today and for some time to 
come. In the morning, provincial CPC Standing Committee member 
and provincial governor Guo Yuhuai relayed the main content of 
the national economic work conference. In the afternoon, Sun 
Wensheng, the acting provincial governor, gave a report titled, 
"Seize Opportunities to Hasten Reforms to Advance the Province's 
Sustained, Rapid, and Healthy Economic Development." 
  Provincial CPC Committee secretary Hu Fuguo, deputy 
secretary 
Liang Guoying [2733 0948 5391], provincial people's congress 
chairman Lu Gongxun [4151 0501 8113], and other provincial 
leaders attended the conference as follows: Zhang Weiqing [1728 
4850 1947], Feng Zhimao [7458 5347 5399], Zheng Shekui [6774 
4357 1145], Wan Liangshi [8001 5328 6624], Wang Yunlong [3769 
0061 7893], Cui Guangzu [1508 0342 4371], Wu Dacai [0702 6671 
2088], Wang Wenxue [3769 2429 1331], Liu Zemin [0491 3419 3046], 
Peng Zhigui [1756 5268 0964, Wu Junzhou [0702 0193 3166], Zhang 
Changzhen [1728 7022 3791], Lu Zhengxi [64242973 6007], Jin 
Chengxu [7246 2110 1645], Li Yuzhen [2621 3768 5271], and Zuo 
Xiang [1563 4382]. CPC committee secretaries, commissioners, 
mayors from all the province's prefectures and cities, leaders 
of provincial departments, county CPC committee secretaries and 
county magistrates from all counties, as well as leaders of all 
prefecture and city bureaus, committees, and offices concerned 
attended the conference. 
  In his report, Sun Wensheng emphasized several points 
concerning the province's economic work and reform tasks for 
1994. First, he spoke about economic work during 1993 and the 
current situation in the province. He said that in 1993 new 
achievements had been scored in economic construction, reform 
and opening to the outside world, and work in all regards. These 
were manifested mostly in the following: 1) Sustained and rapid 
growth of the national economy, with across-the-board growth of 
the three major industries. According to preliminary estimates, 
the province's GNP for the year reached 62 billion yuan, an 
approximately 12 percent increase over 1992. The rural economy 
saw all around increase. Gross output of grain reached 9.902 
billion kilograms, up 15.4 percent from 1992 and exceeding the 
all-time high. Township and town enterprise gross output value 
increased by more than 70 percent. Industrial gross output value 
for the year (not including industries at the village level and 
below) totaled 62.6 million yuan, up 11 percent from 1992. 
Tertiary industries grew very rapidly. Social commodity retail 
sales were up 14 percent over 1992. 2) The "three 
constructions." In the important project construction realm, as 
of the end of November, cumulative investment in capital 
construction in the main areas of energy, transportation, 
communications, water conservancy, and raw and processed 
materials production totaled 8.81 billion yuan, and investment 
in technological transformation totaled 2.62 billion yuan. This 
was a respective 37.3 and 34.6 percent increase over the same 
period in 1992. 3) Results were achieved in macroeconomic 
regulation and control, marked improvements occurring in finance 
and banking and fiscal revenue procedures. Overly rapid rise in 
prices was held down, and the province's fiscal revenues for the 
year totaled 6.7 billion yuan, up 16 percent from 1992. 4) The 
intensity of economic system reform increased, substantial 
advances being made. The 14 business decision making rights were 
substantially applied in most enterprises. Pilot projects for 
the transportation of operating mechanisms moved ahead smoothly 
in 100 large- and medium-sized enterprises, the number of 
enterprises instituting internal "three systems reforms" 
totaling more than 3,000. The number of share system enterprises 
increased from 64 in 1992 to 260 in 1993, the amount of equity 
capital totaling 3.5 billion yuan. The Fenjiu Share 
Corporation's open issuance and listing of share succeeded. 
Joint stock system enterprises proliferated in cities and in the 
countryside throughout the province. 5) Achievements in opening 
to the outside world to bring in and use foreign capital were 
rather outstanding. Eight economic development zones are 
operating in the province. The four province-level development 
zones in Taiyuan, Datong, Changzhi, and Fenglingdu signed 220 
project contracts for a total investment of 1.5 billion yuan. 
The province's foreign trade exports earned a total of $634 
million, up 9 percent from 1992. 6) Heartening advances were 
made in linking scientific and technical education to the 
economy, the enthusiasm of scientific and technical personnel 
for making a contribution on the main battlefield of economic 
construction finding further expression thereby. The provincial 
CPC committee and government publicized the experiences of 
Yangquan, Jincheng, and Luliang prefectures in linking 
"agriculture and scientific education." Despite a funds 
shortage, funds were appropriated for the payment of special 
technical vocational allowances to highly qualified 
intellectuals, and to increase the wages of middle and primary 
school teachers. 7) The income of both city and countryside 
residents further increased, peasant per capita net earnings 
exceeding the 70 to 80 yuan increase set at the beginning of the 
year. The per capita income available for living expenses of 
city and town residents reached 1,680 yuan, an 18 percent 
increase over 1992. Peasant per capita income was 718.33 yuan, 
up 14.6 percent from 1992. 
  Second, in talking about economic development goals and the 
work emphasis for 1994, acting provincial governor Sun said that 
in accordance with the spirit of the Third Plenary Session of 
the Fourteenth Party Congress and the plenary session of the 
provincial CPC committee, the guiding thought in the province's 
economic work during 1994 is as follows: to take the building of 
a socialist market economic system as the goal, to seize new 
opportunities for reform and development, to blaze new trails in 
the enterprise system, to expand the opening to the outside 
world, to accelerate structural readjustments, to promote 
technological progress, to continue the further building of the 
"three foundations," to strive to improve overall economic 
returns, to improve further the people's livelihood, and to 
promote sustained, rapid, and healthy economic development 
throughout the province. By way of following this guiding 
thought, the provincial government has preliminarily set the 
main economic development goals for 1994. The provincial CPC 
committee and the provincial government believe that attainment 
of these goals requires adherence to the "three principles," and 
close attention to the "five tasks." 
  The first of the three principles is to give priority to 
economic returns. Attention to economic returns is necessary to 
the operation of a market economy. With reform of the taxation 
and finance and banking systems, and commercialization of the 
specialized banks, a large number of not well run enterprises 
making poor returns are facing a grim situation in which the 
banks provide no loans, the treasury provides no refunds, and 
there are no tax reductions or exemptions. Unless they improve 
their earnings, they are in danger of having to halt production 
or close their doors. This may give rise to social problems. 
Therefore, the more the market economy develops, the more the 
main emphasis in economic work must be on improvement of 
economic returns. The second of the three principles is making 
scientific and technical progress first. With reform of the 
investment system, enterprises will increasingly become main 
investment entities. If they continue to follow the old road of 
expansion rather than internal improvements, not only will 
finding the money for construction become the greatest problem, 
but existing concerns -- particularly old concerns -- will be 
unable to carry out technological transformation. The most 
direct and effective means to promote scientific and technical 
progress is to speed up the technological transformation of 
existing enterprises, applying new techniques to the creation of 
new technologies for the development of new products and improve 
the inherent quality of products. The third of the three 
principles is balanced and coordinated development. The essence 
of the development of a market economy is effective exercise of 
the market's role in the allocation of resources. It cannot be 
denied, however, that a market economy operates blindly in some 
respects. When market signals are distorted, in particular, a 
rush headlong into mass action, redundant construction, and 
blind competition are most likely to occur. In Shanxi Province, 
pronounced problems exist in the production, sale, and 
transportation of coal. Beginning now, governments at all levels 
must pay close attention to the adoption of policies to provide 
guidance and needed organizational coordination measures to 
ensure that output is based on sales and on transportation 
capacity. 
  Next, acting governor Sun talked about close attention to 
the 
"five tasks" in building the province's economy during 1992. The 
first of the five tasks is to make increase in peasants income 
the main goal, making a major effort to develop the rural 
economy. The main tasks in the province's rural work during 1994 
are as follows: to carry out the spirit of the central 
government's rural work conference, to buttress the basis 
position of agriculture, to readjust the province's industrial 
structure, to increase the peasants' income, and to advance 
all-around development of the rural economy. Leaders at all 
levels must pay close attention to agriculture, to the peasants, 
and to rural problems. They must use the spirit of the central 
government's rural work conference as a vehicle for unifying 
thinking. Peasant enthusiasm must be rallied, protected, and 
brought into play. The key issue is paying a high degree of 
attention to the peasants' interests, doing all possible to 
increase peasant income. Township and town enterprises must be 
developed further. Attention must be given to linking the 
development of township and town enterprises with the 
development of three kinds of partially or wholly foreign-owned 
enterprises, private enterprises, and cooperative share 
enterprises, to linking readjustment of the rural industrial 
structure and development of high yield, high returns, premium 
quality agriculture, and linking improvement of the socialized 
services system and the integration of trade, industry, and 
agriculture. The second main task is emphasizing readjustment of 
the product mix and the industrial structure to hasten 
industrial development that improves economic returns. 
Improvement of economic returns and the technical level must be 
the goals. The future readjustment focus and development 
orientation of existing enterprises must be spelled out while 
simultaneously providing active support to the development of 
new industries and dominant industries. Investment in fixed 
assets must be prudently redirected, investment in technological 
transformation increased, investment in some redundant 
construction and low returns capital construction projects 
curtailed, the scale of investment in some projects cut back, 
and priority given to ensuring urgently needed enterprise 
technological transformation. An enterprise research and 
development system must be established and strengthened, more 
attention given to translating research into production. High 
technology industries must gradually become a new growth point 
for the province's national economy. The third main task is 
liberalizing policies to accelerate development of tertiary 
industries. We must make sure that the state, collectives, and 
individuals rise together. Specifically, we must use policy 
guidance for the vigorous development of the non state-owned 
component of the economy. The fourth main task is continued 
close attention to the building of key projects and 
infrastructure. The province's key projects and infrastructure 
constitute the reserve strength for the entire province's 
economic development. The tasks have been set; now they must be 
carried out unflaggingly year after year. In capital 
construction, energies must be focused on key points. Projects 
that are inconsistent with national industrial possible, for 
which market prospects are difficult to predict, and for which 
no investment is available must be resolutely halted. There can 
be no yielding on this issue, and positively no vacillation. The 
fifth task is close attention to fiscal and price matters. A 
firm hand must be taken on fiscal matters at the very beginning 
of the year, tax collection and supervision improved according 
to law to ensure payment of tax revenues into the treasury. At 
the same time, unnecessary fiscal expenditures must be 
controlled and held down. The stabilization of prices, and 
holding down inflation must be given an important place in the 
economy, the degree of increase in retail prices for the whole 
year held within 10 percent. 
  Acting governor Sun also set forth requirements for reform 
in 
the province as follows: 1) Do a good job of dovetailing work 
with reform of the national macroeconomic regulation and control 
system. 2) Strive for marked progress in the six key fields that 
the provincial CPC committee has set. 3) Transform functions, 
actively moving ahead with reform of administrative control 
organizations. 
  Finally, acting governor Sun emphasized that reform and 
construction tasks for 1994 are very strenuous. Smooth 
completion of all the 1994 tasks will require that leading 
cadres at all levels diligently study, update their concepts, 
rally their spirits, do solid work, improve their sense of 
urgency, their sense of responsibility, and their sense of 
mission, and unify and guide the people of the whole province in 
their efforts. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20307 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar021___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PROVINCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shaanxi Industries Show Rapid Growth in 1993 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shaanxi Industries Show Rapid Growth in 1993 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0354A Xian SHAANXI RIBAO in Chinese 15 Feb 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0354A </F>
<F P=104>  Xian SHAANXI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by Liang Xi: "Implementing the Provisions and </F>
Transforming the Mechanisms, Our Province Achieved Rapid Growth 
in Its Industrial Economy Last Year--The Value of Industrial 
Output and Sales Revenues Increased Substantially Over the 
Previous Year"] 
  [Text] In the year that has just ended, our province's 
value of industrial output and industrial sales revenues both 
increased substantially over the previous year, thereby 
constituting a good achievement. 
  Last year, there were fund shortages and the center put into 
effect a series of macroeconomic control policies and measures. 
In such a general environment, our province, motivated by 
Comrade Xiaoping's southern inspection remarks and the spirit of 
the 14th CPC Congress, conscientiously implemented the 
Provisions, making focused efforts to transform mechanisms and 
to resolutely adjust the product mix; as a result the industrial 
economy continued its good momentum of rapid and healthy 
development: For the year, the total value of output of 
industrial enterprises at the township level or above 
provincewide was 56.963 billion yuan, and the sales value of 
industrial output was 54.419 billion yuan; both figures 
represented substantial increases over the previous year. The 
rate of industrial products sold reached 95.7 percent, an 
increase of 1.2 percentage points over the previous year. 
  There were five gratifying changes in our province's rapidly 
developing economy: 
  --The growth momentum of heavy industry was strong. Last 
year the value of output of heavy industry enterprises 
provincewide increased by 20.3 percent over the previous year, 
representing a growth rate which was 4.6 percentage points 
higher than the province's industrial growth rate; heavy 
industry' share of the province's total value of industrial 
output increased from 60.5 percent in the year before last to 
62.9 percent last year, and the increase in heavy industry's 
value of output accounted for 78.5 percent of the increase in 
the province's total value of industrial output. 
  --The nonstate industrial sector grew faster than the state 
industrial sector. Last year, the total value of output and 
sales revenues of collective enterprises in the nonstate 
industrial sector of the province increased by 31.5 percent and 
39.1 percent respectively over the previous year. In this 
respect the total value of output and sales revenues of 
township-run industrial enterprises increased by 46.8 percent 
and 55.3 percent respectively; the total value of output and 
sales revenues of the rest of the nonstate industrial sector 
increased by 81.9 percent and 97.5 percent respectively. For the 
same period the total value of output and sales revenues of 
state-owned industrial enterprises increased by only 10.9 
percent and 11.9 percent respectively. 
  --The amount of foreign exchange created by industrial 
exports increased rather rapidly. Last year the value of 
industrial exports delivered by the province increased by 27.9 
percent over the previous year. In this regard the growth rate 
for the first half of the year was 16.3 percentage points higher 
than that for the second half. 
  --Sales revenues of industrial enterprises covered by the 
budget on the one hand and profits made by those enterprises and 
taxes paid by those enterprises on the other hand increased in a 
synchronized manner. Last year, sales revenues of the 
province's industrial enterprises covered by the budget 
increased by 30.1 percent, while profits made by those 
enterprises and taxes paid by those enterprises increased by 
27.5 percent. 
  --Industrial production and sales of the prefectures and 
cities increased on a widespread basis. Last year, except 
for Tongchuan City, the industrial economy of each of 10 
prefectures and cities in the province increased over the 
previous year; the growth rate of industrial sales revenues of 
each of seven prefectures and cities was higher than the 
provincial average. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20308 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar021___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  20 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PROVINCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shaanxi Economic Communique </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shaanxi Economic Communique </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0354B Xian SHAANXI RIBAO in Chinese 20 Feb 94 p 1, 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0354B </F>
<F P=104>  Xian SHAANXI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by Liang Wei: "The Provincial Government Reports to </F>
All Sectors of Society: The Provincial Economy Grew in a 
Sustained, Rapid Manner, and There Were New Breakthroughs in the 
Development of All Social Undertakings"] 
  [Text] The other 
day Cai Zhaofa, press spokesman of the provincial government, 
reported on our provincial economy and our province's social 
development, pointing out that 1993 was the year with the 
fastest development in the 15 years of reform and opening up. 
  1. Large steps were taken in the various reforms revolving 
round the establishment of a socialist market economic system. 
Rural reforms continued to deepen, and the degree of 
marketization and commercialization of agriculture further 
increased. The pace of the transformation of enterprises' 
operating mechanisms quickened, and there was progress in the 
experiments on the reform of the property rights system and on 
the transformation leading to the adoption of the joint stock 
system. Provincewide 203 enterprises were transformed into joint 
stock enterprises, and the number of enterprise groups increased 
to 54. There was faster progress in the work of fostering and 
building a market system, and price reform proceeded steadily. A 
market-regulated pricing mechanism was formed in a preliminary 
way; the market-regulated share of the province's retail 
consumer goods reached 97 percent, and prices of many important 
production materials were gradually decontrolled. The reform of 
the provincial-level agencies which was centered on transforming 
the function of government proceeded in an hastened manner. The 
reform of the housing system proceeded in a comprehensive 
manner. The reform of the social security system achieved 
prominent results. 
  2. The provincial economy grew in a sustained, rapid manner, 
demonstrating a good momentum of healthy development. GNP for 
the year reached 60.3 billion yuan, an increase of 12 percent 
over the previous year. The gross value of industrial and 
agricultural output reached 97.18 billion yuan, an increase of 
19.8 percent. Agriculture produced a good harvest rarely seen in 
recent years. The total grain output reached 12.156 million 
metric tons, thereby climbing another step. The total oil crop 
output constituted a historical record. New steps were taken in 
transforming agriculture into being characterized by high 
qualities, high yields, and high efficiency. The total value of 
agricultural output reached 21.78 billion yuan, an increase of 
11.5 percent over the previous year. The value of output of 
township enterprises reached 37.2 billion yuan, an increase of 
48 percent, thereby making last year the year with the highest 
growth rate among recent years. Industrial production grew 
rapidly on the basis of the deepening of reforms, the 
transforming of mechanisms, the adjustment of structure, the 
efforts to expand market, and the improvement in efficiency. For 
the year, the total value of industrial output reached 75.4 
billion yuan, an increase of 22.4 percent over the previous 
year; the rate of products sold reached 95.6 percent, an 
increase of 1.2 percentage points over the previous year. The 
gross amount of profits made and taxes paid by the province's 
industrial enterprises covered by the local budget increased by 
27.5 percent; in this respect, profits increased by 78.6 
percent. The outputs of energy, raw materials, and major 
industrial products increased substantially. The nonstate sector 
and relatively less economically developed northern Shaanxi and 
southern Shaanxi demonstrated strong growth momentums and 
increased their shares of the overall economy. The overall 
functioning quality of industry further improved. 
  3. Fixed-asset investments increased rapidly, and the basic 
industries and infrastructure were strengthened. In the year 
fixed-asset investments worth 21.5 billion yuan were completed 
provincewide, representing an increase of 50.9 percent over the 
previous year and a growth rate which was 36.9 percent higher 
than that for the previous year. With regard to a number of key 
construction projects, especially the 20 "revitalizing-Shaanxi 
projects" and the 38 capital construction projects started last 
year, the progress of 22 projects which must be guaranteed was 
accelerated through the enhancement of the fund allocation work 
on the basis of categorizing and prioritizing the projects and 
of clarifying the focus of investment. Other key construction 
projects proceeded in a hastened manner or were under active 
preparation entailing efforts to create conditions that made it 
possible to start construction as early as possible. 
  4. Buying and selling both boomed on the domestic market. 
The 
total volume of retail sales of the province for the year 
reached 27.24 billion yuan, an increase of 14.8 percent over the 
previous year. The consumer goods market moved in a marked 
fashion, with retail sales reaching 24.55 billion yuan, an 
increase of 17.8 percent. Over the year investments provincewide 
in the construction of merchandizing networks and establishments 
totalled 320 million yuan; 196 markets of various kinds were 
built, renovated, or expanded; the number of bazaars reached 
2,587, and the number of financial, labor service, information, 
technology, and other markets increased to 298. A new 
pluralistic situation of large commerce, large circulation, and 
large markets is emerging. 
  5. The opening to the outside world further expanded, and 
external economic and technological cooperation proceeded in a 
satisfactory manner. In 1993 our province held economic and 
trade talks in Hong Kong, Singapore, Xi'an, and Shangzhou on 
separate occasions, producing abundant results. A new situation 
of multilayered, all-dimensional opening to the outside world is 
emerging. Over the year a total of $234 million in foreign 
capital and loans from such sources as the World Bank and the 
Asian Development Bank was utilized. Seven hundred and ninety 
new foreign-funded enterprises were approved, exceeding the 
number of foreign-funded enterprises established over the 10-odd 
years. Especially, cooperation relations with some large 
conglomerates, large corporations, and large enterprises abroad 
began to be established. There was progress in using foreign 
capital to conduct transplantation in and transform traditional 
industries and in establishing joint ventures. Foreign trade 
exports continued to exhibit a good growth momentum. Exports 
totalled $990 million in the year, an increase of 28.6 percent. 
The tourist industry continued to develop its market 
internationally, thereby increasing the sources of tourists; the 
number of tourists from abroad for the year was 458,000, 
generating 500 million yuan in foreign exchange renminbi; the 
two figures represented increases of 8.4 percent and 21.6 
percent respectively over the previous year. 
  6. Fiscal revenues increased steadily, and financial order 
improved. Last year the province's fiscal revenues totalled 6.24 
billion yuan, representing 113.5 percent of the annual budget 
target and an increase of 22.5 percent over the previous year. 
Although fiscal capability remained in a tight situation, 
investments continued to be made in agriculture, education, and 
key construction. The province's fiscal expenditures totalled 
7.36 billion yuan, an increase of 13.1 percent. The financial 
sector made serious efforts to rectify the phenomena of 
unauthorized short-term financing, unauthorized fund raising, 
and establishing unauthorized financial institutions. Within the 
time stipulated, 1.23 billion yuan in incoming short-term 
financing was repaid, and 1.22 billion yuan in outgoing 
short-term financing was recovered. The year-end balance of 
deposits at banks and credit cooperatives reached 61.67 billion 
yuan, an increase of 11.17 billion yuan over the beginning of 
the year. Existing loans of various kinds amounted to 76.99 
billion yuan, an increase of 13.16 billion yuan. 
  7. Further progress was made in such social undertakings as 
science and technology, education, culture, and health. 
Revolving round economic construction, science and technology 
work and education work were characterized by energetic efforts 
to create breakthroughs in important science and technology 
projects and to utilize results of scientific and technological 
research. Over the year 1,368 items of achievement of scientific 
and technological research were produced; of those 216 were of 
high technology and applied technology items. 
  The education sector carried out a series of reforms on 
enrollment planning, disciplinary composition, and the placement 
of graduates. Regular institutions of higher learning under 
local jurisdictions enrolled 11,600 regular undergraduate 
students and technical college students, and secondary technical 
schools enrolled 23,400 students, representing increases of 22.9 
percent and 16.5 percent respectively over the previous year. 
The provincial school-attendance rate for school-age children 
stabilized at above 98 percent. Education input continued to 
increase. Education expenditures authorized by the provincial 
fiscal budget increased by 23.1 percent over the previous year. 
  The health sector made the reform of the medical care system 
the intended breakthrough point. In the rural areas, focus was 
placed on the construction of three things in the health sector 
(county-level disease-prevention stations, women's health 
centers, and township hospitals) and of the three-tier rural 
health-care networks; in the urban areas focus was placed on 
reforming the medical care system, improving service quality, 
and reforming health facilities. 
  Family planning work produced prominent achievements. 
According to estimates, the rate of population growth for the 
year was 11.0 per thousand, a decrease of 1.2 per thousand from 
the previous year. Such social undertakings as culture, sports, 
news business, and broadcasting all further developed. 
  8. The income of the urban and rural residents increased, 
leading to further improvement in the consumption living 
standards. The urban and rural residents' per capita 
living-expense income for the year was 1,920 yuan, an increase 
of 23 percent over the previous year. With the adjustment for 
inflation made, the increase in real terms was 7.8 percent, 
making last year the year with the largest increase since 1987. 
The peasants' net per capita income reached 653 yuan, an 
increase of 16.8 percent over the previous year; with the 
adjustment for inflation made, the increase in real terms was 
6.3 percent, also making last year the year with the fastest 
growth in recent years. The urban and rural residents' savings 
increased substantially, creating a year-end balance of 40.38 
billion yuan, an increase of 22.7 percent. While the urban and 
rural residents increased their income and expanded their 
consumption scale, consumption structure also changed 
substantially, with large increases in expenditures on clothing, 
entertainment, cultural and educational goods, and health care. 
The masses' housing conditions further improved. Over the year 
166,000 urban job-waiting persons were placed, and the urban 
job-waiting rate was kept under 3 percent. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20309 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar021___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  8 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Foreign Exchange Rate System Reform </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Foreign Exchange Rate System Reform </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Features of New System </H4>

<F P=102> 94CE0373A Beijing JINRONG SHIBAO in Chinese 8 Feb 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0373A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINRONG SHIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Li Zexing: "The Basic Features of the New </F>
Exchange Rate System--The Third of the Serial Reviews of the 
Reform of the Foreign Exchange System"] 
  [Text] The 
unification of renminbi [RMB] exchange rates in 1994 was an 
inevitable result of the reform and opening up as well as 
development of our country, and also represented the further 
deepening of the reform of the foreign exchange management 
system and exchange rate system of our country in accordance 
with the overall demands of the establishment of the socialist 
market economic system, marking the entry of an completely new 
RMB exchange rate system into the economic arena of China. 
  A. The Basic Features of the New RMB Exchange Rate 
System 
  After the unification of exchange rates, the state also 
carried out corresponding reforms of the mechanisms of 
exchange-rate formation and adjustment, adopting a unitary, 
controlled floating rate system based on market supply and 
demand. This was an important measure to reform the RMB exchange 
rate system, a measure which was based on referring to the 
successful experience of Western developed countries, on 
international practices, and on a full consideration of the 
realities in our country. The new RMB exchange rate system has 
the following several features: 
  1. Exchange rates based on market supply and demand. This 
refers to the fact that the supply and demand situation and 
exchange rate level on the foreign exchange market constitute 
the main factor determining the RMB exchange rate level after 
the unification of exchange rates. For instance, the exchange 
rate for the RMB against the U.S. dollar published by the 
People's Bank of China on 1 January 1994 was the weighted 
average price of the U.S. dollar on the major foreign-exchange 
swap markets nationwide on 31 December 1993. In the future, 
after the unified standardized interbank foreign exchange market 
is formed, exchange rates on that market will become the main 
basis for the exchange rates published by the People's Bank of 
China. In addition, fluctuations in the exchange rates for the 
major currencies against the U.S. dollar on the international 
foreign exchange market are also an important factor determining 
the exchange rates for those currencies against the RMB. 
  2. Unitary exchange rates. The exchange rates quoted by each 
designated foreign exchange bank independently on the basis of 
the exchange-rate medium prices published by the People's Bank 
of China and the floating range set by regulations will be 
applicable to settlements involving foreign exchange and RMB and 
foreign exchange-RMB exchanges (encompassing trade foreign 
exchange, nontrade foreign exchange, and capital account 
activities of earning and spending foreign exchange), and will 
also be applicable to domestic and foreign-funded enterprises as 
well as Chinese and foreign nationals. 
  3. Controlled exchange rates. This is mainly manifested in 
the macro-regulation and -supervision of RMB exchange rates 
exercised by the People's Bank of China through the State 
Administration of Exchange Control; that is, when there occur 
large exchange-rate fluctuations on the market, the central bank 
should intervene in the foreign exchange market through 
releasing or retrieving foreign exchange, so as to keep RMB 
exchange rates basically stabilized at an appropriate level. 
  4. Floating exchange rates. This is mainly manifested in two 
respects: first, the market exchange rates published by the 
People's Bank of China on a daily basis are floating rates; 
second, the exchange rates quoted by each designated foreign 
exchange bank in its foreign exchange transactions with the 
general public may float within the confines of the market rates 
published by the People's Bank of China and within the range set 
by regulations. 
  The new RMB exchange rate system is based on the taking of 
full account of the existence of the two foreign exchange 
markets, the domestic and external markets, and is therefore 
full of vitality; it is certain to further stimulate our 
country's opening up to the outside world, develop economic and 
trade cooperation and contacts between our country and countries 
around the world, and be conducive to giving greater play to RMB 
exchange rates' role as an economic lever, thereby promoting the 
overall reform, opening up, and economic development of our 
country, and will also constitute an important step toward RMB 
convertibility. The reform of the exchange rate system has been 
widely welcomed and highly regarded by people of various circles 
at home and abroad. In addition, because the state has adopted 
some transitional measures in the transition period, taking full 
account of the interests of all sectors of society, the 
transition has been smooth up to this moment. It can be said 
that the reform of the RMB exchange rate system has been 
successful. 
  B. RMB Exchange Rates Will Be Kept Stabilized at an 
Appropriate Level 
  After the unification of exchange rates, some comrades have 
some doubts, believing that the RMB will devalue in a sustained 
and significant manner. In my view, such a worry is not well 
founded. 
  First, the economic strength of a country is the basis for 
determining the external price (exchange rate) for the national 
currency. In 1992-1993 our country had the highest economic 
growth rates in the world for two years in a row; the steady 
economic growth enabled our country's overall capabilities to 
climb another step. The major Western developed countries place 
high hopes on the Chinese economy. At the same time our country 
has adequate foreign exchange reserves and enjoys a good 
balance-of-international-payments situation, while foreign debts 
are being kept below the internationally recognized safety 
warning line. This is the material foundation for keeping our 
country's RMB exchange rates stabilized at an appropriate level. 
  Second, in accordance with international practices, our 
country's central bank will use economic means such as currency 
and interest rate policy as well as direct intervention in the 
foreign exchange market to regulate the supply and demand for 
foreign exchange, so as to maintain relative stability in RMB 
exchange rates. This is the practice common to all developed 
countries in regard to exchange rate policy. In fact the central 
bank's intervention in the foreign exchange swap markets in our 
country in the second half of 1993 was very successful, not only 
stabilizing market exchange rates but also accumulating rich 
experience on intervention in the foreign exchange market. 
Maintaining basic stability in currencies' domestic as well as 
external prices has always been the main part of the monetary 
policy of central banks of various countries. Our country will 
not be an exception either during the process of establishing 
the socialist market economic system and enhancing macroeconomic 
regulation and control. Currently, not only is the RMB very 
welcome in neighboring countries, but its exchange rates are 
rising. This can also serve as an important basis for judging 
the future trend of the RMB in our country. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20310 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar021___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  22 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Foreign Exchange Rate System Reform </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Foreign Exchange Rate System Reform </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Implementing Floating Exchange System </H4>

<F P=102> 94CE0373B Beijing JINRONG SHIBAO in Chinese 22 Feb 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0373B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINRONG SHIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Jing Xuecheng: "Implement a Controlled Floating </F>
Exchange Rate System--The Fourth of the Serial Reviews of the 
Reform of the Foreign Exchange System"] 
  [Text] According to the announcement by the People's Bank 
of China on the further improvement of the foreign exchange 
management system, the unification of exchange rates, the 
abolition of the foreign-exchange retention system, the 
establishment of interbank foreign-exchange trading markets, and 
the reform of the mechanism of exchange rate formation this time 
constitute a complete framework of reform of the exchange rate 
system. Substantial progress has been achieved in nearly a 
month's time since the unification of exchange rates: first, the 
People's Bank publishes market exchange rates on a daily basis; 
second, the designated foreign exchange banks are all actively 
studying and implementing the announcement, making preparations 
for handling foreign exchange settlements and deposits; and, 
third, independent operators (enterprises engaged in 
foreign-exchange swap transactions) on the foreign-exchange swap 
markets have withdrawn from the swap markets, and the framework 
of transactions between foreign exchange banks is being 
gradually established. Thus, in terms of unifying exchange 
rates, the unification of exchange rates has been basically 
completed in a formal sense; the focus of work in the future 
should be put on observing the impacts of the reform of the 
exchange rate system on various areas and on exploring ways of 
achieving a "controlled floating" exchange rate system. 
  First, with regard to the use of unitary exchange rates, 
during the transition period before 1 April, it is necessary to 
pay attention to the impact of exchange rate adjustments, and it 
is particularly necessary to study the issue of the extent to 
which the adjustments affect the macro economy, fiscal revenues 
and expenditures, and bank credits, thereby affecting the price 
level. Current analyses are conducted under a situation where 
the impacts of the unitary exchange rates on various area are 
not yet clear. In the beginning stage of the reform of the 
foreign exchange system, only by making further tracking 
observations will it be possible to find correct operating 
procedures. 
  Second, in the "controlled" floating exchange rate system, 
floating is appearance, representing a normal phenomenon in 
regard to the trajectory of exchange rate movement and foreign 
exchange trading; but, it is "control" that is the key issue. 
How to do a good job of controlling the unitary floating rates 
so that "they may float but are not chaotic, remaining stable 
amid movement," thereby providing a stable exchange rate 
environment for the growth of the national economy, is a new 
issue facing us. Specifically, if a "controlled" floating 
exchange rate system is to be maintained, the central bank's 
intervention in the market is indispensable. It is necessary to 
study all the practical operational issues, including issues of 
time, location, and mode of intervention (if it is direct 
quantitative intervention, there will be the issue of the amount 
of foreign exchange to be sold or bought) as well as related 
issues of market analysis and of the understanding of market 
psychology. 
  Third, the central bank's intervention in the market entails 
the issues of determining target areas, of the functioning of 
the mechanism of market trading, and of operating mechanisms. 
Unitary exchange rates have resolved the issue of dual exchange 
rates, but have not provided a stable exchange-rate level which 
the central bank must maintain in order to ensure the steady and 
rapid growth of the national economy. Whether unitary exchange 
rates can be stabilized at an appropriate (perhaps only 
relatively appropriate) level depends on whether there are a set 
of indicators used in observing the economy and market and a set 
of market transaction mechanisms which can serve to ensure the 
stabilization of the rates at an appropriate level. Therefore, 
it is necessary to actively cultivate and develop an interbank 
foreign-exchange trading market, making it both serve the 
trading on foreign exchange markets itself and be useful to the 
central bank in its intervention in foreign exchange markets. In 
order to establish a unified standardized national interbank 
foreign exchange market, the People's Bank of China and the 
State Administration of Exchange Control have decided to 
establish the Foreign Exchange Trading Center of China in 
Shanghai; through communications facilities, foreign exchange 
trading centers in all the major cities across the country will 
constitute a foreign exchange trading network centered on 
Shanghai. Furthermore, the central bank will also make the 
relevant rules and, together with designated market 
foreign-exchange banks, conduct actual examinations of banks' 
quoted exchange rates which are based on the central bank's 
market rates and of the appropriateness of the rates used by 
banks in their transactions with customers. Ultimately the 
central bank should formulate a time-point or time-period 
framework of its intentions regarding the regulation of the 
foreign exchange market. 
  Fourth, although "floating" exchange rates only represent 
appearance and form, they still need to be further studied. The 
ideal situation of movement of RMB exchange rates should be a 
situation of some floating in the medium and long term without 
too much floating in the near term. Exchange rates which remain 
fixed for a long time will lose the flavor of "floating," and 
will even become fixed rates. If floating happens too frequently 
and too violently, RMB exchange rates will be in a chaotic 
situation governed by no laws, thereby producing many harmful 
effects on the reform of the foreign exchange system and on the 
development of the national economy. 
  Fifth, to further reform the exchange rate system and the 
foreign exchange system as a whole, it is necessary to carry out 
supporting reforms in various areas. For instance, exchange rate 
fluctuations will result in enterprises facing exchange rate 
risks. All this on the one hand requires that further reform of 
enterprises' operating mechanisms be carried out so as to 
establish a modern enterprise system, and on the other hand also 
requires that our designated foreign exchange banks be able to 
provide enterprises with risk-avoidance services commonly seen 
on the international financial market, such as value-preserving 
forward hedging and foreign currency forward trading. 
  Sixth, the floating and control of exchange rates raise 
higher demands on the domestic money and credit supply, 
adjustment of interest rates, and the central bank's use of 
those means to adjust macro-monetary policy. The central bank 
should adopt different measures to flexibly control floating 
rates in view of different situations; sometimes it should 
intervene in the market to directly affect exchange rates and 
prices for foreign exchange, but sometimes it should pursue the 
root causes or take facilitating measures to provide support, 
raising or lowering interest rates and tightening or loosening 
the retrieval of RMB so as to achieve the goal of "stability 
amid floating." 
  Finally, more detail-oriented work will also be needed to 
improve the management of foreign debts and foreign-owned banks 
and to achieve other objectives. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20311 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar021___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  6 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reportage on Aviation Industry, Reform Measures </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reportage on Aviation Industry, Reform Measures </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0315A Shenyang ZHONGHUA DISANCHANYE BAO in Chinese 6 Jan 
94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0315A </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang ZHONGHUA DISANCHANYE BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Si Da (1835 6671): "Symptoms in China's Civil </F>
Aviation Industry, Countermeasures To Carry Out Reform"] 
  [Text] Frequent Accidents and Poor Service 
  During the past few years, crashes and hijacking of China's 
civil air carriers continuously occurred. This has made people 
doubt the standards of China's civil aviation industry and even 
lose their confidence. The foreign press even rated China's 
aviation industry as the least safe. In fact, the Civil Aviation 
Administration of China really has something debatable in terms 
of flight safety, keeping flights on schedule, and services. 
  -- There were frequent aviation accidents in the past few 
years. The number of accidents even increased in 1992 and 1993. 
In nearly four months from 31 July to 24 November 1992, five 
major aviation accidents occurred in Nanjing, Guilin and other 
localities causing 309 deaths and five passenger planes and 
helicopters damaged. Another four accidents took place in 1993, 
causing deaths. The number of accidents and deaths in China's 
civil aviation industry is alarming. According to statistics, 25 
accidents occurred during scheduled flights in the world causing 
990 deaths in 1992, while the number of deaths during accidents 
of Chinese air carriers accounted for one-third of the total 
number of deaths caused by international carriers in the world 
in that year. 
  If a Chinese air carrier has an accident, the reason for 
such an accident is very seldom made public, stirring up a great 
deal of doubts among the people. Although we should not blame 
the flight crews of China's aviation industry for all the 
accidents, the people's worries about the quality of these crew 
members are not entirely groundless. An official of the 
department of airworthiness under the State Administration of 
Civil Aviation said: "The guerrilla sentiments of some civil 
aviation flight crews is incompatible with the scientific 
management procedure. They are used to do things by relying on 
their experience instead of acting with a scientific approach." 
In addition, the emergence of various regional airlines has also 
brought many new problems to the management and safety of 
China's civil aviation industry. According to a survey, three of 
the crashes in 1992 involved air carriers of China's new 
airlines. 
  -- Incidents of hijacking air carriers continuously 
occurred. As of 26 November, there were eight cases of air 
carrier hijacking in 1993. Among the eight cases, seven air 
carriers were hijacked and flown to Taiwan, while in one 
particular case, hijackers were later subdued on an Air Eastern 
passenger plane on 26 November when the plane was seized and on 
its way to Taiwan. Due to the large number of casualties on the 
air carriers when attempts to thwart hijacking failed in the 
past several years, we have always adopted the attitude of 
attaching great importance to safety of passengers and air 
carriers. Therefore, we do not desperately try to thwart 
hijacking. Meantime, we have repeatedly asked the Taiwan 
authorities to repatriate all hijackers back to the mainland so 
that we can subject them to severe punishment in order to attain 
the goal of executing one as a warning to a hundred. 
  -- Not many of China's air carriers depart or arrive on 
time. According to statistics, 225 flights were delayed in 1991. 
The number of flights delayed rose to 1,319 in 1992 in which 86 
percent of all flights by Chinese carriers departed and arrived 
on time, close to the international average. This percentage 
declined to 81.9 during the first half of 1993, a drop of 10.2 
percent as compared with the same period in 1992. The civil 
aviation industry on the Mainland often gives no explanation for 
its schedule delay. Nor does it offer any compensation for the 
time loss, making the passengers unhappy. The schedule delay has 
also drawn criticism from the media at home and abroad. However, 
due to the fact that China's civil aviation industry has a 
tremendous backlog in construction and it is hard to come up 
with good measures to correct their outmoded practices. 
According to an analysis conducted by a official of the Civil 
Aviation Administration, China's air traffic control system, the 
system of flight detours and that of holding planes in the air 
have caused serious wastes and greatly affected the arrival and 
departure of scheduled flights on time. Right now, the civil 
aviation industry in foreign countries has generally used II-ILS 
[instrumental landing system], but none of the airports on the 
Mainland has met the II-ILS standard. Therefore, takeoffs and 
landings are often delayed whenever the weather is abnormal. Not 
long ago, heavy snow hit Beijing. Even after the snow stopped 
and the airport was open to traffic our reporter's flight 
schedule was still delayed for 10 hours. It was said that the 
pilot refused to take the risk of taking off under such weather 
conditions. 
  -- Poor service. In addition to the quality of flight 
stewards and stewardesses, the poor service of China's civil 
aviation industry is closely connected with the shortage of 
flight crews. There are 13,000 flight crew members for China's 
civil aviation industry with an average of 30 members for each 
plane. According to statistics compiled by the FAA of the United 
States in May 1992, there were a total of 6,083 planes run by 
various U.S. airlines, and the number of flight crews reached 
400,000 in 1900 [as received] with an average of 66 crew members 
for each plane. Therefore, while we criticize China's civil 
aviation industry for the poor service and indifference of the 
service personnel, we have found, after a specific analysis, 
that most of the flight crews for China's civil aviation 
industry work many extra shifts and are extremely tired. There 
was such a saying in China's civil aviation industry on the 
Mainland. A Civil Aviation Bureau official was once on an 
inspection tour of an airline service. He asked a stewardess a 
question: "Why don't you smile while working in the passenger 
plane?" "I cannot smile. I work overtime everyday. I am so tired 
that I want to cry," replied the stewardess. 
  The aforementioned contradictions have greatly damaged 
China's civil aviation industry's reputation at home and abroad. 
Jiang Zhuping, director of the Civil Aviation Administration of 
China, believes that in addition to the poor infrastructural 
facilities, lack of professionally trained people and some of 
the rules and regulations pending further improvement, an 
outstanding problem is the lax administration. Right now, it is 
of great urgency to strengthen administration in China's civil 
aviation industry, he said. 
  To ensure the safety of the civil aviation system and 
improve service, the related units in China have repeatedly 
issued circulars and worked out measures to ensure civil 
aviation safety. In early 1993, the State Council approved and 
distributed the "Circular on Proposals Concerning Civil Aviation 
Safety." Not long ago, Jiang Zhuping, director of the Civil 
Aviation Administration of China, once again emphatically 
pointed out the need to develop civil aviation transportation in 
a safe and coordinated way. He said that to strengthen 
macro-control in China's civil aviation industry, the central 
task is to resolve the issue of structural imbalance caused by 
over-expansion. If there are too many air carriers, they would 
disperse productivity and lower the scale merit. Unreasonable 
and improper competition between different air carriers would 
adversely affect their stable development. Therefore, in 
purchasing more passenger planes, we must take into 
consideration the operational and maintenance capabilities and 
ensure that the ground facilities are able to cope with the 
additional planes. Meanwhile, we must make proper arrangements 
to adjust the flight schedules. Right now, the Civil Aviation 
Administration of China has temporarily stopped to accept 
applications for the establishment of any new airline. He also 
emphatically pointed out: "From now on, those who seek to buy or 
rent planes will have to go through a strict procedure according 
to the regulation, and we will strengthen the control over the 
purchase and rental of airplanes. We will also set up a network 
of training centers to strengthen the training of flight 
attendants to help them improve their services. We have imported 
a batch of sophisticated navigational equipment, and established 
the Beijing Flight Attendants Training Center and the Zhuhai 
Flight Simulator Training Center to improve the technical and 
management skills in China's civil aviation industry. 
<H5>  Low Starting Point, Large Rate of Growth </H5>
  The speed in the development of China's civil aviation 
industry in recent years is eye-catching. An official of the 
Civil Aviation Administration of China, named Liu pointed out: 
There are 38 air carriers in China right now, including 25 
regional ones and 13 air carriers under the direct 
administration of the Civil Aviation Administration of China. 
China has more than 600 civil aviation planes of all types, 
offering a total of 47,267 seats. As of the early 1993, the 
Civil Aviation Administration of China opened up 563 domestic 
and international air routes including 492 domestic air routes 
and serving 110 cities. There are 58 international air routes 
serving 53 cities. There are 13 regional air routes. Additional 
35 domestic air routes will be added between the spring of 1993 
and that of 1994. 
  China's civil aviation industry was placed under the control 
of the Chinese Air Force prior to 1980. Only after 1980, it was 
placed under the leadership of the State Council and under the 
administration of the Civil Aviation Administration of China. 
There are six regional civil aviation administrations. This is 
the first major change in the civil aviation administrative 
system in China. Another reform took place from April 1987 in 
the civil aviation administrative system on the Mainland. The 
State Council approved the plan for the reform of the civil 
aviation administrative system. Its basic train of thought is 
that as government organizations, the Civil Aviation 
Administration of China and its regional branches play a 
supervisory and administrative role. The flight operation, 
transportation, service and other production units form various 
air carriers. They and the airports become economic entities 
which manage their own affairs with an independent accounting 
system for each department or air carrier. Airports in various 
districts have also become independent. In order to cope with 
this situation, six regional civil aviation administrations have 
been set up to perform official functions. In 1993, China's 
civil aviation industry has become more comprehensive and 
established a large number of regional aviation companies. 
  The reform measures taken by China's civil aviation industry 
have made its business booming. In 1992, its air transportation 
volume stood at 4.26 billion ton/km, up 32 percent over 1991 and 
13.2 times over 1978, after it registered a sharp increase of 30 
percent in 1991 over that of 1990. Its rate of growth is 3.4 
times greater than the world average during the same period. 
During the first half of 1993, China's civil aviation industry 
still saw rapid growth in transportation volume which stood at 
2.38 billion ton/km. A total of 15.8 million passengers flew 
China's skies during that period. China's civil aviation 
industry is among the top ten in the world. 
  This official pointed out that six of the 13 aviation 
companies under the direct administration of the Civil Aviation 
Administration of China are key enterprises. They are as follows: 
  China International Aviation Corporation. Its insignia is a 
red phoenix. It has a total of 62 planes with 97 international 
and domestic air routes including 39 international and regional 
air routes. Its assets, volume of sales and profits exceed other 
air carriers in China. 
  China Eastern Airlines. Its insignia is a flying swallow. It 
has a total of 66 planes with its base in Shanghai. It covers 
the whole country and connects China with Southeast Asia and 
Europe. It has a total of 130 air routes at present, going to 
more than 50 cities in the country. It also has regular flights 
to the United States, Japan, Singapore, Korea, Belgium, Spain 
and other countries as well as Hong Kong. Not long ago, a 
Eastern Airlines Group was formed with the air carrier as the 
center. It has more than 30 enterprises handling businesses in 
aviation, tourism, air kitchen, real estate, trading and 
advertisement. 
  China Southern Airlines. Its insignia is a red kapok flower. 
It has a total of 89 planes. It is one of the air carriers with 
more international air routes. The China Southern Airlines Group 
which operates with the air carrier as its center mainly handles 
air transportation. It also handles other businesses such as 
express parcel delivery by air, commercial advertisement, 
in-flight catering service, imports and exports, hotels and 
tourism. 
  China Southwestern Airlines. Its insignia is a roc. It has a 
total of 33 planes. 
  China Northern Airlines. Its insignia looks like a flying 
hawk and also like the rolling Changbai Mountains. It has a 
total of 92 planes. 
  China Northwestern Airlines. Its insignia is a swan flying 
through a sickle moon. It has a total of 42 planes. 
  Because of economic factors, most of the passengers on the 
mainland are businessmen or government employees on business 
trips. Therefore, China's air aviation industry can still barely 
meet the needs of the market right now in addition to 
maintaining scheduled flights. In 1992, the busiest flights were 
those between Guangzhou and Shanghai. There were 4,826 such 
flights, offering 1,033,363 seats. The rate of passenger 
occupancy is 88.6 percent. The next is Guangzhou-Beijing. The 
number of flights totalled 4,166 in 1992, offering 1,006,150 
seats. Its rate of passenger occupancy was 88.2 percent and its 
regular payload is 61 percent full. There were 3,304 flights 
between Beijing and Shanghai, offering 1,130,800 seats. Its 
regular payload was only 43.4 percent full. There were only 830 
flights between Guangzhou and Fuzhou, offering 111,016 seats. 
The rate of passenger occupancy reached 96.3 percent, ranking 
top in the country. The Guangzhou-Fuzhou flights are the busiest 
on the mainland. As compared with the average world rate of 
passenger occupancy of 66.2 percent, it is quite obvious that 
there are more passengers than China's air aviation industry can 
possibly serve. 
  Although the development of China's air aviation industry is 
fast, it still lags far behind the world advanced nations, 
because China had a weak foundation in the past. For example, 
the Beijing International Airport has the largest number of 
takeoffs and landings on the mainland every year -- 68,000. 
However, this figure is only 10 percent of the world's busiest 
airport -- the Osaka International Airport. The Baiyun 
International Airport has the largest capacity for handling 
passengers in China -- 9.01 million, but that of the Gatewick 
Airport in London is 18 million. Therefore, from a long-term 
point of view, China's air aviation industry is not large 
enough. Some related experts believe that a large number of 
Chinese passenger planes are outmoded such as AN-12, AN-24, 
Y-11, Y-5 and Y-7. Some of the planes should no longer be used, 
but they are still flying. In addition, the number of passenger 
will greatly increase, as China's economy is rapidly developing, 
the nation is opening wider and wider to the outside world, the 
people's living standards are rising, and there will be more and 
more foreign tourists. If we do not develop our air 
transportation as soon as possible, our civil aviation industry 
will become a "bottleneck" of China's development. 
<H5>  Shockwave From Regional Airlines </H5>
  An upsurge to establish regional airlines was whipped up on 
the mainland since 1992. This has created a shock wave in 
China's aviation industry. People call it a regional airlines 
shock wave. 
  China's first regional airlines is the Shanghai Airlines 
established in 1985. Right now, there are 25 regional airlines. 
Except for a few regional airlines, large ones have five to six 
planes, while small ones have two to three planes. Some ones 
even have no planes at all. The majority of them render 
passenger services. On the one hand, the regional airlines help 
make more seats available to passengers, while on the other 
hand, they offer competition to the national airlines. 
  Right now, the business of the regional airlines is booming. 
In 1992, the total air transportation volume of regional 
airlines stood at 200 million tons, and nearly 3 million 
passengers flew China's skies, marking increases of 47.4 percent 
and 33.5 percent respectively over 1991. 
  However, the most serious threat to the national airlines 
posed by the regional airlines is their competition for 
professionally trained people. A pilot must finish four years of 
studies at the Institute of Civil Aviation and go through six 
years of flying while learning in order to become a competent 
pilot who can fly a solo. China's air aviation industry is 
unable to solve the problem of staff shortages and help its 
staff members improve their quality within a short period, 
because it takes so long to train professionals. Meanwhile, 
staff shortages lead to fierce competition between the regional 
airlines and the national airlines for professionally trained 
people. Right now, about 150 pilots graduated from institutes of 
all types each year. With the number of intermediate and 
high-level engineering staff included, only 500 to 600 
professionally trained people are available each year for the 
air aviation industry. This is far from being enough. It is only 
a drop of water in a bucket. 
  According to an estimate made by an official of the 
Department of Personnel and Manpower under the Civil Aviation 
Administration of China, a civil aviation pilot's annual income 
including basic pay, flying pay, flight crew meal subsidy, 
comprehensive and frugality bonus is about 14,000 yuan. However, 
regional airlines pay their pilots several times more than their 
national counterparts. This is a tremendous attraction to the 
pilots. This year, there are 100 military pilots who have been 
transferred to work for the civil aviation industry after some 
training. One regional airlines with only one plane, 
successfully recruited more than 20 of these pilots at one fell 
swoop with high pay. Only slightly over 10 such pilots have been 
hired by the large China International Aviation Corporation. 
Engineers and mechanics are also in great demand. The 
maintenance department of a national airline had more than 200 
engineers and mechanics. Over 70 of them left for other airlines 
which offered higher pay. When the Hainan Airlines was 
established, more than half of the Boeing 737 maintenance staff 
working for the China International Aviation Corporation left to 
work for the Hainan Airlines. The leadership of the China 
International Aviation Corporation is worried about this 
situation, but there is nothing he can possibly do for the time 
being. 
  Meanwhile, due to the fact that most of the regional 
airlines only have a few planes, some of the pilots who have 
been hired by the regional airlines with higher pay have little 
chance to fly, causing waste. Besides, accidents are prone to 
occur in newly established airlines, because they have weak 
foundation, less capital and poor operational conditions. In 
addition, they are using outmoded or even obsolete planes. They 
also lack of supervision to ensure flight safety and 
airworthiness. There were three plane crashes in 1992 that 
involved new airlines. 
  A relative department in China believes that the excessively 
rapid increase of the number of airlines has further aggravated 
the structural imbalance in the civil aviation industry and 
brought many problems to aviation safety. As early as the 
beginning of 1993, the State Council, in a document it issued, 
pointed out the need to examine and approve any application for 
the establishment of any airline in strict accordance with the 
regulations, procedure and standards. Other departments must 
not handle such application without the proper authorization. 
Special consideration must not be given to any locality or unit 
that has not met the requirements for the establishment of any 
airlines. The State Council document also stipulated that no 
airplane or helicopter is allowed to take off by any person 
without a license issued by the Civil Aviation Administration of 
China or without a certificate of airworthiness for the plane. 
In order to rationally solve the contradiction between the 
regional airlines and the national airlines, fully utilize the 
limited manpower and ensure maximum flight safety, the Civil 
Aviation Administration of China had temporarily stopped to 
accept any new application for the establishment of any new air 
carrier from July 1993. 
  An official of the Civil Aviation Administration of China 
said to our reporter that right now, the administration has 
worked out some measures to restrict airline staff in switching 
jobs. The regional airlines are not allowed to contact pilots of 
other airlines privately for job switching. If there is a need, 
negotiations should be carried out between airlines to solve 
problems. The national airlines may lease or transfer personnel 
to help regional airlines develop themselves. Flight crews or 
mechanics who privately switch jobs without authorization may 
lose their licenses to fly or do aircraft maintenance work. 
Airline, airport and flight control personnel are not allowed to 
accept side jobs. 
<H5>  Major Adjustments in Airline Ticket Price </H5>
  For many years, China has implemented a system of dual 
ticket price. That is, the officially announced price as well as 
the discount price. Foreigners and residents of Hong Kong and 
Macao buy their airline tickets at the official price, while 
mainland passengers buy their tickets at the discount price with 
the latter about 30 percent lower than the former. Both the 
national or the regional airlines sell their tickets at the 
unified price. They have no authority to change prices for their 
tickets. 
  An engineer who is in charge of ticketing in the Beijing 
Civil Aviation Building said, the official ticket price in 1992 
is approximately 0.5 yuan per km, while the discount price is 
0.31 to 0.34 yuan per km. For example, the officially announced 
ticket price between Beijing and Guangzhou is 0.5 yuan per km, 
while the discount ticket price is 0.34 yuan per km. The price 
structure for about 90 percent of the flights on the Mainland is 
like that. The ticket price for flights between Guangzhou and 
Guilin is slightly exceptional. The officially announced ticket 
price is 0.72 yuan per km, while the discount ticket price is 
0.34 yuan per km. In addition, the price is comparatively higher 
for flights of shorter distances. For example, the ticket prices 
for flights between Guangzhou and Swatow are 0.92 and 0.97 yuan 
respectively, while prices for flights between Guangzhou and 
Chanjiang are 0.9 and 0.94 yuan respectively. Besides, foreign 
residents must use foreign exchange certificates to purchase 
tickets. 
  The dual ticket price system confuses foreign residents. 
They 
are not so happy. This system causes a great deal of 
inconvenience. The leadership of the Civil Aviation 
Administration also believes that this system is unable to keep 
pace with the developing market economy and the opening-up 
program. It makes China's air aviation industry less 
competitive. It is against international practice, and should 
be reformed. In June 1993, the Civil Aviation Administration 
issued a circular to temporarily put the officially announced 
price into effect from 25 June for passenger tickets on 114 busy 
air routes from Guangzhou, Shenzhen and other localities. That 
meant the abolishment of the discount price. Domestic and 
foreign passengers must buy tickets in accordance with the 
existing officially announced price list. Taking the officially 
announced price list for these 114 air routes as the highest 
limit, various air carriers have the authority to give their 
passengers up to 20 percent rebate. The Southern Airlines 
operates on 56 of the aforementioned 114 air routes. 
  On reforming the ticket price system, an official of the 
Civil Aviation Administration believes that China's civil 
aviation industry has begun to follow the international 
practice. It has also given various air carriers even greater 
power to manage their own business. From now on, various air 
carriers may adjust their price list according to market demand 
whenever conditions permit without the approval of the Civil 
Aviation Administration. This encourages various air carriers to 
compete with one another and improve their services. 
  Right now, various air carriers on the mainland have adopted 
measures to attract passengers. The China Southern Airlines has 
stipulated that passengers in group of ten may purchase group 
tickets at a 10 percent discount. A 10 percent discount is also 
given to any passenger who buys a round trip ticket between 
Guangzhou and Tianjin and between Guangzhou and Shenyang. 
<H5>  Structural Reform Is Key </H5>
  Nearly all the people interviewed talked about issues on 
reforming China's civil aviation industry. All of them believe 
that without reforming itself, this industry has no way out. 
Structurally China's civil aviation industry is gradually 
turning the enterprises under its administration into a modern 
corporate system. It is changing the situation whereas the 
functions of government are mixed up with those of the 
enterprises. This industry is becoming more and more 
market-oriented and competitive so that it can set up a modern 
enterprise system. Right now, there are two large civil 
aviation groups -- the Southern Civil Aviation Group with the 
China Southern Airlines as the mainstay and the Eastern Civil 
Aviation Group with the China Eastern Airlines as the mainstay. 
In addition, the China International Aviation Corporation which 
has not yet formed any group because of personnel changes will 
do so in the future. By forming groups, China's aviation 
enterprises would have more power in managing their own 
businesses. To form enterprise groups is an important measure to 
improve the industrial structure of China's civil aviation 
industry. 
  As for the investment system, China's civil aviation 
industry will adopt the form of limited-liability companies to 
raise its funds in society. Regional air carriers are welcome to 
cooperate with and buy shares of main national air carriers. 
China's civil aviation industry will support the various 
localities to build airports, and it will share risks and 
profits with them. As for capital, we may expand the scope of 
business of Sino-foreign joint ventures and strengthen 
international cooperation. Foreign airlines may become 
shareholders of China's air carriers, and airports may be built 
by Sino-foreign joint ventures. Foreign residents may be invited 
to work as managers or consultants in order to make full use of 
their managerial experience to improve management. 
  In fact, China has already attained some achievements in 
opening its civil aviation market and attracting foreign 
investments for its civil aviation industry. By the beginning 
of 1993, the amount of foreign investments used in China's civil 
aviation had exceeded US$5 billion. Some of the funds have been 
used to rent 126 planes and set up 12 Sino-foreign joint and 
cooperative ventures. The first Sino-foreign joint venture for 
China's civil aviation industry is the Beijing Air Catering 
Limited which is a joint venture with Hong Kong. The China 
International Aviation Cooperation and the Lufthansa Germany 
Airlines set up a joint venture called the Beijing Aircraft 
Maintenance Engineering Ltd., forming a base area for doing 
maintenance service to European and U.S. planes according to 
international standards. 
  In order to meet the rapidly increasing social demands, 
China's civil aviation has imported a large number of planes and 
become one of largest buyers on the world aircraft market. 
Since 1992, China's civil aviation industry has taken over 80 
planes, including 65 passenger planes. In March 1993, it had 
again ordered 20 Boeing 737 planes and one Boeing 757 plane. 
  In the early days, China's civil aviation industry had 
already used foreign loans to rent planes. It also used its own 
funds and special state loans to rent 238 large- and 
medium-sized planes from abroad. Only in 1992 alone, it had 
imported 25 planes with US$1.25 billion financed by the 
Mitsubishi Trust Bank, the Hong Kong Ting Hip International 
Leasing Company, the Hong Kong Bark Tat Leasing Company and the 
U.S. Xinfu Company. In addition, China had begun to raise China 
Aviation Funds abroad since last year. The first batch of such 
funds in the amount of US$66.6 million has been secured. 
Securities in the name of China Aviation Funds are already on 
the European stock market. 
  Right now, foreign investments in China's civil aviation 
industry are still limited to the building of airports, the 
purchase of maintenance equipment and the development of other 
infrastructural facilities. For example, the Wuhan Airport is 
built by a joint venture between the Hong Kong New World Group 
and the Wuhan City government. The Xiamen Butterfield and Swire 
Aircraft Engineering Company Ltd, is one with six shareholders. 
The Hong Kong Aircraft Engineering Company Ltd, has a 41 percent 
share, the Chinese side a 29 percent share and 10 percent each 
by the Hong Kong Cathay Airlines, the Japan Airlines and the 
Singapore Airlines Engineering Company Ltd. 
  Nevertheless, China's civil aviation industry remains weak 
in flight control, aircraft maintenance and flight crew 
training. There still exist all types of unfavorable factors in 
this industry. In early 1993, the leadership of the Civil 
Aviation Administration of China had considered the 
establishment of air carriers in the form of joint ventures. 
According to well-informed sources, the relevant departments in 
China are prepared to work out some regulations for the 
establishment of airlines in the form of joint ventures, but at 
the present moment no such regulations have been announced. 
Therefore, China's civil aviation still has a long way to go 
before it attains a spectacular development and makes tremendous 
progress. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20312 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar021___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  15 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Status, Development of Service Industries </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Status, Development of Service Industries </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0336 Beijing GUOJI MAOYI [INTERTRADE] in Chinese No 144, 
15 Dec 93 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0336 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI MAOYI [INTERTRADE] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yu Weixiang (0060 4850 7449), </F>
Institute of Foreign Economics and Trade] 
  [Excerpt] [passage omitted] Present Status of Service 
Industries in China 
  Since the initiation of reforms and a greater opening to the 
outside, growth in the tertiary industry in China has been 
advancing at a rather rapid pace. Many occupations servicing 
production are undergoing rapid growth in the rising industry. 
Occupations in traditional industries such as transportation, 
telecommunications, finance and insurance which affect 
production enterprises to a great extent have continued to 
undergo healthy growth in recent years. The appreciated value of 
these industries makes up about 65 percent of the total 
appreciated value of China's tertiary industry, and their work 
force makes up more than 50 percent of the labor force in the 
tertiary industry as a whole, making it the dominant group in 
the tertiary industry. New occupations in information, 
consulting, advertising etc., are growing. Take advertising as 
an example. Before reform and a greater openness, only several 
score agencies nationwide had the right to advertise, but the 
number has grown to more than 10,000 now. In conjunction with 
expansions in the scope of economic activity, and new 
discoveries in scientific technology, occupations in the 
information and consulting fields have also begun to open up. 
Increasingly, they are exerting an important effect on improving 
the levels of management and decision making, raising product 
effectiveness, and improving the efficiency and creativity of 
scientific research. 
  However, because of problems in the economics management 
system, lack of support in its policies, and other historical 
factors, a proportionately low and backward status is created 
for the tertiary industry in the national economy, together with 
a lack of coordination for it with the first and second 
industries. Not only is development backward in those basic 
service industries such as transportation, telecommunications, 
and public utilities which directly serve production needs in 
cities and towns, the setup of other production services is also 
unhealthy and incapable of meeting enterprise needs. Add to this 
the lack of coordination between operations in the information, 
consulting, finance, and insurance industries with social 
development, the lack of progress in activities that safeguard 
society, the lack of coordination between scientific and 
educational activities with economic construction, and other 
problems. For enterprises attempting to start a tertiary 
industry in such a way, these factors create conditions that 
penetrate deep into the industry's various sections. Moreover, 
the enterprise is expected to shoulder many heavy 
responsibilities such as worker housing, medical care, cultural 
activities, recreation, family planning, education and jobs for 
worker offspring, insurance, safety, welfare benefits etc. In 
summary, the enterprise has total responsibility for the 
workers' clothing, food, shelter, and other daily activities 
from birth till death. Since the initiation of reforms and 
openness, many enterprises have blindly established many welfare 
type services atop the original base to increase worker benefits 
and income. 
  Because of property rights and obstacles in the management 
system, the tertiary industry started by enterprises has chiefly 
been self service in a closed-loop operation, with no concern 
for benefits to society. As the result, the market for 
production services is shrunken, and socialized development of 
production services is curtailed. Socialization of China's 
production services, together with low commercialization, not 
only causes irrational allocation of resources and serious 
waste, but the way enterprises handle their own "tertiary 
industry," and their own "welfare" to form a "large and 
complete" or a "small and complete" entity causes them to 
shoulder some heavy baggage. On one hand, because enterprises 
are unable to obtain high quality production services, product 
improvement is affected. On the other hand, because of a 
structural cancer created by the enterprise taking on its own 
burden of a "miniature society," with too many people sharing 
the same pie, the enterprise's expenditures and management 
responsibilities are increased, making it difficult to 
concentrate on development and production, which in turn hinders 
increased productivity. 
<H5>  Direction Taken by China's Production Services </H5>
  Production services make up an important component of the 
tertiary industry, and their growth and progress follow overall 
development of the tertiary industry. As the result, 
accelerating development of the tertiary industry is a necessary 
condition for enterprise survival, an objective requirement in 
modern management. The focus of accelerated development of the 
tertiary industry should be on those "cross-serving" occupations 
that make up the whole economic service base found during 
various stages of enterprise activity. Examples are those in 
transportation, telecommunications, public utilities in cities 
and towns, etc. The pace of growth in all these occupational 
areas is the sole factor affecting development of the whole 
tertiary industry. It is also the premise upon which stepped-up 
development of the national economy at a steady pace is based. 
Furthermore, it is also necessary to expend great effort to 
develop those specialties such as finance, insurance, 
consulting, information, and various technology services that 
serve specific phases in the enterprise' production cycle. 
Accelerated development of these production services is the key 
to rational use of enterprise capital for efficient productivity. 
  To step up development of the tertiary industry, we must 
step 
up reforms in the present system, as well as the pace of change 
in enterprise operation, to truly accomplish the separation of 
the enterprise from politics and events, so that the enterprise 
can truly be an independent operation that is self sufficient 
and self directing. 
  In the first place, to adapt to requirements for developing 
a 
market economy, fields such as scientific research, information, 
consultation etc., must be taken out from under their respective 
departments to become new social services. They will then 
provide production agencies with timely information on market 
changes, and forecast changing trends in market needs to help 
with scientific decisions and policies that must be made to 
develop new technology and explore new products. Next, the 
dependent "self-service structure" must be separated gradually 
from the enterprise to which it is attached, and be placed in 
the larger tertiary industry market under socialized management. 
By doing so, the burden on the enterprise is lessened, structure 
is simplified, and personnel and expenses are reduced, thereby 
increasing productivity. Third, a protective social welfare net 
must be established to reform the presently practiced health 
care, labor protection, and retirement systems so that 
enterprises can shed the responsibility of these benefits and 
services that should rightly be provided by society. Fourth, the 
pace of economic legislation must be stepped up, various rules 
and regulations strengthened, and a societal system of 
surveillance, auditing, and consulting services perfected, to 
maintain economic order and enforce strict administration and 
execution of the law to assure the healthy conduct of all 
economic activity. 
  Accelerating the pace of tertiary industry development 
provides the important assurance that the goal of continued 
economic growth for China is realized. It is also the 
precondition for establishing a socialist market economy and the 
objective requirement for modern management in the information 
age. At any rate, it is commonly recognized that accelerating 
this industry's development is an enormous task that affects the 
overall picture. In June 1992, the Central Committee of the CPC 
(Communist Party of China) and the State Council issued a 
resolution on accelerating the pace of development in the 
tertiary industry. In his report at the 14th Plenum of the CPC, 
General Secretary Jiang Zemin had emphasized that an important 
indicator in a modernized economy is how a tertiary industry is 
flourishing, and for this reason, we must exert great effort to 
stimulate its rise. The essence of this conclusion also 
illuminates the objective trend in man's development of a social 
economy and changes in social structure, and clarifies the role 
and effect of the tertiary industry in the modern economy. 
Because the Central Committee and the government both strongly 
emphasize development of the tertiary industry, many specific 
policies and measures have appeared, for development of the 
tertiary industry in China to be regarded in a new light. As the 
focus for accelerating the pace for tertiary industry 
development, the "Resolution of the Central Committee of the CPC 
and the State Council on Accelerating the Pace of Tertiary 
Industry Development" mentions occupations in four areas. They 
are: 
  1. Occupations and services requiring low capitalization, of 
high efficiency, quick returns, and high volume that are closely 
related to economic development and the people's livelihood. 
  2. New occupations closely related to scientific and 
technological progress. 
  3. Occupations and services that improve peasant character 
and raise their standard of living, as the tertiary industry at 
the rural level is presently comprised chiefly of occupations 
providing services before, during and after agricultural 
production. 
  4. Comprehensive and innovative basic services and 
occupations that contribute to development of the national 
economy. 
  Innovative services are formed from many different kinds of 
specialized services. As the result, some people refer to them 
as "mixed-type services," whose development accompanies the 
rapid growth of many types of services just described. To adapt 
to the needs of economic development, the direction and goal 
taken by China's production services must 1) adapt to the 
multiple facets of demand; 2) be of high quality; 3) be 
consistent; and 4) lower the cost of service. To realize these 
goals, the service industry must implement six changes: that is, 
to be externalized, organized, mechanized, standardized, 
informed, and systemized. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20313 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar021___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  22 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Industrial Output Value by Area in February </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Industrial Output Value by Area in February </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2203115394 Beijing CEI Database in English 22 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK2203115394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS) -- Following is a list showing the 
industrial output value by area in China in February 1994 
released by the State Statistical Bureau: 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |                  |                  |(Unit: 100 millio-| 
|                  |                  |                  |n yuan)           | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Area              |2/94              |2/93              |Change Over 2/93 (| 
|                  |                  |                  |pc)               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|National total    |2513.80           |2408.68           |4.4               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Beijing           |77.68             |71.42             |8.8               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tianjin           |58.13             |57.92             |0.4               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hebei             |88.34             |86.78             |1.8               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Shanxi            |39.20             |42.31             |-7.4              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Inner Mongolia    |20.51             |21.21             |-3.3              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Liaoning          |131.37            |133.30            |-1.4              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Jilin             |44.19             |48.49             |-8.9              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Heilongjiang      |63.85             |68.43             |-6.7              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Shanghai          |183.97            |185.84            |-1.0              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Jiangsu           |394.21            |357.05            |10.4              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Zhejiang          |169.75            |159.65            |6.3               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Anhui             |70.32             |63.79             |10.2              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Fujian            |60.26             |54.07             |11.4              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Jiangxi           |46.81             |41.65             |12.4              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Shandong          |255.07            |199.21            |28.0              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Henan             |87.71             |90.63             |-3.2              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hubei             |100.09            |93.07             |7.5               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hunan             |59.78             |60.38             |-1.0              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Guangdong         |246.01            |248.17            |-0.9              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Guangxi           |48.84             |47.25             |3.4               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hainan            |6.01              |6.77              |-11.2             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Sichuan           |120.01            |118.59            |1.2               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Guizhou           |17.04             |20.00             |-14.8             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Yunnan            |35.78             |37.86             |-5.5              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tibet             |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Shaanxi           |33.60             |37.00             |-9.2              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Gansu             |24.97             |25.02             |-0.2              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Qinghai           |4.41              |4.25              |3.8               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ningxia           |6.12              |6.61              |-7.4              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Xinjiang          |19.51             |21.96             |-11.2             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Note: Industrial output value in 1994 is measured in 1990s constant yuan.  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20314 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar021___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  23 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Feb Light Industrial Output Value Figures By Area Issued </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Feb Light Industrial Output Value Figures By Area Issued </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2303112194 Beijing CEI Database in English 23 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK2303112194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS)--Following is a list of the light 
industrial output value by area in China in February 1994 
released by the State Statistical Bureau: 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |                  |                  |(Unit: 100 Millio-| 
|                  |                  |                  |n Yuan)           | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Area              |2/94              |2/93              |Change Over 2/93 (| 
|                  |                  |                  |Percent)          | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Total             |1182.86           |1140.46           |3.7               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Beijing           |29.36             |26.35             |11.4              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tianjin           |24.01             |24.10             |-0.4              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hebei             |34.76             |34.07             |2.0               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Shanxi            |8.03              |9.31              |-13.7             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Inner Mongolia    |6.74              |7.27              |-7.3              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Liaoning          |32.90             |33.19             |-0.9              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Jilin             |13.69             |16.30             |-16.0             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Heilongjiang      |18.69             |20.84             |-10.3             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Shanghai          |81.31             |82.86             |-1.9              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Jiangsu           |205.29            |177.88            |15.4              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Zhejiang          |110.08            |102.73            |7.2               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Anhui             |36.11             |33.49             |7.8               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Fujian            |39.33             |34.62             |13.6              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Jiangxi           |20.47             |18.37             |11.4              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Shandong          |123.24            |98.45             |25.2              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Henan             |40.22             |42.20             |-4.7              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hubei             |41.45             |38.67             |7.2               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hunan             |22.95             |24.96             |-8.1              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Guangdong         |165.36            |169.25            |-2.3              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Guangxi           |28.13             |28.46             |-1.2              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hainan            |4.32              |5.32              |-18.8             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Sichuan           |44.89             |47.57             |-5.6              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Guizhou           |5.13              |8.00              |-35.9             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Yunnan            |17.86             |21.12             |-15.4             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tibet             |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Shaanxi           |12.26             |14.35             |-14.6             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Gansu             |5.06              |6.60              |-23.3             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Qinghai           |1.10              |1.00              |10.0              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ningxia           |0.92              |1.40              |-34.3             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Xinjiang          |9.133             |11.73             |-22.2             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 




</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20315 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpcar021___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  1 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> CONSTRUCTION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Report on Real Estate From Construction Conference </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Report on Real Estate From Construction Conference </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0355A Beijing ZHONGGUO SHANGBAO in Chinese 1 Feb 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0355A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO SHANGBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by reporter Zhang Wanlong: "The Real Estate Market </F>
Nationwide Gradually Came To Function Normally--Development 
Slowed Down, Investment Structure Improved, and the Rules Were 
Being Perfected"] 
  [Text] At the recently closed national conference on 
construction work, this reporter learned that the work of 
exercising macroregulation and control over the real estate 
market nationwide had produced prominent results in the second 
half of 1993. 
  Development slowed down. The entire year's rate of growth 
over the same period of the previous year was 14.9 percent lower 
than the first six months' rate of growth over the same period 
of the previous year. In terms of floor space, the amount of 
commercial buildings being built declined by 26.7 percent, and 
newly started projects of buildings declined by 67.2 percent, 
the amount of buildings completed declined by 15.9 percent, the 
amount of buildings sold declined by 22.4 percent, and the sales 
volume declined by 3.2 percent. 
  Investment structure improved. The localities reexamined the 
projects of luxury buildings and projects of high-consumption 
construction which had already been approved, strictly 
controlling the granting of approval to construction projects 
with unclear market prospects and shifting the focus of 
investment to the construction of urban housing. The share of 
housing in the amount of commercial buildings being constructed, 
newly started, or completed increased markedly over 1992. 
  Prices stabilized. In the second half of the year, forward 
real estate prices in the hot spot regions declined by 20-30 
percent over the beginning of the year, and spot real estate 
prices declined by 10-20 percent. Under the situation of strong 
inflationary pressures and a strong demand for real estate, real 
estate prices remained basically stable. 
  Market rules were being gradually perfected. The relevant 
agencies of the central and local governments all quickened the 
pace of legislation. In addition to the national Provisions for 
Land Appreciation Tax and Provisions for Fund and Quality 
Management of Real Estate Development Enterprises, provinces 
such as Zhejiang and Guangdong promulgated regulatory rules on 
real estate development; over a period of time some regions also 
issued such local laws and regulations as on the relinquishing 
and transferring of land use rights, real estate trading, real 
estate evaluation, and standard land prices. 
  The situation with respect to the regulating of development 
companies became markedly more orderly. The companies with no 
real estate development capabilities were withering away by 
themselves. In Guangxi 380 real estate companies closed down by 
themselves; Guangdong terminated 170 real estate companies with 
no development capabilities. At the same time many law-violating 
companies were investigated and actions were taken against them; 
and, in accordance with state regulations, land management 
agencies and financial institutions were disconnected from the 
companies they had created. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20316 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar021___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  6 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC ZONES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shenzhen Economic Zone Readjusts Market Prices </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shenzhen Economic Zone Readjusts Market Prices </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0335A Beijing JIAGE LILUN YU SHIJIAN [PRICE: THEORY AND 
PRACTICE] in Chinese No 12, Dec 1993 pp 51-53 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0335A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JIAGE LILUN YU SHIJIAN [PRICE: THEORY AND 
PRACTICE] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wen Wuhan (2429 2976 3352): "Shenzhen Economic </F>
Zone's Way of Regulating and Controlling Market Prices"] 
  [Text] The Shenzhen Special Economic Zone [SEZ] was like a 
trailblazing vanguard in China's reform and opening to the 
outside world, in developing the socialist market economy, and 
in stepping up modernizations. It was not only first in 
achieving successes in a market-oriented price reform, but also 
gained abundant experiences in its exploration of price 
management through regulation and control under the conditions 
of market economy. 
  1. Direct Regulation and Control of Government-Fixed Prices 
  The method employed by the Shenzhen SEZ was: Prices and 
charges in areas of a monopolistic, scarcity, protective, and 
mandatory character shall still be fixed, regulated, and 
controlled by the government. These include charges for electric 
power, communications and transportation, water supply, urban 
public utilities, primary means of agricultural production, real 
estate, education, health services, and administrative 
enterprises. This is a pattern in which the government by itself 
applies the law of value in regulating and controlling prices. 
In the actual practice of regulating and controlling these 
prices, the Shenzhen SEZ strictly observes the limits of 
authority in matters of price administration as between the 
central, provincial, and city governments. It will rationally 
determine and adjust the said prices and charges according to 
the product costs and expenses in the various lines involved, 
according to the supply and demand situation, also considering 
the average profit margin of social funds, and also considering 
the need for optimizing the production structure. The aim is to 
allow these lines and products to earn, under the conditions of 
normal production and rational operations and services, more or 
less the same profit as the average profit margin of social 
funds, and furthermore to promote the sustained and 
well-coordinated development of all the various industries and 
trades of the national economy. 
  2. Price Management by Regulation and Control of Prices 
Determined by Market Forces 
  In its price reform, one step ahead of others, the Shenzhen 
SEZ has already decontrolled all prices and charges for products 
and labor services of a competitive nature and allowed them to 
be regulated by the market, with the result that prices for 97 
percent of all retailed commodities had become market-regulated. 
In this vast array of market-regulated prices, the SEZ 
government chose food prices, which were of primary importance 
for the people's livelihood and which accounted for over 60 
percent of all retail sales, as its breakthrough point in 
carrying out the said regulation and control measures. It 
effected regulation and control by economic measures, through 
new rules and regulations, and by necessary administration 
means, and thereby, ahead of others, accumulated experiences in 
the regulation and control of market-regulated prices under the 
conditions of the socialist market economy. 
  A. Establishing markets for the trading of agricultural 
products, promoting normal circulation of commodities. To 
establish wholesale and retail markets for the agricultural 
products of the SEZ, the SEZ government instituted unified 
planning, and through the methods of investments by public 
finance, raising funds among the public, loans, and the 
shareholding system, it set up successively large and 
medium-sized wholesale markets for agricultural products of 
altogether over 100,000 square meters in Yuanling, Futian, Buji, 
and other places. It restored or newly built over 100 retail 
markets for agricultural products over an area of over 300,000 
square meters, accommodating over 60,000 vendors' stalls. The 
purpose of establishing these markets for agricultural products 
was not only to enliven circulation, promote production, and 
greater convenience for the people, but also to provide the 
preconditions for fair competition and trading at reasonable 
terms. This is an important link in the establishment of a new 
market order for the whole series of processes, from production, 
to circulation, and to consumption of agricultural products, in 
accomplishing normalization of market prices, and in effective 
price management through regulation and control. 
  B. Using economic measures in the regulation and control of 
market prices. These are the essential measures by which 
government effects macroeconomic regulation and control of 
market prices under the conditions of the socialist market 
economy. They are also objectively demanded by the operational 
mechanism of an economy that works on the principle of "let the 
state regulate and control the market, and let the market guide 
the enterprises." It is for this reason that the industrial and 
commercial departments of the SEZ exert efforts in the following 
ways: 
  First, closely monitoring of market movements, being 
accurately in control of supply and demand changes in the 
market, signalling to the government danger signs in the market, 
and suggesting countermeasures that will effectively control 
prices. For instance, in 1989 the entire city's total demand 
in 1990 for major foodstuffs was forecast as: grain 180,000 
tons, edible oil 20,000 tons, sugar 12,000 tons, aquatic 
products 30,000 tons, poultry 18 million heads, egg products 
12,000 tons, and vegetables 280,000 tons. The forecasts were 
also for the particular seasons, months, and days of the demand, 
and in this way provided clear and definite targets for the 
scientific regulation and control of supply and demand of 
agricultural products in the market, for the development of 
production, for the organization of out-of-town sources of 
supplies, and for ensuring a well-balanced availability in the 
market. 
  Second, energetically developing production, increasing 
effective supplies. Guided by the policy of "developing 
production, increasing supplies, expanding exports," the SEZ 
government formulated a set of "food basked projects" which 
combine concern for the economic development of the SEZ as also 
for the livelihood requirements of the people. It has so far 
established 646 specialized and intensively operating fresh 
foodstuff production entities. By 1990 the entire city had 
become self-sufficient in aquatic products to 64 percent, in 
vegetables to 50 percent, in egg products to 60 percent, in pork 
to 41 percent, and in poultry to 31 percent. 
  Third, opening all gates to the SEZ, enlivening the 
circulation system, and on a broad scale opening up supply 
sources in outlying areas. Production and construction in the 
SEZ is rapidly developing, employees, workers, and floating 
population are all rapidly increasing, and the excess of demand 
over supplies in the market is becoming an ever more significant 
factor. Under these circumstance, the SEZ government is exerting 
great efforts in the development of production and in increasing 
the local sources of commodities, while at the same time ridding 
itself of the ossified traditional distribution system and 
smashing the exclusivity of business operations by state-owned 
commercial enterprises and supply and marketing cooperatives. 
The SEZ is establishing a diversified circulation system with 
many divers channels which flexibly react to changes, with a 
minimum of intermediary links, and with an integration of 
production, supply, and marketing. Under the new system of 
having the commercial and trading enterprises "operate in a 
diversified way but adopting one line as main line of business," 
and of "integrating domestic and external trade, while making 
production, supply, and marketing one well-coordinated process," 
the gates of the SEZ will be opened wide, "commodities are 
welcome from any direction, and people are welcome whether in 
state-run, collective-run, or individually operated 
enterprises," all may participate in the market, to engage in 
fair competition and free trading. On a broad scale, main 
agricultural production districts in outlying areas are being 
interested in setting up commercial enterprises in the SEZ, so 
that commodities from all directions may flow into the SEZ's 
markets and continuously increase effective supplies to the SEZ. 
  Fourth, exploiting to the fullest the advantageous location 
of the Shenzhen SEZ for export trade, developing import and 
export trade, aiming at a balance of supplies and demand in the 
market. Shenzhen is separate from the hub of international 
trade, Hong Kong, by only a bridge, and the SEZ has a unique 
advantage for earning foreign exchange by exporting fresh 
foodstuff to Hong Kong. At the same time, it is also in a 
position to obtain through Hong Kong most rapidly supplies of 
important commodities from the international market and 
information on price fluctuations. The SEZ can be flexible and 
selective in its import and export trade, so as to achieve a 
balance of supplies and demand in its market. For instance, 
early in 1989, the grain market became disturbed, and No 3 rice, 
even at as high as 160 yuan per 50 kilo, was hard to come by. At 
that time the SEZ immediately imported rice from Thailand and 
stabilized the grain market. 
  3. Using rules and regulations as means of effectively 
regulating and controlling market prices. From the viewpoint of 
administrative control, market economy is an economy operating 
within a legal system. The Shenzhen SEZ has therefore formulated 
a complete set of rules and regulations operationally effective 
in its system of wholesale and retail markets. 
  First, the SEZ's rules and regulations for the 
administrative 
control of wholesale markets. 1) Operators must register and 
display their license when operating wholesale markets. 2) 
Wholesale business in agricultural products must be transacted 
inside the market. 3) Market control organs must daily publish 
the commodity supply situation, the prices of the various 
commodities in transactions the day before, so as to provide 
price information for buyers and sellers. 4) Set prices must be 
clearly marked out in the market. None other than legally 
prescribed standard scales and weights must be used. 
Fraudulently cornering the market, hoarding and speculating, 
adulterating and falsifying, and the deliberate forcing up of 
prices are strictly prohibited. Prices must accord with the 
quality offered, competition must be fair, and trading must be 
free. 5) Operators must pay taxes and administrative charges 
according to regulations. Invoices are prescribed, and invoices 
must accompany all commodities transacted, to provide, for later 
linkage with the retail sales, a basis for the determination of 
retail prices, according to the system of having a rate for the 
differential between wholesale and retail prices. 
  Second, the SEZ's method of administrative control of retail 
markets and its system of law-consistent trading operations. The 
SEZ's policy is to treat state-run, collective-run, and 
individually operated businesses equal and without 
discrimination. 1) The trading system is to be one of openness. 
The SEZ prescribes that every retail trader shall install 
himself/herself and conduct trade within his own vendor's stall. 
He/she shall openly display the quantity and quality of goods 
and clearly mark their prices. Transactions shall be fair and in 
observance of the law, and all trading shall be courteous and 
open to supervision. 2) The trade control system shall be well 
documented and conducted with proper bookkeeping. When retail 
traders bring good bought at the wholesale market to the retail 
market, they must have documentation of legal transactions, and 
they shall fix the retail sales prices according to the 
prescribed rate for the differential between wholesale and 
retail prices. They must also strictly keep accounts of all 
transactions according to proper accounting procedure. The 
accounting system shall enable checks as to whether the traders 
have observed all legal provisions. 3) Instituting a system of 
"cards of reputable conduct." To ensure fairness of 
transactions, and to guard against adulterations and 
falsifications, short weighing and arbitrary forcing up of 
prices, every retail sales stall has to prepare at the time of 
any transaction a "card of reputable conduct," showing the type 
of commodity sold, its quantity, quality, unit price, and total 
amount involved, to present to the buyer and the city official 
in charge for examination and verification, as proof that vendor 
has conformed to law. (4) Instituting an administrative control 
system by means of recording negative marks for violating rules 
or regulations. Rules and regulations, as well as penalties for 
violations, shall be publicly displayed inside the market. 
Violators shall be penalized by recording negative marks. The 
SEZ is carrying out its comparative appraisals in an enlightened 
way: those who had no negative marks during one month are 
vendors of excellence, those who had only one to two negative 
marks are good vendors, those with three to five negative marks 
are vendors due to receive a warning, those with five to 10 
negative marks shall be temporarily closed down and undergo 
rectification, those who have accumulated 25 or more negative 
marks during the year shall have their license revoked and be 
expelled from the market. 5) The SEZ instituted a "target 
achievement" administrative control system. This is a mechanism 
of self-control of administrative control personnel. The system 
of job responsibility applies to personnel of every rank 
enforcing basic administrative control of industrial and 
commercial commodity prices in the SEZ. A comparative appraisal 
of "target achievements" shall furthermore be conducted every 
month, quarter, and year, and administrative market control and 
service achievements shall be linked to rewards, penalties, and 
promotions. 
  4. Using administrative measures to control the rate for the 
differential, according to the principle of giving due 
consideration to production prices. This is a kind of new type 
of administrative control method which effectively regulates and 
controls market prices by applying the principle of adding the 
average rate of profit to the cost price. By a rational 
determination of the rate for the differential allowed between 
the prices at which the goods are brought in and the prices they 
are sold for, the Shenzhen SEZ is regulating and controlling for 
a certain time and for certain special commodities the rate for 
the differential between wholesale and retail prices. 
  This kind of control of the rate for the price differential 
reflects the government's conscious application of the 
production price (plus average profit) principle, arrived at by 
making full use of the function of market regulation. It 
enables, on the one hand, effecting changes according to the 
changes in costs and charges, and, on the other hand, enables 
formation of rational purchase, wholesale, and retail prices 
under the restraints of market supply and demand. It establishes 
a harmonious coordination of profit distribution as between the 
various links of production, wholesale, and retail. It has also, 
as a consequence, resolved the irrational situation of "having 
people at both ends crying, while the middleman laughs" and of 
having exorbitant prices being demanded, a situation that had 
arisen after the traditional prices had become irrational, had 
been decontrolled, and allowed to freely adjust. It has also 
enabled control of prices at an appropriate level. 
  In short, after several years of hard work in the economic 
field, and exploratory efforts in the field of socialist market 
economy, the Shenzhen SEZ has achieved excellent results in its 
government's regulation and control of prices. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20317 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar021___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  1 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Five Major Social Contradictions, Rural Unrest </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Five Major Social Contradictions, Rural Unrest </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0163A Hong Kong KAIFANG [OPEN MAGAZINE] in Chinese No 
85, 1 Jan 94 pp 38-39 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0163A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong KAIFANG [OPEN MAGAZINE] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Xia Wensi (1115 2429 1835): "Peasant Discontent </F>
Sparks Riots"] 
  [Excerpts] China today has five principal contradictions, 
so says the Sociology Institute of the Chinese Academy of Social 
Sciences [CASS] in its recent analysis of the social situation 
in China and forecasting of the year to come. 
  First, central-local relations are being tested across the 
board. Second, the war against corruption is facing a serious 
test. Third, the gaps in regional development are widening, as 
are income disparities between the different strata, which has a 
substantial impact on the public psychology. Fourth, there is 
the possibility of serious sudden incidents breaking out in some 
localities. Fifth, law and order is in serious trouble. 
  These five major contradictions, which cause the CPC 
authorities much anxiety, are the very factors that may touch 
off unrest in China today. They also epitomize what is wrong 
with Chinese society at the moment. 
  As far as central-local relations are concerned, the most 
likely trouble spot, if the current situation is any guide, is 
Muslim areas in the northwest. Shaken by riots by the Hui 
nationality in Qinghai in the fall of 1993, Zhongnanhai is now 
very nervous about the situation in the northeast. Its 
instruction to the local governments is that they absolutely 
must do a good job in nationalities work and prevent anybody 
from stirring up trouble in the name of religion. The government 
is scrutinizing what is being said in the press in the Hui areas 
most closely, fearful that the slightest linguistic indiscretion 
would again anger the Muslims and ignite a disaster similar to 
the Qinghai riots. 
  Dominated by the Han nationality, many people believe, China 
does not face the prospect of dissolution in the manner of the 
Soviet Union and Yugoslavia. Yet Chinese history is replete with 
examples of instant disintegration after the demise of a 
centralized imperial authority. Besides, the CPC regime today is 
very similar to the centralized monarchies in Chinese history. 
Will the Chinese mainland remain unified as central power wanes 
and CPC authoritarianism further declines after Deng Xiaoping's 
death? Hard to say right now. 
  The takeoff of the Chinese economy has brought prosperity, 
but prosperity is not exactly the same thing as stability. 
Prosperity itself has spawned new social problems such as 
corruption and the unequal distribution of wealth, all breeding 
grounds of social unrest. The more prosperous the economy, the 
bigger the problems. The Shenzhen Special Economic Zone is the 
nation's corruption and degeneration capital. The officialdom in 
Shenzhen, the ordinary people say, is a hotbed of corruption; 
there is not a single cadre in the city who is not on the take. 
Measured by the charges against the several economic criminals 
whom the CPC has openly executed by shooting, two-thirds of the 
members of the CPC municipal committee should also be killed by 
the firing squad. Then there are the relatives of the cadres and 
officials who speculate in land and stock, making a killing 
thanks to their power and influence. The common people see 
everything and feel bitter at heart. There is a groundswell of 
resentment. 
  In the booming coastal areas, individual-household upstarts 
and bureaucratic capitalists wallow in dissipation and luxury, 
their way of life consisting of the so-called "one big and three 
smalls," that is, "big brother" and "minor wife, small car, and 
small villa." Side by side with the nouveau riches, however, are 
tens of thousands of low-paid workers from the provinces in the 
interior, toiling in factories and experiencing the brutality of 
what Marx called capitalist primitive accumulation. After seeing 
how they lived, a Beijing reporter said it was as tragic as the 
lot of the "indentured laborers" in Shanghai in the 1930's as 
portrayed by veteran writer Xia Yan [1115 5888]. 
  After witnessing the shocking polarization between the rich 
and the poor in the coastal areas, he could not help but sigh 
with feeling, saying he would not be surprised if there occurred 
another round of unrest similar to the Shenzhen stock market 
riots. 
  Owing th the erosion of social values and the gradual 
decline 
of the authoritativeness of the CPC dictatorship, the mainland 
society is showing signs of getting out of control. Law and 
order on the mainland is in worse shape today than in 1949 when 
the KMT was in power. Serious crimes such as car theft, highway 
and river robbery, armed robbery, drug-trafficking, 
prostitution, abduction, and kidnapping have been on the rise 
relentlessly. 
  There were over 70 bank robberies in broad daylight on the 
mainland in the first 11 months of 1993 and 11 bank employees 
were killed. Most of the bank robbers carried firearms. A Taiwan 
businessman who traveled back and forth between two cities 
regularly reported witnessing three major hold-ups by gangs 
within 5 days. He said he had travelled on business to countries 
like the Philippines and India, nations notorious for their 
lawlessness, but had never before seen anything this 
frightening. He said, "In terms of law and order, the mainland 
is about even with the black neighborhoods of New York City." 
  According to the internal documents of the Ministry of 
Public 
Security, law and order has broken down in many border areas and 
villages and at numerous locations along the highways and 
railways, where serious crimes like smuggling, prostitution, 
drug-trafficking, and gang robberies are commonplace. 
  Mainland sociologists predict that social law and order will 
continue to deteriorate as the urban unemployment rate keeps 
climbing because of economic reform and as haphazard rural 
migration worsens by the day. 
  Inadvertently or otherwise, the Sociology Institute of CASS 
has omitted the most serious problem in China today, namely 
agriculture. 
  The most dangerous thing today, both the mainlanders and 
people overseas say, is peasants making trouble. [passage 
omitted] 
  In early 1993 peasants in Renshou County, Sichuan Province, 
staged anti-tax riots lasting five months. This time around the 
CPC regime did not despatch tanks and AK-47 rifles to put down 
the uprising, which was how it dealt with the students on 
Tiananmen Square. Not only did it stress appeasement, but it 
even released Zhang Dean [1728 1795 1344] and Xiang Wenqing 
[0686 2429 5237], two peasant leaders who headed the tax 
protest, but was also forced to take practical measures to ease 
the heavy burden on peasants in the county. 
  It has been said that this was the first time in 40 years 
that the CPC buckled under popular resistance. 
  It had no other choice, people in the know say. Already the 
flames of the peasant movement in Renshou County and neighboring 
areas were spreading. During the disturbances, 17 peasants' 
associations sprang up spontaneously in Renshou County 
overnight. Trouble was also brewing in the surrounding counties. 
Any forcible suppression would have ignited a mass uprising 
throughout the province. [passage omitted] 
  The peasant riots in Renshou County should not have taken 
the 
CPC by surprise. By the time Deng Xiaoping toured southern China 
in 1992, fueling a second bout of "economic reform fever," the 
seriousness of China's agricultural crisis was quite pronounced. 
  In the beginning, reform--fixing farm output quotas for each 
household--generated a measure of short-term prosperity in 
Chinese agriculture. But this was followed by stagnation and 
decline. Reformers were wholly preoccupied with industry and 
investment in agriculture began a steady decline. Investments in 
capital construction in agriculture in 1992 accounted for a mere 
3 percent of all fixed assets investments in the whole country, 
a historic low. Because of inflation, agricultural production 
costs also rose continuously, increasing the burden on peasants 
and causing bankruptcies in agriculture, a bad omen. Reports say 
that villagers in Sichuan Province, long known as the land of 
milk and honey, were so overwhelmed by the burden that they went 
on strike. Peasants in Jianyang County, Sichuan Province, pulled 
up rice seedlings that they had planted painstakingly, declaring 
that never again would they grow crops. Or turn over grain to 
the state. 
  But the peasants' woes are not limited to these. Caught in a 
cash squeeze, the Chinese Government in recent years has been 
shifting its fiscal difficulty to the most impoverished members 
of Chinese society: the peasantry. Consequently, peasants turn 
over grain to the state only to be given IOU's. When the 
children of peasants who have found jobs elsewhere remit money 
home, the post office refuses to cash them, issuing "green 
slips" instead. Furthermore, peasants are slapped with all sorts 
of the most outrageous and exorbitant taxes and levies. Mainland 
newspapers frequently carry reports of peasants being driven to 
commit suicide by drowning or hanging, an entire family ruined 
in the process. 
  Chinese peasants have gotten to the point where they could 
no 
longer continue living. 
  In many localities peasants gang up with one another and 
turn 
to banditry, robbing trains and cars and stealing public 
installations mostly just to survive; one can no longer feed and 
clothe one's family doing legal work alone. There is a village 
in Sichuan inhabited by poor peasants. Driven by poverty, the 
peasants dug some big holes on the highway, making it impassable 
by car. Only when the drivers paid a toll did they fill up the 
holes and let the cars go through. 
  Leaders of the CPC, including Jiang Zemin [3068 3419 3046], 
inspected the countryside in 1992. What they saw made them 
tremble with fear and gave them many a sleepless night. 
Reportedly they asked the peasants, "What do you need?" Answer: 
"Chen Sheng [7115 0524] and Wu Guang [0702 1639]." Asked what 
they would like to do, the peasants said, "Sweep Li Zicheng's 
[2621 5261 2052] grave." 
  Peasant riots in Renshou County may very well be the 
harbinger of a more extensive peasant uprising in the future. 
Experts on the Chinese peasantry note that sporadic peasant 
disturbances are now springing up all over China. [passage 
omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20318 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar021___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  6 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SOCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Eight `Components' Of Propertied Class </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Eight `Components' Of Propertied Class </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0163B Shanghai SHEHUI [SOCIETY] in Chinese No 108, Jan 
94 pp 22-24 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0163B </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai SHEHUI [SOCIETY] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Gu Wen (1324 5113): "Propertied Class On the </F>
Rise"] 
  [Excerpts] [Passage omitted] 
  A booming private economy, a large infusion of foreign 
capital, and the marriage between them and the market system 
have inevitably led to widening income gaps, hence the emergence 
of a host of property owners of substantial means. We call this 
segment of the Chinese economy the "propertied class" and 
propose to identify its components. 
  The first component consists of home-grown individual 
households. Starting with next to nothing, a large number of 
self-employed individuals in China have prospered in recent 
years. As the unemployed or people waiting for employment, they 
were the objects of pity of the salaried society in the early 
1980's, only to become the first batch of beneficiaries of 
reform thanks to a historic opportunity. Formerly "speculators" 
and "profiteers" who transported goods long distances for sale, 
they gradually accumulated enough capital to open a restaurant 
or a clothing store, or to go into business retailing textiles 
made of chemical fibers. Women who once sold eggs now sit right 
next to the counter to keep an eye on video game machines 
nearby. After making a fortune doing business in a small way, a 
number of individual households became more ambitious as their 
wallets expanded and set their sights on television sets, 
recorders, electric fans, refrigerators, even computers. In the 
city where I live, all five electrical appliance stores that 
opened for business in 1992 are run by individual households. 
More recently, encouraged by the speeches made by Deng Xiaoping 
as he toured the south, individual households began flexing 
their economic muscle almost overnight. Individual households 
from Wenzhou head north to the Sino-Russian border and south to 
where China abuts Myammar and Vietnam to participate in border 
trade. Their counterparts from Jiangsu and Zhejiang march into 
Sichuan and line the roads there with gas stations, sinking tens 
of thousands, even hundreds of thousands, of yuan into the 
business. The area is so heavily dotted with gas stations that 
the eye cannot take them all in. According to the latest survey 
by the State Statistics Bureau, about 20 percent of urban and 
rural households are high-income households earning over 10,000 
yuan a year, including 5.30 million households who make more 
than 50,000 yuan annually. Perhaps man is a born economic 
animal. These people, previously referred to by political 
economists as the "lumpen-proletariat" (in Marx's words), are 
reinvesting the enormous wealth they have accumulated instead of 
spending it to build houses to live in. That way they steered 
clear of the possibility of becoming mere big-time consumers and 
instead turned themselves into owners of capital goods. No doubt 
the moment an individual householder who used to do everything 
himself opens a store, hires help, and is addressed as "boss" by 
his employees, he crosses the threshold into the "propertied 
class." 
  The second component consists of township and town 
enterprise 
shareholders. The township enterprise is a form of enterprise 
unique to China. Most of these enterprises are built with funds 
raised by peasants and manned by peasants hired to do the job. 
Typically a township enterprise has only a few major 
shareholders, three to five perhaps. The ownership of a major 
stake in the enterprise distinguishes the major shareholders 
from the ordinary peasants whose investment can be anywhere from 
100 yuan to 1,000 yuan and even more from the larger number of 
peasants who are paid for their labor. They hold managerial and 
distribution power and own the capital goods. As such they 
belong in the "propertied class." 
  The third component consists of capital owners from 
overseas. 
After reform went under way and the open policy was introduced, 
China in reality is no longer an unadulterated socialist 
economy, with all forms of capital from overseas penetrating 
into the mainland economy. Whether they are involved in 
Sino-foreign joint ventures, Sino-foreign contractual joint 
ventures, or wholly foreign-funded enterprises, these overseas 
investors must be considered card-carrying members of the 
capitalist class, something that absolutely nobody would 
disagree with. This is so even though some of them are red 
capitalists and even though their capital does not take the form 
of funds but technology and intellectual property rights. They 
hold overseas passports but are part of the propertied class in 
the mainland's society and economy. 
  The fourth component consists of shareholders of state 
enterprises other than the state. As state enterprises adopted 
the shareholding system and as the state issued shares on a 
large scale, reserving only enough to maintain its controlling 
shareholder status, more and more state enterprise shares find 
their way into the hands of private individuals. Assuming that 
the state needs to own just 25 percent of the stock of an 
enterprise to be the controlling shareholder, as some economists 
estimate, then 75 percent of the shares are in the ownership of 
non-state shareholders. This proportion represents a substantial 
amount of money. Should the state decide to sell off a number of 
small enterprises and declare some mismanaged enterprises 
bankrupt and auction them off, then the state will own an even 
smaller percentage of the stock. Taking up the slack is foreign 
capital, as noted above. In addition, most of the shares will 
become the capital of private enterprises and township and town 
enterprises and the incomes and, subsequently, the capital of 
individual households and the salaried class. The owners of 
private enterprises and township and town enterprises, 
individual households, and wage-earning employees who own a 
substantial number of shares have also joined the ranks of the 
propertied class by virtue of their ownership of a large number 
of shares. It must be made clear in passing that there is a 
point at which a difference in degree becomes a difference in 
kind. It would be absurd to lump together with the propertied 
class a salaried worker who has purchased 100 or even 1,000 yuan 
worth of shares. If, on the other hand, the income he derives 
from the shares he owns exceeds his wage, it is clear where he 
belongs. 
  The fifth component consists of idle profiteers. There is 
gradually emerging in China a class of jobless idlers who do 
nothing decent all day but are kept alive by deposits and bonds 
worth more than tens of thousands of yuan, reaping a bonanza of 
interest and dividends. Although these assets are not on the 
surface direct capital-goods capital, they benefit from the 
redistribution of production profits in the form of short-term 
loans. Accordingly these assets are no longer ordinary wealth 
but financial capital. This class of profiteers who live off 
assets should rightly be included in the propertied class. 
  The sixth component consists of celebrities in the movie, 
television, cultural, and sports communities who have parlayed 
their fame into capital. As an intangible asset, fame has made 
some individuals enormously wealthy. Already there are dozens of 
singers who command 10,000 yuan per concert appearance at home. 
Every Olympic gold medalist is a millionaire. A leading actor 
has now accumulated a fortune exceeding billions of yuan, 
rivaling that of some rich women in Hollywood. True to form, 
such wealth is promptly converted into capital. Some goes into 
advertising to finance the expanded reproduction of fame. Some 
is directly invested in industrial and commercial real estate to 
earn production profits. Typical of this group are such 
celebrities as Li Ning [2621 1337], Liu Xiaoqing [0491 2556 
1987] and Zhan Rong [3277 1369]. They too are members of the 
propertied class. 
  The seventh component comprises scientific and technical 
[S&amp;T] workers who transform knowledge into productive 
forces. By 
patenting their inventions and innovations and selling them to 
the highest bidders, or by entering into cooperative schemes 
directly with a production unit to turn their inventions and 
innovations into commodities, S&amp;T workers have reaped a 
windfall. Because of the government's drive to develop primary 
productive forces, the ranks of S&amp;T personnel who 
successfully 
marry knowledge with commercialization will only continue to 
swell. The realization of wealth drives home the actualization 
of value and also motivates them to pursue even more wealth. The 
most successful among them have been elevated into the 
propertied class. 
  The eighth component is made up of administrative officials 
who abuse their office for personal gains. Although discipline 
inspection, supervision, and oversight by public opinion have 
kept administrative departments as honest as possible, there are 
still some administrative officials, particularly leading 
cadres, who have amassed considerable properties by abusing 
their office. Insiders say that some leaders stand to receive 
thousands of yuan, even 10,000 yuan, in cash in bribes, gifts, 
and bonuses at year end. After being ensconced in top jobs for 
years, some as long as a dozen years, a number of bureaucrats 
have stashed away a fortune made up of all sorts of dubious 
incomes. They too are members of the propertied class, their 
passport to that club being their official positions. 
  [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20319 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar021___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  1 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY, PUBLIC SECURITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Special Police School Demonstrates Skills </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Special Police School Demonstrates Skills </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0180A Beijing ZHONGGUO KONGJUN [CHINESE AIR FORCE] in 
Chinese No 1, 1 Feb 94 pp 26-27 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0180A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO KONGJUN [CHINESE AIR FORCE] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by People's Armed Police Correspondents Jiang </F>
Zishen (5261 3947), Liu Lixian (0491 4539 3759), and Bie Qinglin 
(0446 1987 2651): "Fine Showing of Special Police. On-Site 
Sidelights on Special People's Armed Police Unit Military 
Training Demonstration"] 
  [Text] This is a stirring scene. This is a never-to-be 
forgotten moment. 
  On the morning of 19 September 1993, many leading comrades 
drive cars to the Special Police Academy of the People's Armed 
Police [PAP] to view a demonstration of PAP military training 
results. On this occasion, the PAP, a sword that has been 
hardened for the past 10 years, is undergoing rigorous 
examination by the party and the people. 
<H8>  I </H8>
  At exactly 0900 hours, on command from PAP Chief-of-Staff Wu 
Shuangzhan [0702 7175 2069], the military training demonstration 
begins with the national flag raising ceremony. To the rousing 
strains of "Sing in Praise of the Motherland," played by the PAP 
band, a contingent of flag escorts in dress uniform and carrying 
semi-automatic rifles closely accompanies three soldiers bearing 
flags as they goosestep across the rostrum. 
  The Chinese people are renowned throughout the world as a 
nation devoted to ceremony. A march-past, the firing of a gun 
salute, and, the escorting of foreign guests are the three main 
events making up the PAP salute to the troops and welcoming of 
the guests. The PAP honor guard enters the grounds to the 
stirring sound of the military band. 
  "Boom, boom..." Volley after volley of gunfire resounds, 
directing the eyes of those present to the left front of the 
exhibition grounds. Gun salute troops from the Eleventh Zhidui 
[regiment] of the Beijing Zongdui [corps] have now begun the gun 
salute. This unit was founded in 1984. Since the firing of its 
first gun salute on 23 March of the same year during the visit 
to China of Japanese Prime Minister Nakasone, it has 
successfully completed the firing of 238 gun salutes to welcome 
guests. Today, the gun salute troops are firing a 21-gun salute, 
the highest welcoming ceremony for foreign guests, to welcome 
the arrival of all the leaders. Within the short period of 1 
minute 28 seconds, from the beginning to the end of the national 
anthem, it unerringly fires 21 volleys, each volley being fired 
simultaneously by four ceremonial guns. 
  As the thunderous sound reverberates across the land, a 
powerful motorcycle cavalry spreads its wings and soars. At 0915 
hours, the national guest escort appears on the exhibition 
grounds amidst the roar of motorcycles. All that is visible is 
imposing people's armed police driving white motorcycles to the 
left and right as they escort the vehicles carrying the foreign 
guests in a speedy entrance. During the nine years since the 
founding of this People's Armed Police contingent, which 
combines security and ceremonial escort functions into one, it 
has safely escorted heads of state, government leaders, and 
leaders of political parties in power from 152 nations in 
outstanding completion of its escort duties. 
<H8>  II </H8>
  Volley after volley of rifle fire cracks. At 0929 hours, a 
dramatic demonstration begins in which Model 81 automatic rifles 
fire at targets on which Chinese characters face away from the 
audience. First four sharpshooters from the Special Police 
School, Wang Zhiwei, Mao Xiaodong, He Liming, and Hu Bo, came to 
the field. "Pop, pop, pop." With each crisp rifle shot, the 
words, "politically qualified, militarily accomplished, fine 
work style, strict discipline, and strong support" pop into view 
on the target in 20 large resplendent characters. These are 
Chairman Jiang Zemin's main requirements for building the armed 
forces. 
  The next item in the dramatic demonstration is on truncheon 
and shield technique and boxing. These two subjects, which are 
demonstrated by the Thirteenth Detachment of the Beijing 
Headquarters Group and the People's Armed Police School, fully 
show the solid basic skills of People's Armed Police military 
training. The 20 basic fighting methods and the five offensive 
and defensive actions that the truncheon and shield contingent, 
made up of 216 men from the Thirteenth Detachment, demonstrates, 
shows an attack that sweeps everything before it like a 
hurricane, and a defense that is like a steel Great Wall. The 
fisticuffs technique that the 60-man special police personnel 
collectively demonstrate consists of very powerful battle-tested 
fighting techniques that the Special Police School has absorbed 
in the course of training from the essence of Chinese martial 
arts and the fisticuffs of all countries. They blend offensive 
and defensive techniques into a whole. Using their fists and 
feet, the action is determined and lively. 
  A women's performance where no men are allowed. The 
performance of the Women's Enemy-Capturing Contingent from the 
Sichuan Headquarters attracts particular attention. In a 
one-on-one performance of capturing an enemy, young soldier 
Zhang Ying faces a club wielding young man who is half again as 
tall as herself Using the fighting skills for making a capture 
that she learned in regular training, with cunning, she manages 
to knock the "villain" to the ground in less than three 
maneuvers. 
  The firing of Model 81 automatic rifles to designated parts 
of the human body brings the feelings of the spectators to a 
high pitch. From a distance of 100 meters, Five sharpshooters 
headed by Di Lin from the special police school aim at the 
targets, awaiting a command from the commander. 
  "The villain is trying to fight back. Hit him in the 
forearm." 
  "The villain is still fighting. Hit him in the chest." 
  "....." 
  With each command from the commander, the five sharpshooters 
fire, each shot hitting the part of the body they are directed 
to hit. 
  Firing of the machine gun in bursts is a tough part of the 
contingent's training. Comrades from the military training and 
research office of the Tianjin Group Command School devoted 3 
years study to this problem finally solving it. On the 
exhibition ground, two machinegunners fire at 15 steel plate 
targets from a distance of 100 meters. The rifle fire goes 
"bang, bang, bang,' and within 5 seconds all the targets are hit 
in 30 places. Immediately, enthusiastic applause breaks out on 
the exhibition ground. One leading comrade says, "It is not 
easy. The light machine gun that squads use does not do a good 
job, but the People's Armed Police troops are good shots!" 
  The light machine gun precision rapid firing that the Anhui 
Headquarters Group shows opens the spectators' eyes even more. 
Six people including school police officer Ding Jiatie, each 
fire 100 rounds at a human chest target from 100 meters. After 
the firing ends, the range officer presents the target for 
examination to the leaders on the exhibition grounds. 
  "Target number 1 hit with 100 rounds." 
  "Target number 2 hit with 100 rounds." 
  ... 
  "Good shooting, good shooting." 
  "Beep." With the sound of its horn, a long distance bus 
drives into a station. Four "criminals" mingle with the 
passengers and board the bus. As soon as the bus starts to move, 
the "criminals" suddenly fire their weapons to hijack the bus. 
The lives and property of the passengers are in serious danger. 
  This is a tactical exercise conducted against a backdrop of 
real warfare. When our people's armed police detachment 
patrolling the highway discovers what the "criminals" have done, 
at once they notify headquarters via walkie-talkie. Immediately, 
a truck bearing local government license plates, and two Model 
130 trucks appeared behind the bus. The officers and men of a 
Special Police combat company were under orders to remain in the 
vehicle as they began to subdue the "criminals" and rescue the 
hostages. 
  The hijacked bus speeds along rapidly, our special police 
unit personnel in hot pursuit. When the bus reaches a relatively 
wide spot in the road, the lead truck suddenly overtakes it and 
brakes suddenly across the road ahead of it. When the bus driver 
instinctively brakes his vehicle, the two Model 130 trucks speed 
to the right sight of the bus. The special police detachment 
personnel leap from under the canvas top, smash some windows in 
the bus, and rush inside, capturing alive all four of the 
"criminals" as swiftly as a thunder clap that leaves no time for 
covering one's ears. All the hostages are released with no 
injury to any of our special police detachment personnel. No 
sooner does this intense battle end than the curtain opens on a 
battle to rescue hostages from a residential area . 
  Seven "criminals" who had stolen a large sum of money, 
rifles 
and ammunition hijack a white van, which they are using to flee 
helter-skelter. Along the way, the van breaks down. To prevent 
the police from capturing them, the "criminals" place obstacles 
in the road including the van and lane separators, and set fire 
to them. Then, they flee to a residential apartment where they 
seized several people as hostages in the hope of being able to 
escape. As soon as our special police detachment receives the 
report, it immediately organizes four combat teams, which 
approach the apartments separately. Our riot prevention 
personnel fire a tear gas shell from within the riot prevention 
armored personnel carrier. The tear gas shell explodes in the 
room where the "criminals" are hiding, and white smoke gushes 
forth at once. Our combat team personnel, some of them following 
the downspout and others using rope, scale the building like 
geckos, leap into the room, and pin the "criminals" in a corner 
with firepower, seizing four of them alive. Another two 
"criminals" flee the building in an effort to escape. Our 
assault team personnel immediately set loose two watchdogs, 
which bring the "two criminals" to the ground in the twinkling 
of an eye. 
  A roar of motors as the iron cavalry soars. The skilled 
motorcycle driving of the Guangdong Police Headquarters brings 
the exhibition to a high pitch. Six people's armed police headed 
by Gao Xueping, drive their iron cavalry motorcycles at high 
speed across a single plank and soar across a 1.5 meter high 
platform. 
  "Next is flying across a short bridge. The bridge is 3.5 
meters high, 3 meters wide, and 7 meters long. This simulates 
obstacles that might be set up in search and destroy combat..." 
After hearing the announcer's briefing, the leading comrades on 
the rostrum put their binoculars to their eyes to watch this 
daring performance. 
  "Varoom, varoom." As the detachment members open the 
throttle, the motorcycles issues an ear-splitting noise. Then, 
six motorcycles fly toward the cut off bridge at lightening 
speed. The instant their front wheel hit the cut off bridge, 
they zoom into the air in an arc, then land safely on another 
cut off bridge 7 meters distant. Whew! They are like tigers 
vaulting a ravine or like a rainbow arching through the sky. The 
leading comrades on the rostrum are overwhelmed by the 
exceptional skills of the soldiers. They put down their 
binoculars and applaud warmly. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20320 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar021___94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-021 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  6 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Cross-Strait Trade Policies Analyzed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Cross-Strait Trade Policies Analyzed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0330A Hong Kong CHING PAO [THE MIRROR] in Chinese No 2, 
5 Feb 94, pp 80-81 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0330A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong CHING PAO [THE MIRROR] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Liu Fang (2692 5302): "Developmental Trends of </F>
Taiwan-Mainland Trade"] 
  [Text] This year, it is estimated that Taiwan will 
implement more flexible trading policies in its economic and 
commercial policies, while continuing to be more restrictive on 
investment. But due to the working of the "profit principle," it 
will be difficult to halt the trend of Taiwan businessmen 
investing on the mainland of China. 
<H5>  Will Taiwan implement more flexible economic and commercial </H5>
policies regarding Mainland China? 
  At the beginning of the new year, word spread out from the 
island of Taiwan that more flexible economic and commercial 
policies would be implemented; but at the same time, it was said 
that the Taiwan government was vigorously implementing a "going 
to Southeast Asia policy," encouraging manufacturers and 
businessmen to develop the Southeast Asia market. Indeed, what 
changes in economic and commercial policies regarding Mainland 
China will the Taiwan government implement? What economic and 
commercial developments will the next year bring? 
  First of all, let us look at this news of "flexible 
restriction." Not long after the new year, the International 
Trade Bureau of the Taiwan Economic Department leaked the news 
that "Means of Permitting Trade Between Taiwan and the People's 
Republic of China" was completed. What most inspired economic 
circles on both sides of the straits was the permission planned 
to open the Taiwan market completely to mainland goods within 
two years at the outside. At that time, the methods for "listing 
negative factors and forbidding exceptions" for mainland goods 
will go into effect. 
  This will change the current method of importing mainland 
goods which requires an import license examined and issued by 
the National Trade Bureau. In the initial stage, there will be a 
change to a visa issued by an authorized; in the second stage, 
there will be a change to "listing negative factors," then 
gradually moving into free trade. 
  These revisions were acclaimed by Taiwan trade officers, for 
this way Taiwan can treat Mainland China as a general trade 
region, and implement administrative measures similar to those 
of other general regions. The government's role will change from 
administering, examining, and issuing licenses to helping 
manufacturers and businessmen develop markets. 
  Before this, the Taiwan Economic Minister Chiang Ping-k'un 
[3068 0014 0981] made public a proposal to "ship across the 
strait at fixed ports," a plan that would have "Kaohsiung 
correspond to Hsiamen," and "Fuzhou correspond to Keelung," with 
the goods in Taiwan's cross-strait trade shipped directly to cut 
costs. 
  These proposals and the manner of the Taiwan Economic 
Ministry have attracted considerable attention, not just on the 
island, but also across the strait, and throughout the entire 
worldwide Chinese community as well. It is believed that 
implementation of these measures would definitely go a long way 
toward promoting cross-strait economic and commercial ties, and 
even develop cross-strait relationships. 
<H5>  Encourage Mainland China's economy and commerce "going to </H5>
Southeast Asia" 
  In fact, these proposals were made as early as last 
November. 
At that time, when the Taiwan Economic Ministry held informal 
discussions with representatives of the enterprise community, 19 
countermeasures were raised to promote cross-strait economic and 
commercial communication: 1) Resolve "economic problems" by 
"economic means," to help entrepreneurs "cut costs" and "develop 
markets" through use of a market operations system. 2) Allow 
manufacturing and commercial units fix plans, allow 
entrepreneurs master the plans by themselves with government 
assisting by furnishing essential capital and information. 3) 
Reduce the number of "forbidden items" in Mainland China 
investment, and expand the scope of the "types of investment 
requiring special examination." 4) Let "trade associates" help 
entrepreneurs expand their businesses. 5) Give total support to 
entrepreneurs who have achievements in industrial promotion. 6) 
Encourage relevant government officials to conduct on-site 
inspections of the mainland market. 7) Open up mainland bank 
business operations by financial organizations. 8) Open up, as 
early as possible, the policy of allowing mainland economic and 
commercial businessmen to come to Taiwan. 9) Widen the door for 
importing mainland semi-finished products to Taiwan. 10) 
Appropriately open up the allowance for Mainland China 
investment projects and technical cooperation. 11) Let the 
General Industry Association organize a general Taiwan 
commercial association for investing on the mainland. 12) 
Promote the rights and interests of Taiwan business through 
people-to-people industrial and commercial groups. 13) Suggest 
that both sides negotiate intellectual property protection 
agreements. 14) As early as possible, enact legislation 
protecting the investment rights and interests of Taiwan 
businessmen, and list Taiwan businessmen's life and property 
insurance in cross-strait investment protection agreements. 15) 
Work towards allowing the mainland government to set up as soon 
as possible a mediation agreement system for cross-strait 
economic and commercial disputes. 16) Allow Taiwan businessmen 
to establish people-to-people economic and commercial 
organizations on the mainland. 17) Relax restrictions on Taiwan 
business's capital investment on the mainland. 18) Permit Taiwan 
businesses to fund schools on the mainland. 19) Completely open 
up Taiwan business' operational rights in the mainland market. 
  Summing up these 19 proposals, Chiang Ping-k'un said that 
the 
greatest policy change in the future would be government's 
change from neither encouraging nor interfering to vigorously 
assisting and leading overall Taiwan investment on the mainland. 
In addition, it will readjust the current measure of "listing 
the positive factors" of mainland investment to one of "listing 
the negative factors," that is, "allowance in principle, with 
only exceptional prohibitions." 
  But just a few days later, Yang Shi-chien [2799 0013 4873], 
vice minister of the Economic Ministry, corrected this to 
"maintaining the current status" of economic and commercial 
policies regarding the mainland. He went on to explain that 
whether mainland investment was "listing the positive factors" 
or "listing the negative factors" was a technical problem, not a 
policy problem; while the positive list was sufficient, there 
could be a change to a negative listing. 
  But Kao K'unglien [7559 1313 1670], vice chairman of the 
Cross-Strait Trade Committee was very clear in his view that the 
change from listing positive factors to listing negative factors 
was a policy issue, and should be sent to the Committee for 
discussion. In addition, he demanded that in the future the 
Ministry of Economics inform the Committee in advance of major 
and significant new measures concerning cross-strait trade. 
Entrepreneurs believe this demonstrates that the Cross-Strait 
Trade Committee is still in control of economic and commercial 
policy regarding Mainland China. 
  Obviously, the new proposals put forth by the Ministry of 
Economics after the New Year are a reversal of the "19 items" 
proposed last November. At that time, Chiang Ping-k'un proposed 
"listing negative factors" in both investment and trade, but the 
new proposal only mentioned the single trade issue, saying 
nothing about the investment issue, and it was still uncertain 
whether it would pass through the Cross-Strait Committee. 
Moreover, it is obvious that by its "going Southeast Asia" 
policy, the Taiwan government is encouraging entrepreneurs to 
invest in Southeast Asia instead of in China. 
  So, we can conclude that in the coming year, in its 
cross-strait economic and commercial policies, the Taiwan 
government will have a more flexible trade policy, while still 
retaining many of its restrictions on investment. 
<H5>  The reasons for Taiwan's more flexible cross-strait trade </H5>
policy 
  In reality, it is propelled by the condition that first 
caused Taiwan to take greater steps towards free trade. 
  First of all, it is a requirement for joining GATT. It would 
run counter to joining GATT for Taiwan to carry out a policy of 
prohibiting and restricting the importation of goods from 
Mainland China out of political considerations; Taiwan cannot 
join GATT if it does not change this policy, so it has to 
abolish it gradually. 
  Second, the demands of developing foreign trade. In January, 
the Taiwan Ministry of Finance announced that for the entire 
year, Taiwan had a $7.88 billion foreign trade surplus, which 
was $10.59 billion less than the year before last, with an 
annual negative growth rate of 0.166 percent, the lowest in four 
years. 
  But there was a $16.72 billion surplus with Hong Kong, an 
increase of 22.7 percent over the year before. It is common 
knowledge that Taiwan goods actually enter the mainland through 
Hong Kong, and the current surplus in Taiwan's foreign trade is 
chiefly due to having the mainland market there. If exports to 
the mainland were subtracted, Taiwan's foreign trade might have 
shown a deficit last year. 
  Third, a more flexible policy toward importing goods from 
the 
mainland holds more benefits for Taiwan than shortcomings. 
Although giving mainland commodities a more open market will 
reduce its trade surplus with the mainland, Taiwan can obtain 
more cheap raw materials and semi-finished products from the 
mainland, which will improve the international competitiveness 
of Taiwan's own products help to increase exports. In addition, 
it means that more of Taiwan's semi-finished products can be 
processed on the mainland, which will reduce costs and further 
increase competitiveness. 
  Therefore, we believe there will be more development in the 
next year or two, and there especially will be a great increase 
in the amount of mainland goods going to Taiwan. 
  But the Taiwan government always has two concerns when it 
comes to investment. One, that Taiwan industry will become a 
"vacuum"; and two, an increasing "degree of dependence" on 
Mainland China, just like the situation in Hong Kong. Although 
everyone in the Taiwan government, no matter whether in charge 
of politics economics, understands that direct investment on the 
mainland can not only exploit cheap land, labor, and resources 
but can also take direct advantage of the huge mainland market. 
But they always worry that it could lead to an "industrial 
vacuum" and an increasing "degree of dependence" on the 
mainland, which will put them at a disadvantage in negotiations 
with the mainland government, which the mainland would then 
control; this is hard for the Taiwan government to accept. 
  In addition, due to the many political barriers raised by 
the 
so-called "three stages" policy of developing the relationship 
with the mainland over the near term, medium term, and long 
term, plus the former "three `no' policy" and the "guiding 
principles for unifying the nation," breakthroughs have not been 
easy. For example, "cross-strait shipping between fixed ports" 
proposed by Chiang Ping-k'un is really just wishful thinking by 
the Economic Ministry, and with no response by higher ranking 
Taiwan officials, it might be hard to accomplish within a short 
term. 
  In summary, we believe that in the next year, the Taiwan 
government will continue to encourage manufacturers and 
businessmen to "go to Southeast Asia," and there will still be 
many restrictions on investing in Mainland China. 
  However, due to the working of the "profit principle," it 
will be difficult to halt the trend of Taiwan business investing 
on the mainland. 
  Mainland statistics show that, up to last November, over 
15,100 enterprises with Taiwan investment had been approved, 
with agreed capital of $13.6 billion. Regardless of investment 
site, scale, or project, investment by Taiwan show an expanding 
trend. At present, Taiwan enterprises are even in Qinghai and 
Tibet, and Taiwan business on the mainland has shifted from the 
short-term processing industry of the past to developing 
long-term investment projects such as finance, real estate, 
energy, etc., and has cross-trade, large-scale investment 
projects have started to appear. Overall, Taiwan business 
investment on the Chinese mainland will steadily increase. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20321 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  27 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Articles Call for Protection of Peasants </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Articles Call for Protection of Peasants </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Ease Financial Burdens </H4>

<F P=102> 94CM0187A Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO in Chinese 27 Jan 94 
p 6 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0187A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wen Wei (7186 3555): "Speak Up for the Peasants"] </F>
  [Text] Easing the peasants' burden has been an important 
part of rural work since last year. 
  Subsequent to the introduction of the State Council's 
"Provision on Managing the Peasants' Share of Expenses and 
Services," the abolition of 37 fund gathering, foundation, and 
fee collection programs was announced on 20 June. It was an 
important new measure, but in its actual implementation, are the 
localities doing what they please? 
<H5>  Deceiving Those Above and Below--Jacking Up the Per Capita </H5>
Net Income 
  When a county in the western part of the central Shaanxi 
plains reported its per capita net income last year, the county 
statistics bureau compiled the figures submitted by the towns 
and townships and let the leader in charge of the bureau review 
the numbers before submitting them to the city. When the manager 
saw that the per capita net income was only 570 yuan, he thought 
it was far too low and immediately met with several deputy 
county heads to reach a consensus: "We have worked hard for the 
last year, and we have so little to show for. It won't do." In 
fact these people only had their own promotions in mind. The 
county chief who was in charge of agriculture summoned the head 
of the statistics bureau to the county government office and 
eventually changed the per capita net income to 590 yuan, and 
the number was then sent to the city. The city statistics bureau 
noticed that the per capita income of the people in a village in 
the mountains in a certain town was only 176 yuan. They worried 
that it might drag down the whole city's per capita income, and 
so the manager immediately called up the county statistics 
bureau which got in touch with the town statistician who said 
that the number had been reported by the town. The county 
statistics bureau later took it upon itself to change the per 
capita income to 340 yuan. The whole county's per capita net 
income was raised by 20 yuan, and based on the rule that the 
peasant's burden may not exceed 5 percent of the per capita 
income of the previous year, the county was taking away 1 yuan 
from every peasant. The county claimed that the peasant's share 
was only a little more than 4 percent, but in fact it was 9 
percent. 
  Relevant data show that counties tempering with the per 
capita net income figures is a nationwide practice; it is only a 
matter of how far each would go. 
<H5>  Rural Electricity Prices Turn Somersaults </H5>
  Walk around any village and mention electricity price and 
you 
will see how angry the peasant can get. They are very unhappy 
with the "electric tiger." Study shows that electricity prices 
differ among the 21 towns and townships and 250 villages in one 
county, and none is complying the current state-set price. Some 
charge more than three times the state-set rate; their receipts 
come in all shapes, colors, and forms. 
  From data provided by the electricity department, one learns 
that electricity rate for lighting is a three-tier system: low, 
normal, and peak rates which translate to 0.129 yuan per degree, 
0.257 yuan per degree, and 0.386 yuan per degree respectively. 
Motive electricity generally cost 0.207 yuan per degree. When I 
checked the receipts of the 312 electricity customers I visited 
in the county, I found most were standard invoices used in the 
cities and a few were town- and village-level invoices; some 
were blank slips. 
  The Chen family in Group 3 of Miganqiao Village in a certain 
township owns an electric oven (with two-phase motor.) When the 
electrician collects the bill, he adds the amount of electricity 
consumed by the oven to the bill. That household's monthly 
electric bill comes to an average of 50 yuan. The Sunjiabao 
Village in a certain township makes its own electric bills and 
charges as much as 0.70 yuan per degree, which shocks most 
people. Two villages in another town issues blank slips and 
charges 0.30 all the way up to 0.60 yuan per degree. Some 
peasant families have to make do with oil lamps. 
  Some village group cadres pay little or nothing for 
electricity. This has become a common practice. This is because 
village-level cadres can hire and fire electricians at will. 
Those who obey the village cadres, who do special favors for the 
cadres' families, and who do not charge the cadres will get the 
jobs, and so the electricians collaborate and add the cadres' 
household electric bills onto the other villagers' bills and 
even raise the charges as they please to let the cadres reap a 
profit. 
<H5>  Improper Apportionment Still Runs Rampant </H5>
  Today, when the leading cadres go out, they want to show 
off. 
They want fancy cars, the best-selling cars. They get money by 
hook or by crook so that they can buy cars. They use bank loans 
to buy cars; they spend official administrative funds on cars. 
Despite specific regulations handed down by the State Council 
regarding the grades of cars they can buy, everybody, regardless 
of rank, is buying a SANTANA. 
  A certain township has a new "Beijing" jeep. In June of this 
year, it appropriated 20,000 from each township-affiliated 
enterprise, and without getting permission from the 
purchase-control office, they bought a SANTANA. A few days 
later, the county financial bureau sent someone down to 
investigate. The township leader wined and dined him and paid a 
fine. An illegal car was thus legalized. The year's jeep is to 
be used by the county leaders when they go to the villages, and 
the new SANTANA is for use when they go to town. 
  Today, reportedly, the township party committee secretary is 
rewarded for the clever apportionment and is put to work in high 
places by the county leadership. 
  Appropriating money from township enterprises in fact is 
adding to the peasants' burdens. 
<H5>  Some Thoughts on Easing the Burden </H5>
  Since the 1980's, the Party Central Committee and the State 
Council have paid special attention to the issue of the 
peasants' burden. They have always made protecting the peasants' 
interests the most important starting point of their rural work. 
They have promulgated a series of policies and measures which 
have played a definite role in easing the peasants' burden. But 
why is the cancer of heavy burden still here? The problem lies 
in the fact that some localities and departments are halfhearted 
in carrying out the policies; they move and then stop, and they 
distort the policies, or they just go through the motion of 
carrying out the policies. 
  One of the keys to reducing the peasants' burden lies in the 
hands of the leading departments at all levels, because many 
projects that add to the peasants' burden originate from these 
departments. If they do not have a sound and clear understanding 
of the problem of the peasants' heavy burden, if they do not 
begin to take effective measures, it would be difficult to solve 
the problem. To reduce the peasants' burden, there must be a set 
of laws and regulations which would severely punish those who 
impose heavy burdens on the peasants, so that the party's rural 
policy can be implemented smoothly and without obstacle. To ease 
the peasants' burden, all sides must work together and lend 
their support. Speeding up rural economic development and 
increasing the peasants' income are also necessary conditions 
for easing the peasants' burden. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20322 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  27 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Articles Call for Protection of Peasants </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Articles Call for Protection of Peasants </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Worries of Village Cadres </H4>

<F P=102> 94CM0187B Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO in Chinese 27 Jan 94 
p 6 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0187B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhi Yan (4160 6056): "What Do the Village </F>
Branch Secretaries Dislike Most During New Year's?" The author 
is from Wuxian County's Changshu Town in Jiangsu Province's 
Suzhou City] 
  [Text] Chinese New Years will soon be here. When I asked 
the village branch secretaries how they were doing, they all 
said, "Things are tough." 
  Those who said New Years was a tough time fall into two 
categories. The first are those from villages with a 
fast-growing economy. The higher-level managing department 
leaders have become frequent visitors to these economically 
advance villages. If these were normal relationships established 
in the course of work, one would see nothing wrong with them. 
The problem is, there are always some department leaders who 
want to bring home some native products or some handicrafts. 
That is taken to be the usual practice. To forge better 
relations, enhance friendship, and make things work smoothly, 
the villages naturally are eager to oblige and ready to give 
gifts on every visit. The village cadres have no choice but put 
on a happy face all day and be ready to socialize. It is very 
hard indeed. 
  In villages where the economy has been developing rapidly, 
the cadres are busy receiving and sending off guests at 
year-end; they can hardly handle the amount of socializing. But 
what about the poor villages? The village branch secretaries 
have just as difficult a time. Few high-level visitors bother to 
come, but many from below show up. Year after year, village 
cadres are owed wages. Those who understand are less of a 
problem, but those who don't understand simply walk away. The 
villagers come to get medical expense reimbursement for an only 
child; old people come in with the aid of walking sticks to 
collect their 40 yuan pension; there are electric bills, 
telephone bills, special allowances, and joint defense expenses; 
there are taxes and fees which they cannot afford to pay. Those 
who run the villages say that getting through New Years is 
harder than finding refuge from disasters. 
  Alas, cadres at all levels, please understand the village 
branch secretaries' problems. Go deep into the grass-roots level 
to solve practical problems. One should add flowers to the 
brocades--make perfection still more perfect, but it is even 
more important to provide charcoal in snowy weather--provide 
timely help. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20323 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  27 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Articles Call for Protection of Peasants </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Articles Call for Protection of Peasants </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Who Will Defend Me? </H4>

<F P=102> 94CM0187C Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO in Chinese 27 Jan 94 
p 6 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0187C </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Letter to the editor entitled "To Whom Should I Tell My </F>
Troubles?"] 
  [Text] Comrade Editor, 
  My name is Zheng Meiling [6774 5019 3781]. I am a member of 
the Number 2 Brick Factory of Regiment 123, 7th Agricultural 
Division in Xinjiang's Kuitun. I have had little education. 
Since my divorce in 1988, I have been raising three children on 
my own. Last year, I planted more than 70 mu of cotton on the 
farm. After handing over the farm's share, I took home the 
remaining cotton and was going to sell it to Regiment 123's 
processing plant. On 17 November of last year, I rounded up 
several fellow villagers to load the cotton onto a cart. We 
packed more than 4,000 kilos of cotton and covered the cart with 
canvas. Night fell before the selling procedure was completed, 
so I left the cart in front of my house. I was afraid someone 
would steal the cotton, so I stayed up all night. That night 
someone came and dragged the cotton cart away. Someone told me 
that those people were from the local police station, because 
they suspected that my cotton had belonged to someone else. I 
went after them to get my cart back. They said, "You must pay us 
a hundred yuan, hand over the cotton that don't belong to you, 
and pay us back the wages we had paid to the men who got the 
cotton, and then you can have the cotton back. We paid 100 yuan 
to hire that cart." I spent two days and went there four times. 
They said, "We have weighed your cart already and unloaded the 
cotton at the processing plant." I toiled for more than a month, 
running back and forth more than 20 times. My feet were badly 
frostbitten; I could hardly walk. During that period, I have 
gone to the leaders of the 14th Company to prove that I was a 
member of the brick factory, I had planted the cotton in the 
farm, and that I was living in the 14th Company's family 
compound. I have also gone to the farm's cadres. They said, "She 
has delivered her share. We told her to take the remaining 
cotton and sell them." But they still decided to fine me 500 
yuan. At that time, they had not given me the ticket. On 16 
December, I went to the police station to get the cotton ticket, 
the deputy chief told me to hand over 500 yuan. In my present 
condition, I can't come up with 20 yuan, let alone 500. I did 
not give him the money, and they would not give me the ticket, 
and without that ticket, I could not settle the account and get 
my money, and without money, my children and I would soon die. 
To borrow the 500 yuan, I ran around for two days. It was no 
easy task, but I got the 500 yuan and got the ticket, but it 
said I had delivered only 3,510 kilos. My big piece of canvas 
was gone too. Now my family owes people more than 10,000 yuan. 
We have no electrical appliances at home. There is only the four 
of us and three beds. I singlehandedly raise three students. The 
oldest is enrolled in the Bayi Agricultural College this year; 
number two is enrolled in Dongyin Petroleum College. Both are 
four-year, full-time college students. The youngest is in his 
third year of junior high. I depend on the cotton I plant to 
send them to school. The cotton was hard-earned! In the seven 
months from 17 April when I sowed the seeds until the time I 
picked the cotton, rain or shine and no matter how hot, I 
brought a steamed bun and a bottle of water, and at noon, I 
worked and ate at the same time. In July, one after another, my 
three children came home for vacation. Every morning, they came 
down to the farm at 8 o'clock and returned home at 3 o'clock and 
came down again at 5 o'clock and would not go home until 11 
o'clock. They worked till school started again. They only took 
one day off. I am 42 years old. Just watering the land would 
take me several days and nights. All by myself, I picked the 
cotton, had it weighed, paid for it, and delivered it. We worked 
hard for a whole year and bought everything with our own sweat 
and blood, and in just one sentence, they fined me 500 yuan. The 
leader even said, "You got off easy with a 500-yuan fine. 
According to the regiment's regulations, your cotton should have 
been confiscated." 
  Comrade editor, tell me, whom should I tell my troubles to? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20324 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  27 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Articles Call for Protection of Peasants </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Articles Call for Protection of Peasants </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Cadres Question Policies </H4>

<F P=102> 94CM0187D Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO in Chinese 27 Jan 94 
p 6 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0187D </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Letter to the editor by Xiang Gan (3276 1626): "What Do </F>
the Village Cadres Want?"] 
  [Text] Comrade Editor: 
  We village cadres come into contact with the tail-end of the 
party's and the state's policies, principles, and lines, and we 
are the ones who faithfully carry out the party's rural 
policies. It is our obligation to serve the people. But these 
days, many of the rural tasks really bewilder and puzzle us. 
  First, there is family planning. Family planning is the 
nation's fundamental policy; but to us, it is the most difficult 
task on earth. 
  Second, we have to collect grain payment and taxes. In the 
past, it was the crown grain and state taxes which no one could 
refuse. Last year, grain prices were decontrolled and the 
villages' unified apportionment and procurement responsibilities 
with regard to grains were rescinded. But this year, our 
superiors have forced us to get money and grain from the 
peasants based on their past apportionment and procurement 
responsibilities; otherwise they would refuse to pay wages. In 
the past, agricultural tax could be offset by grain payment, but 
today, grain prices are higher than the agricultural 
tax--generally the difference is 5 yuan per dan. If the peasants 
pay all of their agricultural tax but do not deliver some grain 
for the remaining apportionment and procurement 
responsibilities, they must pay 5 yuan per dan to cover the 
price difference. Most of their money is handed over to the 
grain stations, and the peasants do not even get a piece of 
paper as receipt. We feel that we are the "bandits" and are in 
turn "robbed." Even though we do not want to be "bandits," the 
peasants have no choice but to look at us coldly with frowning 
brows. 
  Third, we have to make the peasants buy insurance. Our wages 
were docked last December and we still have not been paid. This 
is because we have not completed the insurance tasks that were 
assigned to us. According to our assignment, each peasant must 
pay the insurance companies 10 yuan for insurance. In the remote 
and poor countryside, this is indeed a task we cannot accomplish. 
  Fourth, our superiors come to check on us: When the leaders 
come, they eat, drink, and have a good time. Afterwards, they 
sometimes even want us to pay them wages. 
  Fifth, the public security bureaus and local police stations 
send people to the homes of criminal elements to collect fines. 
Thousands and thousands have been collected, but there is not a 
single receipt. 
  Faced with poverty and corruption, what should we do? What 
are the responsibilities of the county, district, and village 
cadres? How do we do our jobs? We would appreciate the public's 
comments. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20325 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  27 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Articles Call for Protection of Peasants </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Articles Call for Protection of Peasants </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Editor's Note </H4>

<F P=102> 94CM0187E Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO in Chinese 27 Jan 94 
p 6 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0187E </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Editorial note in column entitled "Forget Not the Village </F>
Elders and Town Folks"] 
  [Text] Editorial Note: The Party Central 
Committee and the State Council have issued orders again and 
again to reduce the peasants' burdens. Today, the focus of rural 
work is on accelerating rural economic development and 
increasing the peasants' income. Now that the masses of peasants 
are warmly clothed and well-fed, income has become the issue of 
greatest concern to them. To prompt society to pay more 
attention to the rural areas, we have compiled some letters and 
essays from the rural areas. On the one hand, they reflect some 
of the poor conditions in the rural areas, and on the other 
hand, we urge comrades who have contact with the peasants and 
the villages not to further add to the peasants' burden by 
artificial means. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20326 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  21 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PROVINCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jiangsu 1993 Statistical Communique </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Jiangsu 1993 Statistical Communique </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0351A Nanjing XINHUA RIBAO in Chinese 21 Feb 94 p 8 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0351A </F>
<F P=104>  Nanjing XINHUA RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report: "Statistical Communique by Jiangsu Satistical </F>
Bureau on Jiangsu's National Economic and Social Developments in 
1993"] 
  [Text] In 1993, the people of Jiangsu Province, under the 
correct leadership of the Jiangsu party committee and 
government, conscientiously acted in the spirit of Deng 
Xiaoping's important speeches on his inspection of southern 
China and of the 14th CPC Congress, by freeing up our thinking, 
seizing opportunities, and pushing forward resolutely with 
reform and opening. We tightened and improved our 
macroeconomic regulation and control, explored boldly, and 
worked genuinely and solidly, continuing to maintain our rapid 
national economic growth momentum, and achieving new successes 
in all causes. Our preliminary estimates for Jiangsu in 1993 are 
that our GDP reached 255 billion yuan, up 18.5 percent from 
1992, including value added in tertiary industries of 62.3 
billion yuan, up 20.3 percent, to make up 24.4 percent of our 
GDP. We doubled our GNP for the second time seven years ahead 
of schedule, laying a solid foundation for tripling Jiangsu's 
GNP by the end of the century. But certain noteworthy problems 
and conflicts still exist in our economic development, with 
market prices up considerably, our economic structure still not 
rational enough, our rural foundation remaining relatively weak, 
and some state enterprises experiencing more production and 
operating problems. 
<H5>  I. Agriculture </H5>
  In 1993, governments at all levels throughout Jiangsu 
vigorously implemented all Party Central Committee and State 
Council policy measures on strengthening agriculture and 
protecting peasant production initiative by paying attention to 
more investment in agriculture, which brought quite evident 
results. We conquered severe natural disasters in agricultural 
production throughout Jiangsu to reap better harvests. Our 
value added in agriculture for 1993 was 42.184 billion yuan, up 
4.2 percent from 1992, to make up 16.6 percent of our GDP. This 
included value added in farming of 27.927 billion yuan, down 2.9 
percent from 1992, in forestry of 809 million yuan, up 13.3 
percent from 1992, in livestock raising of 7.64 billion yuan, up 
1.9 percent from 1992, and in fishery of 5.809 billion yuan, up 
29.7 percent from 1992. 
  Our agricultural output grew steadily, with considerable 
growth in specialty cultivation and breeding. As to staple farm 
products, we basically maintained our grain and edible oil 
output at about the level of our 1992 bumper harvests, with 
cotton output down nearly 20 percent due to less cultivated area 
and considerable disaster damage, but output of cash crops, such 
as sugar, hemp, fruit, and vegetables, all up to varying degrees 
from 1992. 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Staple Farm-Product Output                                                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Product                  |1993                     |Percent Growth from 1992 | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Grain                    |32.797 Million Tons      |-1.2                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Including:               |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Cereal Grain             |30.8011 Million Tons     |-2.5                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Soybeans                 |559,200 Tons             |45.1                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Potatoes (Fresh)         |5.048 Million Tons       |9.1                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Cotton                   |429,000 Tons             |-18.7                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Edible Oils              |1.2571 Million Tons      |-1.3                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Including: Rapeseed      |870,400 Tons             |-9.2                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Sugar                    |331,700 Tons             |33.8                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tobacco                  |4,200 Tons               |-60.0                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hemp                     |16,700 Tons              |25.6                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Silkworm Cocoons         |172,300 Tons             |18.0                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tea                      |15,100 Tons              |7.1                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Fruit                    |712,600 Tons             |25.9                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  We continued to optimize our cultivation structure. 
Impacted by market demand and the law of value, our crop 
structure throughout Jiangsu developed in the direction of high 
quality and efficiency. Our soybeans, potatoes, and food grains 
other than wheat and rice (including corn) area reached 22.0434 
million mu, up 1.5345 million mu from 1992. 
  We achieved new successes in forestry production and 
development and in greening work. In 1993, Jiangsu's 
afforested area reached 379,900 mu, up 81,800 mu, or 27.4 
percent, from 1992. 
  Our livestock industry output continued to grow. 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Staple Livestock-Product Output and Livestock-Onhand Headcount               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Product                  |1993                     |Percent Growth from 1992 | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Pork, Beef, and Mutton   |1.7923 Million Tons      |4.0                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Including: Beef and Mutt-|135,500 Tons             |17.9                     | 
|on                       |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Milk                     |112,100 Tons             |-2.9                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Meat-Hog Out-of-Pen Count|23.5464 Million Head     |4.8                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Year-End Hog Count       |19.4694 Million Head     |-1.1                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Year-End Sheep Count     |9.7855 Million           |12.0                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Year-End Large-Livestock |1.004 Million Head       |3.8                      | 
|Count                    |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Eggs                     |1.3238 Million Tons      |18.5                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  We set a new fishery-production record; our aquatic product 
output for the year was 1.5726 million tons, up 16.8 percent 
from 1992. This included freshwater product output of 1.1052 
million tons, up 19.6 percent, and saltwater product output of 
467,400 tons, up 10.5 percent. 
  We continued to adjust our agricultural structure. Our ratio 
of value added in forestry, livestock raising, fishery, and 
commodities produced by mixed peasant-household industrial 
operations throughout Jiangsu to our value added in agriculture 
reached 39.5 percent, up again from 1992's 36.6 percent. 
  We continued to improve our agricultural-production 
conditions. By the end of 1993, our overall farm-machinery 
power had reached 20.8175 million KW, up 3.3 percent from the 
end of 1992; we had 21,300 large and midsize tractors, up 2.9 
percent; 735,200 small and hand tractors, up 1.5 percent; 18,100 
trucks, up 11.7 percent; our agricultural irrigation and 
drainage machinery power had reached 5.0135 million KW, up 1.4 
percent; our 1993 chemical-fertilizer usage (converted pure) had 
reached 2.4971 million tons, up 1.2 percent; our rural power 
usage had reached 16.92 billion KWh, up 15.5 percent. And we 
completed our annual plans for water-conservancy projects, such 
as Tai Hu and Huai He. 
  We continued to develop our rural economy. In 1993, 
township enterprises throughout Jiangsu emphasized size, level, 
and quality, raising economic efficiency, and continuing to grow 
quickly while adjusting, with gross output value and all taxes 
and profits both up more than 50 percent from 1992. Jiangsu's 
nonfarm industrial economy in sectors, such as rural industry, 
construction, transportation, wholesale and retail trade, and 
food and drink, grew 65.5 percent from 1992, with its ratio of 
our rural economy up from 1992's 80.8 percent to 84.6 percent. 
<H5>  II. Industry and Building Construction </H5>
  In 1993, all of Jiangsu pushed ahead actively with reform, 
by 
continuing to intensify our implementation of the "Regulations 
on Converting the Operating Forces of State-Owned Industrial 
Enterprises," further invigorating large- and medium-sized state 
enterprises, speeding up our pace of operating-force conversion 
and organizational-structure adjustment, and working to sustain 
our fast growth of industrial output based on an optimized 
structure and improved efficiency. Our 1993 value added in 
industry was 136.535 billion yuan, up 23.1 percent from 1992, to 
make up 53.5 percent of our GDP. 
  Our heavy industry grew faster than our light industry. 
Jiangsu's 1993 value added in light industry reached 62.615 
billion yuan, up 20.9 percent from 1992; in heavy industry it 
reached 73.92 billion yuan, up 25 percent. Our outputs of key 
manufactured goods all grew to varying degrees. 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Key Manufactured-Goods Output                                                | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Goods                    |1993                     |Percent Growth from 1992 | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Yarn                     |658,800 Tons             |17.9                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Cloth                    |2.782 Billion m          |-4.2                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Woolen Goods             |84.2367 Million m        |-27.7                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Machine-Made Paper and C-|888,200 Tons             |0.1                      | 
|ardboard                 |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Crude Salt               |2.4974 Million Tons      |2.0                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Synthetic Detergent      |167,500 Tons             |6.8                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Household Washing Machin-|545,500                  |90.1                     | 
|es                       |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Household Refrigerators  |178,800                  |8.1                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Electric Fans            |9.4208 Million           |-13.1                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|TVs                      |5.1219 Sets              |-15.1                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Including: Color TVs     |1.6953 Million Sets      |0.1                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Raw Coal                 |25.0576 Million Tons     |2.0                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Crude Oil                |862,100 Tons             |-5.9                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Refined Crude            |9.1404 Million Tons      |2.1                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Power Production         |51.283 Billion KWh       |6.6                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Steel                    |3.1229 Million Tons      |15.3                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Finished Rolled Steel    |4.7679 Million Tons      |23.0                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Pig Iron                 |1.779 Million Tons       |8.4                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Cement                   |27.3361 Million Tons     |20.1                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Plate Glass              |4.8687 Million Weight Bo-|28.4                     | 
|                         |xes                      |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Sulphuric Acid           |1.3336 Million Tons      |-4.9                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Soda Ash                 |492,900 Tons             |29.1                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Caustic Soda             |399,800 Tons             |5.6                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Power-Generation Equipme-|632,700 KW               |95.0                     | 
|nt (Over 500 KW)         |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Metal-Cutting Machine To-|35,600 Sets              |28.1                     | 
|ols                      |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Motor Vehicles           |124,400                  |23.2                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tractors (Large and Mids-|1,100                    |-38.9                    | 
|ize)                     |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Chemical Fertilizer (Con-|1.3261 Million Tons      |-8.3                     | 
|verted 100 Percent)      |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Chemical Pesticides      |60,600 Tons              |11.8                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Chemical Fibers          |613,400 Tons             |11.3                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  We clearly improved our industrial economic efficiency. In 
1993, our composite index of economic efficiency for 
independently accounted industrial enterprises at the township 
level and above throughout Jiangsu was up from 1992's 89.30 to 
99.34. This included a rate of profit and tax on capital fund 
of 10.58 percent; a working-capital turnover frequency up from 
1992's 2.04 to 2.21; an overall labor productivity rate 
(calculated at value added) up 43 percent from 1992. Our gross 
profits and taxes from industrial enterprises at the township 
level and above reached 32.55 billion yuan, up 31 percent from 
1992. We better dovetailed production with sales, with our 
production-sales rate for industry above the township level up 
from 1992's 93.67 percent to 95.3 percent. But while we 
further raised our power use efficiency, with our overall power 
usage per 10,000 yuan output value for urban industrial 
enterprises down 14.71 percent, too many funds remained tied up 
in finished products, leaving the losses of some enterprises 
still needing improvement. 
  Production in our building construction industry grew 
quickly. In 1993, building trades throughout Jiangsu steadily 
intensified reform, with building construction enterprises 
maintaining rapid production growth. Our 1993 value added in the 
construction industry reached 13.989 billion yuan, up 23.6 
percent from 1992, to make up 5.5 percent of our GDP. Our 
state-owned construction enterprises raised their overall 
labor productivity rate 30.7 percent from 1992; our housing 
construction completed area reached 3.912 million sq m, up 6.1 
percent. We also improved our building-product quality 
somewhat. 
<H5>  III. Fixed Assets Investment </H5>
  In 1993, in our fixed assets investment throughout Jiangsu, 
we paid attention to improving our structure, emphasizing and 
ensuring priorities, and increasing our stamina for sustained 
economic growth. Our fixed assets investment throughout Jiangsu 
was 107.488 billion yuan, up 51 percent from 1992, including a 
state-unit investment of 45.869 billion yuan, up 59.3 percent, 
an urban collective-unit investment of 10.028 billion yuan, up 
81.6 percent, a rural collective investment of 33.2 billion 
yuan, up 50.3 percent, and an urban and rural individual 
investment of 18.391 billion yuan, up 24.7 percent. In 1993, we 
had 7,591 projects inprocess by state units in capital 
construction and upgrading, down 841 from 1992. 
  As to our state-unit investment, our capital-construction 
investment was 20.949 billion yuan, up 34.4 percent from 1992, 
our upgrading investment was 14.139 billion yuan, up 50.8 
percent, and our commercial-housing-construction investment was 
9.909 billion yuan, up 230 percent. Our central-project 
investment was 8.418 billion yuan, up 20.1 percent from 1992, 
and our local-project investment was 37.452 billion yuan, up 
71.9 percent. 
  As to our upgrading investment, in adding product varieties, 
raising product quality, conserving energy, and controlling the 
three wastes, we invested 4.209 billion yuan, up 31.1 percent 
from 1992. 
  We further optimized our investment structure. As to 
state-unit investment, our tertiary-industry investment was 
26.223 billion yuan, up nearly 100 percent, with its proportion 
up from 1992's 46.1 percent to 57.1 percent, including 
investment in communications, transportation, and post and 
telecommunications of 6.773 billion yuan, up 59.3 percent; and 
in culture, education, public health, and broadcasting of 1.629 
billion yuan, up 35.1 percent. Our power-industry investment was 
4.516 billion yuan, up 8.3 percent. Our raw-materials-industry 
investment was 4.018 billion yuan, up 23 percent, and our 
agricultural investment was 649 million yuan, up 47.4 percent 
from 1992. 
  We made great progress in building priority-infrastructure 
and basic-industry projects. Work is fully underway on the 
Shanghai-Nanjing expressway, the Nanjing-Lianyungang and 
Nanjing-Nantong primary highway construction, and along the 
Grand Canal in southern Jiangsu, with the early-stage 
construction in smooth progress on priority projects, such as 
the new Nanjing airport and the highway bridge over the Chang 
Jiang at Jiangyin, and the upgrading and expansion of the 
Yancheng-Nantong section of National Highway $204, the 
construction of the Nantong and the Gaoliangjian (ship) locks, 
and the first and second stages of the upgrading of the southern 
Jiangsu highway network all completed on schedule. Our 
investment in 84 inprocess large and midsize capital 
construction and above-quota upgrading projects throughout 
Jiangsu was 6.6 billion yuan, just about our annual plan. We 
completed and put into operation in 1993 10 large- and 
medium-sized capital-construction projects, as well as four 
above-quota upgrading ones. 
  The priority projects or units that we wholly or partially 
completed and put into operation were mainly ones, such as the 
Wuxi Ligang Power Corporation, the Wuxi Enzyme Preparation 
Plant, the Changzhou Qishuyan Power Plant, the Zhangjiagang 
Harbor Construction, the Changshu Power Plant, the Nantong 
Airport Construction Project, the Nantong Port Authority Harbor 
Construction, the Huaneng Huaiyin Power Plant, the Zhenjiang 
Port Construction, the Nanjing Gu'nandu Hotel, the second stage 
of the Suzhou Gas Project, the Suzhou Sulun Plant, and the 
Nantong Composite Materials Plant. 
  Our newly added key production capacity was generators with 
an installed capacity of 1.7 million KW and ports with an annual 
handling capacity of 9.64 million tons. Meanwhile, we built 
new service facilities, such as civil aviation facilities and 
tourist hotels, giving us complete sets of facilities to develop 
an externally oriented economy, and increasing our service 
capability. 
<H5>  IV. Transportation, and Post and Telecommunications </H5>
  In 1993, Jiangsu maintained overall production growth in 
communications, transportation, and post and telecommunications, 
completing a value added in 1993 of 11.98 billion yuan, up 17.7 
percent from 1992, to make up 4.7 percent of our GDP. But 
conflicts remained between our transportation and post and 
telecommunications and our overall economic and social 
development needs. 
  Our communications and transportation production grew 
steadily. We completed a value added in 1993 of 10.223 billion 
yuan, up 12.2 percent from 1992, to make up 4 percent of our 
GDP. Both our cargo and passenger turnover for 1993 through 
all means of transportation were up somewhat from 1992. 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|All Transport Volume                                                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Category                 |1993                     |Percent Growth from 1992 | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Cargo Turnover           |130.547 Billion Ton Km   |23.8                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Railway                  |34.649 Billion Ton Km    |3.8                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Highway                  |23.507 Billion Ton Km    |30.7                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Water Transport          |68.963 Billion Ton Km    |37.3                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Pipeline                 |3.428 Billion Ton Km     |-9.0                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Passenger Turnover       |59.785 Billion Passenger-|16.0                     | 
|                         |Km                       |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Rail                     |16.136 Billion P-Km      |9.4                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Road                     |42.93 Billion P-Km       |18.8                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Water                    |719 Million P-Km         |14.4                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Port Cargo Handling Capa-|195.48 Million Tons      |2.2                      | 
|city                     |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  We speeded up our post and telecommunications industry 
growth. Our value added for 1993 was 1.757 billion yuan, up 
63.9 percent from 1992, with a post and telecommunications gross 
business turnover of 3.443 billion yuan, up 68.8 percent, and a 
business income of 2.315 billion yuan, up 54.58 percent. We 
added in 1993 a new computerized-telephone installed-capacity of 
843,000 urban phones and 445,100 rural phones, ranking us second 
to Guangdong in having an urban and rural telephone exchange 
capacity of over 2 million phones. All of our county seats have 
computerized phones. We completed ahead of schedule the 
Beijing-Jinan-Nanjing fiberoptic cable transmission artery and 
the Shanghai-Nanjing electric cable capacity-expansion projects. 
Our services, such as telephone fax and express transmission, 
also grew very quickly, with wireless search-and-call customers 
reaching 289,800, more than triple that of 1992, with mobile 
communications spreading throughout Jiangsu. 
<H5>  V. Domestic Commerce and Market Prices </H5>
  In 1993, we brought the role of market forces into full play 
at all levels throughout Jiangsu, stimulating circulation 
sharply, giving us abundant market goods supplies and brisk 
buying and selling, and maintaining a basic overall stable 
consumer goods market order. Our 1993 retail commodity sales 
were 107.427 billion yuan, up 33.9 percent from 1992, (for real 
growth of 16 percent corrected for inflation). This included 
retail sales of consumer goods to residents at 85.078 billion 
yuan, up 36.1 percent, retail sales of consumer goods to social 
groups at 11.699 billion yuan, up 47.4 percent, and retail sales 
of agricultural capital goods at 10.65 billion yuan, up 8.6 
percent. 
  In our retail consumer-goods sales, urban retail sales were 
54.019 billion yuan, up 48.2 percent from 1992, with retail 
sales at the county level and below at 42.758 billion yuan, up 
25.7 percent. 
  All retail sales of consumer goods for industries in all 
economic categories grew. This included retail sales for the 
state-owned economy of 33.251 billion yuan, up 28.7 percent, for 
the collective economy of 34.172 billion yuan, up 31.2 percent, 
and for the individual economy of 15.804 billion yuan, up 41.5 
percent. 
  Of all key consumer goods, retail commercial sales were up 
7.3 percent for edible vegetable oils, 23.4 percent for sugar, 
2.1 percent for woolen goods, 26 percent for silk and satin, 
14.5 percent for all clothing, 64.3 percent for color TVs, 61.3 
percent for VCRs, 44.7 percent for washing machines, and 55 
percent for household refrigerators, with varying degrees of 
growth also for all other durable consumer goods, such as home 
air conditioners. Buying and selling were brisk for capital 
goods markets. In 1993, commodity circulation enterprises 
throughout Jiangsu bought capital goods worth 108.15 billion 
yuan, up 47.9 percent from 1992, with sales of 109.18 billion 
yuan, up 43.7 percent. This included sales of 43.72 million 
tons of coal, 10.3 million tons of rolled steel, 3.48 million 
tons of cement, and 75,000 motor vehicles. 
  In 1993, we took larger price-reform steps, smoothly 
deregulating grain and edible oil buying and selling prices, 
raising cotton-purchasing prices, and deregulating and adjusting 
the prices of a group of basic products, such as coal, power, 
and oil, to increase their market-regulation ratio. Retail 
prices rose 15.4 percent in 1993, quite a lot, including retail 
price rises of 16.6 percent in the cities and 14 percent in the 
countryside. 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|All Price Indexes (Compared to 1992)                                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1. Cost-of Living Price  |118.2                    |                         | 
|Index                    |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Including:               |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Urban                    |118.7                    |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Rural                    |117.3                    |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|2. Retail Price Index    |115.4                    |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Including: Consumer Goods|115.9                    |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |A.Food                   |116.6                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |Grain                    |139.0                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |Edible Vegetable Oil     |119.3                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |B. Clothing              |111.9                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |C. Articles of Everyday  |108.8                    | 
|                         |Use                      |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |D. Cultural and Recreati-|100.5                    | 
|                         |onal Articles            |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |E. Books, Newspapers, an-|102.6                    | 
|                         |d Magazines              |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |F. Drugs and Medicines   |108.7                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |G. Building Construction |132.9                    | 
|                         |and Interior Decoration  |                         | 
|                         |Materials                |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |H. Fuels                 |151.2                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Agriculutural Capital Go-|                         |111.7                    | 
|ods                      |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|3. Service Price Index   |                         |143.6                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |Including: Urban         |140.2                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |Rural                    |150.8                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|4. Energy and Raw Materi-|                         |125.7                    | 
|als Purchase Price Index |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|5. Fixed Assets Investme-|                         |138.8                    | 
|nt Price Index           |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|6. Farm and Sideline Pro-|                         |114.8                    | 
|duct Purchase Price Index|                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


<H5>  VI. External Economy </H5>
  In 1993, Jiangsu further opened up new development space, 
continuing to open up further to the outside world, maintaining 
the vigorous growth momentum of our externally-oriented economy, 
and actively advancing it from south to north. 
  Our foreign trade grew steadily. Our 1993 foreign trade 
turnover reached $8.7 billion, up 39.2 percent from 1992, 
including exports of $5.959 billion, up 27.6 percent, and 
imports of $2.741 billion, up 73.4 percent. We further 
optimized our export structure, with exports of finished 
manufactured goods up somewhat. FIE exports were $2.269 
billion, up 73.6 percent from 1992, with their percentage of 
Jiangsu exports up to 38.1 percent. 
  We further increased our use of foreign investment. In 1993, 
10,289 new agreements on the use of foreign investment were 
signed throughout Jiangsu, for an agreed foreign investment of 
$10.11 billion, up respectively 24.3 percent and 29.7 percent 
from 1992. We approved 10,032 new FIEs in 1993, for a 
contracted foreign investment of $10.056 billion, up 
respectively 22.4 percent and 30.8 percent from 1992. Jiangsu 
actually used $3.287 billion in foreign investment in 1993, up 
90.9 percent from 1992, including an actual foreign investment 
of $3.002 billion, up 114 percent. Foreign investment in 
Jiangsu increased in size, at a higher level, with more large 
projects, and beginning to involve fields, such as energy, 
communications, basic industry, high technology, and tertiary 
industries. 
  Our foreign economic and technical exchanges and cooperation 
expanded rapidly. In 1993, Jiangsu signed 418 new foreign 
contracting and service cooperation projects, 155 more than in 
1992, for a contracted amount of $332 million, up 52.9 percent, 
and our actual business volume was $259 million, up 76.5 
percent. We approved 210 new overseas nontrade enterprises, 
with 368 having been approved by the end of 1993. 
  Our international tourism was increasingly prosperous. In 
1993, Jiangsu received 792,200 visits by overseas travellers for 
tourism, sightseeing, interviews, and other activities, 
including 455,200 visits by foreigners, up 22 percent from 1992. 
Our tourism foreign exchange earnings were 741 million yuan (in 
foreign-exchange certificates [FECs]), up 21.5 percent from 1992. 
<H5>  VII. Finance, Banking, and Insurance </H5>
  In 1993, Jiangsu's revenues were better. Our 1993 revenue 
was 22.13 billion yuan, up 45.3 percent from 1992, for a record 
increase. This included industrial and commercial tax revenue 
of 21.273 billion yuan, up 54.4 percent from 1992, with our tax 
revenue involving foreigners up 125.8 percent. Our spending was 
16.258 billion yuan, up 29.2 percent. 
  Our banking situation stabilized gradually. In 1993, 
financial institutions throughout Jiangsu vigorously organized 
all deposits, so that by year's end, we had a deposit balance of 
179.733 billion yuan, up 36.934 billion yuan from the beginning 
of the year, and a loan balance of 177.78 billion yuan, up 
28.916 billion yuan from the beginning of the year. We 
continued to maintain our deposit increase higher than our loan 
increase, with net currency put into circulation in 1993 at 
11.601 billion yuan, up 2.285 billion yuan from 1992. 
  Our insurance business grew rapidly. In 1993, the People's 
Insurance Company system throughout Jiangsu insured 525.76 
billion yuan in domestic assets, up 39.1 percent from 1992. 
Jiangsu had 64,000 enterprises covered by enterprise property 
insurance, 10.25 million residents covered by family property 
insurance, and 18.497 million people covered by personal 
insurance. Our insurance companies handled 345,000 domestic 
property insurance settlements, paying out compensation of 720 
million yuan, and paying out 320 million yuan in personal 
insurance compensation to 103,000 people. 
<H5>  VIII. Science, Education, Culture, Public Health, and Sports </H5>
  We achieved new S&amp;T successes. In 1993, we won 368 
provincial-level S&amp;T-progress awards, including three #1 
awards, 
28 #2 awards, 126 #3 awards, and 211 #4 awards. At the national 
level, we won one invention-award, three S&amp;T-progress awards, 
and six Spark awards. 
  We authorized more patents. In 1993, Jiangsu had 4,170 
patent applications, with 3,757 being authorized, up 80.1 
percent from 1992. 
  We expanded our S&amp;T ranks. Local state enterprises and 
institutions throughout Jiangsu had 1.2133 million specialized 
technicians of all types, up 5.1 percent from 1992. 
  We continued to increase our average education. In 1993, 
Jiangsu enrolled 3,000 graduate students, up 600 from 1992. 
Our general institutions of higher learning enrolled 68,500 
undergraduates, with 180,200 students in school, up 27,500 from 
1992. Our intermediate specialized technical schools of all 
types had 191,800 students in attendance, up 42,400 from 1992. 
Our vocational senior high schools had 220,800 students, or 
52.1 percent of Jiangsu's general senior high school students. 
We had 2.9398 million general high school students, and 5.9494 
million grade school students, with an entrance rate for 
grade-school-age children of 99.5 percent. In 1993, another 28 
counties (cities, districts) and 420 townships throughout 
Jiangsu fully implemented 9-year compulsory education. By the 
end of 1993, 59 counties (cities, districts) and 1,227 townships 
throughout Jiangsu were fully practicing nine-year compulsory 
education, for a population coverage rate of 56.8 percent, up 20 
points from 1992. Meanwhile, we also made some developments in 
preschool education and in special-ed for low-intelligence and 
disabled children. 
  We continued to reinforce our adult education. In 1993, we 
enrolled 38,900 adults as college undergraduates, with 84,800 in 
college, up 18,000 from 1992, and had 135,200 adults in 
intermediate vocational schools, up 31,800 from 1992, and 
762,100 adults in intermediate and primary schools. We 
eliminated illiteracy in 1993 for 565,000 youths and adults in 
the prime of life (ages 30-50). 
  We continued to expand our cultural enterprise. By the end 
of 1993, Jiangsu had 136 arts performance troupes, 110 cultural 
centers, 93 public libraries, 66 museums, 20 radio stations, one 
short-wave broadcast and relay station, and 38 TV stations. We 
had 147 TV broadcast and relay stations, and 4,358 
film-projection units. In 1993, we printed 1.177 billion 
newspapers, published 59.83 million magazines of all types, and 
published 3,722 books. 
  We further developed our public health enterprise. By the 
end of 1993, Jiangsu had 12,074 public health organs of all 
types, 207 less than in 1992, with 173,300 sickbeds, including 
152,900 hospital beds, up 2,200 from 1992. We had 234,400 
specialized health technicians, up 2.4 percent from 1992, 
including 106,300 doctors, up 1.9 percent, and 59,900 nurses and 
nursing teachers, up 4 percent. Jiangsu had 261 sanitation and 
antiepidemic stations and professional prevention and treatment 
organs, with 8,749 personnel, up 5.4 percent from 1992. 
  We achieved new sports successes. In the Seventh National 
Games, Jiangsu athletes won 20 gold medals, 16 silvers, and 17 
bronzes, with seven breaking 15 Asian records 26 times, nine 
breaking 17 national records 28 times, and the Jiangsu team 
ranking sixth in the nation. In major international 
competitions, seven Jiangsu athletes won nine world 
championships, with five setting six Asian records and breaking 
three world records 18 times. It is estimated that 95.02 
percent of our school-age students in schools of all types at 
all levels throughout Jiangsu reached international 
physical-education training standards. 
<H5>  IX. Population and Living Standards </H5>
  We continued to control our population-growth rate. Based on 
a sampling of 1993 population changes, Jiangsu's birthrate was 
down from 1992's 1.571 percent to 1.397 percent, with our 
deathrate down from 0.676 percent to 0.661 percent, and our 
natural growth rate down from 0.895 percent to 0.736 percent. 
Projecting from this, by the end of 1993, Jiangsu's permanent 
population was 69.6727 million, up 560,700 from the end of 1992. 
  Our urban and rural incomes continued to grow. Based on a 
sampling for 1993, our urban cost-of-living income averaged 
2,526 yuan, up 30.4 percent from 1992 or, corrected for 
inflation, up a real 10.2 percent. Our rural net income 
averaged 1,267 yuan, up 19.4 percent or, corrected for 
inflation, up a real 3 percent. 
  We steadily intensified our labor reforms. In 1993, we had 
206,400 new urban jobs throughout Jiangsu, with a year-end urban 
unemployment rate of 2 percent. Our contract-system employees 
reached 2.6 million, or 28.4 percent of all urban employees. 
Jiangsu had 5.9308 million employees and 1.2406 million 
retirees covered by overall old-age insurance. By year's end, 
our urban workers numbered 9.113 million, up 72,100 from the end 
of 1992, with urban private-enterprise and self-employed workers 
numbering 359,600, up more than 120,000. 
  Our employee wages also increased. In 1993, Jiangsu's 
payroll was 32.15 billion yuan, up 27.8 percent from 1992, with 
employee wages averaging 3,544 yuan, up 26.6 percent or, 
corrected for inflation, up a real 6.6 percent. 
  Our urban and rural savings continued to grow. In 1993, our 
residents' savings deposit balance reached 96.422 billion yuan, 
up 19.175 billion yuan from the end of 1992, or 25.7 percent. 
Purchases of all types of securities also increased clearly. 
  We further improved our urban and rural housing conditions. 
By the end of 1993, our housing space for urban residents 
(including living and auxiliary space) averaged 14.63 sq m, up 
0.27 sq m from the end of 1992, and our peasant housing space 
averaged 24.53 sq m, up 0.96 sq m from the end of 1992. 
  We further intensified our environmental protection cause. 
In 1993, Jiangsu had 4,530 employees in our environmental 
protection system, 101 environmental monitoring stations of all 
types, 16 national and provincial nature-protection zones, three 
national-forest parks, and 379 environmental-pollution control 
projects completed in 1993 with an investment of 125 million 
yuan. By the end of 1993, we had established 867.27 sq km of 
smoke and dust control zones, and 264.91 sq km with 
environmental noise standards. 
Notes: 
  1. This communique's GDPs and all industrial value-added 
indexes were calculated at prevailing prices, with growth rates 
calculated at comparable prices. 
  2. GDPs and all industrial value-addeds include mainly 
worker 
remuneration, profits, taxes, and depreciation, not various 
intermediate consumption values, such as energy, raw materials, 
or the sum of material-product and service value that show the 
year's production that can be used for final consumption. The 
difference between GDP and GNP is mainly that the former does 
not include overseas net factor income, while the latter does. 
  3. The national S&amp;T awards won by Jiangsu do not include 
those won by enterprises and institutions of state ministries 
and commissions in Jiangsu. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20327 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  14 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Bright Outlook for Futures Market </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Bright Outlook for Futures Market </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0363A Beijing ZHONGGUO WUZI BAO in Chinese 14 Feb 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0363A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO WUZI BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Tian Yuan (3944 3293): "Bright Outlook for </F>
China's Futures Business"] 
  [Text] In the last decade of the 20th Century, one 
important achievement of the policy of opening and reform in 
China is that it has bred a brand new specialty--the futures 
business. This brand new specialty's emergence has promoted the 
development of China's market economy and is supplying a new 
channel for promoting the Chinese economy's merging and 
connecting with the world. For this reason, Dr. Tian Yuan, 
Chairman of the Board of the China International Futures Brokers 
Corporation Ltd., was fully confident of making the following 
suggestions: 
<H5>  As an investment instrument, futures must develop into a </H5>
higher form 
  Since its establishment, the futures market has played 
several roles. On the one hand, it supplies the means for 
assuring value, while on the other hand, it is an available 
investment instrument. In Western financial markets, futures are 
as widely acknowledged and accepted as stocks. In comparison, 
futures operations are characterized by "gambling for big stakes 
with a small investment" making it a high risk investment 
instrument. As a high risk financial product, its possibly high 
return attracts a large group of investors, so in the futures 
market, besides the value assurors, there are quite a few 
investors who seek profits by engaging in "buy low, sell high" 
trading. 
  Someone analyzed the behavior of market participants by 
using 
statistics from the U.S. Commodities Futures Trading Commission, 
and concluded that there are three types of investors in 
markets, i.e., big value assurors, big speculators, and small 
speculators. If one is speaking just of the futures market's 
performance, there are several different situations besides the 
spot market. One specialist's comprehensive statistics proved 
that big value assurors suffer losses (they might make a profit 
in the spot market), big speculators gain profits, and small 
speculators usually lose money. Another specialist had a 
different conclusion, that is, that big value assurors make 
profits, big speculators neither make profits nor lose money, 
and small speculators lose money. From this we can see that no 
matter what the situation, small speculators are ultimately 
always in an unfavorable position. Precisely for this reason, 
the operating style of futures trading is undergoing an 
important change: to collect social investment capital by means 
of funds and managing accounts, etc., with the futures run by 
professional futures specialists; this is called "managing 
futures." Twenty years ago, the first U.S. share of managed 
futures sold for less than $10,000. This has so far developed to 
$26 billion, becoming an important force in the futures markets 
which cannot be ignored. Looking at the situation in China, 
documents from all over show that while it is not the best 
investment means for entering the futures market by individual 
or single accounts, there should be encouragement for developing 
various types of futures funds and managed accounts, and gradual 
development of professional futures trading consultants. This 
would push futures investment trading from its current low level 
mode of operation to a more advanced one, and further promote 
the maturity of the futures industry. 
<H5>  Work to become the world futures trading center </H5>
  The futures industry is a major industry in the world 
economy, and the futures market has major and long term impact 
on the international trading, international financial activity, 
and international information. Several years ago, China didn't 
play a role in the world futures markets community, which was 
inappropriate to the status of so large a country. China has 
one-fourth of the world's population, ranks number one in the 
world in grain output, number one in cotton output, number four 
in steel output, has all varieties of nonferrous metals and 
ranks number five in world output, has more than $100 billion in 
imports and exports, and over $40 billion in foreign currency 
reserves. Such a huge quantity of commodities, trade, and 
foreign currency demonstrates that the domestic futures markets 
have a great capacity in China, and internationalizing China's 
futures markets is an absolute possibility. In the last decade 
and more, since China has firmly implemented its policy of 
opening and reform, the scale of international trade has spread 
rapidly, and is an important media and bridge for bringing about 
the internationalization of China's futures markets. For China's 
corporations, a high volume of international trade activities 
can not only assure value in China's futures markets but also 
assure value in futures markets overseas. By getting foreign 
capital involved, it can export price "risks," just as the 
Chinese Insurance Corporation exports the risks of satellite 
launching, sharing the insurance with those overseas. If we look 
at the characteristics of changing the mix in an era of world 
economic competition, seizing the opportunity to rise in 
importance in the Asian-Pacific region, China's economic forces 
and huge domestic market potential provide abundant reasons to 
aim for the goal of developing futures markets. This goal should 
be: after vigorous development in the nineties, become the 
biggest commodity futures markets center in the Asian-Pacific 
region. With financial futures developed to a certain degree, it 
should form a tripartite balance of forces with Europe and 
America; the second step is aiming to become the world commodity 
futures trading center in the early 21st Century, and become the 
financial futures market center for the Asian-Pacific region. 
  If the above goals for China's futures markets are 
accomplished, it will have an important and deep influence on 
Chinese economic development. Looking at the domestic market, 
the entire spot markets and its pricing system will be remolded 
due to wild and active futures trading, forming a unified market 
price system. Futures markets will become an internal stabilizer 
for China's economy, especially for its agricultural economy. It 
will play a major role in protecting agricultural development, 
the growth in farmers' income, grain circulation and processing, 
etc. The great deal of information and long term pricing signals 
supplied by the futures markets will effectively improve the 
government's ability to readjust macroeconomically, and 
significantly increase initiative in economic work. Looking at 
the situation worldwide, the experience of Chicago's futures 
market indicates that after China is established in a central 
position in world futures trading, a great deal of important 
information about the world economy and politics will be 
continuously, directly transmitted to China's economic system. 
China's futures trading will play an important role in the world 
economy as a kind of "magnetic pole"; this will help improve our 
international economic cooperation, international financial 
market, and our status and influence in international commodity 
trade, and will promote multiple facets of China's economic 
development. 
  Looking at the development practices and historical 
experience of the international futures industry, futures 
trading centers are not immutable. Historically, the futures 
industry originated in Europe, and blossomed in America. After 
World War II, Hong Kong, Singapore, and Japan in the 
Asian-Pacific region became new regional futures trading 
centers. The roots of this "phenomenon of changing centers" lies 
in the changing of economic powers. New arrivals in regional 
futures trading centers can not only develop their status as 
futures trading centers depending on the growth of their 
economic power, they can also take advantage of the "superiority 
of the up-and-coming." In Asia, the correct application of 
official power to prop up futures trading is also very 
important. For example, it took the United States about 70 years 
to develop and perfect its futures markets, but it took only two 
to three years to establish futures markets in both Hong Kong 
and Singapore. This was because the futures market model had 
developed to maturity, so much could be implanted, making it 
absolutely unnecessary to start out from scratch. We must 
understand and absorb these countries' and regions' experiences, 
encouraging bold innovation and exploration to meet the 
opportunities and challenges of China's futures industry. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20328 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  14 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Authorities Issue $1 Billion in Bonds Worldwide </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Authorities Issue $1 Billion in Bonds Worldwide </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0363B Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO in Chinese 14 Feb 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0363B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by correspondent Zhao Renfang (6392 0088 2455): </F>
"China Successfully Issues $1 Billion in Bonds Worldwide; 
Wonderful Opportunity for International Low Interest Rate, 
Bright Future for Domestic Economy"] 
  [Text] New York Special Dispatch -- On 2 February, the 
Chinese Government issued $1 billion in bonds in the world's 
major bond markets, which sold out the same day. Relevant 
observers believe that this is further proof that investors 
throughout the world are optimistic about the China market, and 
about the strongly emerging Chinese economy. 
  Jin Renqing [6855 0086 1987], Vice Minister of Finance, who 
came to New York from Beijing especially to attend the issuance, 
said that this "is the largest quantity of bonds issued by the 
Chinese Government in international capital markets to date. 
They were sold separately and simultaneously in Asian, European, 
and U.S. capital markets, with trading carried out over a 24 
hour period." 
  In his introduction, Jin Renqing stated that the U.S. 
dollars 
amassed through the issue of these global bonds by the Finance 
Ministry as China's representative would be used to develop such 
fundamental facilities as transportation, energy, and 
telecommunications, etc., to ensure that China's economic 
development would have more staying power. Meanwhile, through 
issuing bonds, it was also letting world investors learn more 
about China, provide international investors with investment 
opportunities, and associate the Chinese economy more closely 
with that of the world. Specialists believe that the successful 
issuance of $1 billion in global bonds proves that international 
investors have great interest in China's economic development 
and investing in China, and that they are fully confident of 
China's future. 
  The principal executive bank for the bond issuance is the 
well-known U.S. Merrill Lynch Securities Corporation. On the 
afternoon of the 3d, officials of China's Ministry of Finance 
and Merrill Lunch's people in charge of this business held a 
press conference in Merrill Lynch's New York headquarters. At 
the press conference, Merrill Lynch International's Chairman of 
the Board Winthrop Smith said that investors showed very strong 
interest in China's bonds, and he hoped by this cooperation to 
introduce more investment opportunities to the world, and bring 
closer the relationship between China's economy and world 
investment markets. Merrill Lynch Corporation announced that 
although the final figures were not in from the sole marketing 
group, 60 percent of the bonds the corporation was in charge of 
selling had been sold in the United States, 20 percent had been 
sold in Europe, and the remaining 20 percent in Asia. 
  It has been reported that at the end of 1992, China had a 
total of $69.3 billion in foreign debts. Therefore, a 
correspondent asked whether rapid economic development and the 
arrival of a great deal of capital could possibly create such 
problems as inflation and an increasing burden of payments. Jin 
Renqing replied that the capital collected in this bonds 
issuance would be uses to develop construction of fundamental 
facilities and resolve "bottlenecks" that are hindering economic 
development. So, issuing bonds will spur economic development 
but not cause inflation. According to international regulation, 
in general, a country's debt payment rate should be 20 percent, 
but China has kept this strictly within 15 percent, and the 
practical rate of payment is only 7.3 percent. Therefore, Jin 
Renqing stressed that it was absolutely no problem with China's 
debt payment ability. Jin Renqing pointed out that the 
objectives of this bond issuance were: one, to amass capital for 
fundamental construction at lowest possible cost by taking 
advantage of the favorable opportunity presented by lower costs 
in the current international capital market; two, to publicize 
to the world by means of the world capital market China's 
achievements by reform and opening; and three, to set a standard 
line for Chinese financial organs going into the world's capital 
markets, especially the U.S. market. 
  On 4 February, Jin Renqing, as the representative Chinese 
authority, officially signed the sales agreement with Merrill 
Lynch Corporation for issuing $1 billion in global bonds in the 
international capital market. The interest rate of the bonds is 
6.5 percent yearly, with expiration in ten years. 
  China has been preparing for this successful issue for 
nearly 
one year. Last year, the Ministry of Finance invited the 
well-known U.S. Rating Corporation to rate China's authorized 
foreign debt credit, and the results showed that China had a 
very good reputation. Moody's Investor Service of the U.S. 
raised Chinese authorized foreign credit rating from the Baa1 
level to the A3 level, while Feiji //phonetic// Corporation has 
rated China's authorized foreign debt credit as A-. All these 
paved the way for Chinese bonds to enter the European, Asian, 
and global market. In addition, before issuing the bonds, the 
Ministry of Finance organized delegations to the international 
financial markets of Hong Kong, Tokyo, Singapore, Zurich, 
Frankfort, London, Chicago and New York to carry out publicity 
activities and answer questions related to China's economy, 
politics, and international relations. This also had a definite 
effect on this successful bond issuance. 
  Before issuing the bonds, the Ministry of Finance had at one 
time or another issued in the European market Japanese Yen bonds 
worth 30 billion Japanese Yen, and had issued $300 million in 
"dragon debts" in the Asian-Pacific region, and all were 
successful. Relevant persons expressed the view that China would 
in the future continue to vigorously and cautiously collect 
capital throughout the world in accordance with the demands of 
its economic development and construction and the conditions of 
international capital markets. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20329 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  18 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Feb. Statistics: Output of Main Chemical Products </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Feb. Statistics: Output of Main Chemical Products </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK1803115094 Beijing CEI Database in English 18 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK1803115094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS) -- Following is a list of the output 
of main chemical products in February 1994, released by the 
State Statistical Bureau: 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Item              |Unit              |2/94              |2/93              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Chemical fiber    |10,000t           |20.29             |17.17             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Sulphuric acid    |10,000t           |17.46             |13.55             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Dense nitric acid |10,000t           |2.41              |3.92              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Soda ash          |10,000t           |48.55             |40.19             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Caustic soda      |10,000t           |29.37             |28.78             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ethylene          |10,000t           |17.62             |17.05             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Calcium chloride  |10,000t           |20.47             |19.20             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Pure benzene      |10,000t           |7.23              |6.38              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Synthetic ammonia |10,000t           |187.76            |172.42            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Chemical fertiliz-|10,000t           |171.61            |155.28            | 
|er                |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|(Nitrogen)        |10,000t           |134.45            |120.57            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|(Phosphorous)     |10,000t           |35.40             |45.56             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|(Potash)          |10,000t           |1.09              |0.38              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Chemical pesticide|10,000t           |1.73              |2.06              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Paint             |10,000t           |5.38              |8.14              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Dyestuff          |10,000t           |1.06              |1.44              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Chinese patent me-|10,000t           |1.66              |1.67              | 
|dicines           |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tyre              |10,000pc          |396.42            |499.31            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Synthetic rubber  |10,000t           |4.80              |3.25              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Film              |10,000m           |955               |1084              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|(Color film)      |10,000m           |861               |1052              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Plastics          |10,000t           |28.74             |28.48             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Notes: t - ton, pc - piece, m - meter                                      | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20330 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  19 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   1993 Feed Output, Outlook for 1994 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    1993 Feed Output, Outlook for 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0337B Beijing ZHONGGUO NONGJIHUA BAO in Chinese 19 Jan 
94 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0337B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO NONGJIHUA BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Shao Jianbiao (6730 0494 1753); Jia Mingsheng </F>
(6328 2494 3932): "This Year the Feed Industry Will Rise to a 
New Plateau"] 
  [Text] In 1993 with China's feed industry facing such 
difficulties as tight resources, rising prices, and a shortage 
of funds, it continued to maintain growth. Total production of 
mixed and blended feeds reached 40 million tons, a 5 percent 
increase over 1992. 
  According to a person in charge of the National Feed 
Industry 
Office, in 1993 China's feed industry production and sales had 
the following characteristics: First, although overall 
production rose, overall returns declined. Second, the greatest 
decline was in production and returns of commercial grain system 
feed enterprises. Their production share declined from 80 
percent to 50 percent, but both the production and the returns 
of livestock-raising, aquatic-product, and small town, and 
individual enterprises, and "three kinds of foreign-invested 
enterprises," increased rather greatly. Third, the demand for 
feed for high-quality, high-grade fowl, fish, and special 
animals was vigorous and full price mixed feed's share of total 
production reached 80 percent. Fourth, the mix of feed products 
was further adjusted and the tendency toward serialized and 
standardized, and concentrated, and pre-mixed feeds increased by 
about 50 percent, respectively, over the year before last. 
Fifth, farmers' understanding of mixed feeds further improved. 
  Since reform and opening up, China's feed industry has 
developed very rapidly, the feed industry system has gradually 
improved, and it has become an important support to sustained 
rapid growth of the livestock industry. Because of the 
large-scale use of mixed and blended feeds, the remuneration 
from feed greatly increased. To produce only the same amount of 
livestock products, can save 8 million tons of feed grain 
annually throughout the nation. Despite this, there still are 
numerous problems currently in China's feed industry. The main 
ones are: 1) The supply of feed resources, especially protein 
resources, is tight and the prices have risen a great deal, 
greatly increasing feed costs, but the prices of feed products 
cannot keep pace, causing feed enterprise operations that 
formerly made only slight profits to experience losses, and 
economic results have generally declined. 2) Some large- and 
medium-sized state feed enterprises, faced with market 
competition, have been unable to convert their operating 
mechanisms in a timely fashion. The enterprises lack vitality 
and production and economic returns simultaneously slide. 3) 
Macroeconomic controls are not strong and industry 
administration is weak. Because industry administrative 
departments lack the necessary administrative methods and rules 
and regulations, duplicate development, blind growth, and the 
existence of counterfeit and inferior goods are serious, 
seriously affecting the healthy development of the feed industry. 
  So, the National Feed Industry Office has explicitly 
proposed 
the guiding thought for 1994: Further intensify reform and rely 
on scientific and technical progress and improvement in product 
quality, adjustments in the industry and product mix to strive 
to attain a production volume of 42 million to 43 million tons 
for mixed and blended feed and an 85 percent share for 
full-price mixed feed. In the light of the current state of the 
industry, while enhancing industry administration and further 
improving standards, rules and regulations, and the service 
system regarding the feed industry, it is important to adopt the 
following measures: 
  1. Strictly control low-quality duplicate development. In 
areas where feed processing capacity essentially satisfies 
demand, generally do not set up new feed processing factories. 
  2. Progressively upgrade the technology of some processing 
enterprises. Plan to use four years and invest 2 billion yuan to 
upgrade technology for a 20 million ton feed processing capacity. 
  3. Speed up development of protein resources and feed 
additives, mainly: Using 300,000 tons of cotton and rapeseed 
cakes, 100,000 tons of feed yeast, 600 tons of vitamin A, 800 
tons of vitamin E, 200 tons of vitamin B[.sub]2[/], and 
25,000 tons of calcium hydrogen phosphate, and 10,000 tons of 
lysine, and setting up a 3 million mu soybean base 
for comprehensive use. 
  4. Speed up the conversion of scientific and technical 
achievements to productivity. In more than ten years of tackling 
scientific and technical problems, we have a large batch of 
scientific research results in such areas as feed resource 
exploitation and make up, and feed additives and we urgently 
need to organize the total area and expand its utilization. This 
year we will select a group from them and expand it to improve 
the overall technical level of the feed industry. 
  5. Continue to intensify surveys and research and more 
intensively research major problems that affect the development 
of the feed industry such as adjusting the import and export 
policy and the purchase and sales policy for feed resources and 
striving for various preferential policies and proposing 
adjustments in the mix of crops planted and expanding feed crop 
production. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20331 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  23 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Survey of Shift in Anhui's Surplus Rural Labor Force </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Survey of Shift in Anhui's Surplus Rural Labor Force </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0319A Hefei ANHUI RIBAO in Chinese 23 Jan 94 pp 1, 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0319A </F>
<F P=104>  Hefei ANHUI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by the Anhui Provincial Survey Group on Changes in </F>
the Rural Labor Force: "An Important Strategic Task That Impacts 
the Goal of Becoming Fairly Well-Off--A Survey and Some Thoughts 
on the Shift in Anhui's Surplus Rural Labor"] 
  [Text] Editorial Note: In the latter half of 
last year, leading comrades of the provincial party committee 
organized a fairly large-scale study of the shift in the rural 
labor force. We hereby publish an excerpt of the study report 
and hope that the localities and various departments will pay 
more attention to and spend more time exploring and studying 
this issue. 
  Between July and October 1993, we revolved around the goal 
of 
elevating the rural areas to the relatively well-off level by 
the end of the century and conducted a fairly large-scale, 
province-wide survey and study of the shift in the surplus rural 
labor force. The province organized three survey teams and 
selected Feidong, Mongcheng, and Xiuning to be representative 
counties in a prototypical survey, and at the same time, a 
general survey was conducted in 15 province-run departments, 
four prefectural cities, and 13 counties. Through this round of 
survey and study, we have basically sorted out the province's 
labor resource and its distribution, gained a thorough 
understanding of the important strategic impact of the 
accelerated shift in the surplus rural labor force on achieving 
the goal of making the rural areas relatively well-off, and have 
made a preliminary study of the basic approach and 
countermeasures to speed up the shift of the labor force. 
<H5>  I. Rural Socioeconomic Development's Natural Choice </H5>
  Labor is the most active and the most important factor of 
production. Given the conditions of a socialist market economy, 
how to realize the optimal allocation of the rural labor 
resource in accordance with the market mechanisms and law of 
value and how to further liberate and develop the rural labor 
force is an important issue for today and well into the distant 
future. In particular, whether the large surplus rural labor 
force can be successfully shifted is an important strategic task 
that will determine whether the rural areas can beco me 
relatively well-off by the end of the century. 
  To become relatively well-off, the rural areas have many 
norms to satisfy, but the most fundamental is to substantially 
increase the peasants' income. Anhui is a major agricultural 
province. It has a total population of 58.17 million, 84.4 
percent of which is rural population. It has 65 million mu in 
total farm area, averaging 1.33 mu per capita. In 1992, the 
province's rural population had a per capita net income of 575 
yuan, and overall, everybody was basically well-fed and 
clothed, and some peasants have begun to advance toward the goal 
of becoming fairly well-off. This means Anhui's rural 
socioeconomic development has entered a new phase, which is most 
encouraging. But we should also realize sobermindedly that in 
recent years, the planting industry's comparative profit has 
been on the decline, and so increased agricultural production 
has not been matched by higher agricultural income. The increase 
in the peasants' income has been slow, and in some areas, it 
has even stalled. In addition, because peasants in many 
localities are heavily burdened, it has dampened their 
production enthusiasm and has slowed their advance toward the 
goal of becoming relatively well-off. 
  If we make an in-depth examination and analysis of the 
reasons for the slow increase in peasant income, besides such 
factors as the widening price scissors between industrial and 
agricultural products and the lower comparative profit for 
agriculture, especially for grains, cotto n, and oil, the most 
important reasons are the slow readjustment of the rural 
industrial structure, the improper distribution of labor 
employment, and the wide gap between the input of labor resource 
and material output. In 1992, nationwide, the nonagricultural 
sector's contribution to the rural society's total output value 
was 64.2 percent, and in some well-developed coastal provinces, 
it exceeded 80 percent, but it was only 55 percent in Anhui 
which had a rural labor force of 24.32 million--of which 19 .92 
million, or 81.90 percent, were employed in agriculture, and 
among those in agriculture, 93.6 percent were in the planting 
business. By today's productive standard of an average of 6 mu 
per worker, we needed approximately 11 million people, and 
subtracting those who left through the development of township 
enterprises and other channels, in 1992 we had a surplus rural 
labor force of 4.92 million people, or one-fifth of the labor 
force. Anhui's share of stalled agricultural labor force is 
approximate ly 30 percentage points higher than that in the 
economically well-developed coastal provinces. Anhui currently 
is in a transition from the early stage of industrialization to 
the mature stage, and compared to international standards, the 
proportion of stalled agricultural labor force in other relevant 
nations at this stage of development is generally below 70 
percent [as published]. This means the shift in Anhui's rural 
labor force is lagging far behind. The poor rural industrial 
structure and the improper employment structure naturally affect 
the income structure. In 1992, the per capita net income of 
Anhui's peasants was 575 yuan. Specifically, those in the town 
and township's secondary and tertiary industries had average 
incomes of 142 yuan [as published], and they accounted for only 
24.7 percent of the work force (national standard was 28.4 
percent), while those in agriculture accounted for 75.3 percent 
(57 percent for the nation), and among those in agriculture, 
61.3 percent plant crops (compared to 36.8 percent nationwide). 
Such income structure which is made up primarily of 
agricultural, especially crop-planting, income not only slows 
the rate of increase but faces market and natural risks. If we 
fail to vigorously readjust the rural industrial structure, 
accelerate the rural labor force's move to the nonagricultural 
sector, and increase the output value and the employment shares 
of the secondary and tertiary industries, a large rural labor 
force will remain on the land which averages a little over a mu 
per person, and no matter how we try to change the production 
method, it will be difficult to increase income by much. Thus, 
if we simply stake the "treasure" that can make us rich in 
grain, cotton, and oil and put all of our hopes of becoming 
relatively well-off into agriculture, or especially in the 
planting industry, it will not work, and not only will it not be 
safe, but it can actually be dangerous. In this sense, whether 
Anhui's rural areas can become relatively well-off will, to a 
large extent, be determined by how much of the surplus rural 
labor force we can shift out. 
  In recent years, pressured by the rural surplus labor force 
and pulled by the difference in comparative advantages among 
different industries, the rural labor forces in many localities 
have begun to move through channels such as agricultural 
development, township enterprises, labor export, and entry to 
small cities and towns and so on. By the end of 1992, 
approximately 5.30 million people in the province have shifted 
to the secondary and tertiary industries. Because Anhui's urban 
industries and township enterprises are relatively small in 
scope and limited in capacity at the present time, and because 
the large- and medium-sized cities and the economically 
well-developed localities have a big demand for labor, many 
peasants have spontaneously and continuously left the yellow 
earth which for generations and generations has been tilled and 
planted, and they have flocked to some of the nation's large- 
and medium-sized cities, especially in the economically 
well-developed coastal regions to find work, creating a so 
called "tidal wave of civilian workers." In 1992, the province 
exported approximately 5 million workers (around 2 million on a 
year-round basis). Gradually this shift is creating a trend that 
rivals the absorption of the labor force by township 
enterprises. This large-scale spontaneous shift of the rural 
labor force heralds a major trend in socioeconomic development: 
Regardless of whether a locality is importing or exporting 
labor, it will clearly benefit economically and socially. 
Overall, we can say that the current shift in the surplus rural 
labor force is the product of a macroeconomic backdrop of the 
transition from the old economic system to the new during which 
the peasants' increased output is not matched by increased 
income and the gaps between industry and agriculture, between 
urban and rural areas, and among different regions are 
constantly widening. It is a natural product driven by profit; 
it is a natural trend as the labor force turns to face the 
market, adapts to the market, goes after higher economic profit, 
strives to realize its own value, and improves its overall 
quality. It is a natural choice as the peasants make an 
historical transition from being well-fed and clothed to being 
comfortable and advance faster toward the goal of becoming 
relatively well-off. We should also realize that surplus rural 
labor will become an even more serious problem as agriculture 
becomes increasingly mechanized, as scientific farming standard 
rises, as farm area shrinks, and with the natural population 
increase. It is estimated that by the year 2000, Anhui's total 
rural labor force will be 28.13 million strong, with surplus 
labor of approximately 11.50 million. If this huge army of 
surplus labor cannot be effectively shifted, it not only will 
jeopardize the goal of becoming relatively well-off, it can even 
threaten social stability. This is an important 
political-economic problem and a social problem that affects the 
whole situation. 
<H5>  Realistic Approach and Prospects for Accelerating the Shift </H5>
  It is estimated that to achieve the goal of becoming 
relatively well-off by the end of the year 2000, the peasants' 
per capita income should top 1,700 yuan (at that year's prices). 
If we analyze the relevant figures from other countries and 
apply them here, by that time, the agricultural to 
nonagricultural employment ratio for Anhui's rural labor force 
should be adjusted from today's 7.3:2.7 to 3.6:6.4. That is, out 
of the total labor force of 28.13 million, 10.03 million should 
be in agriculture while 18.10 million should be in the 
nonagricultural sector. These represent decrease and increase of 
37 percent respectively based on 1992 figures, and only then can 
we basically complete the historical mission of shifting 11.50 
million surplus rural labor force. Judging by the current 
conditions of the province's resources and economic development 
and summing up the experiences and approaches of various 
localities over the years, it is still possible to realize this 
goal via different channels to speed up the shift of the surplus 
rural labor force: 
  (1) Readjust agriculture's internal structure, 
vigorously develop forestry, animal husbandry, sideline 
production, and fishery, and encourage the surplus labor force 
to go wider and deeper into agriculture. As a major 
agricultural province, Anhui is rich in agricultural resources 
and rural labor resource . Much can be said about how to develop 
and utilize those agricultural resources and at the same time 
properly tap the rural labor resource; there is huge potential. 
Currently, the agricultural sector has a poor internal 
employment structure: the labor force is concentrated primarily 
in the planting industry, and within the planting industry, the 
emphasis is on grain production. In 1992, province-wide, 18.65 
million people were employed in the planting industry; only 1.27 
million were employed in fore stry, animal husbandry, sideline 
production, and fishery--they made up 6.4 percent of the work 
force in the planting industry. Thus, for most localities in 
Anhui, we must plant our foothold on the comprehensive 
development of agricultural resources, and while stabilizing 
grain production, we should use a two-prong approach of 
expanding across the board and developing internally to 
accelerate the rural labor force's shift from crop-planting to 
forestry, animal husbandry, sideline production, and fishery a 
nd from simple grain planting to growing other cash crops. We 
must expand forestry, animal husbandry, sideline production, and 
fishery and the growing of cash crops, increase their share and 
efficiency, and increase the peasants' income via several 
channels. The province currently has 65 million mu of arable 
land; 25 million is suitable for forest planting and 13.81 
million mu for growing aquatic products. Their current 
exploitation and utilization rate and production rates are 
fairly low and therefore accelerating the development of 
forestry, animal husbandry, sideline production, fishery, and 
cash crop productions will provide much potential for changing 
agriculture's internal structure and the labor force's 
employment structure. Initially, the ratio of labor force in the 
planting industry to those in forestry, animal husbandry, 
sideline production, and fishery and cash crops should be 
adjusted from 93.6:6.4 to 79.8:20.2 by the year 2000, raising 
the labor force in the latter group by 13.8 percent. Based on 
the 1980 to 1992 figures where each percentage point increase in 
the output value of forestry, animal husbandry, sideline 
production, and fishery resulted in an increase in employment of 
61,000 people, we need a work force of 2.18 million people, 
890,000 more than in 1992. By developing "one superior and two 
high" in agriculture, Anhui can achieve an average of one mu of 
high efficiency cash-crop farm per peasant household, and based 
on 2 mu of land per worker, this can accommodate 6.85 million 
workers, and subtracting the 1.37 million workers needed in 
conventional farming, we can absorb 5.48 million workers. Thus, 
by readjusting agriculture's internal structure and increasing 
the agricultural resource utilization rate, the province can 
absorb more than 6.37 million of the rural labor force. This is 
an effective way to move the surplus rural force which we should 
not overlook. 
  (2) Optimize the rural industrial structure, vigorously 
develop township enterprises, and promote the shift of the 
surplus rural labor force to the non-agriculture sector. 
Whether the peasants' per capita net income can reach the 
relatively well-off level is determined to a large extent by the 
optimization of the rural industrial structure. Looking at 
Anhui's current situation, the rural industrial structure is 
only a "well-fed and clothed" structure. In 1992, the 
nonagricultural sector's share of the province's rural total 
output was 8.9 percentage points below the national average. 
This structure se riously hampers the increase in peasant income 
and its advancement toward the goal of becoming relatively 
well-off. In the next seven years or so, we have a very arduous 
task in meeting the provincial party committee and provincial 
government's standards for a comfortable rural life. We cannot 
rely on agriculture alone. We must guide and organize the shift 
of masses of peasant to the secondary and tertiary industries. 
Practice in many localities has already proved that the 
development of township enterpri ses should be the main focus of 
attack if we want to increase the peasants' income and advance 
faster toward the goal of becoming fairly well-off, and it is 
also the main avenue for shifting the rural labor force. Between 
1984 and 1991, the total output value of China's township 
enterprises rose from 100 billion to 1.1 trillion, at a net 
increase of 1 trillion yuan; total labor force employed by 
township enterprises also rose to 100 million. This means for 
every 10,000 yuan increase in the township ente rprises' output 
value, we can employ one more worker. In 1992, Anhui's township 
enterprises' output value was 58.8 billion yuan, and that year, 
nearly 600,000 people were shifted, an increase of 12.3 percent 
compared to the previous year. By the year 2000, Anhui's 
township enterprises will employ 13.80 million people, a net 
increase of 8.45 million compared to 1992; they will account for 
49 percent of the total rural labor force. Of course, township 
enterprises' rapid development is constrained by many factors; 
fund problem is one of the main problems. Based on the 
province's financial situation, working hard to raise money from 
the masses, from enterprises themselves, through bank loans, and 
via foreign investments, we can provide township enterprises 
with an average of 5 billion yuan a year in development fund. 
Based on the current figure that each additional person must be 
outfitted with 5,000 yuan's worth of equipment, in the next 
seven years, it is possible for township enterprises to absorb 
another 8.45 million people. 
  (3) Actively develop a rural socialized service system 
with emphasis on the civilian-run format, broaden employment 
opportunities, and promote the surplus rural labor force's shift 
to the tertiary industry. To develop a socialist market 
economy, we must have a fully developed tertiary industry, and 
the rural areas especially must set up a socialized service 
system. In 1992, Anhui's tertiary industry accounted for 21.4 
percent of the province's total output value; it e mployed 15 
percent of the labor force--both were below the national average 
levels. The rural area's tertiary industry is even weaker. Only 
around 5 percent of the labor force is employed in the tertiary 
industry. They are concentrated primarily in communications, 
transportations, retail shops, and restaurants and other 
businesses; few have anything to do directly with services 
before, during, and after agricultural productions. In 
particular, because circulation lags far behind production, 
agricultur al and sideline products and township enterprise 
products are stockpiled. To solve this problem, besides 
producing hot-selling products, it is especially important to 
enliven circulation services. We should emphasize building a 
rural socialized service system that focuses on circulation. 
Looking at years of practice, to set up and firmly establish a 
service system truly capable of shouldering this responsibility, 
we cannot rely on the government service organizations to do it 
all; instead, we must continue to give play to the government 
service organizations, but at the same time, we must actively 
develop a very vigorous, civilian-run rural service system. So 
called civilian-run rural service system is a kind of community 
shareholding cooperative organization that is based on family 
enterprises and is organized voluntarily by the peasants to 
provide services before, during, and after agricultural 
production. The basic mold is to make cooperatives its main 
format, marketization its basic direction, modernization its 
strong suit, and industrialization its general approach. It is 
an effective means to adjust to the development of the 
agricultural labor force and the shift in rural labor force 
during the agricultural modernization process, and it opens up a 
new way for the surplus rural labor force to shift from the 
agricultural to the nonagricultural sector. This kind of 
family-enterprise-based rural cooperative economic organization 
turns separate agriculture, industry, and commerce management 
into joint management; it changes the separate and solitary use 
of important factors of production to optimized composite use; 
it turns dispersed, low-efficiency use of resources into 
properly-allocated, comprehensive use; it reduces the multiple 
links and speeds up the slow circulation of agricultural 
products; it turns a single family's productive force into a 
combined community productive force, so that rural production 
and management can make the historical change from "separate" to 
"combined" and in turn promote the progress of the rural 
productive forces and the modernization of agriculture. Looking 
at initial practices, the civilian-run service system is playing 
a very important role in promoting the readjustment of the rural 
industrial structure and accelerating the development of the 
rural economy, and meanwhile, it itself has a large capacity for 
absorbing the surplus labor force. Its future is very promising, 
and it should be vigorously developed. 
  (4) Reform the system of separation of to wn and 
country, accelerate the process of turning villages into towns 
and townships, and encourage the surplus rural labor force to 
move to the small towns and townships. Urbanization is an 
important norm gauging a country's or a region's level of 
modernization. The establishment of the socialist market 
economic system creates an important condition for smashing the 
dual, city-versus-country, socioeconomic structure. We should 
seize the opportunity, accelerate the development of the 
nonagricultura l sector, and actively guide its regionalized 
development, so that the masses of peasants will embark on the 
rural urbanization road by leaving the land and the villages, 
leaving the villages without entering the cities, or leaving the 
villages to build new cities. Since reform and opening up, 
Anhui's economy has undergone rapid development, but its 
urbanization standards still lag behind. In 1992, of the 
province's total population of 58.17 million, the cities and 
towns claimed 8.73 million, or 15.1 pe rcent; agricultural 
population claimed 49.44 million, or 84.9 percent. In 1992, the 
province's GVIAO was 133.3 billion yuan, of which industries 
contributed 72.4 percent and agriculture contributed only 27.6 
percent. This structure serious hampers the unification of town 
and country and the process of modernizing agriculture. It not 
only makes it difficult to raise the peasants' income level or 
realize the goal of becoming relatively well-off, but the 
state's modernization process is also affected. It is 
increasingly clear that shifting the rural labor force to the 
towns and townships is an irreversible trend. The massive shift 
of rural labor force in recent years is but a prelude to the 
great future migration of peasants from the villages to the 
cities and towns. For this reason, we must correctly gauge this 
trend and actively promote the progress of urbanization. 
Internationally, there are two ways to achieve urbanization: 
centralized and decentralized. In general, for the 
industrialization of the well-developed nations early on, they 
chose the approach of expanding the large cities which brought a 
rapid rate of urbanization, but it also brought economic and 
social problems to the cities and caused agriculture to remain 
stagnation and even shrink temporarily. Nations that began their 
industrialization after World War II primarily took the 
decentralized approach and focused more on rural 
industrialization and the development of small cities and towns. 
This latter approach is more appropriate for us. Currently, 
Anhui's small cities and towns are spread out among the masses 
of villages; they are the rural political, economic, and 
cultural centers. In the wake of the development of the market 
economy, small towns and townships, acting as bridges and links 
between town and country, will shoulder the important 
responsibility of absorbing and transforming the rural surplus 
labor force. At the end of 1992, the province had 3,219 assorted 
market towns with total population of 9.167 million. Each market 
town had an average of fewer than 1,000 nonagricultural 
population. They are small-scale, low-level towns with little 
impact. Where people gather, towns flourish, and when towns 
flourish, people tend to gather. If, on the average, each market 
town doubles its nonagricultural personnel, we not only can 
permanently shift more than 3 million rural workers but can 
bring definite scale economy and cumulative effects to 
industrial production and the tertiary industry in the small 
towns and townships and impact and give impetus to the economic 
development of the surrounding areas. To build small cities and 
towns, we must insist on unified planning, proper layout, 
raising funds in all directions, comprehensive development, and 
the construction of other necessary facilities. First, we must 
choose some central cities and towns that have good basic 
conditions and good future prospects and develop them first, so 
that they can play an exemplary role and bring along the others. 
In terms of economic components, we must let the individual, 
private, and shareholding cooperative economies develop freely. 
In terms of industrial development, we should start out from the 
small cities' and towns' own conditions, set priority, and 
integrate the development of small industrial zones and markets. 
We should emphasize the development of the construction 
industry, the transportations and communications industries, the 
real estate industry, and other service trades to strengthen the 
overall function of the small cities an d towns. While 
accelerating their development, we should also develop the 
large- and medium-sized cities, so that they can be the source 
of radiation and point of support to the small cities and towns. 
  (5) Set up an open labor market, expand labor export, 
and encourage the surplus rural labor force to shift across 
regional boundaries. In recent years, more and more of 
Anhui's workers have gone outside of the region to work; the 
number has reached 5 million. This trend of going outside of t 
he region to work has been coined by the cadres and the masses 
as "machine-less factory, counter-less shop, invisible technical 
school, and credit-less bank." It not only has increased the 
peasant's economic income but even more important is that it has 
forged ties between town and country and enlivened the factors 
of production, so that through this kind of labor export, many 
peasants have gone to the economically well-developed cities and 
regions not only to learn technologies but also to obtain 
information and enhance their sense of commodity economy, and 
more importantly, it has integrated the dual--town versus 
country--economic structure into a single structure and has 
created conditions for modernizing agriculture. Because of the 
many limiting conditions, in the next seven years or longer, it 
will be very difficult for Anhui to completely digest the 
surplus rural labor force internally, and there will continue to 
be big differences in economic development among the provinces. 
Thus, labor export will continue to be an important way to 
solve the surplus rural labor force problem. The trend of large 
numbers of surplus workers going outside of the region to work 
or do business will continue, and this trend will grow -- 
perhaps no fewer than 6 million people will move, which adds 
another million people or more on top of today's labor export 
figure. It is estimated that by the year 2000, there may be as 
many as 2.2 million people working outside of the province 
year-round. We should continue to advocate, encourage, and 
support labor export. In particular, we should gradually set up 
a labor market network that covers both town and country, 
actively expand the organized export of labor, reduce the kind 
of aimlessness typical of uncontrolled mobility, and promptly 
solve the problems created by the shift in the labor force--such 
as transportation, family planning, and public security--so as 
to promote the healthy development of labor export. 
<H5>  III. Provide Active Guidance and Give Impetus To </H5>
Accelerating the Shift 
  Shift in the rural labor force not only involves the 
peasants, agriculture, and the villages but also affects the 
cities, industries, social life, and other aspects. It is a 
social project of grand scale, and we must mobilize and organize 
all sides to actively participate and work hard together in 
order to effectively promote a quicker pace in shifting the 
rural labor force. Today, the following problems urgently need 
to be addressed: 
  One, we must further liberate our thinking, change old 
concepts, and conscientiously strengthen organizational 
leadership in working to shift the labor force. Because of the 
old traditional concepts and decades of economic planning, many 
cadres and the masses have come to believe that "peasants grow 
crop, and the crop they grow is grain," that "cities build 
factories, and villages engage in agriculture," and that "any 
shift in the rural labor force will weaken the agricultural 
base" and so on. They also embrace such small-scale peasant 
economy co ncepts as finding satisfaction in being warm and 
well-fed and being complacent with a little money, and these 
ideas have influenced and obstructed the shift in the rural 
labor force. Therefore, we must further liberate our thinking 
and free ourselves from the bondage of these concepts. We should 
have a "first-course procedure" to make the shift in the rural 
labor force successful. In particular, in terms of guiding 
ideology, the party committee and government leading comrades 
should deepen and heighten their awareness from the strategic 
high point that the goal of becoming relatively well-off, the 
industrial structure, and the employment structure are a 
"three-in-one" concept, and they should be diligent in guiding 
and organizing the shift in the rural labor force. It is fair to 
say that whether we can seize the historical opportunity before 
us, take advantage of the situation, and accelerate the shift of 
the surplus rural labor force are in essence an important 
indication of whether the leaders at al l levels, especially the 
key leaders in the prefectures, cities, and counties, are in 
command of all aspects of the rural tasks, and they are also an 
important test of the ideologies, concepts, leadership 
standards, and the ability of the leading group. Party 
committees and governments at all levels should put the shift of 
rural labor force on the top of their agenda and keep in mind 
the goal of becoming relatively well-off as well as local 
conditions to promulgate programs, procedure, and measures for 
shifting the rural labor force through the end of the century. 
We must insist on suiting measures to local conditions and 
provide different types of advice, choose the breakthrough 
points and the main approaches properly, pay attention to the 
typical effects, and give impetus to the task of moving the 
labor force. 
  Two, we must deepen the reform process and promulgate and 
perfect other policies to complement the reform. In the wake of 
the establishment of the socialist market system, the policies 
and s ystems promulgated under the planned economic system no 
longer meet the needs of the new situation and can affect and 
even obstruct the movement of the rural labor force and the 
further liberation of the productive forces. In the spirit of 
reform, we should promptly promulgate, perfect, and develop new 
policies and system that are compatible with the market economy. 
More problematic is, for example, the existing town and country 
household control system and policy which seriously restrict the 
proper cir culation of labor force between town and country, 
obstruct fair competition, and hinder the processes of rural 
industrialization and urbanization and should be actively 
reformed in order to create the conditions to achieve fair 
competition and proper circulation of the labor force. The 
existing rural land management policy and system restrict the 
movement and relative concentration of land. On the one hand 
they affect the shift of the labor force to the nonagricultural 
sector, and on the other hand, the y prevent the farming experts 
from getting the amount of land they deserve in order to achieve 
economies of scale. Therefore we should explore land management 
system and policies that are compatible with the new situation 
after we have stabilized and perfected the output-related 
contract responsibility system. With regard to the rural area's 
various specialized technical and management personnel, we 
should consider the rural area's real conditions and make 
professional skills and management standards th e primary bases 
to formulate a unified set of standards for the rural 
specialized technical and management positions, create an organ 
to evaluate job titles and issue certificates, so that the 
hiring units can refer to those standards. We should set up a 
social security system and gradually provide collective-, 
individual-, and privately-owned enterprise workers 
comprehensive medical care, pension, job-related injury, and 
unemployment insurance, so that the workers' basic needs and 
legal rights and privileges are protected, so that they do not 
have to worry about the future after moving to a different 
sector. With respect to the industrial policy, we should 
encourage and guide the spread of agricultural and sideline 
product processing and parts and spares production from the 
cities to the township enterprises and small cities and towns to 
give full play to the superiority of the rural labor force and 
local resources and promote the development of the town and the 
country economies. 
  Three, we should accelerate the development of the labor 
market and set up a network-type service system. Objectively, 
the development of the market economy requires a perfect market 
for factors of production. Similarly, a mobile labor force 
requires a labor market, advice, information, training, 
organization and other services. These in turn provide the 
opportunity and condition for the rural labor force to achieve 
free and proper circulation and to compete on equal footing. 
Overall, Anhui's labor market is still in a naturally 
dispersed, relatively immature stage. It has not formed a 
regional market or a network of service systems, and as a 
result, there is a lack of information and the channels are 
clogged, so that labor circulation often tends to be aimless. It 
is imperative that we set up a labor market system that is 
compatible with the shift and employment of the rural labor 
force. In this and next year, the province should focus on the 
construction of prefectural, city, county, and key town and 
township labo r markets and continuously expand, perfect, and 
upgrade them to eventually form a network. By the end of the 
century, we should have a fully equipped, well-informed, full 
service, standardized, and guaranteed labor service network that 
covers the province's every town and township and which links 
tracks with the national and international labor markets. It 
should basically shoulder the whole province's labor export 
organizational responsibility. To accelerate the pace of labor 
market construction, fund s should be gathered through multiple 
channels at every level. In accordance with the principle of 
"whoever makes the investments obtain ownership and reaps the 
profit," we should mobilize and organize the state, collectives, 
individuals, and the shareholding cooperatives to work together 
and vigorously develop a team consisting of all types of labor 
intermediary organizations and agents to form an open labor 
market and its service system. We should also speed up market 
legislation to standardize the la bor market activities and 
diligently protect the workers' legal rights and privileges. 
  Four, we should set up a rural education system consisting 
of 
a "central program for three types of education" to improve the 
overall quality of the rural labor force. In the wake of the 
development of the productive forces, we are increasingly 
demanding of the quality of the workers. The existing rural 
education system is very incompatible with the need to raise the 
worker's educational and technical qualities. T his is 
manifested especially in the backward vocational and technical 
education and adult education which restricts the mobility of 
the labor force. For this reason, we must deepen the reform of 
the rural education system and set up a new system consisting of 
a "central program for three types of education"--basic 
education, vocational and technical education, and adult 
education. In other words, we must continue to focus on the 
universal, 9-year, compulsory education system, but we should 
also take the multi-level, multi-channel, and multi-format 
approach to vigorously develop rural vocational-technical 
education and adult education. Vocational-technical education 
should be linked to the colleges and universities and scientific 
research units at the higher level, maintain contact with 
various trades and industries laterally, and impact the masses 
of rural households below, so that the rural economic, science 
and technology, and education departments' human, financial, and 
material resources become one strong combined force. Adult 
education should consist primarily of practical technical 
education. The relevant departments and units at every level 
should get organized to offer the rural labor force training for 
different professions or of different types, so that every 
worker at least have one or two special skills. We should strive 
for a 1:1 ratio between polytechnic schools and regular junior 
and senior high schools in the villages throughout the province 
by the end of the century. For rural adul t education, we should 
strive to build comprehensive training centers in the counties, 
central schools in the villages and towns, and tutorials in the 
administrative villages. At the same time, the middle and 
elementary schools should offer manual labor courses, technical 
course, and vocational elective courses, and we should 
accelerate the education reform and school system reform to 
separate out the students at the end of their junior high or 
senior high school years and implement the "three-plus-one" 
system (that is, upon graduating from junior or senior high, 
students can enroll in a one-year, vocational-technical training 
course) to provide some students with directional or preparatory 
professional-technical education. The province, prefectures, and 
counties should set up vocational-technical education and adult 
education funds, provide paid services to get the development 
rolling, and vigorously advocate, encourage, and support various 
trades and industries, units, and individuals to open schools 
and offer training courses of all types. Through the "three 
kinds of education," we can accelerate the improvement in the 
overall quality of the rural labor force and create the 
conditions for the successful transfer of the labor force. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20332 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  22 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Funding for Agricultural Development </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Funding for Agricultural Development </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0341A Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 22 Feb 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0341A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Staff Correspondent Wang Xinjian (3769 0207 </F>
1696) and Staff Reporter Zhang Zichen (1728 1311 5256): "With Wu 
Kunlong, deputy director of the State Comprehensive Agricultural 
Development Office"] 
  [Text] In this new historical situation, the state has 
established a new strategic project: there will be large-scale 
investment in comprehensive agricultural development to bring 
about macroeconomic adjustment and control and ultimately to 
realize the modernization of agriculture. This systematic 
project requires more investment, and in addition requires 
scientific and directed logical application. To discuss such 
issues as the annual collection of more than 5 billion yuan in 
capital, its allocation and administration, etc., we visited the 
Permanent Vice Director of the State Comprehensive Agricultural 
Development Office Wu Kunlong [0702 0981 7893]. 
  Question: What is your appraisal of the 
application of investment since China initiated its project of 
implementing comprehensive agricultural development? 
  Answer: The nation set out on the project of 
comprehensive agricultural development in 1988. As of 1993, it 
had invested a total of 25.31 billion yuan in capital, including 
6.84 billion yuan from the central financial authorities. It is 
the first incidence of such large-scale concentrated investment 
since the founding of the People's Republic of China. 
  This project has reliable resources of capital, clear 
directions for its application, policies which are quite 
favorable, and a complete system. So party and administrative 
leadership have given it their close attention, the masses have 
welcomed it, the capital has been applied efficiently. The 
investment structure reflects the state's policies on industry 
and technology. 
  In the 25.31 billion yuan investment I referred to earlier, 
75 percent was put into grain, cotton, and vegetable oil 
production, 15 percent was put into the production of meat, 
eggs, and aquatic products, and 10 percent went into building 
forests and grasslands. Categorized by developmental and 
handling measures, 80 percent was put into construction 
measures, 10 percent into biological measures, and 10 percent 
into scientific and technological measures. The figures show 
that over the last six years there has been a total of 40 
billion yuan in capital for state-fixed comprehensive 
developmental investment plus farm labor force converted into 
capital; this is equivalent to more than 10 percent of the gross 
fixed capital in publicly owned, collective, and personal 
investment during the same period. In this, the proportion for 
major grain-producing areas was even greater. For example, 
Anhui's gross investment in comprehensive agricultural 
development was 1.23 billion yuan in 1992, which was about 10 
percent of the province's gross societal fixed asset investment 
(including primary, secondary, and tertiary industry). There is 
no doubt that this has been very beneficial in strengthening the 
reserve strength of agricultural development and regional 
economic development. 
  Question: What have been the problems with the application 
and administration of capital recent years? 
  Answer: There have been four aspects to this: 
  1) There have been too many "connecting batch" projects; 
they 
formed a base, and have affected capital turnover and 
efficiency. In 1993, the central financial authorities made 
arrangements for 1.7 billion yuan in capital, but most of this 
has been taken up by projects already approved, and only 140 
million yuan of the capital can really be arranged for renewal. 
2) Capital is being used in a scattered fashion, getting quite a 
ways away from the focus. 3) The capital has not come through on 
time, local supporting capital is hard to implement, and 
allocation and payment are taking too long. In some cases, units 
which have made application still have not received all of the 
year's capital by the end of year, which affects the pace of 
their development and their accomplishment of construction 
assignments. 4) Impractical repayment terms for financial 
capital debts makes it difficult to repay them. These problems 
demand our closest attention, we absolutely cannot be careless 
about them or lower our guard. Capital investment and 
administration supplement each other, so if we only pay 
attention to investment and not to administration, our 
developing goals will hard to attain, and there will be no way 
to be efficient. So from now on, our development department and 
financial department must take very seriously their 
administration of capital use. 
  Question: What is this year's gross investment capital and 
its structure? 
  Answer: It could increase to a total of 5.8 billion yuan 
this 
year (excluding the conversion value of the farmers' labor 
force). It is chiefly composed of three aspects. These are the 
1.9 billion yuan central financial allocation, localities' 
minimum support of 1.9 billion yuan at a 1:1 rate to complete 
the set, and in addition, there is a 2 billion yuan loan from 
the Agriculture Bank. 
  Question: What is the future of agricultural development 
capital? 
  Answer: It will certainly increase. This is because 
agriculture must have more capital investment. In order to 
continue making good allocations of agricultural development 
capital and meet the demands of the central government's 1993 
rural work conference, the 1994 financial capital budget for 
support of agriculture must be higher than the normal increase 
in financial income proposed in the "Agriculture Law." 
Establish a grain risk fund, to be used chiefly for central 
grain storage costs, and subsidize the gap between the prices 
for purchases and sales of grain. Increase by 1 billion yuan 
yearly until the year 2000 the funding for providing work as a 
form of relief. Increase comprehensive agricultural development 
capital by 200 million yuan, to 1.9 billion yuan from its 
present 1.7 billion yuan. Gradually find some resolution to the 
troublesome debts accruing from grain producing enterprises' 
losses. 
  Certainly, increasing the investment in agriculture is not 
just the concern of financial departments; there are many 
aspects to it, such as bank credit, investment in construction, 
fund-raising by agriculture itself, importing foreign capital, 
etc., in addition to finance. All departments should work 
together -- when everyone adds fuel the flames rise high. When 
overall agricultural investment is increased, the capital for 
comprehensive agriculture development will naturally increase 
with it. 
  Question: What are the possible ways of implementing out 
supporting capital? 
  Answer: Implementing local supporting capital is the key to 
increasing investment and guaranteeing that projects will be 
implemented. Beginning this year, the state will require that 
fiscal authorities at the provincial level assume the lion's 
share of supporting capital. In addition, this capital must be 
held in reserve when making out the budget at the beginning of 
each year. Now, with reform of the financial system reform, the 
sources of agricultural development funds will certainly change, 
and for some provinces it may be not sufficient to just rely on 
that portion of the tax revenues received from occupying 
cultivated land which is controlled by provincial fiscal 
authorities. In these circumstances, it is essential to arrange 
that part of the capital resources be kept in reserve for 
contingency use. We cannot fill out our needs with bogus 
supporting capital, nor can we resort to makeshift solutions. 
  We must really strengthen our management of capital. We 
especially must strengthen that management in advance, using 
capital within strictly fixed limitations. Comprehensive 
agricultural development funds are different from general 
administrative funds; we must make the usage of these two very 
clear, never mixing them up. In the meantime, we should 
strengthen our regular supervision, examination and 
administration, giving financial departments the authority to 
halt allocation at the first appearance of any violation of 
discipline. Comprehensive agricultural development 
organizations must accept the supervision of financial 
departments. 
  Question: What adjustments should we make in the investment 
mix right now? 
  Answer: The general breakdown of overall agricultural 
development investment is that 80 percent of central and local 
financial investment is used to improve the basic condition of 
agricultural production and develop such major agricultural 
by-products as grains, cotton, vegetable oil, sugar, and meat, 
etc., while 20 percent is used to develop a variety of 
operations in the regions which have the projects; of the 
special loans from the Agricultural Bank, 50 to 60 percent is 
used for land exploration and treatment, and 40 to 50 percent is 
used for production and operations. This kind of investment mix 
is of significant value in increasing the staying power of 
agricultural development and increasing the output of grains, 
cotton, vegetable oil, and meat. But, in the new situation of 
increasing the development of a socialist market economy, it 
will be inappropriate to keep on arranging our capital according 
to such quotas; we must readjust. From now on, calculating with 
the province as the unit, central and local financial investment 
should have a quota for increasing investment for improving the 
basic condition of agricultural production by not less than 70 
percent, and no more than 30 percent into investment in 
developing multiple operations and leading projects. As for 
arranging bank credits, again counting the province as the unit, 
30 percent will be used for land exploration and treatment, and 
70 percent for multiple operations and leading projects. This 
will reflect governmental activities and suit the demands of the 
market economy while developing high output and efficient 
agriculture. 
  Question: When will the project file system be implemented? 
  Answer: The project file system is a means of advanced 
administration. It embodies the principle of selecting that 
which is excellent and competitive, and is beneficial to 
improving the efficient use of capital. Vice Premier Zhu Rongji 
has praised the township enterprise project file system very 
highly. Some places which are carrying out comprehensive 
agricultural development are in the initial stages of 
establishing this system too, and these should be vigorously 
expanded. Starting this year, both the State Office for 
Comprehensive Agricultural Development and the provincial 
development offices should establish their own project file, 
gradually changing the work of setting projects to regular work. 
Before applying for setting projects, each area and unit should 
subject projects initially selected through feasibility 
demonstration, and when state investment becomes possible, take 
the project from the file and submit it to higher authority. 
  Permanent Vice Director Wu Kunlong stressed that each 
locality must do well the preparatory work involved in 
implementing the new system by suiting measures to their local 
conditions, strengthening professional training, working out 
detailed regulations for implementation, and link up 
appropriately with the original system. Only in this way will 
comprehensive agricultural development in China have great 
economic and social efficiency in investment and production, and 
push comprehensive agricultural development work to a new stage. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20333 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  16 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jiangxi 1993 Agricultural Outputs, Plans for 1994 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Jiangxi 1993 Agricultural Outputs, Plans for 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0397C Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO in Chinese 16 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0397C </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] In 1993 gross output of grain in Jiangxi 
Province totaled 30.34 billion jin, an increase of 1.34 billion 
jin over the assigned task; cotton 3,124,000 dan, a 5.3 percent 
increase; oil crops 778,100 tons, a 4.9 percent increase; 
18,110,000 hogs were removed from stock, a 15.2 percent 
increase; and aquatic products output 554,900 tons, a 34.3 
percent increase. Per capita net income of farmers was 870 yuan, 
a net increase of 102 yuan over 1992. 
  Planned grain output in 1994 is 30 billion jin. The planned 
cotton area is 2.6 million mu, an increase of 600,000 mu over 
1993, and cotton output 4 million dan. Planned aquatic products 
output is 650,000 tons, and per capita farmer income will reach 
1000 yuan. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20334 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  24 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Small Phosphate Fertilizer Plants: Quality Problems </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Small Phosphate Fertilizer Plants: Quality Problems </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0350A Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 24 Feb 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0350A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by reporter Zhang Chaoyang (1728 2600 7122): </F>
"Results of 1993 Unified Inspection of China's Phosphate 
Fertilizer Shows: Quality Problem in Small Enterprises Is 
Serious"] 
  [Text] There has been a fairly large rise in the general 
quality level of China's phosphate fertilizer products, but the 
quality problem in small enterprises is still fairly serious. Of 
the 800 phosphate fertilizer-producing enterprises covered by a 
national unified inspection, the sample qualified rate of small 
enterprises was only 76.9 percent, 19.3 percentage points below 
the sample average qualified rate (96.2 percent) of large- and 
medium-sized enterprises. Of all of them, the 21 
inferior-quality products were all produced by the small 
enterprises; of the 93 samples with unqualified phosphate 
content, the small enterprises accounted for 96.8 percent. An 
official in the relevant part of the State Technology 
Supervision Administration (STSA) has pleaded for a 
strengthening of quality management in small phosphate 
fertilizer enterprises. 
  The STSA recently organized a nationwide unified supervision 
and inspection of the quality of two phosphate fertilizer 
products: calcium magnesium phosphate and calcium 
superphosphate. The results of inspection of 811 samples in 800 
phosphate fertilizer-producing enterprises in 28 provinces 
throughout China showed that 644 qualified, the sample average 
qualification rate being 81.9 percent. Of them, of the 209 
samples in 199 large- and medium-sized enterprises 201 
qualified, the qualification rate being 96.2 percent, and in the 
601 small enterprises inspected there were fairly many problems 
in 602 samples. The main problem is that, because old and 
obsolete methods of production continue to be used, the moisture 
content is high, the effective phosphate content is low, and the 
free acid content is overproof. For example, in the fourth-grade 
calcium superphosphate produced by Shaanxi Province's Chenggu 
Yuantian Chemical Plant, the moisture content was as high as 
26.8 percent (the standard requirement is less than 15 percent), 
and the effective phosphate content was only 3.7 percent (the 
standard requirement is greater than or egual to 12.0 percent). 
The Qiling-brand fourth-grade calcium superphosphate produced by 
the Linzi Guoli Chemical Plant in Zibo City, Shandong Province, 
went directly out of the factory without going through a 
maturation process; the free acid content of its products was 
15.5 percent (the standard requirement is less than or equal to 
5.5 percent), exceeding the upper limit of the standard 
requirement by nearly three times. 
  The STSA official concluded: The main causes of the quality 
problem in small phosphate fertilizer enterprises are: the 
consciousness of quality is poor and enterprise management is 
slack; production conditions are poor and the technological 
level is low; and products are turned out in large quantities 
without regard for quality, shoddy work is done, and inferior 
materials are used. The official demanded that the enterprises 
that were found unqualified in the unified inspection supervise 
and urge their relevant departments in charge to be responsible 
for rectification and reform, and said that the original 
producing firms must recall inferior-quality products and 
reprocess them technically. With regard to enterprises that 
intentionally turn out products in large quantities without 
regard for quality and that cheat the consumers, he said that, 
besides meting out severe punishment, cases in which the 
circumstances are serious must be turned over to the judicial 
organs for investigation into the responsibility for the crime. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20335 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  9 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SOCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Surveys Reveal New Trends in Divorces </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Surveys Reveal New Trends in Divorces </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0207B Shanghai SHEHUI [SOCIETY] in Chinese No 109, Feb 
94 pp 4-7, 21 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0207B </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai SHEHUI [SOCIETY] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chu Zhaorui (0328 0340 3843): "Current New </F>
Trends in Dissolving Marriage"--edited by Lao Qin (0525 0530)] 
  [Excerpts] [passage omitted] A comprehensive analysis of a 
recently completed nationwide social investigation and various 
regular surveys reveal the following new trends in dissolving 
marriage at present: 
  With regard to divorce cases, there are more wives than 
husbands requesting divorce. About 70 percent of the cases are 
requested by wives. Of the wives requesting divorce, 
intellectual women account for a bigger share, i.e., 86.1 
percent. There are more divorce cases in big cities than in 
small and medium cities, and in particular, more cases occur in 
coastal open cities. More couples under 35 are seeking 
divorce--they account for over 60 percent of the total divorce 
cases. More divorce cases involve couples married shortly after 
falling in love --they make up 69.16 percent of the total. Also, 
more divorce cases are found among those who have 
children--64.82 percent of the total. 
  With regard to divorcees, several "added" new trends have 
appeared. There are more advanced-age divorcees. There is no 
lack of divorcees who are in their 50's. People in their 60's 
getting divorced are not rare, and divorce cases involving 
septuagenarians are often heard of. A weird report carried in 
SHANGHAI FAYUAN [0006 3189 3127 5373] says that an 80-year-old 
woman and her 84-year-old husband insisted on divorcing each 
other. There are more early-married couples getting divorced, 
such cases now hitting a record high. More actors and actress 
get divorced than ever before. This is especially so among young 
performers whose divorce rate is as high as 70-80 percent--a 
fact that is known to all. There are also more self-employed and 
contract work households getting divorced after becoming better 
off. In some cities, the divorce rate among the self-employed 
has reached 12.4 percent. Some well-to-do people have even used 
money in exchange for agreement to divorce. In addition, more 
divorce cases have appeared among people going abroad. More and 
more people who have gone abroad to study or to "earn credits" 
have divorced their "ladies in the rear [liu shou nu shi 3966 
1343 1166 1102]" or "gentlemen without wives by their side [tai 
kong nan shi 1132 4500 3948 1102]." 
  As to reasons for divorce, the new trends are as follows: 
A remarkably increased number of divorce cases involve a "third 
party." Such divorcees account for about 25 percent of the total 
divorcees around the country, and the percentage is as high as 
70 percent or so in coastal developed areas. People divorced 
because of "inharmony in sex" have also increased, the 
percentage of such divorcees being 34.7 percent nationwide and 
60-70 percentage in certain areas. More people are divorced due 
to emotional discord. Over 95 percent of the divorce cases are 
attributable to emotional and personality conflicts rather than 
economic problems; still less are they due to political reasons. 
More often than not, divorce is caused by overt or covert 
psychological reasons or not-to-be-slighted social factors. An 
increased number of people seek divorce because of such factors 
as promotion, job transfer, or going to other places to study. 
Those who are mockingly described as "Chen Shimei" of the new 
age have increased in number. Also increased are cases in which 
husbands and wives separate and go different ways under the 
influence of the reform and opening environment or because of 
their different values. 
  In addition, the following new trends have appeared with 
regard to the attitudes and ways in dealing with divorce. People 
who do not consider divorce to be disgraceful have increased to 
73.90 percent. Those taking an indifferent attitude account for 
14.83 percent. And only 11.77 percent think that divorce is 
disgraceful. There are more cases of negotiated divorce than 
cases of divorce based on the court's judgment. In the past 
these two kinds of divorce cases were in the ratio of 1:3. Now, 
the ratio is 3:1 in such big cities as Shanghai. More people 
treat divorce in a civilized manner. Some divorcees hold balls 
and banquets and travel on the occasion of divorce. After 
divorce, some still contact each other and set dates for meeting 
with their children. More divorcees can justly appraise and deal 
with their previous spouses--they account for 61 percent of the 
total divorcees. While 40 percent of the divorcees say they can 
consider remarrying, actually more of them tend to remain single 
in view of the difficulty and trouble in getting remarried. 
Throughout the country, there are about 9.9 million unmarried 
men aged over 30. This is about 3.3 times more than unmarried 
women over 25. Recently, an increase is noted in the number of 
unmarried people between 28 and 49 years of age, and the trend 
is going upward. Beijing has 600,000 unmarried adults, Qingdao 
has 420,000, and Guangzhou has over 1 million. In early 1991, a 
public official bachelors' club, the first of its kind in China, 
was founded in Beijing. Meanwhile, a bachelors' party also 
appeared in Qingdao. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20336 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  9 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SOCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Big Universities Compared to Foreign Counterparts </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Big Universities Compared to Foreign Counterparts </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0207A Beijing JIAOYU YANJIU [EDUCATIONAL RESEARCH] in 
Chinese No 168, Jan 94 pp 34-38 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0207A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JIAOYU YANJIU [EDUCATIONAL RESEARCH] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhou Chuan (0719 1557) of Suzhou University and </F>
responsible editor Zhu Shan (2612 3790): "Project 211--A 
Foundation-Laying Project for China's Education Modernization"] 
  [Excerpts] A key proposal for higher-education development 
made by the State Education Commission, "Project 211" (which 
focuses on building about 100 institutions of higher education 
plus a number of key specialty-course centers to meet the needs 
of the 21st century) has been approved recently by the party 
Central Committee and the State Council. The proposal has thus 
become an official state project, and work has begun to put it 
into practice. After all, the curtain has been formally raised 
for this great trans-century education endeavor. Seeing this, 
insightful people of all social sectors have unanimously 
expressed the earnest hope that, with this project, China's 
higher education will embark on a new course of development. 
[passage omitted] 
  To build big-name universities up to the advanced world 
level by implementing "Project 211," we should, first and 
foremost, look into the standards and characteristics of the 
world's first-rate big-name universities, get acquainted with 
the basic practice of higher education in the world, and see how 
we are lagging behind it. The following is a comparison of some 
major aspects of our institutions with foreign universities, 
especially big-name foreign universities: 
  1. Funds for running institutions. All big-name 
universities in developed countries have ample operating funds. 
Even at the present time when a Western economic recession is in 
the offing, their operating funds are still way above ours. For 
instances, operating funds for all big-name universities in the 
United States are from $700 to $800 million a year. For such 
schools as Stanford and Berkeley, the amount even exceeds $1 
billion. In Japan, the University of Tokyo has an annual budget 
of more than 100 billion yen. All these figures are exclusive of 
private contributions. And whether they are public or private 
universities, their education funds are, without exception, 
supplied mainly by government appropriations. In our country, 
the annual operating funds for the few big-name key universities 
are only about 100 to 200 million yuan of renminbi. As to key 
universities run by provinces, the operating funds are generally 
between 10 and 20 million yuan. Now, all provinces and 
municipalities have done their best to set aside funds for 
"Project 211," but when the money is distributed among numerous 
institutions, the amount that each one can get will be merely 20 
to 30 million yuan a year. Of course, when comparing our 
operating funds with those of our peers in developed countries, 
we have to take account of the different price levels. On the 
other hand, however, we should also consider the fact that a 
sizable part of the operating funds for our universities are 
disbursed as salaries for the large number of "administrative 
personnel" who depend on salaries for their livelihood. Such 
disbursement may cut the already-scanty "operating funds" to one 
half. 
  2. Structure and scale. Most of the first-rate big-name 
universities in the world are "giant universities." They have a 
big structure with all kinds of specialty courses and are, in 
particular, strong in fundamental disciplines. In general, each 
university has over a dozen schools comprising 50-60 
departments, and its full-time students may number tens of 
thousands or even more than 100,000. The ratio between 
undergraduate and graduate students is generally 1:1 or nearly 
so. In Harvard University, the ratio has even reached 1:1.5. 
Most of these universities have more than a dozen or even up to 
100 well-equipped research institutes and laboratories plus 
"research libraries" with 6-7 million volumes of books (the 
Harvard libraries have as many as 11 million volumes). Compared 
with them, most of our institutions of higher education are 
smaller and less efficient. Only a few universities have more 
than 10,000 full-time students. In our big-name key 
universities, the ratio between undergraduate and graduate 
students is generally 4:1 or 5:1. Besides, most of the 
comprehensive universities which have undergone the 1952 
campaign for adjustment of schools and departments are only 
comprehensive in name but not in reality, not to mention those 
specialty colleges, which concentrate on a single field of 
study. Though some reforms toward "comprehensiveness" have been 
carried out by certain universities in recent years, their newly 
established schools and departments can in no way match the old 
ones in quality. 
  3. Autonomy in running schools. In developed countries, 
whether it is France whose higher education is under relatively 
centralized management or countries like Britain and America 
where universities enjoy "unparalleled freedom in the world," 
institutions of higher education are generally given varying 
degrees of autonomy. This is a sacred and inviolable tradition 
of Western higher education formed over the past 1,000 years. 
Although the past few decades have seen an increasingly apparent 
trend toward the "nationalization" of higher education in these 
countries, the governments' role is to guide, rather than 
control, the universities' operations by means of fund 
appropriations or through other measures. In the university, the 
president, as the highest executive, possesses the supreme 
administrative power in reality as well as in name. In our 
country, under the influence of the decades-old planned economic 
system, institutions of higher education have, so far, been 
unable to gain the status as independent legal entities. 
Autonomy in running institutions is still very limited, and the 
administrative power of university presidents is not 
sufficiently protected. School affairs, big or small, are still 
based on the "red-head documents" [government documents with 
large characters printed in red for headings] issued by the 
higher authorities. Without the most rudimentary autonomy, how 
can our institutions operate successfully and play an 
outstanding role in education? 
  4. Administrative system. In Western developed countries, 
autonomy in operating institutions of higher education is 
associated with the tradition of "professors running the 
school." Organizations like professors' associations and 
advisory councils represent the will of teachers at large and 
stand for their rights and interests. According to the 
prevailing international concept, "in an institution of higher 
education experts and researchers are the kings," while the 
president and all administrative functional departments are 
merely spokesmen and executors for the teachers' will. In 
contrast with this, our institutions of higher education have a 
large administrative body, comparable in size to the faculty. It 
has numerous departments, employs a large number of personnel, 
and possesses enormous power, but its work efficiency is 
low--this is rarely seen elsewhere in the world. Such a huge 
administrative and logistic body not only takes up a large part 
of the scanty education funds, but sometimes infringes upon the 
faculty's rights and interests. In some schools, there has 
appeared the weird phenomenon that those who do not teach and 
engage in research work are controlling those who teach and 
engage in research work. Seeing this, some insightful people in 
the higher-education field have raised a cry of warning: Unless 
we drastically streamline these administrative departments, trim 
their personnel, develop automation of the administrative work, 
socialize the logistic service, and give the teachers the status 
as the masters of the institution, we will never be able to 
build a first-rate world-renowned university. 
  5. Faculty. According to UNESCO's statistics, the 
faculty-to-students ratio in institutions of higher education in 
foreign countries was 1:11.1 in the early 1950's, 1:1.8 [as 
published] in the early 1960's, and 1:13.5 in the 1970's. At 
present, the ratio is generally maintained at 1:15. Even in 
research-oriented universities such as Princeton, Stanford, 
Cornell, and Cambridge, the ratio is about 1:10. Moreover, the 
stringent screening and evaluation system and the effective 
arrangement for the flow of teachers have ensured the salient 
features of their faculty members such as having a sound 
academic background and being younger in age. Compared with 
them, the faculty-to-students ratio in our institutions, which 
is generally 1:5 or 1:6, is too low. If the large numbers of 
administrative and logistic personnel are counted as members of 
the "faculty," the ratio will be even much lower. What is more, 
the low faculty-to-students ratio is especially noticeable in 
old key university. Apart from this, there are a host of 
faculty-related problems, including overemphasis on seniority, 
aging of teachers, lack of sound academic backgrounds, 
appointment based on cronyism, and teachers working solely in 
one department. All these have affected, in varying degrees, the 
improvement of the faculty's overall quality. 
  6. Evaluation mechanism. In developed countries, with the 
development of higher-education research, a quality-evaluation 
system for institutions of higher education is becoming mature 
and gradually institutionalized. The United States is the most 
successful in this respect. It has six university accreditation 
associations. Any institution of higher education, if not 
accredited by the association, cannot be recognized as a 
qualified institution, even though it has been approved by the 
state government. In addition, there are some 150 organizations 
for evaluating the quality of institutions or the specialty 
courses offered by them. These organizations are responsible for 
conducting periodical evaluation of institutions of higher 
education. They also publish statements ranking the institutions 
on the basis of their evaluation. Within institutions, it is 
relatively common for teachers and students to evaluate each 
other's performance. This is why some people say that American 
universities are laden with evaluation within and without. It is 
due to this evaluation that American universities are maintained 
at their high level and encouraged to compete with one another 
for prestige. In recent years, China has begun to pay attention 
to evaluating its institutions of higher education. Evaluation 
procedures have been adopted by certain pertinent departments 
and put into practice in some universities on a trial basis. 
However, such work is still in the experimental stage, and 
neither the quality of the evaluation work nor the method 
applied is satisfactory. In most cases, the work done to 
appraise and compare the quality of institutions remains at the 
"experience and impression" level and is far from "scientific." 
Lacking a sound and strict means of evaluation, it is hard to 
raise and control the quality of our institutions. 
  The operation of our institutions of higher education has 
lagged behind the advanced world standards for quality and 
efficiency. There are gaps in many areas, and some of the gaps 
are quite wide. The above-cited are just a few big gaps. There 
is still a long and hard way to go before we can narrow the gaps 
and bring some of our institutions to a higher level through the 
implementation of "Project 211." We should make an adequate 
assessment of the situation and be fully prepared for the work 
before us. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20337 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  10 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY, PUBLIC SECURITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Armed Forces' Needed Skills Advertised </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Armed Forces' Needed Skills Advertised </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0181A Beijing DAXUESHENG [UNIVERSITY STUDENTS] in 
Chinese No 1, 10 Jan 94 pp 59-60 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0181A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing DAXUESHENG [UNIVERSITY STUDENTS] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article: "Information About Armed Forces' Skilled Personnel </F>
Needs"] 
  [Text] Beijing Military Region 
  Graduates and undergraduates are needed in the fields of 
hydrogeology and engineering geology, machine manufacturing 
technology and equipment, electronic engineering, computers and 
computer applications, industrial and civilian construction, 
biochemistry, medicine, mathematics, physics, English language, 
Russian language, Chinese language and literature, journalism, 
politics and law, and political theory. Openings exists in 
scientific research units, institutions of higher education, 
hospitals, and troop units as scientific research technicians, 
instructors, military medical personnel, and as military 
officers and non-military cadres. Jobs are in Hebei Province, 
Shanxi Province, the Inner Mongolian Autonomous Region, Tianjin, 
and Beijing. 
  Unit in charge of receiving graduates: Assignment Office, 
Cadre Department, Beijing Military Region. 
  Contacts: Song Gexin and Qin Shaoxuan 
  Postal Service Number: 100041 
<H5>  Shenyang Military Region </H5>
  Graduates and undergraduates are needed in the fields of 
engineering construction design, industrial electric automation, 
computer application and design, ordnance technology, 
hydrogeology and engineering geology, communications 
engineering, radio technology, electronic precision machines, 
ship and boat electricity supervision, medicine, Russian 
language, Japanese language, French language, and Chinese 
language and literature. Openings are mostly in research units, 
institutions of higher education, hospitals and troop units as 
research technicians, instructors, military medical personnel, 
and various kinds of military officers and non-military cadres. 
The jobs are in Liaoning, Jilin, and Heilongjiang provinces. 
  Unit in charge of receiving graduates: Assignment Office, 
Cadre Department, Shenyang Military Region 
  Contact: Zhang Xiyuan 
  Postal Service Number: 110013 
<H5>  Lanzhou Military Region </H5>
  Graduates and undergraduates are needed in the fields of 
computer applications and design, construction, electronics 
technology, communications engineering, automation, medicine, 
maintenance and repair of medical diagnostic equipment, aerial 
surveying, physics, chemistry, English language, Russian 
language, Mongolian language and literature, journalism, and 
Chinese language and literature. Openings are mostly in 
scientific research units, institutions of higher education, 
hospitals, and troop units as scientific research technicians, 
instructors, military medical personnel, and various kinds of 
military officers and non-military cadres. The jobs are in 
Shaanxi, Gansu, Ningxia, Qinghai, and Xinjiang. 
  Unit in charge of receiving graduates: Scientific and 
Technical Cadres Office, Cadre Department, Lanzhou Military 
Region 
  Contact: Chen Hang 
  Postal Service Number: 250002 
<H5>  Nanjing Military Region </H5>
  Graduates and undergraduates are needed in the fields of 
computers and computer applications, industrial and civilian 
construction, electronic engineering, communications 
engineering, electronics technology, radio technology, English 
language, machinery technology, medicine, political theory, law, 
and journalism. Openings are mostly in scientific research 
units, institutions of higher education, hospitals, and troop 
units as scientific technicians, instructors, military medical 
personnel, and various kinds of military officers and 
non-military cadres. The jobs are in Jiangsu, Zhejiang, Anhui, 
Jiangxi, Fujian, and Shanghai. 
  Unit in charge of receiving graduates: Cadre and Scientific 
and Technical Cadre Office, Nanjing Military Region 
  Contact: Wang Huineng 
  Postal Service Number: 210016 
<H5>  Guangzhou Military Region </H5>
  Graduates and undergraduates are needed in the fields of 
computers and computer applications, computer hardware, 
architecture, plumbing and ventilation, prospecting, nuclear 
physics, applied mathematics, biology, medicine, the building of 
socialism, and English language. Openings are mostly in 
scientific research units, institutions of higher education, 
hospitals, and troop units as scientific research technicians, 
instructors, military medical personnel, and various kinds of 
military officers and non-military cadres. The jobs are in 
Guangdong, Guangxi, Hunan, Hubei, and Hainan. 
  Unit in charge of receiving graduates: Scientific and 
Technical Cadre Office, Cadre Department, Guangzhou Military 
Region 
  Contact: Wu Liezhong 
  Postal Service Number: 510084 
<H5>  Chengdu Military Region </H5>
  Graduates and undergraduates are needed in the fields of 
electronic engineering, computers and computer applications, 
computer software, communications engineering, architecture, 
communications and transportation administrative engineering, 
financial accounting, physics, applied mathematics, medicine, 
and Chinese language and literature. Openings are mostly in 
scientific research units, institutions of higher education, 
hospitals, and troop units as scientific research technicians, 
instructors, military medical personnel, and various kinds of 
military officers and non-military cadres. The jobs are in 
Sichuan, Yunnan, Guizhou, and Tibet. 
  Unit in charge of receiving graduates: Scientific and 
Technical Cadre Office, Cadre Department, Chengdu Military Region 
  Contact: Liu Liangxu 
  Postal Service Number: 6100111 
<H5>  Navy </H5>
  Graduates and undergraduates are needed in the following 
fields: Harbor and waterways engineering, ship and boat 
engineering, ship and boat communications and navigation, 
welding engineering and equipment, electric power systems and 
automation, subterranean engineering and tunnels, bridge 
engineering, electric power towing and transmission equipment, 
cranes, transportation, and engineering machinery, marine 
engineering hydrology, electricity technology, ordnance fire 
control, communications engineering, engineering survey, 
aircraft systems, fuels and engines, precision instruments, 
electronic engineering, refrigeration equipment and cryogenic 
techniques, optical devices, firearms and gun design and 
manufacture, automation, systems engineering, high polymer 
chemistry, electronic instruments and measuring technology, 
thermal energy engineering, financial accounting, physics, 
applied mathematics, optoelectronics technology, radio 
technology, weather dynamics, marine engineering, nuclear 
reactor engineering, machinery manufacturing technology and 
equipment, microelectronic circuits and systems, underwater 
weapons, nuclear powered equipment, communications engineering, 
motor vehicle utilization engineering, architecture, geology, 
medicine, English language, Russian language, political theory, 
and law. Openings are mostly in research units, institutions of 
higher education, hospitals, fleet units, bases and ordnance 
plants as scientific research technicians, instructors, military 
medical personnel all sorts of technical officers on ships and 
boats, non-technical cadres, and ordnance plant military 
representatives. The jobs are in Shanghai, Nanjing, Wuhan, 
Beijing, and in coastal provinces and cities. 
  Unit in charge of receiving personnel: Assignment Office, 
Cadre Department, Navy 
  Contact: Han Guoping 
  Postal Service Number: 100841 
<H5>  Air Force </H5>
  Graduates and undergraduates are needed in the following 
fields: Computers and computer applications, electronics 
instruments and measuring techniques, machinery manufacturing 
technology and equipment, machinery design and manufacture, 
airplane systems, aircraft structural mechanics, space physics, 
cryophysics, astronomy, machinery technology, warheads, guidance 
technology, weather dynamics, engineering mechanics, command 
automation, radio technology, communications engineering, 
multi-circuit communications, fuels and engines, automation, 
electronic precision machines, engineering heat treatment, water 
supply and drainage engineering, electronic engineering, 
internal combustion engines, magnetism physics and devices, 
heating and airconditioning engineering, precision instruments, 
architecture, mathematics, chemistry, medicine, Chinese language 
and literature, electronics instruction, English language, 
Russian language, and law. Openings are mostly in scientific 
research units, institutions of higher education, air force 
bases, hospitals, troop units, and military ordnance plants as 
scientific research technicians, instructors, military medical 
personnel, all kinds of military officers, non-military cadres, 
and ordnance plant representatives. The jobs are in principal 
provinces, cities, and autonomous regions throughout the country. 
  Unit in charge of receiving graduates: Scientific and 
Technical Cadres Office, Cadre Department, Air Force 
  Contact: Wang Shouyi 
  Postal Service Number: 100843 
<H5>  Second Artillery Corps </H5>
  Graduates and undergraduates are needed in the fields of 
ballistics engineering, radiation measurement, solid state 
engines, warhead guidance and control, machinery manufacturing 
technology and equipment, welding technology and equipment, 
electricity technology, electronic measurement, electric power 
generation and supply, applied electronics techniques, 
communications engineering, carrier wave communications, 
microwave communications, satellite communications, optical 
fiber communications engineering, programmable switching, 
optical devices, architecture, water supply and drainage 
engineering, geodetic surveying, motor vehicle maintenance and 
repair, bridge engineering, nuclear electronics and nuclear 
technology applications, engines, mathematic, chemistry, Chinese 
language and literature, Japanese language, and philosophy. 
Openings are primarily in scientific research units, 
institutions of higher education, and troop units as scientific 
researchers, instructors, and various kinds of military officers 
and non-military cadres. The jobs are in 11 provinces, cities, 
and autonomous regions around the country. 
  Unit in charge of receiving graduates: Assignment Office, 
Cadre Department, Second Artillery Corps 
  Contact: Yu Qunli 
  Postal Service Number: 10085 
<H5>  Science, Technology, and Industry Commission, Ministry of </H5>
National Defense 
  Graduates and undergraduates are needed in the fields of 
aerodynamics, weather sounding, accelerator physics, spaceflight 
dynamics, flight mechanics, astrophysics, spaceflight 
measurement, fluid transmission and control, monitoring 
techniques and instruments, aircraft design, engineering 
thermophysics, biomedical engineering and instruments, marine 
vessel piloting, ship and boat electrical supervision, inertial 
navigation and inertial navigation instruments, turbine 
management, computers and computer applications, electric field 
and microwave technology, image transmission and processing, 
high polymer materials, machinery manufacture, inertial 
simulation testing, guidance technology, electronic technology, 
electronic engineering, radio technology, electronic devices and 
testing techniques, precision instruments, communications 
engineering, microwave communications, optical fiber 
communications, optics, electricity technology, automation, 
railroad engineering, power generation and supply, thermal 
energy engineering, heating, ventilation, and airconditioning 
engineering, microelectronic circuits and systems, high voltage 
technology and equipment, non-destructive testing, electric 
power systems and automation, radar engineering, laser physics, 
radio wave propagation and antennas, hydrogeology engineering, 
nuclear physics, explosion mechanics, engineering construction, 
English language, and water supply and drainage engineering. 
Openings are mostly in scientific research institutes, 
institutions of higher education, and technical units at test 
bases as scientific research technicians and instructors. The 
jobs are in 18 provinces, cities, and autonomous regions. 
  Unit in charge of receiving graduates: Scientific and 
technical cadre office, Cadre Department, Science, Technology, 
and Industry Commission, Ministry of National Defense 
<H5>  General Staff Department </H5>
  Graduates and undergraduates are needed in the following 
fields: Computer science, microelectronic circuits and systems, 
electronic engineering, radio technology, radio wave propagation 
and antennas, image transmission and processing, artificial 
intelligence, instrumental analysis, nuclear electronics, 
machine manufacturing, organic chemical industry, helicopter 
firing, helicopter engines, ground-to-ground ballistic firing 
theory, firearms and gun design and manufacture, guidance 
technology, systems engineering, rocket launch equipment, 
electrical automation, engineering mechanics, construction 
materials, tank design and manufacture, automatic control, 
gyroscopes, data communications and networks, optical fiber 
communication, communications engineering, hydrogeology and 
engineering geology, water supply and drainage engineering, 
nuclear electronics and nuclear technology application, fluid 
transmission and control, welding technology and equipment, 
scientific and technical intelligence, mechanics, high polymer 
materials, firepower command and control, optical instruments, 
mathematics, physics, chemistry, medicine, philosophy, history, 
politics, scientific socialism, international politics, law, and 
various foreign languages. Openings are mostly in scientific 
research units, institutions of higher education, and in 
military representative offices as scientific researchers, 
instructors, and ordnance plant representatives. The jobs are in 
26 provinces, municipalities, and autonomous regions throughout 
the country. 
  Unit in charge of receiving graduates: Cadre Department, 
Political Department, General Staff 
  Contact: Wang Xiaoqing 
  Postal Service Number: 10034 
<H5>  General Logistics Department </H5>
  Graduates and undergraduates are needed in the following 
fields: Boat and ship engineering, computer science, 
communications and transportation management, construction, 
electric power systems and automation, petroleum processing, 
corrosion and its prevention, water supply and drainage 
engineering, Heating and airconditioning engineering, 
hydrogeology and engineering geology, engineering survey, 
cranes, transportation and engineering machines, organic 
chemical industry, electronics engineering, high polymer 
material, molecular biology, automatic control, agriculture, 
machine manufacturing technology and design, materials 
management, economic management, finance and banking, 
accounting, biochemistry, nutrition, precision instruments, 
fluid transmission and control, electronic engineering, 
scientific and technical intelligence, sanitary environment, 
English, Russian, Japanese, Marxist theory, history, 
mathematics, chemistry, Chinese language and literature, and 
various kinds of medicine and pharmacology. Openings are mostly 
in scientific research unit, institutions of higher education, 
hospitals, and logistics technology management units as 
scientific researchers, instructors, military medical cadres, 
and logistics technology management cadres. The jobs are in 14 
provinces, municipalities, and autonomous regions. 
  Unit in charge of accepting graduates: Cadre Department 
General Logistics Department 
  Contact: Yuan Ansheng 
  Postal Service Number: 100842 
<H5>  General Political Department </H5>
  Graduates and undergraduates are needed in the following 
fields: Philosophy, economic management, scientific socialism, 
history of the Chinese revolution, criminal investigation, 
criminal law, international law, economic law, English language, 
journalism, history, foreign literature, statistics, 
administration, piano, dance, and gymnastics as instructors in 
institutions of higher education. The institutions of higher 
education are in Beijing Xian, Nanjing, and Changsha. 
  Unit in charge of receiving graduates: Institutions of 
higher 
education under the General Political Department Office 
  Contact: Wang Bixi 
  Postal Service Number: 100034 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20338 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  8 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY, PUBLIC SECURITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Preparedness for High-Tech Naval Warfare Stressed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Preparedness for High-Tech Naval Warfare Stressed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0177A Beijing JIANCHUAN ZHISHI [NAVAL AND MERCHANT 
SHIPS] in Chinese No 1, 8 Jan 94 pp 2-3 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0177A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JIANCHUAN ZHISHI [NAVAL AND MERCHANT 
SHIPS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vice Admiral Fang Qiang (2455 1730): "Need for </F>
High Technology Orientation in Building the Navy"] 
  [Excerpts] Editor's Note: Thanks to the 
energetic support of Navy comrades concerned, this magazine has 
invited several old Navy admirals to write some articles for it. 
Even though these old admirals are advanced in years, when they 
speak of the work they have done in building the Navy and their 
future hopes for the Navy, they are filled with deep feelings. 
They provide a very good window whereby readers can gain a 
further understanding of progress in developing the Navy. 
[passage omitted] 
<H5>  Need To Face Squarely the Ever-Changing International </H5>
Situation 
  Since the late 1980s, the international situation has 
changed 
very rapidly. One might say that this has been the most complex, 
most unpredictable, and most tumultuous period since the end of 
World War II during which a series of unanticipated major events 
have taken place. This has included changes in Eastern Europe, 
the unification of the two Germanys, the Gulf War, the civil war 
in Yugoslavia, the dismemberment of the USSR, and the 
dissolution of the Warsaw Pact. International tensions have 
eased, dialogue has replaced confrontation, and peace and 
development have become the two main themes of the world today. 
Comrade Deng Xiaoping, who made a scientific judgment of the 
international situation and the trend of developments based on 
long observation and analysis, stated clearly that the increase 
in forces for peace is greater than the increase in forces for 
war. Although the danger of war exists, with good work, a world 
war may be postponed. The winning of a long period of a peaceful 
environment is possible. The way in which the situation has 
developed completely confirms this scientific judgment of 
Comrade Deng Xiaoping. 
  The current international situation appears favorable for 
China's development. Nevertheless, some disputes between China 
and some surrounding nations about territorial sovereignty and 
maritime rights and interests remain basically unresolved. 
Differences and disputes will go on for a long time, and may 
possibly intensify somewhat under certain circumstances. As the 
international situation constantly changes, the possibility that 
limited naval warfare will occur cannot be ruled out, first 
because of hegemonistic aggression, expansion, and provocations; 
second, in order to recover island reefs that the enemy 
occupies; and third, to contest marine economic rights. With the 
development of high technology, a series of high and new 
technologies such as nuclear energy, electronic computers, 
spaceflight, microelectronics, automation, and new materials 
have irresistably surged into the navy military realm, and have 
been translated into weapons and equipment. Therefore, in order 
to meet the constantly changing international situation, the 
focus of the Chinese navy must be on modern technology, 
particularly on preparing for limited wars at sea in which high 
technology will be used. 
<H5>  Need for a High Technology Orientation in Building the Navy </H5>
  Jiang Zemin, chairman of the Central Military Affairs 
Committee, Deputy Chairman Liu Huaqing, and Deputy Chairman 
Zhang Zhen pay extremely close attention to the winning of a 
limited high technology war, and they put great emphasis on the 
study of how existing equipment may be used to defeat a better 
equipped enemy. We must inculcate confidence about daring to 
fight and being sure to win; and we must thoroughly understand 
and study the history of our military forces in using inferior 
equipment to triumph over enemies having superior equipment, and 
our Navy's history of daring to fight and holding fast 
tenaciously. We must be sure to maintain and develop these 
special strengths. 
  The position of naval forces in a high technology situation 
becomes more and more important. The achievements made in combat 
operations at sea in which naval forces play the main role and 
other service arms take part frequently exceed those of ordinary 
sea warfare. Should a military engagement suddenly occur at sea, 
we will unavoidably face the challenge of high technology 
limited ocean warfare. Practice has demonstrated that whoever 
possesses high technology will effectively control the combat 
area, will seize the combat initiative, and will carry out 
rapidly orchestrated attacks. In order to contain effectively 
outbreaks of limited warfare at sea, it is necessary to focus in 
peacetime on different goals and adopt different tactics in 
different environments to demonstrate the existence and the role 
of naval forces. This includes things such as conducting 
exercises and weapons tests at sea. Visits abroad of naval 
forces, regular naval forces exercises, forces deployments, 
build-ups in combat areas, and participation in scientific 
expeditions and marine surveys give pause to present and future 
enemies. They make enemies understand that they will have to pay 
an enormous price for any infringement of the sovereignty of our 
territorial sea and marine resources. Thus, such demonstrations 
play a deterrent role in containing limited wars at sea. Because 
each battle in a limited war at sea has a direct bearing on a 
nation's political and diplomatic battles, the outcome of 
military activities will have an extremely great effect 
internationally and domestically. 
  The Navy's "coastal defense" strategic policy requires 
understanding of trends of development in navy building, 
emphasis on advanced research, overall planning, long-range 
planning, greater development of large and medium size vessels 
suited to the development of China's navy, and making fullest 
use of the role of submarines and water mines, as well as 
torpedoes. Submarines are the main force employed in ocean 
sabotage and guerrilla warfare, and they are also one of the 
main forces in the conduct of mobile warfare at sea. Sea mines 
and torpedoes are conventional weapons, but they still are very 
potent under high technology warfare conditions. During several 
recent partial wars at sea, they played an astounding role. In 
high technology warfare, full use must be made of the role of 
technical personnel. We must use the training of our own 
personnel and the importation of others in combination. We must 
tap the knowledge of available talent and fully validate it to 
build our own large vessels to increase deterrent force. The 
Navy is a technology-intensive, human talent-intensive service 
army. Building the navy is a piece of complex systems 
engineering. Genuine building of a a complete naval combat 
capability requires attention to the building of systems to 
improve overall integration, and increase overall benefits from 
the building of the Navy. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20339 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  2 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY, PUBLIC SECURITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning Civil Air Defense Works Economic Uses </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Liaoning Civil Air Defense Works Economic Uses </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0193A Shenyang LIAONING RIBAO in Chinese 2 Feb 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0193A </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang LIAONING RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by staff reporters Zhao Zhiyuan (6392 1807 6678) </F>
and Cui Tiemin (1508 6993 3046): "Underground Great Walls and 
Buttresses -- Liaoning Province's Civil Air Defense Works Become 
`Gold-Producing Precious Lands'"] 
  [Text] The underground civil air defense works, which up to 
now had been mysterious and silent, are, under the impetus of 
the market economy, slowly opening wide their thick and heavy 
gates. According to what was revealed by a relevant quarter, 
52.3 percent of the underground civil air defense works in 
cities throughout Liaoning have played a role in economic 
construction, in 1193 posting an output value of 750 million 
yuan and a profits tax of 110 million yuan. 
  After liberation, particularly since the beginning of the 
sixties, because of the necessity for making preparations 
against war, Liaoning in succession invested huge sums of money 
in the construction under cities of an enormous concealed system 
for air defense, forming a huge underground space complete with 
water, electricity, and air conditioning facilities. However, 
because of the complex international situation over the past 
several years and other reasons, for these underground works it 
was a case of building at one place, closing at one place, and 
letting one place remain vacant. After reform and opening up to 
the outside world began, particularly against the background of 
the trend toward relaxation in the international situation and 
the putting into practice domestically of the market economy, 
civil air defense departments at all levels throughout the 
province, in line with the principle of "integrating peace and 
war, and serving the economy," gave full play to the 
superiorities of underground works in being warm in winter and 
cool in summer, in having wide spaces, and in being near cities; 
they opened up, one after another, to society the greater part 
of the civil air defense works, thereby making the fast-asleep 
underground treasure caves battlefields of economic 
construction. Now, the civil air defense works throughout the 
province have already become more than 20 sites of commodity 
production and business activity. The underground business 
conducted by Shenyang and Fushun cities, the underground 
processing and cold storage of marine products done by Dalian 
and Dandong cities, and the facilities of some other cities for 
underground aquatic breeding, planting, stockpiling, and 
recreation are gradually developing into a special industry. The 
underground market located in front of Shenyang's North Railroad 
Station has a business area of 23,000 square meters and an 
annual customer flow rate of more than 7 million persons; last 
year its volume of business was more than 70 million yuan, 
becoming a big part of Shenyang's business landscape. 
  In the process of turning civil air defense works toward the 
market and service economies, civil air defense departments at 
all levels insist on making the requirements for preparation 
against war number one. They strictly manage and safeguard the 
works for society's by letting them out and other forms, in 
order to ensure that the works can at any time be put to use for 
air defense; thus they have achieved a benign cycle in lwhich 
the "caves" are used both to create wealth and to support 
themselves. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20340 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  13 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY, PUBLIC SECURITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Deputy COGS Discusses 1994 Military Training </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Deputy COGS Discusses 1994 Military Training </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0178A Beijing JIEFANGJUN SHENGHUO [THE PLA LIFE] in 
Chinese No 1, 13 Jan 94 pp 4-5] </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0178A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JIEFANGJUN SHENGHUO [THE PLA LIFE] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Correspondents Liu Shanxing (0491 0810 5281) and </F>
Zheng Hui (6774 6540): "Deputy Chief of General Staff, Major 
General Li Jing (2621 2529), Talks About a New Direction in 
Military Training Throughout the Armed Forces During 1994"] 
  [Text] As one year ends and another one begins, this 
journal's correspondents interviewed Major General Li Jin, 
deputy chief of General Staff responsible for troop training 
throughout the armed forces, about plans for doing a good job of 
military training throughout the armed forces during the coming 
year. 
  Pushing aside a thick stack of dispatches and telegrams on 
his desk, General Li engaged enthusiastically in a cordial 
exchange with the correspondents. 
  Correspondent: A new year has begun; spring has 
returned. Military training of troops throughout the armed 
forces in 1994 is about to begin in earnest. We would like to 
ask Deputy Chief of General Staff Li to discuss how troop 
training at the basic level can be improved. 
  The General: First, I would like to take this 
opportunity to extend New Year's greetings via JIEFANGJUN 
SHENGHUO to comrades throughout the armed forces, particularly 
to the large numbers of officers and men at the basic level! I 
want to express warm congratulations and cordial solicitude to 
the advanced groups and advanced individuals who made a 
contribution to military training throughout the armed forces 
during 1993! 
  In talking about military training during 1994, I would 
first 
like to review briefly military training throughout the armed 
forces during 1993. Overall, thanks to the correct leadership of 
Central Military Affairs Committee and the common efforts of 
officers and men throughout the armed forces, military training 
of troops throughout the armed forces scored some very big 
accomplishments in 1993. Leading cadres in the Central Military 
Affairs Committee are satisfied with this. These accomplishments 
were manifested primarily in the following: First, leaders at 
all levels paid very close attention to military training work. 
The central role of military training was rather well expressed, 
and the understanding of the rank and file of officers and men 
about the position and importance of military training in the 
new era was clarified and deepened. The sense of urgency became 
stronger. Second, was attention to changes in objective 
circumstances, to advances made in modern warfare, and to 
realities in the building of China's owned armed forces. Major 
efforts were made in moving ahead with the study of high science 
and technology, and both training reforms and the study of 
tactics was intensified, many results obtained therefrom. Third 
was extensive efforts to produce instructors and outstanding 
staff officers having the "three skills" and the "four 
abilities," and to train advanced units. Throughout the armed 
forces a number of advanced individuals and groups also came to 
the fore. Fourth was intensification and improvement of 
ideological and political training in view of the new 
circumstances and new problems under the socialist market 
economy. This stirred cadres and men to love the armed forces 
and cherish their weapons, and to train hard in skills for 
killing the enemy. Troop training throughout the armed forces 
was infused with vigor and vitality, a fine momentum of steady 
development taking place. 
  Correspondents: What are the overall requirements 
and the guiding thought in military training throughout the 
armed forces in 1994? 
  The General: We will strive to make 1994 a bumper 
harvest year for training reforms. We must realize clearly that 
the international situation remains very serious. The world is 
still not at peace. The possibility of limited wars and armed 
clashes cannot be ruled out. Our military training is still a 
long way from meeting the requirements of modern warfare. 
Specifically, the characteristics of warfare under high 
technology conditions that the Gulf War revealed pose many new 
issues for military training. Therefore, the overall 
requirements for military training throughout the armed forces 
are to respond to situations as they develop and meet needs in 
fighting a high technology war, to discharge the basic functions 
of good military forces, train soldiers well, be prepared to 
stand up to foreign aggression, and maintain the stable 
environment needed for the building of socialism. We must adopt 
a brand new posture, a spirit of reform, and a tenacious work 
style to complete military training tasks in 1994. We must 
increase, across the board, the ability of our armed forces to 
win limited wars employing modern technology, particularly high 
technology. 
  As for the guiding ideology, I feel the following five 
points 
to be of greatest importance: First is to use as a basic guide 
Mao Zedong's military thought and Deng Xiaoping's thought about 
the building of armed forces in the new era. These are the 
summarization of the experiences of the older generation of 
proletarian revolutionaries in the building of our armed forces 
during the past several decades. They serve as the theoretical 
basis for our good performance of all tasks, and they provide 
fundamental support for maintenance of a correct orientation in 
military training. Second is the need for thorough 
implementation of the instructions of Military Affairs Committee 
Chairman Jiang of "politically qualified, militarily superb, an 
outstanding work style, strict and impartial discipline, and 
strong support." This is the general requirement for our good 
performance of all tasks, and it is also the combat goal of all 
military training. Third is the need to focus on the winning of 
limited wars using modern technology, particularly high 
technology. This is an objective requirement for the development 
of military combat now and for some time to come, and it is also 
a basic point for military training. Fourth is the need to make 
reform the main line in training. This is a basic means for 
ensuring that military training continues to meet circumstances 
and steadily moves ahead. It is also a basic force for 
increasing the pertinence of training for outstanding 
fulfillment of military training tasks. Fifth is the need to 
apply training laws and regulations, strictly regulating 
training according to law. This provides important support for 
better building of regularized armed forces and improvement of 
training quality. 
  Correspondent:Deputy Commander Li, you jut 
referred to the need for all military units to devote major 
efforts, in accordance with Military Affairs Committee leaders' 
instructions, to improvement of ability to win limited wars 
using modern technology, particularly high technology. Applied 
to the basic level, just what are the main things that must be 
done? 
  The General: I believe that completion of the new 
year's military training mission will require that every unit, 
particularly the rank and file of officers and men at the basic 
level, show achievements in the following several regards: 
  First is the need to reform training in a positive and 
innovative way so that military training will be better able to 
meet the needs of modern warfare. Despite the numerous 
achievements made during 10 years of training reforms, which 
have spurred the development of military training, we still must 
realize that military matters constantly change. Old problems 
are solved only to have new problems appear. This is a basic law 
of the development of things. This applies to military training 
as well, and it requires that advances must be sought in the 
course of steadily solving new problems. Current events show 
fundamental changes have taken place in the strategic world 
situation. Science and technology have developed rapidly, and 
have been widely applied to the military realm. The weaponry, 
military thinking, and combat style of military forces of all 
countries have developed substantially. Consequently, modern 
warfare has a high technology character, which poses new 
challenges for military training. Responding to circumstances 
and meeting challenges requires that officers and men throughout 
the armed forces focus on the new circumstances and new features 
of military combat under the new circumstances. They must rouse 
themselves to vigorous efforts, study assiduously, carry on 
traditions, dare to innovate, and link training to practice. 
They must boldly reform the content, the organization, the 
methods, the techniques, the management, and the support of 
training. They must find new tactics and new training methods 
that meet the needs of combat under the conditions of modern 
technology, particularly high technology. 
  Second, cadres in general, and key cadres in particular, 
must 
strive to improve military quality. They must improve the 
organization of training and ability to lead troops in battle. 
Basic level military officers and squad leaders are the ones who 
organize and lead the military training of units at the platoon 
and squad levels. They are the ones who must carry out 
instructions from above. Troop training depends on their 
organization and implementation. The military caliber and the 
organizational abilities of basic level officers and squad 
leaders have a direct bearing on the quality of military 
training. Therefore, major efforts must be put into the 
improvement of military quality and organization and command 
skills. I hope that our basic officers and squad leaders will 
study diligently Mao Zedong military thought and Deng Xiaoping 
thought for the building of armed forces in the new era. This is 
the basic way to master the standpoint, the point of view, and 
the methods of the older generation of revolutionaries in 
building the armed forces and directing combat to establish a 
correct combat outlook and methodology. They must strive to 
study modern science and technology. This is a required course 
in the study of modern warfare and mastery of modern warfare. 
Diligent study of modern military thought, combat theory, and 
command techniques are important ingredients in improving the 
level of military training and increasing organizational and 
command skills. Efforts during this year must bring about new 
changes in cadres in general and key cadres in particular. 
  Third is the need for diligent study of military skills to 
improve units' basic quality and live warfare capabilities. 
Superb military skills and specialized skills are the product of 
scientific training in combination with diligent training. 
Officers and men throughout the armed forces must employ 
scientific methods in the training of soldiers. They must put 
major efforts into activities for the rigorous training of crack 
troops. New soldiers entering the armed forces in 1994 must be 
given a good grounding in political ideology, military skills, 
work style discipline, and physical condition. Old soldiers must 
receive training that makes them jacks of many trades and 
masters of one, efforts made to improve their ability to carry 
out combat tasks. We must continue activities that produce 
"sharpshooter riflemen, sharpshooter gunners, and skilled 
technicians," and instructors and staff officer professionals 
having "four abilities" to provide superb training personnel. We 
must improve combat logistics training, live ammunition, live 
explosion, and live input training, and psychological training. 
Units having requisite conditions must train personnel to swim 
while carrying weapons and bayonet training. The difficulty and 
intensity of training must be increased. Bivouac training must 
be organized in a planned way, training given to provide skill 
in fighting, eating, living, and hiding while on the move. The 
nighttime training times and requirements that training plans 
provide must be followed to provide combat training using 
nighttime techniques. Combat exercises above the platoon level 
must be conducted continuously day and night in an effort to 
improve troops ability to fight under modern technology, 
particularly high technology, conditions. 
  Fourth is the need to intensify coordinated training for 
constant improvement of the total warfare capabilities of all 
service arms and branches of service. Integrated training and 
combined warfare are important trends in modern warfare, and 
they are also important tasks in the intensification of reform. 
All service arms and branches, and all specialties must improve 
their sense of being part of a whole and their outlook on the 
overall situation. By training level by level, working in 
coordination level by level, and shaping a total combat 
capability level by level, they can first bring about a 
coordination of forces within their own branches of service and 
service arms, and then bring about a coordination of all 
branches of services in all service arms. They must lay a 
foundation around the combining of forces to learn skills based 
on tactics. Through sustained efforts, they can raise the 
combined combat capabilities of China's armed forces to a new 
level. 
  At the end of the interview, Deputy Chief of General Staff 
Li 
asked the correspondents to tell all military commanders the 
following through JIEFANGJUN SHENGHUO: "The whole year's work 
depends on a good start in spring." He hopes that units 
throughout the armed forces will painstakingly plan and carry 
out training during the coming year in accordance with 
instructions from the Central Military Affairs Committee and the 
General General Staff, make full ideological preparations, 
organizational preparations, teaching preparations, and material 
preparations to do a good job of training, and ensure that units 
begin training on time, thereby creating good conditions for 
satisfactory fulfillment of military training tasks in 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20341 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  15 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY, PUBLIC SECURITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Public Security Situation Tied To Economic Growth </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Public Security Situation Tied To Economic Growth </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0131A Hong Kong TANG TAI [CONTEMPORARY] in Chinese No 
33, 15 Dec 93 pp 51-53 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0131A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong TANG TAI [CONTEMPORARY] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Hai Chao (3189 6389): "Rapidly Deteriorating </F>
Public Security Situation in China--A View of the National 
Situation Based on a Study of Conditions in the Largest City, 
Shanghai"] 
  [Text] Reform has promoted economic development, but 
it has also intensified social conflicts, so that crimes such as 
brutal murders, disfigurement, and kidnapping which never or 
rarely happened in the past are now happening in China's largest 
city--Shanghai. 
  Reform and opening up and the development of the socialist 
market economy have brought life and vitality to the nation's 
growth on the one hand but have also posed a serious challenge 
to the nation's public security. This article uses Shanghai as 
an example to bring up some national issues. 
<H5>  Rising Trend of Serious Crimes </H5>
  According to statistics compiled by Shanghai's Public 
Security Department, the number of criminal cases had declined 
somewhat in 1992 compared to previous years, but the number of 
serious crimes had increased. Between January and June of this 
year, there were 8,535 criminal cases, a 13.5 percent increase, 
but there were 4,303 serious crimes, a 38.4 percent rise 
compared to the same period a year ago, which was fairly 
substantial. Murder, robbery, rape, fraud, theft, and drug 
trafficking and other major crimes also increased by varying 
degrees. Crimes such as brutal murders, disfigurement, and 
kidnapping which never or rarely happened in the past are 
happening today. Serious crimes endanger the lives and 
properties of the people, jeopardize economic construction, and 
seriously undermine social stability. 
<H5>  Crimes Are Mostly Committed by Drifters </H5>
  According to the relevant departments, currently Shanghai 
has 
a mobile population of around 2.5 million people. The 
undesirable elements and drifting criminal elements among these 
outsiders are posing a serious threat to Shanghai's public 
security. From January to July of this year, the municipality 
arrested 4,975 criminals who were from outside of the area, 
2,526 of them for committing serious crimes. These represent 
increases of 75.5 percent and 82.3 percent respectively. Of the 
total number of criminals, 53.1 percent were from outside of the 
area, and among those responsible for serious crimes, 52.4 were 
outsiders. These represent increases of 10.3 percentage points 
and 10.5 percentage points respectively compared to the same 
period last year. In terms of vicious crimes, the absolute 
number of murders, robberies, rapes and other vicious crimes 
committed by outsiders has increased 82.1 percent compared to 
the same period last year; in terms of crimes committed by 
gangs, nearly half were committed by gang members from outsider 
the area. 
  In the course of reform, social contradictions and 
instability have become prominent factors. They have become very 
serious in some instances. 
<H5>  Intensified Social Contradictions Lead To Violations of the </H5>
Law and Crimes 
  1. Contradictions occurring as enterprises change their 
operating mechanisms: Statistics compiled by the municipality's 
relevant departments show that currently, 5,600 of the 
municipality's enterprises have changed their operating 
mechanisms. Among the 2.17 million workers in these enterprises 
implementing the whole staff labor contract system or the 
employment contract system on a trial basis, there are 107,000 
laid-off workers and 34,000 workers looking for work; they 
account for 5 percent and 1.6 percent, respectively, of the 
total work force. Reform will continue to deepen this year, and 
the number of laid-off and unemployed workers will continue to 
increase. Based on the estimated figures of 6 percent laid-off 
and 3 percent unemployed workers, out of the municipality's 4.2 
million workers, there will be 250,000 laid-off and 120,000 
unemployed workers. Because the reform is broad in scope and 
massive in impact and the economic system is in the midst of 
being restructured, traditional concepts will still have some 
impact, and in addition, some enterprises have not been doing a 
good ideological work nor handling the relationship between 
cadres and the masses properly, nor have they made proper 
arrangements for the workers, and so the contradictions caused 
by enterprises' changing mechanisms are quite serious. Some 
workers left destitute have repeatedly appealed to the higher 
authorities for help. 
  2. Contradictions caused by land leases that forced people 
to 
move from one place to another: First, group appeals have 
increased. Second, the residents are moving en masse, creating 
many contradictions in their work, study, and everyday life and 
causing dissatisfaction. Third, arguments have erupted within 
some families over who got better housing or more properties, 
and these in turn have led to family feuds and disputes. Lastly, 
in the land leases, some enterprises and institutes are moving 
entire plants, but mistakes in hammering out the agreements or 
resolving the property rights have resulted in lawsuits and so 
on. 
  3. Negative and corrupt phenomena are a major factor 
contributing to social instability. 
  The negative and corrupt phenomena the masses object to the 
most today are the following: 
  a) The practices of abuse of power for private gains and 
trading power for money have made a come-back under the new 
conditions. In some law enforcement and supervisory and 
administrative departments, there is a serious problem where a 
handful of workers have to be bribed to work; some do a 
haphazard job even after they are bribed, and some make up all 
kinds of excuses to extort payments and so on. 
  b) Some people eat, take, withhold, and make demands; they 
spend public funds on entertainment, gifts, and trips, and they 
squander and waste money. Their entertainment and gift-giving 
are increasingly more extravagant: their dinners often cost 
several thousand yuan and their gifts are expensive, with 
increasing "gold content." 
  c) There is growing resentment among the masses toward 
formalism, bureaucracy, and fraud and trickery, but little is 
done about them. Enterprises are subjected to a lot of useless 
evaluations and examinations, but problems that affect the 
masses' immediate welfare just drag on and are never resolved. 
Contract management is riddled with fraud and trickery, and the 
use of deceptive means to gain profit and fame is commonplace. 
  d) Problems are emerging in new territories: In the real 
estate market, taking advantage of the randomness in who may 
lease land and for how much, some people are giving and taking 
bribes; malpractices for personal gains are common. Some 
government departments have been converted to intermediary 
organs after given new functions; everybody must go through them 
in order to obtain a license or have a project approved by the 
appropriate department. Nothing will get done without paying off 
the middle-men. A handful of government employees have joined 
the ranks of agents to get into the market, using their official 
position and power to recruit business and earn commission and 
payoffs. Meanwhile, some people take advantage of the lecture 
circuit or news media to broadcast false information and mislead 
stock market trends as ways to profit themselves. 
<H5>  Economic Crimes Are Getting Increasingly More Serious </H5>
  1. Corruption, bribery, misappropriation of public funds, 
and 
other economic crimes among state workers are common. Ordinary 
crimes have declined, but serious crimes have increased. 
According to data compiled by the Shanghai Municipal 
Procuratorate, between January and May of this year, there were 
168 major cases of corruption, bribery, and misappropriation of 
public funds. They accounted for 71 percent of all cases filed, 
an increase of 30 percentage points compared to last year for 
the same period. The biggest corruption case involved more than 
5 million yuan, and the biggest case of misappropriation of 
public funds involved 3.07 million yuan. 
  2. Crimes are showig up in the stock and securities 
exchanges. The municipal procuratorate's statistics show that 
between January and May of this year, there were 16 
stock-related criminal cases. Among them were 12 cases where 
employees in bank security departments were taking advantage of 
their position to engage in stock speculations. As much as 11 
million yuan were involved in those crimes. 
  3. Public security problems are emerging as the stock market 
develops: First, it has triggered criminal offenses. Based on 
the public security department's incomplete data, between August 
1990 and May 1992, there were a total of 70 stock market-related 
criminal cases. Second, there are hidden security problems. 
Between August 1990 and May 1992, there were 28 public 
security-related cases in the vicinities of Shanghai's stock 
market. The majority were cases involving fights that broke out 
in the black market exchange of stock subscription certificates 
and traffic problems and so on. Third, there are new social 
conflicts. In particular, there has been an increase in civil 
suits and economic disputes related to the buying and selling of 
stocks. Data compiled by the court system show that the 
municipality's courts handled a total of 102 stock-related 
disputes in 1992. 
  4. Debt-related disputes have continued to increase. 
Statistics show that from July 1992 to March of this year, in 
excess of 400 million yuan were involved in cases mediated by 
the economic dispute mediation center of the municipality's 
courts. Most of the disputes involved payments in arrears in 
business transactions and loans for trips taken abroad and so on. 
  5. Trademark infringement cases have multiplied. 
Counterfeiting well-known, fine products and trademarks has 
become an important way for some enterprises to compete and reap 
exorbitant profits. Between January and May of this year, 26 
trademark infringement cases were filed, accounting for 10.9 
percent of all cases filed, and it was 3.7 times more than the 
number filed last year during the same period. Prior to the East 
Asian Games, a random check of 1,352 businesses on Fourth Street 
showed that 560, or 41.4 percent, were selling counterfeit 
products. 
<H5>  Failure To Curb Prostitution Despite Bans </H5>
  1. For the sake of money, some unscrupulous people are 
circulating low-class, crude, lewd, and obscene "spiritual 
products," corrupting people's souls. According to the 
municipality's music and video control department, in 1992, more 
than 40,000 illegal video tapes and more than 30,000 illegal 
audio tapes were seized; 184 vendor's stalls were shut down, and 
40 people were arrested by the public security department--14 of 
them have been sentenced. In examining 8,390 video tapes 
(containing 10,285 shows,) 5,981 shows, or 57.8 percent, were 
deemed obscene. In May of this year, the municipal public 
security bureau together with the industrial and commercial 
bureau uncovered a case involving the sale of pornographic 
films; a batch of such films were seized. 
  2. Despite concentrated rectification efforts year after 
year, prostitution, although curtailed to some extent, still has 
not been swept out, and in some places, is still spreading and 
growing. In 1992, more than 3,000 women and more than 800 
procurers of prostitutes were rounded up and sent to undergo 
reeducation. Between January and June of this year, 792 cases 
involving prostitution were investigated and processed; 1,585 
people were arrested. Particularly serious are the pornographic 
and gambling "services" provided in some public places: Some 
dance halls provide closed KTV boxes and have bikini-clad girls 
put on shows to attract customers. Despite the municipal party 
committee and the municipal government's repeated orders banning 
the "three services," many places are still secretly doing this 
type of "business." 
  3. The manufacturing, trafficking, and taking of drugs and 
illegal growing of drug-producing plants are still a serious 
problem. From January to April of this year, the municipality 
investigated and prosecuted 40 such cases; 55 people were 
arrested, and 470,000 illegally-grown opium poppy plants were 
eradicated. 
  4. The management and administration guiding ideologies of 
some cultural and entertainment centers are flawed. First, some 
guest-houses, hotels, and inns are only concerned about their 
occupancy rate and profit and are disregarding the issues of 
social benefit and clean social environment. They ignore 
regulations, fail to register guests, and are remiss in 
management. Of the 229 prostitution-related cases in Xuhui 
District, 92, or 40 percent, took place in the guest-houses and 
hotels. Second, amid the intense market competition, some plant 
supervisors and managers have developed unhealthy management 
ideas and are providing immoral services as a means to promote 
their products and negotiate business and are offering 
substantial financial rewards to abet and entice young girls to 
sell their looks and even their bodies. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20342 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  9 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Taiwan Economic Summaries 10-23 Mar </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Taiwan Economic Summaries 10-23 Mar </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW3003035794 </F>
<F P=103> OW3003035794 </F>
<F P=104></F>



<TEXT>
BFN 

    [Editorial Report] Following are summaries of reports on 
economic developments in Taiwan culled by Okinawa Bureau from 
Taipei CHING CHI JIH PAO (ECONOMIC DAILY) in Chinese (10-23 
March 1994 issues). 
<H5>  International </H5>
  Finance Minister Views Taxes, Investment With 
Indonesian Counterpart 
  Finance Minister Lin Chen-kuo held talks with his Indonesian 
counterpart Muhammad in Honolulu on 17 March. During their 
talks, Indonesia promised to allow the establishment of 
Taiwan-invested banks, whereas Taiwan will help promote 
Indonesian goods in Taiwan. Lin Chen-kuo told Muhammad that 
Taiwanese enterprises had invested $4 billion in Indonesia. Lin 
also said that if a treaty of mutual income tax exemption could 
be signed, more Taiwanese businesses would invest in Indonesia; 
Muhammad shared the same view. The second round of 
Taiwan-Indonesia negotiations on mutual exemption of income tax 
is slated for 8 April. (Taipei CHING CHI JIH PAO in Chinese 19 
Mar 94 p 1) 
  Cabinet Views Cooperation With Thailand, Indonesia, the 
Philippines 
  Premier Lien Chan invited Vice Premier Hsu Li-teh, Economic 
Minister Chiang Ping-kun, Foreign Minister Chien Fu, and other 
cabinet members to a meeting on 9 March, discussing programs for 
cooperating with and investing in Thailand, Indonesia, and the 
Philippines, as proposed during President Li Teng-hui's visits 
to these countries. Programs considered include land 
development, agricultural cooperation, occupational training, 
establishing a Chinese school in Thailand, and investment in the 
petrochemical, sugar refining, and pharmaceutical industries. 
Taiwan will also seek to sign investment guarantee agreements 
with the three countries. Premier Lien ordered the Research, 
Development and Evaluation Commission to follow up on the 
implementation of these programs and present their findings to 
the president within three months. (Taipei CHING CHI JIH PAO in 
Chinese 10 Mar 94 p 1) 
  Taipei's Exports To PRC Valued at $12.8 Billion in 1993 
  According to statistics of the Board of Foreign Trade 
[BOFT], 
Taiwan's 1993 export value to the PRC totals $12.8 billion, 
14.88 percent of the total export value -- a sharp increase from 
7.71 percent in 1992. This is the first time that Taiwan has 
included the value of cargo and goods transiting via Hong Kong 
in its figures on exports to the PRC; hence the drastic increase 
in the export value to $12.8 billion, which is very close to the 
$12.9 billion figure given by the PRC. Economics Minister 
Chiang Ping-kun said that most exports to the PRC were capital 
goods such as raw materials and machinery. (Taipei CHING CHI JIH 
PAO in Chinese 18 Mar 94 p 2) 
  Petroleum Company Plans To Build Industrial Zones in 
Indonesia, SRV 
  In response to the government's "southbound policy," the 
China Petroleum Corporation [CPC] is considering moving its 
facilities overseas by building a petrochemical industrial zone 
in Indonesia and Vietnam, thus establishing a trade network 
there to help Taiwan businesses move into Southeast Asia. 
Earlier this year, the CPC signed a $1.3 billion contract with 
Vietnam to build an oil refinery there. (Taipei CHING CHI JIH 
PAO in Chinese 21 Mar 94 p 6) 
  Taipei Lifts Ban on Textile Investments in PRC 
  The Industrial Development Bureau has initially decided to 
allow indirect investment in restricted textile items in the 
PRC. The ban on 325 textile items -- including wool, cotton 
yarn, and cotton cloth made of synthetic fibers -- will be 
lifted. At the same time, indirect imports of most garment 
items will be allowed. (Taipei CHING CHI JIH PAO in Chinese 16 
Mar 94 p 6) 
  Ministry Draws Up Plan To Strengthen Economic Work in 
Southeast Asia 
  The Ministry of Economic Affairs of the Republic of China 
[ROC] and other relevant units have drawn up an outline to 
strengthen economic work in Southeast Asia, which includes the 
Philippines, Thailand, Malaysia, Indonesia, Singapore, Brunei, 
Vietnam, Laos, Cambodia, and Burma. The outline includes the 
following goals: 1) actively expand two-way trade and 
technological cooperation with Southeast Asian countries; 2) 
help Taiwan businesses find production and marketing centers in 
the Southeast Asian region and expand economic activities there 
in order to reduce investment and trade overdependence on the 
PRC; 3) enhance Taiwan's relations with Southeast Asian 
countries; 4) strive to participate in the activities of 
economic organizations in the Southeast Asian region. (Taipei 
CHING CHI JIH PAO in Chinese 12 Mar 94 p 2) 
<H5>  National </H5>
  Planning Council Says Annual Per-Capita Output Value 
Increases 
  The Council for Economic Planning and Development [CEPD] 
under the Ministry of Economic Affairs pointed out on 11 March 
that the annual per capita output value of Taiwan's 
manufacturing industry has risen to $NT2.197 million [$84,500] 
from $NT1.416 million [$54,460] in 1989, indicating that 
manufacturers have switched from the development of 
labor-intensive industries to technology-intensive ones. 
(Taipei CHING CHI JIH PAO in Chinese 12 Mar 94 p 2) 
  Economic Minister Holds Forum With Electric Appliance 
Makers 
  At a forum with members of the Taiwan Electric Appliance 
Manufacturing Association on 16 March, Economic Minister Chiang 
Ping-kun confirmed that the division of work between industries 
on the two sides of the Taiwan Strait is conducive to increasing 
the competitiveness of Taiwanese goods, and promised to allow 
imports of more semi-manufactured goods and component parts from 
the PRC and to ease restrictions on visits by PRC businessmen. 
Responding to suggestions on allowing direct cross-strait cargo 
shipments and setting up a cross-strait free trade zone, Chiang 
noted that the Ministry of Economic Affairs [MOEA] had drafted a 
program on shipping services between designated points on the 
two sides, but for political reasons it is not likely to be 
realized in the near future. (Taipei CHING CHI JIH PAO in 
Chinese 17 Mar 94 p 12) 
  Directorate Announces Figures on Imports of Technology 
  The Directorate General of Budget, Accounting, and 
Statistics 
[DGBAS] under the Executive Yuan said on 16 March that Taiwan's 
technological imports amounted to only $520 million in 1991, 
lower than South Korea's $1.18 billion, and far below the 
figures of other countries like the United States, Germany, and 
Japan. The DGBAS noted that Taiwan manufacturers' unwillingness 
to import high technology will affect the pace of technological 
upgrading on the island. (Taipei CHING CHI JIH PAO in Chinese 
17 Mar 94 p 2) 
  Executive Yuan Says Economy To Grow by 6.32 Percent 
This Year 
  Taiwan's economy is expected to grow 6.32 percent this year, 
the Executive Yuan told lawmakers at a meeting on 10 March. 
According to the Yuan, Taiwan's GNP was $220.2 billion in 1993, 
ranking 20th in the world, while per capita income was $10,566, 
ranking 25th. Fueled by the upturn in the world economy, 
Taiwan's economic growth rate may reach 6.32 percent this year, 
higher than last year's rate, 5.74 percent. (Taipei CHING CHI 
JIH PAO in Chinese 11 Mar 94 p 2) 
  Trade Board Says Benefits of GATT Entry Would Outweigh 
Losses 
  The Board of Foreign Trade [BOFT] has released a report on 
the effects of GATT entry on Taiwan's manufacturing industry. 
According to the report, if tariffs are lowered by 10 percent, 
Taiwan's manufacturing industry will suffer a loss of $NT3.1 
billion [$120 million], but its consumers will benefit by as 
much as $NT4.7 billion [$180 million]. The BOFT said the 
economic benefits from Taiwan's GATT entry will outweigh 
economic losses, except for household appliances and 
automobiles, the economic benefits of which will be slightly 
smaller than the corresponding losses. (Taipei CHING CHI JIH 
PAO in Chinese 10 Mar 94 p 2) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20343 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  27 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG, MACAO </F>
<H3> <TI>   Editorial Comments on Survey of Civil Service </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Editorial Comments on Survey of Civil Service </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2702084894 Hong Kong SUNDAY HONGKONG STANDARD in English 
27 Feb 94 p 6 </F>

<F P=103> HK2702084894 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong SUNDAY HONGKONG STANDARD </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Editorial: "Room for Confidence in Civil Service"] </F>
  [Text] A survey conducted by eminent commentator on public 
affairs Dr Joseph Cheng at the City Polytechnic has raised some 
alarm in some quarters about staff morale in the civil service. 
More than 1,00 directorate-grade officers were asked about their 
plans. Thirty five per cent said they wanted to leave 
government service after 1997. Also, 60 per cent trusted the 
monitoring role of the Legislative Council, saying they would 
find it difficult to adjust to China sovereignty, against 17 per 
cent expressing confidence in the accountability of the China 
authorities. The overall conclusion seemed to be a negative one 
where civil servants' confidence in the future is concerned. 
"There is strong resentment against political interference from 
China," the poll found. "A sense of impotence is evident among 
senior bureaucrats." 
  In the light of the division in the civil service, as in the 
public -- occasioned by the ongoing Sino-British tug-of-war -- 
the survey was not altogether surprising. But there is no need 
to panic. One aspect of the statistics is interesting and could 
have some hidden meaning. The results said that 77 per cent of 
those surveyed held foreign passports -- 66 per cent of these 
being of the exclusively "home" British variety. It is to be 
assumed that those intending to leave the civil service will not 
be lost to Hong Kong completely but will be seeking 
opportunities in the private sector. 
<H5>  Ideology </H5>
  But even should the 350-odd senior-rankers make good their 
intention, there should be no undue cause for alarm. There are 
substantially more people in the civil service with commitments 
to Hong Kong as a place secure and stable enough for a contented 
livelihood, than those influenced by ideology. 
  Throughout the 45-year history of this newspaper, we have 
constantly observed and remarked on the ever-inflationary trend 
of the government bureaucracy. It has been our view, that the 
government tended always to ensure its own safety in numbers, 
disregarding the consequences to taxpayers. 
  In recent years, and as we grind on towards 1997, there have 
been more reasons for the government to enlarge and fatten 
itself, this time with less inhibition -- the public is 
preoccupied with successive political crises. The civil service 
and its problems are a rice-bowl issue that should command a 
higher priority. Government service today is the envy of many 
wage earners. 
  It is not convincing to the average man in the street, that 
government employment with all its protective and even pampering 
perks, will not be able to retain or attract what Hong Kong 
needs to maintain its civil service at the present par of 
efficiency at least. 
  There is nothing worthwhile without some amount of risk. 
Government service is worthwhile. Furthermore, the risk is 
clearly addressed in the assurances which the Basic Law provides. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20344 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  27 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG, MACAO </F>
<H3> <TI>   Poll on Attitude Toward Release of White Paper </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Poll on Attitude Toward Release of White Paper </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2702084794 Hong Kong SUNDAY HONGKONG STANDARD in English 
27 Feb 94 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> HK2702084794 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong SUNDAY HONGKONG STANDARD </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Rita Tsang] </F>
  [Text] The government's release of the White Paper on 
Sino-British talks failed to grab Hong Kong people's 
imagination, a SUNDAY HONGKONG STANDARD street poll held in 
Central yesterday reveals. None of those polled had actually 
read the document. We asked Saturday shoppers these three 
questions following the release on Thursday of the White Paper, 
giving details of talks over the territory's future in 
preparation for reunification with the mainland in 1997: 
  -- Have you read the White Paper? 
  -- Do you feel that China stalled the talks? 
  -- What do you feel the next move should be in the current 
standoff between the Chinese and the British sides? 
  Marie Ng: "I didn't read the White Paper. I think both sides 
are responsible for the talks. The Chinese government is a 
dictatorship. Although the British have given a good 
impression, we know nothing about the negotiations. I hope they 
will go back to the table soon." 
  Rainbow Chow: "I didn't read the White Paper. I don't know 
which side should bear the responsibility, but I don't like the 
Chinese officials because they are always critical and 
ungracious. I hope both sides will open talks soon." 
  Danny Law: "I didn't read the White Paper. I felt that both 
sides stalled the talks. There seems to be no way to come an 
agreement if other countries can intervene." 
  Collins Barron: "I haven't read the White Paper yet. Both 
sides should bear responsibility. I hope the negotiations will 
be opened as early as possible." 
  Eric Winkler: "I didn't read the White Paper. This is a 
cultural misunderstanding, so the two sides need to understand 
each other. There is not much chance for China to improve its 
democracy policy because Deng Xiaoping is the boss now. I 
really hope the two sides will be back to the talks in future." 
  James Lam: "I didn't read the White Paper. I think that they 
had better stop arguing and both sides should compromise and 
make mutual concessions in order to ensure stability and 
prosperity in the territory after 1997." 
  Ken O'Byrne: "I didn't read the White Paper. Both sides 
should take responsibility because different people have 
different ideas and opinions. I wish the talks would go ahead 
soon." 
  Merlida Dallo: "I didn't read the paper. I think China 
stalled the talks and should bear all the responsibility. I 
don't trust the Chinese government." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20345 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar022___94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-022 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  28 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG, MACAO </F>
<H3> <TI>   Health Department Reports Surge in Hepatitis Cases </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Health Department Reports Surge in Hepatitis Cases </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2803073094 Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS in English 28 Mar 94 
p 6 </F>

<F P=103> HK2803073094 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Susie Weldon] </F>
  [Text] Viral hepatitis infections surged in 1992, with 
more than twice as many cases recorded as in the previous year, 
according to statistics just released by the Department of 
Health. More people were also diagnosed as having sexually 
transmitted diseases, died of lung cancer and heart disease, or 
were admitted to hospital because of injury or poisoning. 
  The department's annual report for 1992-93 shows that 4,357 
hepatitis cases were reported in 1992 compared with 1,801 in 
1991. Almost all were hepatitis A, 157 were hepatitis B and 301 
were classified as neither A nor B. The report said the 
infections were due to eating raw or badly cooked seafood from 
Hong Kong's polluted waters. Other figures in the report show 
Hong Kong people died from the same serious diseases, in about 
the same proportions, in 1992 as in the previous year. 
  The biggest killers were cancers, heart diseases and 
cerebrovascular diseases, which together accounted for almost 
two-thirds of all deaths. As in the previous year, lung cancer 
killed more men and women than any other tumour, causing 2,761 
deaths in 1992. Most of these were due to smoking, the 
department said. 
  Liver cancer and naspharyngeal cancer were the second and 
third most common tumours among men, compared to breast and 
colon cancer among women. Although slightly fewer people died 
of a heart attack in 1992 -- 1,785 men and women -- overall 
deaths from heart disease rose by about 400, to 5,359. 
  More babies died in that year because they were born too 
small. Almost 24 percent (83 deaths) of infant mortalities in 
1992 were blamed on immaturity, compared with about 15 percent 
(67 deaths) the previous year. 
  A staggering 82,800 patients were treated in hospital 
because 
of injury and poisoning in 1992, making the category the leading 
cause of hospital admission. Of the 1,693 deaths from injury and 
poisoning -- the fifth biggest cause of death in 1992 -- almost 
45 percent were self inflicted or due to suicide. The other 
main causes of hospital admission were circulatory diseases 
(67,800), cancer (65,000) and normal delivery (54,600). 
  Nearly 3,000 more people were diagnosed with sexually 
transmitted diseases in 1992, making a total of 13,257 cases. 
Almost 60 percent of these were in men aged between 2040 years. 
One man died from syphilis. 
  More than 5,000 people were treated in hospital for "the 
effects of a foreign body entering through orifice," while about 
2,560 were admitted because of complications arising from 
previous medical or surgical care. 
  Doctors were unable to diagnose the illness in about 11,300 
cases. Almost 3,400 people died because they were killed or 
fatally injured by other people. One person died because of 
injuries resulting from "operation of war" in 1992, the report 
says. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20346 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar024___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  24 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   SPC Analysis of 1993 Economy, 1994 Forecast </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    SPC Analysis of 1993 Economy, 1994 Forecast </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0365A Beijing GUANLI SHIJIE [MANAGEMENT WORLD] in 
Chinese No 1, 24 Jan 94 pp 60-67 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0365A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUANLI SHIJIE [MANAGEMENT WORLD] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhang Liqun (1728 4539 5028), with discussion </F>
involvement by Wang Jian (3769 1696), Zhang Liqun, Zhang Chuntai 
(1728 2504 3141), Liang Hua (2733 5478), Yang Takan (2799 1129 
0170), and Fan Caiyao (2868 1752 5069), affiliated with the 
State Planning Commission, Economic Studies Institute, 
Comprehensive Research Office; edited by Jiang Dongsheng (5592 
2639 3932): "Analysis of 1993 Economy and Forecast for 1994"] 
  [Text] The year of 1993 was another one of high growth for 
China's economy, as well as a special one in which economic 
growth saw greater fluctuation. We project our 1993 GNP at a 
comparable-price growth rate of over 13 percent, making 1993 our 
year of highest growth since reform and opening. After July 
1993, as Central Committee Document No. 6 was issued and its 
macroeconomic regulation and control policy was applied, our 
industrial growth rate went into a sharp slide, with its monthly 
growth rate slipping from June's 30.2 percent to 16.4 percent by 
October, for a high drop of 13.8 points. But after October, as 
large amounts of credit funds were put into circulation, our 
industrial growth rate rebounded again sharply, reentering a 
high-growth state, with a much shorter regulation and control 
time-lag, which was the first year since reform in which such a 
situation had arisen. We hold that our 1993 economic growth 
features evolved in the setting of the dual-conversion of our 
economic growth style and economic system, showing that China's 
economic growth had entered a new period. 
<H5>  I. An Analysis of Our 1993 Economic-Growth Course and Its </H5>
Causes 
  Our 1993 economic-growth course can be divided roughly into 
two stages: January through June, with sustained high growth; 
July through November, with a reentry into high-speed growth 
after experiencing a quite large fluctuation. 
  1. An Analysis of Our January-Through-June Sustained High 
Growth and Its Contributing Factors 
  On the heels of our 1992 economy having entered a period of 
overall high growth, our 1993 economy saw sustained high growth 
in a state approaching the verge of overheating. Our industrial 
output value monthly growth rates were 9.8 percent for January, 
32.9 percent for February, 26.1 percent for March, 25.2 percent 
for April, 27.3 percent for May, and 30.2 percent for June. This 
data shows that except for the monthly growth rate changing 
sharply from January to February due to the impact of the Spring 
Festival, our overall growth trend was steadily upward, topping 
30 percent by June. Meanwhile, our capital goods prices rose 
quickly, with retail prices rising steadily to top double digits 
by June at 13.9 percent. Our investment, financial, and 
circulation activities quickly heated up to show a chaotic 
order, all of which indicated that our whole economy was nearing 
the brink of overheating. 
  The cause of this growth course was the dual-conversion of 
our growth style and economy. Since 1992, China's economic 
growth had been conspicuously characterized by investment-demand 
pull with heavy industrial growth taking the lead. In contrast 
to its features since reform of consumer-demand pull with light 
industrial growth taking the lead, this shows that China's 
economic-growth style had undergone a great change. The 
setting for this was a change in our development stage. After 
passing through the consumer makeup-lesson stage, by the 1990s 
we were faced with a higher level of consumer and a changed 
consumption structure, in which China's industrial structure was 
beginning an all-out upgrading, with particularly faster change 
in secondary industries, mostly industry. Our industrial scale 
and overall economic scale correspondingly expanded rapidly. 
This upgrading resulted in a large amount of equipment 
replacement, establishment of new industries, and rapid 
qualitative and quantitative improvement of our infrastructures 
and basic industries, thus causing large-scale investment 
growth, as well as rapid growth of the investment-product 
production sector -- heavy industry. This stage was one of 
rapid heavy industrial growth that certain industrialized 
nations had experienced. 


Table 

Month           January     February     March     April     May      June 

State                       64.1         70.7      68.9      69.3     70.7 
Investment 
Accumulated 
Growth Rate 

Retail          18.9        11.1         18.5      25.4      27.3     28.4 
Commodity 
Sales Growth 
Rate 

Heavy           15.6        36.3         30.2      28.4      28.8     30.5 
Industrial 
Growth Rate 

Light           3.9         29.3         21.9      21.9      25.7     29.7 
Industrial 
Growth Rate 


  It was precisely because we had entered this stage that we 
saw the sustained rapid growth from 1992 to 1993, which growth 
had profound development-stage causes. Our growth reality for 
the first six months of 1993 shows that this stage's features 
are exceptionally clear. 1) Investment grows much more than 
market consumer demand. 2) Heavy industrial growth remains 
higher than light industrial growth. The following are some 
pertinent data: 
  As to system reform, since the last half of 1992, 
[production-] factor markets had entered a period of rapid 
growth, with capital and real estate markets beginning to form 
and steadily expanding in scale, providing more channels for 
investment-capital formation, and supporting rapid investment 
growth. Our development-stage and system conversions combined 
to jointly drive our economy into a high-growth state. 
  Due to the development-stage factor, savings and investment 
funds increased sharply, causing overall financing to expand 
rapidly, while factor-market development was still in a 
preliminary stage, with planning and order not yet evolved. 
Expanded overall financing drove money markets to expand 
rapidly, while the sharp growth of land supply and demand drove 
the real estate market to expand quickly. Under such 
conditions, money and real estate markets that were in an 
initial growth stage unavoidably experienced chaotic order, 
causing an abnormal rise in money and real estate prices, 
rapidly heating up our whole economy to approach the brink of 
overheating. 
  2. An Analysis of Our July-Through-November Economic 
Fluctuation and Macroeconomic Regulation and Control Results 
  Faced with imminent overheating, the Central Committee 
issued 
Document No. 6 in July, taking a series of macroeconomic 
regulation and control steps, such as rectifying our financial 
order, inventorying underway projects, and rectifying 
real-estate and development-zone investment, which brought fast 
results. Our industrial output value growth rate receded from 
June's 30.2 percent to 25.1 percent for July, falling steadily 
through August and September to 16.4 percent by October. In 
September, directed at enterprise operating difficulties and 
strong local demand for faster growth, the center took steps to 
put more money into circulation, also bringing quick results. 
By November, our industrial output value growth rate had 
picked back up to 18.9 percent, and was in a 
further-acceleration trend. So prompt and effective 
macroeconomic regulation and control is a phenomenon that merits 
conscientious summing up and analysis. We would note the 
following about it. 
  1. This phenomenon shows that the central government has a 
clearer understanding of China's economic operating laws. Its 
regulation and control timing choice was more fitting, as our 
economic growth at the time was climbing, while supply-shortage 
restraints were not yet evident, and factors, such as our 
foreign exchange balance and key raw-material inventories, still 
had a certain supportive capability. In contrast to 1985 and 
1988 when supplies were short and potential exhausted, with 
growth already causing a series of glaring conflicts, this 
choice of timing to take regulation and control steps showed a 
certain amount of foresight, preventing sharp economic 
volatility. Its regulation and control dynamics were also more 
appropriate, certainly not completely forcing our economy into a 
trough, but rather aiming at supporting all economic-growth 
terms for a timely promotion of economic recovery to high-growth 
momentum. These two examples show that the central 
government's macroeconomic regulation and control skills are 
much better. 
  2. The quick results from these regulation and control steps 
show that the basic terms of China's economic operations have 
undergone a significant change. From a development 
perspective, as pointed out above, in growth through the form of 
mostly investment-demand pull, in contrast to that through 
mainly consumer-demand pull, demand regulation and control 
capability is much greater. And from the angle of system 
reform, as factor markets grow, the fundamental impact of 
markets on economic operations grows sharply, with economic 
growth being guided more by all market signals, and the decisive 
impact of financial activities on the economy growing more 
prominent. It was precisely in such a setting that the mostly 
financial regulation and control policy measures brought such 
quick results. This shows on one hand that as 
demand-regulation capability grows, macroeconomic regulation and 
control results and significance rise sharply, while showing on 
the other that in China's macroeconomic regulation and control, 
financial regulation and control measures are dominant. 
  3. This macroeconomic regulation and control still depended 
mostly on administrative means, such as exercising financial 
regulation and control mainly through curbing all fundraising 
activities and interbank borrowing, which actually returned fund 
supply channels to banks. Bank regulation and control of 
overall funding relied mainly on direct control of the amount of 
basic currency put into circulation, thus controlling the money 
supply, instead of using benchmark interest rates to regulate 
and control monetary demand. So as to regulation and control 
means and conduction mechanisms, it was still 
nonmarket-oriented. This situation conflicts to a certain degree 
with our market-system development and further change in our 
regulation and control grounds. 
  This review of the state of our 1993 economy shows that 
China's economy, as to either development stage, system base, or 
regulation and control capability, has entered a period of 
higher level and more mature development. 
<H5>  II. An In-Depth Perspective of Our 1993 Economic Situation </H5>
  Despite the above assessment, our 1993 economic growth 
involved certain profound conflicts that must not be overlooked. 
  1. The Relations Among Our Growth, Investment, and Trade 
Structures and Reported Problems 
  In our 1993 economic growth, the fastest growing industries 
were ones such as motor vehicles, building materials, 
metal-cutting machine tools, communications equipment, and 
petrochemical products; but in investment growth, the fastest 
growing industries were ones, such as building materials, 
financial insurance service trades, real estate, transportation, 
and commercial beverages. In contrast to our fastest growth 
industries, this is quite inconsistent. On the other hand, as to 
our trade import structure, our fastest growing industries were 
ones, such as motor vehicles, rolled steel, metalworking machine 
tools, textile machinery, rubber and plastics manufacturing 
machinery, wire telephones or telephone switchboards, and 
refined oil, basically consistent with our domestic 
economic-growth structure. 
  This shows that in contrast to domestic demand changes, our 
growth and trade-import structures responded quickly to meet 
demand, or market changes, while our investment structure did 
not respond flexibly enough. In other words, our 
market-guidance capability toward investment remained 
inadequate. In addition, our imperfect market development with 
a certain misguidance phenomenon, as well as the large impact of 
local government behavior on investment activity, were also 
factors in the lack of coordination between changes in our 
investment and market-demand structures. In such a state, 
market demand guided growth-structure change, while our growth 
structure could not effectively guide our investment structure 
through changes in industrial profit rates. From a long-range 
view, the impact on our domestic supply structure followed 
market-demand change, causing a sharp conflict of uncoordinated 
supply and demand structures, which could be supplemented only 
by trade imports. Such a state put great pressure for a time 
on our future balance of international payments, as well as 
steadily lowering the international market share of domestic 
enterprises. As this resulted in a reduction of pull by 
domestic market development on our domestic industrialization 
progress, this was a problem of farreaching impact which, when 
relying mainly on domestic markets to promote industrialization, 
required full attention. In the short term, the excessive 
pressure being put mainly on our international balance of 
payments showed that the state of our international balance of 
payments had an exceptionally crucial impact on our overall 
domestic supply and demand and structural balance, and thus on 
our domestic prices and even our whole economic growth. 
  Genuinely resolving this problem meant rationalizing our 
investment-finance mechanism. On one hand, this required 
further improving our capital goods market, by adjusting 
upstream product prices, and standardizing and improving markets 
for factors, such as funds, in order to bring into better play 
the role of factor prices in guiding resources and funds. On the 
other, it meant a larger central government investment dynamic, 
by giving adequate investment inclination and support to fields 
in which markets had no impact, such as infrastructures, basic 
industry, and particularly high-tech forerunner industries. 
  2. The Widening of Our Urban-Rural Income and Market Gaps 
Indicated the Resurgence of a Glaring Binary Structural Conflict. 
  Preliminary estimates for January through November are that 
real urban incomes corrected for inflation were up 13.9 percent 
from the same period in 1992; for the first three quarters, real 
peasant income corrected for inflation was up 3.7 percent from 
the same period in 1992. So our urban-rural income growth-rate 
gap reached 10.2 percentage points, which gap had been only 5.7 
points in 1992. 
  Along with this wider income gap, our urban-rural market gap 
also widened. For the first 11 months of 1993, our retail 
commodity sales growth rate was 30.1 percent for urban markets 
but 18.3 percent for rural markets, for a gap of 11.8 points; 
corrected for inflation, this gap was 9.5 percent. Around 
about 1992, these two gaps were respectively 7.8 points and 3.3 
points. 
  This indicated the resurgence of a glaring binary structural 
conflict in China's economy, or a rewidening of our urban-rural 
market and economic gaps, whose impacts were similarly 
far-reaching. 
  a. The impact on our market development. As rural markets 
still made up over 50 percent of China's retail commodity 
market, the slowing of peasant income growth and our rural 
market-development rate was bound to affect the expansion of our 
overall retail commodity market. b. The impact on domestic 
enterprises. In particular, the rural market pull was mainly on 
domestic labor-intensive and traditional consumer goods 
industries. Changes in this part of the market would have a 
great impact on the development of these domestic industries. 
This situation was particularly disadvantageous to 
domestic-market enterprises that were subject to eversharpening 
competition, particularly to state enterprises and a large 
number of our midwestern township enterprises. As Chinese 
industry was currently still lacking in capability and 
competitiveness to meet domestic high-tech market demand, there 
was room for improvement in its urban market share. In 
addition, our rural market inadequacy of the time left Chinese 
enterprises sharply restricted by overall domestic-market demand 
growth. c. Rural market change was having a clear impact on our 
rural industrialization. As a key market of rural industry was 
the rural areas, this was going to further impact peasant income 
growth, putting it into an unhealthy cycle. d. Rural market 
change and the widening urban-rural economic gap also had a 
farreaching impact on our agricultural development and overall 
economic stability. This problem needed solved in ways, such as 
rapidly upgrading urban industry to concede a part of the market 
to rural industry, and increasing exports of rural 
labor-intensive products. In the short term, as the existence of 
this problem affected mainly the effective expansion of consumer 
goods markets, as well as the market share of domestic 
enterprises, it could be held that domestic consumer-goods 
market demand, as to domestic enteprises, was in a state of 
stable growth, so would not exert a strong pull. 
  3. State-Asset Reorganization and a Solution for State 
Enterprises Was a Matter in Urgent Need of Resolution. 
  Our 1993 economic fluctuations reexposed the problems 
existing in state enterprises and state-asset operations, such 
as low operating efficiency, unmarketable products, poor market 
competitiveness, economic cooling, triangular debt, product 
overstocking, and growth rates down sharply, which showed up 
first in state enterprises. These problems were essentially 
ones that state enterprises and state assets could not adjust to 
properly in the course of excellence through market competition, 
leaving their structures and situations severely unsuited to 
market-demand changes and competition needs. So we had to 
reorganize state assets to complete our structural-adjustment 
mission, while speeding up our conversion of state-enterprise 
operating forces to meet market-competition needs. The existing 
problems in our state enterprises and state assets left China's 
economy with very little capability to sustain regulation and 
control. Once growth rates fell, this would put great pressure 
on government, as well as sharply discounting our overall 
economic growth efficiency, to lower our economic growth quality. 
  4. Our Factor-Market Development Remained Poor, With a Lack 
of Market Order, and Still Unsound Capability To Regulate 
Factor-Disposition. 
  Our 1993 economic-order chaos showed up conspicuously in 
factor markets, with economic regulation and control also being 
expressed mainly as rectification of factor markets. As we 
generally controlled factor-market scale to reduce the 
factor-market impact on the disposition of [production] factors, 
factor markets remained unable to improve quickly or develop 
fully. But in view of our socialist market economy reforms, 
which required the establishment of a complete market system, as 
factor markets played a key role in the market system and the 
market-disposition of resources, as well as being a crucial 
grounds for the new form of macroeconomic regulation and 
control, factor-market development and improvement was 
imperative. A matter that required attention was the relations 
between an appropriate resolution of factor-market development 
and the conversion of macroeconomic regulation and control 
style, to ensure an effective macroeconomic regulation and 
control capability. 
  Analysis of these problems shows that while the Chinese 
economy has entered a period of more mature growth, deeper 
development and system conflicts remain, affecting the sound 
development of our whole economy. Along with our dual growth and 
system conversion, the time is gradually approaching to resolve 
these deeper conflicts, so that we are facing a crucial period 
for reform and development. 
  III. An Evaluation of Our 1994 Economic Trends 
  The determining factors in our 1994 economic trends are 
roughly as follows: 
  Demand-expansion potential, including investment growth and 
domestic market demand expansion; supply-growth potential, 
including farm-product supply growth, and basic and key raw 
material supply-growth capability; our international balance of 
payments, reflected mainly in import-growth capability; 
inflation trends and economic and social sustainability. These 
are separately analyzed and projected below. 
  1. An Analysis of Our Demand-Expansion Prospects 
  We hold that our major demand-expansion area in 1994 will 
remain investment, which is interrelated with our conversion of 
growth style and change in development stage. Our investment 
demand in 1994 will be affected by investment aspirations, 
investment fund sources, and investment-fund supply 
channels. Investment aspirations will be related to our current 
development stage, about which all parties will remain 
exceptionally exuberant. For a detailed analysis, our 1994 
planned investment is 1.4-1.45 trillion yuan, up an estimated 
16.7 percent from 1993, basically suited to our GNP growth rate 
of about 10 percent for the first time in years of planning, 
showing that the Central Government has made quite large plans 
for increased investment. Local governments will remain burdened 
on one hand with the problems of employment, shortage 
limitations, and invigoration of local economies, while being 
further heavily motivated by 1994 reelection activities on the 
other. In addition, as our overall economic policy will be for 
the whole nation to seize the opportunity for faster 
development, local government investment aspirations will also 
remain exceptionally strong. Enterprises faced with great 
pressures from market change, equipment upgrading, and the 
establishment of new-product production lines will also take 
active steps to invest more. In general, the aspirations of 
all parties to invest more will remain very strong. Investment 
fund sources will also be more abundant. Current estimates are 
that 1993 was our year of fastest income growth and most savings 
growth, with our savings deposit balance at 1.46 trillion yuan 
by the end of November, up 30.6 percent from the same period in 
1992. In addition, 1994 will see still better terms for a 
further increase in our use of foreign investment. Our real 
use of foreign investment had reached $22.7 billion for the 
first three quarters of 1993, and is expected to top $30 billion 
for all of 1994, to be a major funding source for investment. In 
addition, once our exchange rates are merged in 1994, some of 
the foreign-exchange funds that flowed abroad in 1993 will flow 
back to China, also adding to our investment funding sources. 
The current problem is in investment fund channels. On one 
hand, local government investment fund channels are down in the 
new investment-finance system, with limitations on channels, 
such as credit fund regulation authority, the two basic 
regulation funds, and fundraising. On the other, once the 
central government sets up the policy-investment bank, it may 
have trouble smoothly dovetailing it with its former 
investment-control sector, which problem might affect 
investment-fund supply. But we hold that investment sources will 
be abundant, with strong investment aspirations by all parties, 
so that investment demand will remain very high. 
  As to consumer demand, 1994 will see a stable growth trend. 
For a detailed analysis, urban consumption will grow faster, 
particularly in large cities. Certain new consumer hotspots 
will further expand. For instance, areas, such as housing and 
interior decoration, telephone and communications equipment, 
new-age home electronics, and private automobiles, will all 
grow faster. But as rural markets will be in a slow trend, 
with the purchasing power in small and midsize cities and of 
low- and middle-income city dwellers for new consumer goods 
remaining obviously inadequate, consumer markets will generally 
remain in a state of sustained, steady growth roughly similar to 
1993. 
  In general, demand in 1994 will maintain a brisk growth 
momentum pulled by investment. We predict for 1994 an 
investment growth rate at prvailing prices of still over 30 
percent, with retail commodity sales growth remaining at about 
20 percent. As domestic demand will remain very brisk, our 
1994 exports will still maintain their low-growth trend and, 
despite the impact of factors, such as the merging of exchange 
rates, are predicted to have a growth rate still not higher than 
10 percent. This analysis shows that as to demand pull, 1994 
will still have high economic-growth conditions. 
  2. An Analysis of Our Supply-Growth Prospects 
  The product supplies closely connected to demand expansion 
are farm products, transport capability, power, and key 
production raw materials. Overall, 1993 remained a year of 
bumper agricultural harvests. While our cotton and sugar crop 
yields were lower, our farm product supplies in general still 
had a certain potential. 
  Our railway transport capacity grew slowly in 1993, below 3 
percent, probably indicating inadequate railway transport 
growth. So our 1994 transport capacity will be one of supply 
shortages on top of shortages. As 40 percent of our railway 
transport capacity goes to coal shipping, transport-capacity 
limitations will directly affect our energy growth, which will 
be quite a large restraint on our 1994 economic growth. 
  In 1993, our rolled steel supplies grew very quickly. By 
the end of November, despite our sustained high economic growth, 
our rolled steel inventories were still up 21.5 percent from the 
same period in 1992. But our 1993 rolled steel supply growth was 
due to exceptional factors: a) Iron and steel enterprises, 
induced by market prices, put their equipment into overload 
production, with rolled steel output up 16.7 percent for the 
first 11 months, making 1993 another year of high growth on the 
heels of that in 1992. b) Guided by market prices, imports 
grew excessively. By the end of November, rolled steel imports 
had reached 25.81 million tons, up 370 percent from 1992. In 
1994, as all of these factors will have a much lower impact, 
with iron and steel enterprise growth potential no longer large, 
and sharp import growth also restricted by foreign exchange, our 
rolled steel supply growth rate will be back down sharply from 
1993. 
  This analysis shows that in 1994, our supply-growth 
potential 
will be lower than our demand-expansion potential. From a 
supply-growth perspective, this will support a GNP growth rate 
of only about 10 percent, leaving a definite gap with our 
demand-expansion momentum. 
  3. An Analysis of Our International Balance of Payments 
Prospects 
  This involves mostly an analysis and forecast of our trade 
balance and foreign exchange reserves. We have already 
analyzed above our 1994 export growth rate, which will be lower. 
But our import growth will remain faster, due on one hand to 
our great domestic market-expansion potential (investment and 
consumer demand), and on the other to the large gap between our 
domestic supply and demand structures. So in 1994, our imports 
will grow faster than our exports, with our trade 
foreign-exchange balance remaining in a deficit state, and our 
foreign exchange reserves down further. By the end of November 
1993, our state foreign exchange reserves were at a level of 
enough exchange to pay for two and one-half months of imports. 
If this declines further in 1994, it will very quickly fall 
below the warning line. 
  Our state of international balance of payments shows that 
there will be little capability in 1994 to increase domestic 
supplies through imports, which will further restrict our 
domestic supply-growth potential. Particularly once our exchange 
rates are merged in 1994, the probable exchange-rate rise will 
touch off a tariff-base change, which will put definite 
limitations on import growth. This will have the impact of 
easing our international balance of payments, while restricting 
our supply growth. 
  4. An Analysis of Our Inflation Prospects 
  After November 1993, our domestic market prices went into a 
further rising trend, with the general appearance in particular 
of rising prices for basic consumer goods, such as food, and 
many places afflicted with the phenomenon of panic-buying of 
grain, edible oil, and meat. So our 1994 price and inflation 
trends have become a hot topic of widespread concern to all. 
  We hold that our 1994 prices and inflation will be 
determined 
by our macroeconomic regulation and control steps and effective 
market management. The above supply analysis shows that our 
supply-growth potential will still be able to support a GNP 
growth rate of approximately 10 percent which, generally 
speaking, is still quite a high growth rate. If supply can be 
kept within the limits of growth, there will be neither a large 
gap between supply and demand, or severe inflation and price 
rises. But as our 1994 demand-expansion momentum will remain 
very strong, being larger than our supply-growth potential, if 
we do not regulate and control at all our demand-pulled high 
economic growth, but adopt rather an incentive policy, our 
prevailing-price growth rate will be very high, with very severe 
inflation and price rises. In addition, the phenomenon since 
November 1993 of faster price rises for basic consumer goods, 
particularly grain, is sharply related to the lack of the 
necessary control, restraint, and regulatory means for grain and 
edible oil markets since grain and edible oil prices were 
deregulated. This phenomenon shows more of a market-management 
problem than one of tight supply and demand for basic consumer 
goods and farm products. So as long as our overall 
macroeconomic regulation and control steps in 1994 are correct, 
to effectively control and regulate markets for daily 
necessities, such as grain and edible oil, we will not see 
severe price rises for basic consumer goods. 
  Summing up the above analyses, we hold that 1994 may bring 
either of two economic trends: a) A situation in which high 
growth and more severe inflation coexist, in which case we will 
likely see major regulation and control steps taken in the last 
half or fourth quarter, bringing quite sharp economic 
fluctuation. b) An overall policy keynote of appropriate 
regulation and control to bring higher but stable growth, 
accompanied by sustainable, approximately 10 percent price rises 
and inflation. The key to which trend will occur will be 
determined by our 1994 macroeconomic-policy keynote. We hold 
that we ought to base our actions on a correct understanding of 
our supply potential and growth conditions, to choose an overall 
macroeconomic policy orientation of appropriate regulation and 
control, in an attempt to achieve the second growth trend. 
<H5>  IV. Major Issues and Suggested Countermeasures for 1994 </H5>
  1. Investment-Finance System-Reform and Rational Guidance of 
Investment 
  In 1994, we are going to establish a policy-investment bank, 
which will combine the former control functions of the State 
Planning Commission and the Economics and Trade Commission over 
capital construction and technological-upgrading investment, for 
joint control of investment funds. In addition, local 
government investment-fund sources will be sharply restricted. 
This reform will involve two issues: a) Whether investment 
channels can be opened up to impact investment growth; b) 
Whether our investment orientation can be guided correctly to 
resolve the problem pointed out in the above analysis of the 
lack of coordination between our investment-growth and 
economic-growth structures. We hold that the key to the first 
issue is to rationalize the relations of the policy-investment 
bank with the Planning and the Economics and Trade commissions, 
for an effective increase in Central Government investment. This 
issue is actually related to the second one, as a correct 
guidance of investment orientation, in addition to perfecting 
the functioning of market forces, will more importantly bring 
the government role in the disposition of funds into full play 
in our current economic development stage, which role must be 
realized mainly in the form of Central Government investment. 
So in investment-finance system-reform, we need to give 
central place to Central Government investment, by ensuring that 
Central Government investment channels are open. In addition, 
we need to analyze in detail Central Government investment 
targets. Of our investment fields that are currently under 
little market guidance, in addition to infrastructures and some 
basic industry, the most prominent ones are high-tech 
industries, such as the equipment and basic electronics 
industries, which are industrial forerunners. As these require 
large investments, are highly capital- and technology-intensive, 
have long investment-construction periods, and do not have clear 
short-term market prospects, enterprises and localities find it 
very hard to invest in these fields, leaving a particular need 
for Central Government investment guidance. We hold that there 
is now more emphasis on infrastructure and basic industry 
construction, but not enough on faster development and 
construction of high-tech forerunner industries, so that the 
latter should be given priority. This will be the only way to 
promote faster upgrading of our industrial structure. 
  In investment-fund use, central government investment should 
give prominence to industrial-policy targets, rather than being 
overaffected by microeconomic efficiency goals. Otherwise, the 
market role would interfere too much in Central investment 
activities, making it impossible for the Central Government to 
supplement market defects through direct investment. So when 
coordinating the relations between the former 
government-investment control sector and the policy bank, we 
need to effectvely meet mostly industrial-policy needs, instead 
of overemphasizing microeconomic capital efficiency. 
  Summing up this analysis, we hold that the crux of our 1994 
financial-system reform should be to effectively increase 
central government investment capability, as well as using 
mostly industrial policy to set central government investment 
orientation. This will also be of significance in effectively 
regulating and controlling our investment-growth rate, thus 
affecting overall demand. 
  2. Effectively Combining Financial-System Reform With 
Overall 
Macroeconomic Regulation and Control 
  Our analysis of our 1994 economic trends shows that rapid 
and 
sound economic growth in 1994 will depend largely on the central 
government's overall macroecnomic regulation and control 
capability, centered on its financial regulation and control 
capability. A very important part of our 1994 financial reform 
will be making specialized banks more businesslike, in which 
process, whether reform is complete or not, specialized banks 
will acquire more independent decisionmaking power. As our 
regulation and control of specialized banks and overall 
financial activities will be converted more to setting the basic 
money supply and benchmark interest rates, effective financial 
regulation and control will be a mojor issue affecting our 
overall economic situation. 
  We hold that in 1994, our capability to control fund volume 
and regulate and control financial activities through the basic 
money supply will be sharply lower. This is due mainly to too 
much basic currency having been put into circulation in the 
fourth quarter of 1993. From September through November, the 
central bank put over 200 billion yuan in basic money supply 
into circulation, promoting a rapid increase in bank loans, 
which grew more than 250 billion yuan in October and November, 
over twice their increase for the first three quarters. As we 
estimate that even more money was put into circulation in 
December, we are projecting our loan increase for 1993 at 470 
billion yuan, up 22 percent from 1992. Under such concentrated 
lending and putting into circulation of basic currency, funds 
grew very quickly for both all specialized banks and 
enterprises. Our current specialized bank provision rate is 
over 13 percent, sharply higher than the normal level of 5-7 
percent, and more than 10 points higher than that at the 
beginning of 1993, showing that bank credit-expansion potential 
is great. As to enterprise funds, enterprise deposits began to 
bottom out in October, growing 24 billion yuan that month, over 
50 billion yuan in November, and an estimated even larger amount 
in December. This shows that the large amount of funds put into 
circulation are already higher than our objective 
economic-growth needs. Our calculations show the 
unit-loan-increase correspondence to industrial output value 
growth at 1.50 yuan for 1991 and 2.47 yuan for 1992, but only at 
0.55 yuan for September through November 1993. This situation 
is now more stable on one hand because the rapid demand growth, 
particularly that of investment, is subject to a time lag in 
pulling high-speed economic growth. On the other, it is due to 
more control steps directed at specialized banks, such as the 
relending of basic currency put into circulation going first to 
the head offices of all specialized banks where it is divided up 
among all branches, and all specialized bank branch 
large-denomination remittance settlements having to go through 
the central bank, all of which have sharply reduced fund 
turnover rates, partially offsetting the impact of more overall 
funds. 
  As specialized banks make entrepreneurial reforms in 1994, 
the above measures to restrict specialized banks will be 
affected to decrease in impact, with resulting faster fund 
turnover rates, and problems related to more overall funds 
growing more conspicuous. In addition, as it is predicted that 
investment demand will expand rapidly in the first quarter of 
1994 due to massive fund support, the enterprise fund-turnover 
rate will also accelerate. Summing up this analysis, the 
excessive amount of credit granted in the fourth quarter of 
1933, and the entrepreneurial reforms of specialized banks in 
1994, will sharply reduce the capability of the central bank in 
1994 to regulate and control overall finance through controlling 
the basic money supply. 
  As to the function of benchmark interest rates, since China 
has still not perfected our money markets, once specialized 
banks become businesslike, as new restraint forces will remain 
hard to evolve in a short time, and particularly as prices will 
fluctuate sharply during rapid economic growth, benchmark 
interest rates will still have a weak capability to regulate 
overall finance. 
  Summing up this analysis, the Central Government's overall 
macroeconomic regulation and control capability will be lower in 
1994 than in 1993, with financial reforms likely to exacerbate 
this trend. As to the sound growth of our overall economy, this 
will pose a potential danger. 
  In light of this, in our 1994 financial reform, we should 
pay 
conscientious attention to its impact on our macroeconomic 
regulation and control capability, particularly on our financial 
regulation and control capability. Moreover, we should cut 
back on the amount of basic currency put into circulation 
starting from the beginning of 1994, in an attempt to reduce the 
impact of the excessive amount put into circulation. Meanwhile, 
we should standardize and perfect as quickly as possible our 
money-market order, by strengthening restraints on enterprises, 
particularly financial enterprises, in an attempt to strengthen 
the regulatory impact of capital prices on financing activities. 
  3. The Merging of Our Exchange Rates and Our Balance of 
International Payments 
  In our 1994 economic trends, the major support to supply 
will 
be import growth and, as long as supply grows faster, we will be 
able to achieve our goal of rapid economic growth with low 
inflation. So import-growth potential has a supportive 
capability for our international balance of payments, being one 
of our key grounds for sound economic growth in 1994. 
  Our 1994 foreign exchange reform will abolish foreign 
exchange retention and quota control, deregulating foreign 
exchange prices, with banks managing foreign exchange services 
and foreign exchange transaction activities. This will have the 
impact of probably raising foreign-exchange exchange rates and, 
once foreign exchange quota control is abolished, affecting 
central import activities, also lowering central ability to 
control overall foreign exchange usage. While it is predicted 
that higher exchange rates will stimulate exports and restrict 
imports, having a good impact on our international balance of 
payments, the restriction on central imports may have a bad 
impact on our import structure. Imports of capital goods where 
the relations between domestic and international prices have not 
yet been rationalized, as well as ones, such as crude oil, 
refined oil, and grain, will be impacted sharply, while imports, 
such as high-priced, high-profit manufactured consumer goods, 
will grow faster, which will be particularly adverse to 
supporting effective supply growth. In addition, more 
importantly, our ability to control the use of foreign exchange 
will decline. As pointed out in our above analysis, exports 
will grow slowly and imports sharply in 1994, putting foreign 
exchange in a state of undersupply. So easing our foreign 
exchange control in such a state is very likely to touch off 
large exchange rates volatility, as well as reducing our foreign 
exchange reserves faster, thus weakening our ability to regulate 
and control our international balance of payments. This could 
result in a deterioration in our international balance of 
payments, forcing the government to institute a policy of 
overall economic retrenchment. As to economic growth, this is 
yet another unstable factor. 
  So in our 1994 foreign exchange system reform and exchange 
rates merging, we need to pay attention to overall economic 
trends, particularly our international balance of payments, by 
doing all possible to avoid or lower the negative impacts 
pointed out in our above analysis, in order to pave the way for 
a more effective use of foreign exchange funds, the overall 
strengthening of our macroeconomic regulation and control 
capability, and better macroeconomic regulation and control 
effectiveness. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20347 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar024___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  15 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Analysis of Macroeconomic Regulation, Control </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Analysis of Macroeconomic Regulation, Control </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0348A Beijing ZHONGGUO WUJIA [PRICES IN CHINA] in 
Chinese No 1, Jan 94 pp 9-13 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0348A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO WUJIA [PRICES IN CHINA] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhen Yan (3914 6056): "An Analysis of the State </F>
of Macroeconomic Regulation and Control in 1993"] 
  [Text] Macroeconomic regulation and control had a profound 
impact in the two areas of economic growth and system reform in 
1993. To analyze 1994's macroeconomic regulation and control 
policy results, we will first review the economic setting that 
caused the Central Committee to take macroeconomic regulation 
and control steps. 
<H5>  I. The State of the Economy From 1992 to the First Half of </H5>
1993 
  In early 1992, the inspiration of Comrade Deng Xiaoping's 
southern-tour speeches set off an upsurge of faster economic 
growth everywhere throughout China so that, once the state of 
economic stagnation that had been extant since the improvement 
and rectification campaign was changed, economic growth in all 
areas steadily jumped to new heights. But as China's new 
economic system based on a market economy had not yet been 
established, various flaws of the old system resurfaced. All 
areas competed to build new shops and stores, reexpanding the 
scale of capital construction in particular, while "bottleneck" 
industries, such as power and transportation, did not grow 
correspondingly, causing a tense situation of supply not meeting 
demand for both commodities and capital. Statistics show that 
our 1992 GNP was up 13 percent from 1991's, while this tense 
macroeconomic state intensified steadily in the first half of 
1993, becoming a glaring threat to economic growth. 
  Along with this economic phenomenon of too fast economic 
growth, our macroeconomic financial order during this period was 
in chaos, spurring public capital-demand to exceed normal 
limits. This was seen mainly as: 
  1. Interbank borrowing was enormous, with quite a few money 
markets converting to currency markets. As direct central-bank 
control of the credit scale restricted to a certain extent 
enterprise loan-demand, while call markets grew rapidly through 
financial-system reform, borrowing became a key source of 
capital for enterprises to breach state control. As the central 
bank and state specialized banks in all areas also wanted, due 
to a variety of reasons, to do all possible to satisfy these 
enterprise aspirations, their capital outflow in non-loan forms 
was huge. It was reported that other state-bank fund-source 
account-headings in 1992 were down 152.43 billion yuan, or 42.8 
percent of the increased loans for the same period. And in the 
first four months of 1993, they were down another 79.909 billion 
yuan. Net lending by specialized banks was up 59.32 billion yuan 
in 1992, as well as up again somewhat for the first four months 
of 1993. By May 1993, 14.3 percent of loan capital was being 
used by non-money markets. 
  2. All types of fundraising activities arose one after 
another. While these funds were all beyond-plan, making it 
hard to ascertain their scale precisely, we can see from the 
results they caused the extent of the fundraising impact. a) 
This fundraising was without exception through means that 
promised interest rates higher than those for bank savings 
deposits, with the widespread extent of the fundraising 
activities raising real capital prices (interest rates) above 20 
percent. b) The huge gap between these fundraising-capital 
interest rates and official ones caused a large national 
savings-decline and a bank-payment crisis. It is calculated that 
real savings deposits were down at least 80 billion yuan from 
the savings deposit balance trend-value, or 22.4 percent of the 
1992 loan increase. 
  3. Development-zone, real-estate, and stock fevers 
attracted much construction capital. As much as 75-80 percent 
of loan funds were loaned at high interest to certain economic 
subjects that used them for purposes, such as real estate and 
stock speculation, with many enterprises and institutions even 
drawing on regular production working capital or high-interest 
fundraising to take part in speculative selling. So real 
estate and stock prices climbed time and again, showing a false 
market prosperity of supply not meeting demand, and forming to a 
certain extent a so-called "bubble economy." 
  In addition, foreign-exchange conversion prices, also due to 
many reasons, were speculated in a short period to the boiling 
point, with the real exchange rate of the RMB to the dollar 
reaching 11 : 1 for a time. 
  Such a macroeconomic state unavoidably had the following 
consequences: a) funds were in severly short supply for 
priority enterprises and construction projects that played a 
mainstay role in national economic growth, as well as for 
indispensable farm products and foreign-trade purchasing 
activities, impacting normal economic activities; b) the "bubble 
economy" expanded rapidly, tending to flow over into other 
economic sectors; c) inflation remained high, in danger of 
high-speed growth under "bubble-economy" conditions; d) high 
inflation was about to severely obstruct the sound growth of our 
national economy. 
  So the Central Committee officially decided in June 1993 to 
apply macroeconomic regulation and control to national economic 
operations. 
<H5>  II. Macroeconomic Regulation and Control Application and </H5>
Results 
  Directed at the state of operation of our national economy, 
the state adopted the principles of rectifying the financial 
order, optimizing the industrial structure, raising economic 
efficiency, and promoting balanced, rapid, and sustained 
economic growth, by doing all possible to abandon the 
indiscriminate method of all-out tight money, in order to ensure 
the funds needed for farm and sideline product purchasing, 
normal production by priority enterprises, national priority 
construction projects, and foreign-trade purchasing and 
operations. So we adopted mainly the following regulation and 
control policies: 
  1. We tightened overall monetary demand, strictly 
controlling overall credit. The Central Committee instructed 
all areas to conduct a one-time, all-out examination and 
verification of our project and fund-use lineup, deciding to 
halt or slow projects that did not conform to national 
industrial policy, did not have construction funding, and had 
not been examined and approved per stipulation, to strictly 
control the construction of new projects, and to not approve in 
principle any new construction projects for the last 4 months of 
1993. We tightened credit so that all bank loans grew only 
99.3 billion yuan for the first half of 1993, 26.3 billion yuan 
less than for the same period in 1992. 
  2. We regulated the economy through market-economy means. 
In May and July 1993, the central bank raised bank deposit and 
loan interest rates twice, with the finance sector also 
correspondingly raising 1993 treasury bill interest rates. 
Based on improving foreign-exchange management, the pertinent 
state sector gave up some of its foreign-exchange intervention 
in market exchange rates, stabilizing the rate of exchange 
between the RMB and the dollar at about 8.7:1. 
  3. We improved our financial order through administrative 
means. a) We made a few simple rules to be observed by all 
concerned in the financial system: all illegal lending was to be 
immediately stopped and conscientiously cleared up, with 
deadlines set for recouping illegally loaned funds; no financial 
institutions were allowed to covertly raise deposit and loan 
interest rates, or collect kickbacks from loan subjects; the 
input of credit funds by banks into all economic entities run by 
them was to be immediately stopped, with banks having to 
completely dislink themselves from all of their own economic 
entities. b) We strictly enforced tax-revenue policy. The 
tax-revenue sector had to strictly control tax reductions and 
exemptions, strictly control spending, and further cut back the 
growth of social-group purchasing power. c) We cleared up 
compensated fundraising activities. Except for the sale per 
stipulation of stocks, enterprise bonds, financial bonds, 
investment-fund bonds, and trust-beneficiary bonds, all 
fundraising activity compensated by repayment of capital with 
interest or payment of dividends and bonuses to capital 
contributors was temporarily stopped. We particularly 
stipulated that compensated fundraising activities by state 
organs, institutions, and social groups directed at employees 
and the public were prohibited. 
  Such a large-scale macroeconomic regulation and control 
policy produced in a very short time remarkable results: 
  1. Industrial production, while maintaining high-speed 
growth, fell steadily, with the excessive growth momentun of 
fixed assets controlled somewhat. State Statistical Bureau 
information shows that state-unit investment growth, in 
comparison to the same periods in 1992, was 70.7 percent for the 
first half of 1993, but 66 percent for the third quarter, down 9 
points. As to investment sources, the ratio of self-raised funds 
at all levels also correspondingly fell from 86 percent to 76 
percent, with the industrial growth rate down from its 
first-half of 25.5 percent to 22.5 percent for September, and 
down again to 16.4 percent for October. 
  2. Our financial situation and order began to improve. This 
could be seen mainly as: a) The currency-input growth-trend 
slowed. While our money supply growth reached a high of 54 
percent for the first half, four consecutive months of lower 
input in the last half in relation to the same periods in 1992 
brought our market money-supply growth down by the end of 
October to 38.6 percent, 15 points lower than for the first 
half. b) Specialized bank payment-readiness funds quickly 
rebounded, reaching about 10 percent by the end of October. In 
addition, the PBC injected 20 billion yuan of funds into all 
financing centers, resolving bank-payment problems, and starting 
to invigorate normal interbank lending; c) The illegal 
bank-lending phenomenon began to be corrected, with a net of 
over 30 billion yuan in loaned funds recouped, or one-third of 
that recoupable. d) All arbitrary fundraising began to be 
curbed, with actions, such as high-interest fundraising and 
financial swindling, severely cracked down on. e) The higher 
interest-rate policy showed marked results, with savings 
deposits climbing monthly to reach a balance of 1.3867 trillion 
yuan by the end of September, up 232.2 billion yuan from that at 
the end of 1992. f) Foreign exchange conversion prices 
stabilized at the policy-anticipated control level. 
  3. The development-zone and real-estate fevers in all areas 
cooled somewhat, with real estate prices in coastal zones down 
about 20 percent. Correspondingly, capital goods supplies 
loosened, with investment-product prices back down somewhat. 
According to a report in ZHONGHUA GONG-SHANG BAO [CHINA 
INDUSTRIAL-COMMERCIAL REPORT] for October, the domestic 
commodity market price index was down 2.8 percent, including 
drops of 6 percent for ferrous metals, 2.3 percent for 
nonferrous metals, 0.8 percent for industrial chemicals and 
light industry, and 2.6 percent for machinery and electronics 
products. 
  4. Loans to ensure national priority projects increased 
sharply. As much as 93.9 percent of the funds for 112 
state-loan-invested national priority projects were provided. 
  For 65 priority projects in the transportation, post and 
telecommunications, petrochemicals, pharmaceuticals, light 
textiles, and other industries, all of the loan funds in 1993 
plans were provided; 71 percent of technological upgrading funds 
were provided, up 7.5 points from the same period in 1992; 
foreign-trade loans grew over 10 points more than foreign-trade 
exports; farm and sideline-product purchasing loans grew to 12 
billion yuan for October, with the Agricultural Bank having 
specially set aside over 22 billion yuan in preparation for 
purchasing. 
  While this shows that this macroeconomic regulation and 
control policy's objectives had basically been or were being 
realized, many negative regulation and control effects still 
needed much attention. 
  1. Enterprise operating-fund difficulties remained quite 
glaring. In order to alleviate these difficulties, the PBC 
issued 150 billion yuan in basic money supply to specialized 
banks from late August to late October, increasing the lending 
capability of specialized banks. But while this should have 
improved the overshortage of funds generally, a time-lag was 
involved, meaning that we still needed to see if the lending 
structural reform was appropriate. 
  2. Enterprise inventories grew, with losses up and economic 
efficiency declining. By the end of September, finished 
products were tying up 152.67 billion yuan in funds, up 14 
percent from the same period in 1992; State Statistical 
Bureau data on inventories of 75 key manufactured goods showed 
54 up from the beginning of 1993, with 11 goods, such as rolled 
steel, tin, and concentrated nitric acid, up more than 100 
percent. By the end of September, inventories were up from the 
beginning of 1993 by 2.664 million tons for cement, 53,400 
vehicles for automobiles, and 4.03 million tons for rolled steel 
goods throughout China. For October, finished-goods inventories 
of budgeted state-owned industrial enterprises were up 19 
percent from the same period in 1992, with realized profits down 
21.8 percent from September. As many as 37.8 percent of 
enterprises were sustaining losses, which losses were up 9.1 
percent from September. "Triangular debt" resurged, with mutual 
arrears recurring, leaving net accounts-due by the end of 
October topping 210 billion yuan, up more than 40 billion yuan 
from the end of July. 
  3. Fixed-asset investments continued to grow too fast. While 
the macroeconomic regulation and control steps had controlled 
new projects that had not yet gone into construction in 1993, 
the building of new shops that had begun in all areas was 
certainly not genuinely cut back, with national priority 
construction projects striving to complete plans, making it 
impossible to reduce the investment scale in the short term. 
Fixed-assets investment for the first three quarters was still 
up over 65 percent from the same period in 1992, leaving 
market-demand pull and inflationary pressures certainly not 
markedly lighter. 
  4. Final public demand showed a weakening trend, with 
markets slightly soft. For October, overall retail commodity 
turnover corrected for inflation actually grew only 5 percent; 
investment-product demand corrected for inflation actually grew 
less than in 1992; export demand remained slow, with customs 
exports for October up only 5.1 percent from the same period in 
1992. In addition, commercial-purchasing zeal was not high, 
with net commercial purchases of manufactured goods for October 
up only 10.5 percent, 16.1 points lower than for June. 
  5. In clear contrast to the slight downturn in 
investment-product prices, consumer-goods market prices saw a 
sustained upswing. For the first three quarters, overall 
retail prices rose 12 percent, while the cost-of-living price 
index rose 14 percent, including 18.9 percent for the 35 large 
and midsize cities, to reach a peak-state since economic reform. 
Prices in all areas throughout China rose simultaneously in all 
dimensions, forming a moderate degree of inflation. 
<H5>  III. An Analysis of the Macroeconomic Regulation and Control </H5>
Policy's Effects 
  While this macroeconomic regulation and control policy was 
generally correct in direction and appropriate in degree, to 
basically achieve a "soft landing" without a sharp economic 
retrenchment, such macroeconomic regulation and control through 
mostly administrative measures would have damaged to a great 
extent the regular operations of many enterprises. Phenomena, 
such as the heavier "triangular debt" and soft market sales for 
enterprises at the time, showed that the macroeconomic 
regulation and control was too sharp in force, leaving an 
appropriate easing of the money supply the inevitable option for 
maintaining a certain economic-growth rate. 
  Our economic operations after the macroeconomic regulation 
and control showed a seemingly contradictory economic 
phenomenon. On one hand, higher inventories, declining 
efficiency, and soft markets showed inadequate market demand; on 
the other, too high investment growth and rapid retail-price 
rises showed an abundance of funds and strong demand. As to 
funding, while the central bank had recently issued 150 billion 
yuan in basic money supply, enterprises were again forming 
"triangular debt" on a large scale due to fund shortages. We 
hold that two basic factors created this situation. a) The 
macroeconomic regulation and control impact still existed, and 
was going to for a short time, as the new funds injected by the 
state had not yet reached all economic players. b) This 
macroeconomic regulation and control was structurally 
characterized by a guarantee of priority-project fund demand, 
with a cutback of nonpriority-project fund demand. But in our 
current economic operations, nonpriority projects were sharply 
driving market demand, with the demand inadequacy created by the 
fund shortage for this sector lasting for quite a long period of 
time. So as time passed, the conflicts in our economic 
operations would be bound to improve somewhat. 
  In order to prevent the recurrence of such macroeconomic 
overheating, the state still had to make follow-up policy 
adjustments in many areas. As to the factors producing this 
"bubble economy," on one hand, the severe market imbalance 
created by administrative monopoly had artificially raised 
market prices in many fields, thus causing excessive 
profiteering and speculation; on the other, our financial 
system's responsibilities were hard to separate, with policies 
imbalanced, leaving large amounts of funds, induced by market 
interests, to successfully detour policy restraints. So for 
our financial system, development zones, real estate market, and 
securities market, we had to combine administrative regulation 
and control with market reforms, by clarifying all policy 
limits, as well as making a timely adjustment in line with 
economic reform and growth needs, in order to prevent "the 
exploitation of authority for private market gain," and to 
control the direct factors driving economic overheating. 
  To keep our national economy growing in a sustained and 
balanced way, we had to root out the basic factors leading to 
economic overheating. This grim macroeconomic state caused 
mainly by changes in the field of finance was essentially part 
of the economic-fluctuation cycle of expansion -- retrenchment 
-- expansion of our traditional planned-economy system, being of 
an unavoidable nature. As current systems, such as investment, 
finance, tax revenue, and enterprise, still largely placed soft 
budgetary restraints on enterprises, forcing local microeconomic 
interests on our conversion to a market-economy system, 
investment expansion was an inherent demand of enterprises and 
local governments in all areas. While this demand had to 
acquire funding support from the field of finance, our banking 
system per se was still in a reform process, unavoidably still 
burdened with the dual responsibility for both policy and 
commercial loans. As commercial loans were consistent with 
their own interests, banks were bound to transfer some 
policy-loan funds to commercial-loan funds, through means, such 
as irregular lending of funds and issuing of IOUs, leaving the 
priority-guaranteed policy-loan-fund shortage to the central 
bank, for a bottom-up forcing of the state to increase the money 
supply. It is thus obvious that the nonmarket-oriented system 
was the basic reason for the macroeconomic expansion touched off 
by market reform. So promoting sustained and balanced economic 
growth under the new conditions meant establishing an effective 
market-economy system. In addition to investment, taxation, 
market-circulation, and enterprise-system reform, our currently 
most important task is to establish a more rational financial 
system. This will include: 1) Establishing a central bank 
with independent authority, whose primary task will be to 
maintain the value of the currency and prevent excessive 
inflation, while paying attention to policy loans. 2) Thoroughly 
reorganizing state specialized banks into commercial banks, to 
carry out businesslike operations with no further responsibility 
for policy loans. 3) Actively pushing forward with the 
establishment of a securities market, by increasing stock and 
bond supply to meet market demand. 4) Appropriately easing 
restrictions on private financial institutions, to make the 
financial industry more competitive in regular market 
operations. In such a financial framework, the state will have 
a solid system-basis for developing indirect macroeconomic 
regulation and control, while market restraints between 
enterprises and banks will correspondingly strengthen. 
  In order to smoothly convert from our existing system to a 
market-economy system, macroeconomic policy has to pay great 
attention to quantitative control. In light of China's 
realities, our macroeconomic policy must curb economic 
overheating and excessive inflation, by regulating and 
controlling in line with set quantitative criteria. But in 
issuing currency, we not only must consider economic growth 
rates and a sustainable degree of inflation, but also have to 
accomodate a certain amount of economic-monetarization factors. 
In China's future economic reforms, two areas will obviously 
increase our economic-monetarization extent. 1) The 
commercialization of production factors, such as the rise of the 
securities market, development of the real estate market, and 
other forms of market-building, will objectively absorb a lot of 
capital, absolutely increasing public monetary demand. 2) The 
oil-price reform already set by the state will be bound to 
sharply change China's price system. As oil is the major 
energy source for modern industry, having a huge chain-reaction 
on downstream industries, price reform involving mainly higher 
crude prices will inevitably raise all of our prices to new 
highs. So it will be only by acting on historical experience 
and real needs to set a rational economic-monetarization rate, 
that will enable us to prevent severe inflation, while retaining 
full market-economy vitality. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20348 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar024___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  30 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Characteristics of 1993 Economy, 1994 Prospects </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Characteristics of 1993 Economy, 1994 Prospects </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0321A Beijing ZHONGGUO FANGZHI BAO in Chinese 30 Jan 94 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0321A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO FANGZHI BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Special Columnist Wang Li (3769 5461): "Three </F>
Highs, Three Fevers, and the Rest--1993 Economic Determinations, 
Prospects for 1994 Trends"] 
  [Text] In 1993 Chinese economic life exhibited a few 
major characteristics: a high investment growth rate, a high 
rate of industrial production, and a high rate of inflation; and 
real estate fever, stock fever, and development zone fever. In 
addition, the financial order was chaotic and exacerbation of 
the uneven development among regions and systems of ownership 
and between industry and agriculture was more obvious than in 
previous years. The year 1994 will be a year of policy 
adjustments and intensified reform. We hope that textile 
enterprises, while comprehending the macroeconomic situation, 
will better grasp the helm of enterprise reform. 
  In 1993 China's national economy remained on the fast track. 
In the first half of the year, the economy achieved exceedingly 
high 14.1 percent growth. In June the state adopted a series of 
macroeconomic control measures. In the second half of the year, 
financial order turned around somewhat, the scale of investment 
came under control to a certain extent, and the domestic 
economic environment clearly improved. 
  Compared with the last few years, 1993 still could be 
considered a rapid-growth year. Annual gross national product 
(GNP) is expected to break 3 trillion yuan, calculated according 
to comparative prices, the growth rate will be about 13 percent. 
The total value of output of industry at the township level and 
above is estimated to have grown by 30.2 percent in the first 
half of the year. In the second half of the year, the growth 
rate tended to slow, and the annual increase over the previous 
year is expected to be about 21 percent. 
  Fixed asset investment still maintained an exceedingly high 
growth rate. This is directly related to the chaotic financial 
situation. A great many units by short-term loans in violation 
of the rules carried out different forms of arbitrary raising of 
funds without the permission of the authorized departments. The 
resulting financial confusion caused a decrease in banks' 
sources of funds, making it difficult for them to support the 
requirements of production and circulation and forcing the state 
to issue a large amount of currency. Cash issuance rapidly 
increased. In the first half of 1992, 2.1 billion yuan in 
currency was withdrawn from circulation, but in the same period 
in 1993, an additional 52.8 billion yuan was issued. The 
difference between the decrease and the increase was 50.7 
billion yuan. 
  Financial chaos also led to enterprises' circumventing state 
macroeconomic controls and raising a large amount of funds to 
guarantee projects, expanding the scale of investment. In the 
first half of 1993, fixed asset investment grew by 60 percent. 
Within that, investment in fixed assets under the ownership of 
the whole people grew by 70.7 percent. After the state adopted 
macroeconomic control measures in the last half of June, 
financial order improved somewhat and the chaotic situation of 
arbitrary short-term loans, arbitrary raising of funds, and 
arbitrary establishment of financial organizations was 
essentially curbed. The rate of development was slowed somewhat, 
restraining new starts to a certain extent. In the second half 
of the year, the investment growth rate will decline somewhat, 
but still maintain an exceedingly high rate of growth. It is 
estimated that annual fixed asset investment for the whole 
society could reach 1.15 trillion yuan, an increase of about 46 
percent over the previous year, becoming the year with the 
greatest increase since the 1980s. Its major characteristics 
were that the share of investment in the state budget further 
declined and the share of investment outside the budget 
(domestic loans, self-raised funds, and the use of foreign 
funds) rose further. 
  But enterprise shortage of funds still is rather pronounced, 
causing serious difficulties for normal enterprise production 
and operations. A great many enterprises, because they lack 
funds, have no way to purchase raw materials, affecting the 
production of products that the market urgently needs and making 
them stop production or partially stop production. In September 
the production growth rate of state industrial enterprises was 
only 6.8 percent. Some enterprises were in arrears on staff 
wages. "Triangular debt" staged a comeback and mutual loan 
arrearage among enterprises still exists. The main cause of the 
shortage of enterprise funds is that money was tightened, which 
created a new batch of triangular debts. From June through 
August, the banks recalled a large amount of short-term loan 
funds, but precisely during the same period in 1992, they put 
out a large amount of short-term funds. The increase and the 
decrease actually reduced the utilization of funds. Moreover, a 
large portion of the short-term loan funds recalled were 
enterprise circulating funds. With the decline in the growth 
rate of the economy and the lowering of the intermediate demand, 
some enterprises lacking in competitiveness naturally could 
encounter sales difficulties on the cooling market, and reserves 
could rise with corresponding stagnation and waste of some 
funds. With the "three fevers" (real estate fever, stock fever, 
and development zone fever), banks loaned funds to subordinate 
companies to speculate on real estate and the central bank 
demanded repayment in a limited time. Actually, it could not be 
repaid. So, some banks could only block enterprise liquid 
capital as a stopgap. In some places, enterprises with savings 
in the bank could not take money out. 
  The income and the consumption of residents both rose and 
the 
market was stable in the midst of overall prosperity. In the 
first half of the year, residents maintained worth by competing 
to buy, but in the second half of the year this essentially 
disappeared. Prices of imported home appliances and gold jewelry 
went back down somewhat. As regards the overall supply and 
demand for consumer items on the market, the supply remained 
greater than the demand. It is estimated that the annual social 
commodity retail sales figure will reach 1.35 trillion yuan, an 
increase of about 23 percent over the previous year. Deducting 
the price factor, the actual increase is about 9 percent. The 
disparity between the rural market and the urban market is 
rather great. Increases in the income and the consumption level 
of rural residents still are clearly lower than the national 
average. Income of rural and urban residents continues to 
increase and the standard of living has improved somewhat, but 
the disparity between the incomes of urban and rural residents 
is gradually widening. According to preliminary calculations, 
the ratio of the actual annual income of urban and rural 
residents will expand to about 6:1 from 2.8:1 in 1992. It is 
estimated that the annual per capita living expenses of urban 
residents will reach 2,350 yuan. With the price factor deducted, 
this is an actual increase of about 12 percent over the previous 
year. The per capita net income of rural residents is about 860 
yuan. With the price factor deducted, it is an actual increase 
of about 2 percent over the previous year. The fact that 
increases in farmers' income are not much, is the crux of the 
difficulty for overall agricultural production and favorable 
development of the national economy. 
  The inflation rate remains rather high. Since 1993, with the 
"overheating" economy beginning to cool, prices exhibited an 
overall rise, climbing from month to month. In the first three 
quarters, retail prices rose 12 percent on average and the 
prices of residents' living expenses rose 14 percent, with those 
in 35 large and medium-sized cities rising about 20 percent. The 
economy continuously cooled, but prices remained high. The main 
reason was that prices are a delayed indicator. Although the 
economy had cooled, the delayed effect of the economic 
overheating in the previous stage continued to act on the prices 
of consumer items. This round of price rises came mainly from 
the state's making rather large adjustments or freeing up the 
prices of some items and services necessary for living such as 
grains; non-staple foods; fuel; rent, water, and electricity 
fees; transportation fees; and tuition while macroeconomic 
controls lacked the necessary complete measures, driving overall 
price levels up. With residents' income gradually rising and 
classes of consumption gradually opening up, some high consumers 
gave impetus to the rise in the prices of consumer items. The 
exchange rate of the renminbi for the U.S. dollar changed, 
causing the prices of import and export commodities to soar. In 
addition, such factors as increased wages also encouraged price 
rises. It is estimated that annual new increases in issuance of 
renminbi still will reach 145 billion yuan, and retail prices 
will rise about 13 percent over 1992 and prices of residents' 
living expenses will rise about 15 percent with prices in 35 
large and medium-sized cities rising about 19 percent. 
  Foreign trade formed a deficit and the international balance 
of payments was unbalanced. According to preliminary 
calculations, 1993 exports totalled about US$92 billion, an 
increase of about 7 percent over the previous year; and import 
totals will break US$100 billion, an increase of more than 24 
percent. Foreign trade imports greater than exports led to 
greater foreign exchange expenditure than income and state 
foreign exchange reserves declined for a foreign trade deficit 
of approximately US$7.5 billion, the first in the 1990s. 
  The imbalance in the international balance of payments 
exacerbated. The main reasons were that, beginning in 1993, 
prices on the domestic market rose rather high and foreign sales 
did not equal domestic sales. Some traditional large quantity 
export products declined greatly and export transactions also 
declined rather greatly, causing export reserves to be 
inadequate. Rapid economic growth, flourishing domestic demand, 
and the clearly rising reliance on imports, along with reduced 
import tariffs caused rapidly increased imports of raw materials 
in tight domestic demand such as rolled steel, copper, and 
aluminum. The continuous delivery of large batches of equipment 
ordered by large purchasing delegations that China sent to 
Europe and the United States in 1992 also were a cause of high 
import growth. 
  In 1994 China is in transition to the market economy 
and a policy adjustment period. The economy has already entered 
sustained, rapid, healthy development. It is expected that the 
rate of economic growth will recede somewhat and the rate of 
growth of the national economy will be lower than in 1993, 
maintaining the rather high level of approximately 10 percent, 
which to a certain extent could relieve restraint on development 
of the national economy from the transportation "bottleneck" in 
recent years and curb large price rises, creating a good 
economic environment for adjustments in the economic structure 
and avoiding the occurrence of large rises and large falls in 
economic development and giving 1994 a "soft landing." 
  Improved structural adjustment and maintenance of 
appropriate 
investment. Because of the influence of several factors, it is 
estimated that the rate of increase for fixed asset investment 
in the entire society will decline somewhat in 1994. Total 
investment will exceed 1.35 trillion yuan, but the actual growth 
rate for investment will be 1-2 percentage points higher than 
the actual growth rate of the GNP. Because in 1993 the state 
adopted macroeconomic control measures, generally eliciting the 
attention and the praise of people in foreign economic circles, 
in 1994 the maintenance of constant growth in the scale of 
foreign investment in Chinese fixed assets and the steady growth 
of the national economy will play an ever more important part. 
So, the maintenance of appropriate investment will help to guard 
against economic slippage and the intensification of the 
disparity between overall supply and overall demand will help to 
rationally adjust the economic structure. 
  Given impetus by costs from the previous stage and affected 
by the delayed effect of excessive issuance of currency, it will 
be very difficult to curb inflation. It will be extremely 
difficult to think about maintaining price rises at 6 percent or 
under. Retail prices for the whole society in 1994 are expected 
to approach 10 percent. Urban resident cost of living price 
indices could exceed 10 percent. So, in 1994 we should adopt 
effective measures to keep prices down and avoid social problems 
caused by loss of macroeconomic controls and promote improvement 
in the economic environment. 
  The economic environment has improved somewhat, helping to 
develop foreign trade exports. In 1994 China will be restored as 
a signatory to the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade 
(GATT). Based on the consideration of being restored to GATT, at 
the beginning of the year, China announced a merging of the 
exchange rates. Because the world economy will tend to recover 
in 1994, the international market demand will increase somewhat, 
and the Chinese government will encourage increased exports, the 
1994 domestic economic environment can be expected to be 
somewhat better than 1993. In addition, there is the devaluation 
of the yuan and the impetus to foreign trade that can come from 
that, especially the development of the export trade. But it 
still will be rather great difficult to increase the export 
trade to realize a balance of trade in 1994. It is estimated 
that in 1994 foreign trade will grow at the rate of about 16 
percent and total growth will still be held down by the high 
rate of increase of foreign imports. Within that, imports will 
increase by about 21 percent over the previous year and exports 
will increase by about 10 percent over the previous year, and 
the annual trade deficit will be about US$10 billion. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20349 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar024___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PROVINCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Sichuan Governor Interviewed on Region's Economy </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Sichuan Governor Interviewed on Region's Economy </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0342A Beijing QIUSHI [SEEKING TRUTH] in Chinese No 4, 10 
Feb 94 pp 13-15 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0342A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing QIUSHI [SEEKING TRUTH] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Xiao Yang (5135 4441), governor of Sichuan, </F>
by QIUSHI reporter Zhang Sufang (1728 4790 5364) and SICHUAN 
JINGJI RIBAO reporter Xiao Baoguo (5135 0202 0948); date and 
place of interview not given: "Use Regional Approach To Develop 
Sichuan Economy"] 
  [Text] Long celebrated as the "land of abundance," Sichuan 
Province is China's most populous province whose reform and open 
policy, economic development, and degree of social progress have 
a profound impact on all China. The deepening of economic 
structural reform, the steady expansion of the open policy, and, 
in particular, the CPC Central Committee's call for the creation 
of a socialist market economy have all given the landlocked 
province of Sichuan a historic opportunity to develop its 
economy. Its success has been enormous. However, Sichuan is 
still some distance behind the provinces along the southeastern 
coast. How to accelerate Sichuan's economic development? The 
reporters posed this question to Comrade Xiao Yang, governor of 
Sichuan, during an interview. 
  [QIUSHI] There is a famous couplet written on scrolls and 
hung on the pillars of Wuhou Temple in Chengdu. The second line 
reads, "When one fails to size up the situation, one will err by 
being either too lenient or too strict." This shows the vital 
importance of judging the hour and sizing up the situation. 
Governor Xiao Yang, what can you tell us about Sichuan's 
economic development strategy in the new era? 
  [Xiao Yang] As a local government, the principal mission of 
the Sichuan government is to implement and carry through with 
the CPC Central Committee's line and policies and come up with 
specific policies in light of the reality. Agriculture is the 
foundation of the national economy and rural stability is the 
cornerstone of social stability overall. With its 90 million 
peasants, Sichuan is a leading agricultural province. It is 
imperative that in economic construction the basic position of 
agriculture be strengthened and consolidated. Accordingly 
Sichuan must make agriculture its top economic priority at all 
times. In Sichuan, agriculture is highly developed and rests on 
a firm foundation. While Sichuan accounts for one-sixteenth of 
the nation's arable land, it feeds one-tenth of its population. 
Its per capita grain consumption is 800 jin. Be that as it may, 
there is still widespread rural poverty here and a vast majority 
of the localities have not achieved a moderately comfortable 
standard of living. A basic task of economic construction in 
Sichuan, therefore, is to enable its 90 million peasants to 
achieve just such a standard of living. Failing that, we cannot 
say Sichuan has a decent standard of living. Accordingly, 
developing an agriculture that is "high-quality, high-output, 
and high-profit" and achieving rural industrialization will 
decide whether or not Sichuan will attain a comfortable standard 
of living by the end of this century. 
  Given the reality in rural Sichuan today, we must pay 
special 
attention to the adjustment of the mix of agricultural products. 
We must work hard to increase the output of both agricultural 
byproducts and cash crops to meet market demand and enhance 
peasants' incomes. At the same time, we must tackle farmland 
capital construction with urgency, building and maintaining 
irrigation works and practicing water and soil conservation and 
soil improvement, thus raising the productive capacity of 
agriculture. 
  The fundamental way to develop the rural economy is 
industrialization. Traditional agriculture may meet the 
peasants' basic need for food and clothing, but it cannot bring 
about a comfortable standard of living. To achieve that 
objective calls for a mighty effort to develop township and town 
enterprises. Hence our decision to give the development of 
township and town enterprises a prominent place in the economic 
development plan of the entire province, making it a strategic 
focus of the drive to revitalize the rural economy, accelerate 
economic development, and enhance the province's overall 
strength. The development of township and town enterprises 
mainly involves using agricultural resources as the base and 
utilizing what is available locally. That means taking 
agricultural byproducts such as grain and pork, which the 
province turns out in large quantities, and putting them through 
multiple processing. These days, for instance, over 60 million 
pigs are slaughtered province-wide each year, giving rise to two 
major industries, the multiple processing of pork and pigskin. 
Not only are counties and regions along the Chengdu-Chongqing 
railroad well-equipped in these trades, but even the counties in 
the hill country and mountains surrounding the basin have 
considerable development potential as well. Accordingly we have 
set a goal of more than 50 billion yuan for the increase in 
output value by township and town enterprises each year for the 
next several years. If that comes to pass, township and town 
enterprises will have an annual output value of about 250 
billion yuan by 1995, making Sichuan much stronger economically 
and bringing the achievement of a comfortable standard of living 
closer to reality. Meanwhile, by placing new demands on 
infrastructural development, the substantial development of 
township and town enterprises is bound to greatly fuel the 
development of related industries and facilitate the 
modernization of the countryside over time. 
  Not only is Sichuan a large province, but it is also a 
multi-nationality province with enormous inter-regional 
differences. Of its population of 110 million, 7 million are 
members of 55 minority nationalities. Geographically, Sichuan 
includes both impoverished hill country and primitive mountain 
areas as well as fertile plains. A mix of plains, grassland, 
plateau, hills, mountains, and big rivers gives Sichuan a 
complex geographical milieu. In terms of climate, it includes 
both subtropical areas with their distinctive four seasons and a 
frigid zone covered with snow year round. Turning to economic 
and social development, it boasts a developed region centered on 
Chengdu and Chongqing as well as minority-inhabited areas such 
as Liangshan, Ganzi, and Aba, which are relatively backward both 
economically and culturally, not to mention the old liberated 
areas, minority areas, border regions, and impoverished areas. 
Per capita annual income exceeds 400 yuan in the affluent areas 
but ranges from 200 to 300 yuan in the impoverished mountain 
areas. Take Liangshan Prefecture, for example. The outskirts of 
Xichang Shi has a high-tech corps capable of putting a satellite 
into space, yet many illiterates and semi-illiterates can be 
found around the launching center. Some areas still languish in 
the era of the matrilineal society with its slash-and-burn 
culture. In a province like Sichuan, populous, vast in size, 
home to multiple nationalities, and featuring distinct regional 
characteristics and significant disparities in the level of 
economic and social development from region to region, we cannot 
practice subjectivism or over-simplify things by trying to 
impose a uniform policy across the board as we make economic 
policies. Instead, we must liberate our thinking and truly 
proceed from reality so that our ideas are in line with the 
objective world. Only by conducting in-depth studies and clearly 
understanding the situation can we work out a plan that is right 
for each locality. 
  [QIUSHI] After obtaining a comprehensive understanding of 
the 
situation in Sichuan, how did you go about formulating a 
regional economic development strategy? 
  [Xiao Yang] Sichuan is called Sichuan because there are four 
rivers in the province. Social and economic development takes 
place along the rivers. Sichuan is actually a riverine economy. 
In building a socialist market economy, we try to exploit the 
resources of all areas fully and go all out to develop commodity 
production and commodity circulation by putting industrial 
advantage to work so as to spur social economic development. 
When we talk about regional economies, we refer to, first of 
all, the three-gorge economic region in eastern Sichuan, 
including the Chang Jiang basin downstream from Chongqing. Next 
is the Panxi economic region in southern Sichuan, specifically 
the region upstream from Chongqing all the way to Yibin. The 
third economic region is the western Sichuan economic region. 
The fourth, the minority nationality economic region, including 
Aba and Ganzi, among other places. By developing Sichuan's 
economy based on these four economic regions, we can work out a 
policy appropriate to the realities in each region and give them 
a substantial measure of balanced power so that each region can 
maintain its relative independence. The idea is to have the 
various regions develop jointly on a basis of equality and 
mutual benefit, exploiting their strengths but downplaying their 
weaknesses. By offsetting one another's weaknesses, the regions 
can promote economic development province-wide. 
  [QIUSHI] How will the various economic regions bring out 
their own strengths? 
  [Xiao Yang] Besides doing a good job in infrastructural 
construction, including energy, transportation, and 
communications, the regions must start out by furthering their 
mainstay industries by taking advantage of their existing 
strengths. Mainstay industries should be the locomotive that 
will drive the development of related industries and the 
tertiary sector. The result should be a sound industrial 
structure dominated by the mainstay industries where related 
industries and the tertiary sector also have their proper place. 
Take the three-gorge economic region of eastern Sichuan, for 
example. Centered on Chongqing, this economic region features 
such mainstay industries as metallurgy, machinery, automobile, 
petroleum, and chemical industry. Right now, Sichuan is 
dependent on finished petroleum products shipped into the 
province from outside. That will not do in the long haul. We 
must start with the oil refining industry. Ship crude oil into 
Sichuan on Chang Jiang for processing here. That way we can 
develop the province's oil refining industry and chemical raw 
materials industry. The Panxi economic region in southern 
Sichuan includes such localities as Panzihua, Luzhou, Yibin, and 
Zigong. Here the mainstay industries are metallurgy, natural 
gas, and chemical industry. The rare metals processing industry 
should also be developed. The western Sichuan economic region is 
based on Chengdu and has these mainstay industries: electronics, 
automobile, and heavy machinery and equipment. With its 
considerable strength in these industries, this economic region 
is capable of rapid development too. Given their ample reserves 
of lignite, places like Aba and Ganzi in the 
minority-nationality economic region are in a position to 
develop the coal-mining industry and coal chemical industry. By 
accelerating the exploitation of such resources as minerals, 
hydropower, electric power, Chinese medicinal materials, and 
tourism, the minority economic region should develop pasture 
land properly and improve forage grass and livestock breeds in 
order to develop livestock husbandry. Meanwhile, the development 
of the transportation system in minority areas should be 
accelerated and enterprises that handle minority trade must be 
given aid so that they are properly run and minority areas 
gradually embark on the road to prosperity. 
  [QIUSHI] How should we solve problems relating to the 
industrial structure and investment funds in order to build up 
our mainstay industries as the engine that would drive economic 
growth in all regions? 
  [Xiao Yang] If we are to grasp the opportunity and build up 
our mainstay industries, we must expand their scale, upgrade 
them, and raise their standard. Take pains to optimize the 
industrial structure and product mix. Avoid thoughtless 
investment and project duplication and really bring about an 
essentially export-oriented strategic economic pattern with a 
comprehensive infrastructure and a rational industrial 
structure. Toward that end, we must continue to deepen reform; 
transform the operating mechanism of state enterprises; 
establish and nurture an open, unified, and orderly market 
system; overhaul government functions; create and strengthen the 
macroeconomic regulatory and control system; and speed up the 
development of mainstay industries and the adjustment and 
optimization of the industrial structure. 
  The biggest problem right now is a shortage of funds. And 
there is only one way to solve it: self-accumulation and opening 
the province to the outside world across the board. As far as 
Sichuan is concerned, the strategy of all-round openness 
involves heading to the east, to the south, and to the north at 
the same time; combining the utilization of foreign capital with 
foreign trade and the development of foreign economic relations; 
and taking advantage of the opening of the coast to tap the 
international market. "Heading to the east" means taking 
advantage of the opening of the ports along the Chang Jiang to 
act in concert with the development of Pudong in Shanghai. It 
also means opening Sichuan to cities on the eastern coast 
connected to us by rail. "Heading to the north" means opening 
Sichuan to the neighboring countries via border-trade cities in 
Xinjiang. "Heading to the south" means looking for land or sea 
entry/exit points in places like Guangxi and Yunnan to expand 
our trade with Southeast Asia. We plan to introduce from abroad 
a number of projects that have a high technical content and high 
added value through the establishment of Sino-foreign joint 
ventures, Sino-foreign contractual joint ventures, and wholly 
foreign-funded enterprises. In particular, we are going after 
the creation of a large number of the "three kinds of 
enterprises that are either wholly or partially foreign-funded," 
enterprises that have a high starting point and operate on a 
large scale. We should exhaust all avenues to channel funds, 
technology, projects, and managerial experience into Sichuan for 
use in developing its economy. 
  [QIUSHI] Some people lament that Sichuan is a "bitter sea 
without bounds." They are full of gripes and have no confidence 
that Sichuan would achieve fast economic growth. How do you see 
it? 
  [Xiao Yang] Sichuan is a landlocked province more than 2,000 
kilometers from the coast or the border. As far as opening-up 
and attracting foreign capital are concerned, Sichuan is no 
doubt at a disadvantage compared to the coastal provinces. But 
we should also be aware of our own strengths. We are trying to 
put together a socialist market economy. That means we must 
first of all have a market. We are a populous province with a 
large volume of consumption, so the market potential is immense. 
Suppose per capita consumption goes up 30 yuan. That would mean 
an additional 3 billion yuan in the province, creating a market 
for ourselves as well as a forum for the open policy. In this 
sense, we should say, Sichuan has a relative edge. Provided we 
break with the traditional way of thinking and practices and end 
the isolation imposed on us by the "basic mentality," Sichuan's 
economy will be able to orient itself to the world. 
  It is not right to gripe and complain. Yet it is imperative 
that we genuinely identify the ways in which Sichuan falls 
short. To a certain extent the gap between Sichuan and the coast 
is mainly a result of our lagging behind in the formation of a 
market mechanism and the development of principal players in the 
market. What we must do at the moment is to work hard to nurture 
the market system and develop a non-state economy even as we 
search for a more rational and more effective operating 
mechanism for the state economy, go all out to transform the 
operating mechanism of large- and medium-sized state 
enterprises, and make the most of the state economy as the 
leading player in the economy. We must apply ourselves to the 
development of the urban-rural shareholding cooperative economy 
and push ahead with the "transformation, renovation, leasing, 
sale, and merger" of small- and medium-sized industrial and 
commercial state enterprises that have lost a good deal of 
money. Develop the Sichuan economy even more rapidly and close 
its gaps with the coastal provinces by deepening reform and 
opening Sichuan more and more to the outside world. 
  Apart from its economic muscle and foundation, Sichuan also 
boasts a scientific and technical army consisting of 1.4 million 
people, something no other coastal province or municipality has, 
with the exception of Shanghai. The people of Sichuan are 
hard-working and intelligent. Once their thinking is liberated 
and their intelligence and talents are fully tapped and put to 
work, they will perform many miracles. Sichuan enjoys an edge in 
resources as well. It also has a large number of backbone 
enterprises that run the gamut of the industrial line-up and 
that came of age during the three-front construction and the 15 
years of reform and opening up to the outside world, 
constituting a formidable industrial base. With all these 
advantages, Sichuan's economy will achieve another quantum leap 
provided we carry through with the party's line, principles, and 
policies firmly and unwaveringly, adhere to economic 
construction as our focus, further deepen reform and broaden the 
open policy, and vigorously create a socialist market economy. I 
am fully confident about that. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20350 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar024___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  13 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PROVINCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shanghai Plans Measures To Attract Foreign Funds </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shanghai Plans Measures To Attract Foreign Funds </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0370A Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO in Chinese 13 Feb 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0370A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Correspondent Xia Ruge (1115 0320 7041): "Who Is </F>
Being Courted? Shanghai Offers Large Projects To Attract 
Transnational Corporations"] 
  [Text] Attracting internationally renowned transnational 
corporations for completely systematic cooperation with various 
industries has become a main goal this year in Shanghai's use of 
foreign capital. 
  Persons concerned have disclosed that Shanghai will offer 
about 100 major industrial projects this year to attract more 
than $10 million in foreign capital. These offers are in the 
petrochemical, metallurgy, complete electric power plant 
equipment, telecommunications electronics, motor vehicle tires, 
computer, and ball bearing industries. These projects will be 
joint ventures or cooperative ventures with major advanced world 
business concerns and transnational corporations. They will 
include joint ventures that cut across industry lines, and 
complete industry joint ventures. They will also break new 
ground in the use of technology exchange markets, in investment 
scale, in investment methods, and in conditions for setting up 
holding companies. The goal is for one-third of the world's top 
major corporations to have an investment project in Shanghai 
within one year. 
  People in the economic sector note that the purpose of 
Shanghai's active efforts to cooperate with transnational 
corporations is formation of a high and new technology 
industrial group of substantial size so as to be able to begin 
from a high starting point in the development of its own 
products. This will enable a "new generation" of Shanghai goods 
in entirely new garb to take part in international economic 
competition. 
  Reportedly, Shanghai has some new areas, new approaches, and 
new methods for using foreign capital this year. Ten major 
projects make up Shanghai's second round of infrastructure 
building. They include a power generation project, the Number 2 
subway line, the Pudong international airfield, the 
circumferential highway around the city, and refuse treatment. 
In the attraction of foreign traders, in addition to the use of 
Sino-foreign joint ventures and cooperation, BOT and other means 
of using foreign capital are beginning to be used. Commercial 
wholesaling and retailing enterprises will set up joint ventures 
and cooperation with foreign chain stores, and will trial 
operate Sino-foreign joint venture or sole proprietorship 
foreign trade companies. They will trial operate Sino-foreign 
joint venture commercial wholesale enterprises, and means of 
production retail enterprises. They will, on a trial basis, 
operate and develop investment institutions such as various 
kinds of funds, investment trusts, and holding companies. They 
plan to draw up attractive preferential methods and 
concessionary policies to attract foreign finance and banking 
institutions, transnational corporations, and noted blocks to 
move their headquarters or regional headquarters to Shanghai. 
They plan to decontrol, on a limited basis, the renminbi 
business of foreign financial institutions. Under prevailing 
conditions, foreign financial companies will first be allowed 
issue loans to and collect deposits from foreign invested 
enterprises and those state enterprises which receive 
supplementary renminbi loans along with foreign loans. 
  Statistics show that so far Shanghai has attracted more than 
$13 billion in foreign capital, and has authorized more than 
6000 foreign investment projects. One hundred twenty-six world 
renowned transnational corporations have invested in Shanghai 
enterprises. One-third of the world's 100 largest transnational 
industrial corporations have set up shop in Shanghai. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20351 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar024___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  15 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Foreign Businessmen `Troubled' by New Tax System </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Foreign Businessmen `Troubled' by New Tax System </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0372A Hong Kong TANG TAI [CONTEMPORARY] in Chinese No 
34, 15 Jan 94 pp 34-36 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0372A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong TANG TAI [CONTEMPORARY] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by He Po-shih: "Foreign Businessmen Are Troubled by </F>
the Mainland's New Tax System"] 
  [Text] By adopting the new tax system, the Chinese 
mainland is expected to increase its tax revenues by 
approximately 30 billion yuan, but foreign businessmen who have 
made investments on the mainland are troubled by this measure. 
  In this round of reform of the tax system, under the flag of 
equitable tax burdens and the gradual achievement of tax 
equality between domestically funded and foreign-funded 
enterprises, not only have taxes on foreign-funded enterprises 
been increased, but those enterprises have also come to be 
required to pay several additional taxes. Just the new taxes on 
foreign-funded enterprises include: the land appreciation tax, 
urban maintenance and construction tax, vehicle and vessel use 
tax, securities trading tax, and consumption tax. Taxes of which 
rates have been raised or raised in disguise include value added 
tax, business tax, real estate tax, and urban land use tax. 
<H5>  Real Estate Businesses Are Faced With an Increasingly </H5>
Difficult Situation 
  Since the middle of 1993, the real estate industry cooled 
down across the mainland because of the impacts of the 
tightening of the money supply and macroeconomic regulation and 
control measures on the mainland. According to statistics of the 
Construction Ministry, in January-October 1993, for the country 
as a whole the rate of growth in the completion of investment in 
commercial buildings declined by 10 percentage points from last 
year; the rate of growth in the floor space of newly started 
buildings declined by 15 percent; sales of commercial buildings 
declined by 9.6 percentage points; and forward prices for 
buildings on the real estate market declined by approximately 20 
percent. The per mu price of land fell from 1.8 million yuan to 
200,000 yuan in some cities in southern China. Foreign 
businessmen who had invested in the real estate industry on the 
mainland were already having a very difficult time. 
  Nevertheless, the Provisional Regulations on the Land 
Appreciation Tax of the People's Republic of China which came 
into effect on 1 January 1994 levy the land appreciation tax on 
all enterprises and individuals conducting transfers of use 
rights to state land and buildings and other things affixed to 
the land and receiving incomes from the transactions, including 
domestic and foreign investors. Thus, the new tax law is 
similarly applicable to domestic and foreign real estate 
developers, investors, speculators, and ultimate customers. This 
means that developers must pay the appreciation tax before 
transferring buildings, and that when individuals buy or sell 
buildings, it is necessary to pay the appreciation tax each time 
real estate is transferred. 
  The minimum rate of the land appreciation tax is 30 percent, 
and the maximum rate is 60 percent. According to calculations, 
under the situation where the new land appreciation tax is 
levied by the mainland, a foreign businessman who has made less 
than 500,000 yuan from investing in real estate development 
would have to pay 265,500 yuan in land appreciation and 
foreign-funded enterprise income taxes, resulting in an 
effective tax rate of 53.1 percent. If the income is between 
510,000 and 1 million yuan, the effective tax rate would be 
56.45 percent; if the income is between 1.01 million and 4 
million yuan, the effective tax rate would be a high as 67.34 
percent. 
  According to Shen Yu-wen, a partner of the On Wing 
Accounting 
Firm of Hong Kong, real estate projects accounted for a large 
proportion of the over $100 billion to be invested by foreign 
businessmen under contracts signed last year. Procedures for 
real estate transfers on the mainland are laborious, and 
economic bearing capacity is limited; thus the secondary real 
estate market is immature in the first place. In addition, the 
tax system will adversely affect foreign investment on the 
mainland. Also, recently many foreign businesses have invested 
in public construction such as light railway, subway, highway, 
and bridge construction, and have thereby acquired some land as 
a compensation for the inadequate returns on their investments. 
After the implementation of the new tax system, returns on their 
land properties will decline by at least over 30 percent. After 
the imposition of the new appreciation tax, as investors must 
pay the appreciation tax before transferring buildings and have 
to the pay appreciation tax each time real property is 
transferred, and as in addition to paying the appreciation tax 
individuals also have to pay the individual income tax when 
buying or selling buildings, there will doubtless be adverse 
effects on foreign investment on the mainland. 
<H5>  Tax Increase Results in Increased Tax Burdens on Foreign </H5>
Businessmen 
  According to an informed source on the mainland, the basic 
idea directing the adoption of the new tax system in 1994 was to 
gradually increase the proportion of tax revenues to GNP and to 
raise the share of central fiscal revenues in all fiscal 
revenues through the reform of the tax system. Through the 
implementation of the new tax system, the mainland is estimated 
to increase its tax revenues by approximately 30 billion yuan 
annually. 
  In recent years the mainland has been having a fiscal 
deficit 
every year; the number of officials of all levels has swollen to 
over 30 million. Each year such items as dinners at public 
expense, expenditures on meetings and investigation missions 
abroad, and vehicle purchases at public expense would each cost 
over or nearly 100 billion yuan. The huge deficits can only made 
up through tax increases. Thus the new tax system and the reform 
of the tax system are carried out just for the purpose of 
increasing taxes; they are just the center's efforts to get more 
from tax revenues. 
  In the previous few years, in order to attract foreign 
capital, the mainland applied a preferential tax policy 
characterized by three-year reductions and four-year exemptions 
to foreign-funded enterprises. But under the new tax system, 
unifying income taxes on domestically funded and foreign-funded 
enterprises will be considered. Under the new tax system the 
turnover tax has been divided into the value added tax, 
consumption tax, and business tax, which will be applicable 
uniformly to domestically funded enterprises and foreign-funded 
enterprises; the uniform industry and commerce tax levied on 
foreign-funded enterprises will be abolished; the basic rate of 
the post-reform value added tax is proposed to be 16 percent. As 
pointed out, when the value added tax is levied on 
foreign-funded enterprises, there will be some changes in tax 
burdens. With regard to the existing uniform industry and 
commerce tax, the tax burden resulting from approximately 40 
percent of the tax items is equal to that resulting from the 
turnover tax levied on domestically funded enterprises; the 
burden resulting from approximately 30 percent of the items is 
slightly higher than that levied on domestically funded 
enterprises; and the burden resulting from nearly 30 percent of 
the tax items is slightly lower than that resulting from the 
turnover tax levied on domestically funded enterprises. 
  Furthermore, quite a few of the newly instituted taxes will 
affect foreign businessmen. For example, it is stipulated that 
foreign-funded enterprises which previously did not have to pay 
the urban maintenance and construction tax should become that 
tax's new payers, with a tax rate of 0.5-1 percent being applied 
to them. A securities trading tax will be levied on trading in 
Type B stocks, and the basic tax rate has been proposed to be 3 
percent, which will be applied to both sides of trading and 
allowed to float upward by 10 percent at the maximum. The urban 
real estate tax and vehicle- and vessel-use license tax levied 
on foreign-funded enterprises and foreign nationals will be 
abolished, and the real estate tax and vehicle and vessel use 
tax will be levied in a uniform manner. The relevant tax rates 
and tax amounts which are too low at present will be 
appropriately raised. 
  The principles on implementing the new tax system also 
stipulate that except for the uniform tax breaks provided for by 
tax laws, no tax breaks should be given to enterprises, sectors, 
or regions of any kind, including special economic zones as 
specifically pointed out. This amounts to declaring that the 
preferential tax policies which regions of the mainland have 
promised foreign businessmen when trying to attract investment 
will become legally invalid. 
<H5>  The Minimum Income Level for Payers of the Individual Income </H5>
Tax Is Too Low While the Individual Income Tax Rates Are Too High 
  A foreign employee of a foreign-funded enterprise on the 
mainland complained to me that the minimum income level for 
payers of the individual income tax was too low while the tax 
rates were too high, that furthermore the tax must be paid with 
foreign exchange, and that the situation was really not right. 
  According to a source, with regard to the effective 
deduction 
standards relating to the individual income tax under the new 
tax system, the amount of monthly deduction is proposed to be 
800 yuan on the basis of the general living expense standard on 
the mainland. With regard to individual income tax rates, 
incomes are divided into two categories, "wage and salary 
incomes," and "production and business incomes"; an 
excess-amount progressive rate of 5-45 percent will be applied 
to the former, and an excess-amount progressive rate of 5-35 
percent will be applied to the latter. The tax burden level is 
largely similar to that of the enterprise income tax. Because of 
vigorous calls made by many foreign employees, the mainland will 
make foreign nationals eligible for additional deductions after 
the imposition of the uniform individual income tax on Chinese 
and foreign nationals, and is planning to increase a foreign 
national's monthly deduction to 4,000 yuan. 
  In addition the mainland is also planning to institute an 
inheritance tax and gift tax, and will impose inheritance and 
gift taxes on overseas Chinese and people from Hong Kong and 
Macao; the relevant draft documents have been submitted to the 
State Council. 
  The consumption tax instituted under the new tax system will 
also affect foreign businessmen. As pointed out, the consumption 
tax will be applied to: some luxury, high-grade consumer goods, 
some consumer goods in the nonrenewable resource category, some 
oversupplied products which need to be restricted for a period 
of time in order to support the adjustment of the product mix, 
and products which will cause substantially less tax burdens 
after the institution of the value added tax. It is 
preliminarily planned that the consumption tax will be levied on 
20 commodities, including mainly cigarettes, alcohol, cosmetics, 
jewelry, air conditioners, refrigerators, color television sets, 
videocassette recorders, motorcycles, cars, gasoline, diesel 
fuel, and fireworks; in the future adjustment and control will 
be carried out in accordance with the demands of the state's 
macroeconomic policy and in view of changes in consumption 
structure. 
<H5>  Strengthening Mechanisms So As To Impose Severe Punishments </H5>
on Tax Evasion 
  The mainland was previously called a paradise of tax evasion 
and avoidance for foreign businesses, and the low tax rates and 
the lax tax collection system were one of the reasons why many 
foreign businesses vied with each other in making investments on 
the mainland. However, after the implementation of the new tax 
system, the situation will be greatly changed. 
  --A tax report system will be established across the 
mainland. After the establishment of the tax report system, 
economic penalties will be imposed on those who fail to report 
on schedule, and a failure to report truthfully will be 
considered an act of tax evasion and will be sternly punished in 
accordance with the law. 
  --The establishment of a system of strict tax examination. 
The main force of taxation agencies on the mainland will turn 
into being engaged in routine and priority tax examinations; a 
tax-collection and -management situation characterized by the 
combining of reporting, agent service, and examination is to be 
created, and as a supporting measure, the method of imposing 
heavy penalties on tax evasion will be used. 
  --To meet the demands of the implementation of the separate 
taxation system, two systems of tax collection agencies 
responsible for collecting central and local taxes respectively 
will be established. 
  --Except for the tax breaks provided for by tax laws, 
governments at various levels may no longer grant tax breaks, 
neither may taxation agencies, fiscal agencies, or other 
agencies. 
  --The building of the legal system governing taxation will 
be 
enhanced; efforts to complete the process of making tax laws and 
regulations will be accelerated; and a mechanism of having 
tax-related legislation, adjudication, and law enforcement be 
independent of one another and constrain one another will be 
gradually established. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20352 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar024___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Efficient Capital Market `Important' to Reform </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Efficient Capital Market `Important' to Reform </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0391A Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO in Chinese 15 Feb 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0391A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Li Yang, affiliated with the Finance and Trade </F>
Institute of the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences: 
"Establishing a Highly Efficient Capital Market Is an Important 
Component of Financial Reform"] 
  [Text] Abstract 
  --Under the traditional system, there was basically no 
capital market in our country 
  --Many of the current financial problems are just 
spontaneous 
reactions which represent market economy forces' breaking down 
the confines of the rigid financial system 
  --Vigorously developing nonbank financial institutions 
should 
be an important part of the renovation of our country's 
financial system 
  --Vigorously developing the stock market and corporate bond 
market is even more unavoidable 
  The CPC Central Committee's decision on establishing a 
socialist market economic system set the general policy of 
achieving the "sustained, rapid, and healthy" development of the 
national economy. In this respect, the necessary condition for 
the rapid development of the national economy is the maintaining 
of a high investment rate over a long period of time; meanwhile 
the sufficient condition for the healthy development of the 
national economy is that this high investment rate is supported 
by a corresponding savings rate. Only under the situation in 
which the savings rate and investment rate are kept in 
equilibrium on a constant basis, will it be possible to achieve 
the sustained development of the national economy. In short, 
balancing investment with savings is the key to implementing 
this general policy. Effectively mobilizing savings, or in other 
words establishing a highly efficient capital market, will be of 
even greater importance to China because investment demand has 
always been high in China. 
  Under the traditional system, there was basically no capital 
market in our country. Then the situation was based on a fiscal 
system characterized by unified revenue collection and 
expenditures, and savings of the entire society were 
concentrated in the hands of the government and were then 
allocated to enterprises in the form of fiscal appropriations to 
be used for investment. Such a method of fund handling could be 
said to be a special form of internal-source fund gathering. 
Since the start of reform of the economic system, with the 
adjustment of the structure of primary distribution of national 
income, the share of government savings in overall savings of 
society has gradually decreased (the amount of net government 
savings is now negative), and the shares of enterprise and 
resident savings have gradually increased. Based on such a 
savings structure, external-source fund gathering has gradually 
come to occupy a dominant position in China. According to 
statistics, external-source fund gathering accounts for 
approximately 70 percent of the sources of funds for enterprise 
investments in our country; the manifestation in the "plate" of 
state investments is that bank loans and enterprises' 
self-gathered funds have become the main sources of funds. 
Compared with the external-source fund gathering rate of 30-50 
percent in developed market-economy countries, this rate is 
rather high. 
  Because of the aforementioned changes of various kinds, 
financial policy has come to assume a leading role in our 
country's macroeconomic regulation and control system. Such a 
change manifested itself as a tendency in the early period of 
reform; after the three years of improvement and rectification, 
the change has been widely appreciated by people. But the reform 
of the financial regulation and control system in our country 
has failed to keep up with this change. The main manifestations 
are: First, we are still using the traditional means of credit 
allocation to manage finance; however, not only is it 
increasingly difficult to use such a means to control the total 
amount of credit and the total money supply in society, but the 
situation regarding the distribution and circulation of credit 
funds in the economy is also very far from conforming to the 
subjective wishes of the financial authorities. Second, we are 
still using the method used for managing credit funds to manage 
the issuance of various securities, artificially setting volume 
limits. Third, we still lack effective means of regulating the 
fund-gathering activities of various kinds carried out 
independently by enterprises outside the direct fund gathering 
carried out by the state. All this has resulted in financial 
disorder over the past few years. 
  Rectifying financial order is certainly very important; but, 
while there exist the so-called unhealthy tendencies as well as 
the inertia of the old system behind the various phenomena of 
disorder, there are also buds of financial renovation. It can 
even be said that some of the current financial problems are a 
kind of spontaneous reactions which represent market economy 
forces' breaking down the confines of the rigid financial 
system. Without an appropriate analysis of the various factors, 
not only will it be difficult for rectification to produce the 
desired results, but even the further growth of the Chinese 
economy may be hampered. As we have seen, since the start of 
economic reform, with the transformation of the system, the 
growth mechanism of the Chinese economy has undergone 
significant changes, The economic growth over the past decade 
and more has mainly stemmed from the rapid development of 
nonstate enterprises as far as economic actors are concerned, 
has been mainly due to the expansion of tertiary industry as far 
as the different industries are concerned, and has mainly 
depended on the rapid growth of coastal regions as far as 
geographical regions are concerned. Nevertheless those economic 
actors and industries do not occupy an important position in the 
state's credit plan; meanwhile the gains made by economically 
developed regions are obviously insufficient as far as their 
demands are concerned. A profound contradiction has consequently 
emerged: on the one hand economic development is to a large 
extent dependent on nonstate enterprises and tertiary industry 
as well as on the growth of coastal regions; on the other hand 
the state's official credit plan does not satisfy the needs of 
those enterprises, industries, and regions for funds. As a 
result, moving funds from state banks to nonstate-owned banks, 
nonbank financial institutions, nonstate-owned enterprises, 
tertiary industry, and economically developed regions in the 
form of "short-term financing" became an unavoidable trend. As 
the needs for funds thus created are not mainly based on the 
objective of solving liquidity problems, it is inevitable that 
"day-to-day financing" turns into "month-to-month financing," 
"quarter-to-quarter financing," and "year-to-year financing." As 
such financing is mostly outside the scope of activities 
permitted by the state, discipline violations are inevitable, 
and high prices for funds are also to be expected. The situation 
is rather similar in the area of direct fund gathering: as many 
new investment projects are unable to get fund supplies through 
regular channels, the phenomena of unauthorized fund gathering 
and of levies not approved by the regulatory authorities have 
occurred on a widespread basis. 
  If so, is it possible to use the method of "perfecting" fund 
allocation to improve the situation? We believe that the method 
is not proper and will not work. First, having the monetary 
authorities allocate funds in society is a typical 
planned-economy method, and it is logically consistent with 
plan-based overall management, unified allocation of materials, 
and unified fiscal revenue collection and fiscal expenditures; 
but those economic conditions have now basically disappeared. 
Second, successful fund allocation also requires several 
conditions regarding the financial system. Firstly, financial 
institutions should be highly unified (a situation just like 
what we experienced in the past when there was only one bank in 
the entire society); in this way there would not be the problem 
of large-scale flows of funds within the financial system. 
Secondly, actors making expenditures in society are uniform (a 
situation just like what we experienced in the past when 
state-owned enterprises constituted the dominant, largest sector 
while the government practiced unified revenue collection and 
unified expenditures with regard to them); in this way there 
would not be the phenomenon of flows of funds among different 
economic actors. Thirdly, financial products are undiversified 
(a situation just like what we experienced in the past when 
there were only simple deposits and loans across society); in 
this way there would not be the exchange of various financial 
products for one another, which would result in the problem of 
fund transfers. Fourthly, the national economy should be closed 
(a situation just like what we experienced in the past when 
one-sided emphasis was given to self-reliance); in this way 
there would not be the problem of unanticipated disruptive 
effects of increases or decreases in international reserves and 
fluctuations in exchange rates on the domestic money supply. All 
such conditions have obviously disappeared today. Without the 
necessary foundations and conditions, it is impossible to carry 
out the "perfecting" of such a system. More important, today 
when the marketization reform has been deepened significantly, 
the credit plan is not only increasingly unable to meet the 
demands of increasingly vigorous economic development, but has 
also to an ever greater extent become a huge haven for "rent 
seeking." Therefore it should be terminated as soon as possible. 
It is necessary to establish a set of mechanisms for indirectly 
regulating and controlling the money supply to replace the 
credit plan. Under such a system, the monetary authorities will 
mainly use indirect regulation and control means to regulate the 
total money supply and market interest rates; the direction of 
flow of funds in society is mainly determined by profit-oriented 
financial institutions and securities markets in accordance with 
market signals. 
  Under the new situation regarding financial regulation and 
control, establishing an efficient capital market has become an 
important task. 
  In the area of indirect fund gathering, establishing policy 
banks is surely important, but they can only resolve fund demand 
problems encountered by a few industries with bearings on state 
plans and people's lives. Transforming existing specialized 
banks is absolutely necessary. But, relying on commercial banks 
for long-term funds is not only unable to meet the needs, but 
also dangerous to some extent. This is so because commercial 
banks acquire their funds mainly from the highly fluid savings 
deposits of residents and enterprises and because their 
liabilities also constitute the main part of the money supply; 
relying on such fund sources for sustaining long-term investment 
expenditures is very prone to lead to payment crisis. This is 
the fundamental reason why the monetary authorities require 
commercial banks to keep reserves and disbursement funds in 
relation to their deposits, enforce strict requirements on the 
banks' own-capital rates, regulate the banks' asset-liability 
ratios, and impose strict restrictions on the banks' asset 
operations. In terms of the situation in market economy 
countries, the long-term funds supplied through indirect 
fund-gathering channels mainly come from nonbank financial 
institutions. The nonbank financial institutions discussed here 
mainly refer to various insurance companies, pension funds, 
trust and investment companies, common funds, savings and loan 
associations and financial companies. The common characteristic 
of those financial institutions is that they all have long-term, 
stable sources of funds. It is exactly under such a liability 
structure that they are able to play a leading role on the 
capital market. If it is said that our country's financial 
institutions are very underdeveloped, then our country's nonbank 
financial institutions are just in the beginning stage. 
Therefore, vigorously developing nonbank financial institutions 
on the basis of proceeding from the demand for the establishment 
of an efficient capital market should become a focus of the 
efforts to renovate our country's financial system. 
  In the area of direct fund gathering, the important thing is 
to vigorously develop standardized stock and corporate bond 
markets. It should be soberly realized that volume-based 
regulation of securities issuance will inevitably hamper the 
process of transforming enterprises into corporations currently 
under way. Furthermore, this is a regulatory means which 
conflicts with principles of market economics; only by 
terminating such volume restrictions would it be possible to 
achieve the healthy development of the securities market or even 
the market economy as a whole of our country. However, some 
ideas on the issue of stocks should be clarified. When being 
transformed into a corporation, an enterprise certainly has to 
convert its existing assets into a certain number of shares. 
Nevertheless, first, converting corporate assets into shares 
does not mainly mean a simultaneous increase in assets and in 
the number of shares. It is absolutely necessary to prevent the 
kind of transformation into corporations which is focused on 
expanding the investment scale, while neglecting the adjustment 
of the structure of property rights. Second, transforming 
enterprises into joint-stock companies does not necessarily mean 
that their stocks have to be listed; should they be listed, such 
listing does not necessarily mean that they have to be listed in 
securities exchanges. After the joint stock company becomes the 
main form of enterprise in our country, stocks of most 
enterprises should be traded on the over-the-counter market. 
That is, we may have to maintain a steady pace with regard to 
the listing of stocks in securities exchanges, but we should 
certainly promote the development of over-the-counter trading in 
stocks. We propose that any enterprise which meets requirements 
regarding securities issuance should be permitted to gather 
funds on the market. Artificially setting volume limits on 
securities issuance can only contribute to the expansion of 
irregular fund-gathering activities. In view of the abnormal 
situation of excessively high debt ratios of our country's 
enterprises and in view of the fact that such a situation can be 
fundamentally resolved only through transforming enterprises' 
capital structure, vigorously developing the stock market and 
the corporate bond market is unavoidable. 
  In short, it is necessary to endeavour to create a more 
relaxed, liberal, pluralistic, and competitive financial system 
through financial reform. Only on the basis of such a financial 
system will the central bank be able to assume a detached 
position and be truly capable of playing the role as the umpire. 
On the other hand, if there are only a very small number of 
financial institutions and a very small number of financial 
instruments in the economy, resulting in a situation in which 
"leadership is rendered ineffectual by recalcitrant 
subordinates," the central bank's macro-regulation and -control 
will become truly irrelevant. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20353 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar024___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  4 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> SMALL-SCALE ENTERPRISES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Yunnan Individual, Private Enterprises Increase </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Yunnan Individual, Private Enterprises Increase </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0397D Beijing ZHONGGUO WUZI BAO in Chinese 4 Mar 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0397D </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO WUZI BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] At the end of 1993, Yunnan Province had 442,300 
individual businesses, employing 646,600 people, and funds 
totaled 1.784 billion yuan, increases of 18.7 percent, 19.8 
percent, and 33.5 percent respectively over 1992. There were 
1,563 private enterprises, employing 33,900 people, and a 
registered capital of 359 million yuan, increases of 49.9 
percent, 44.7 percent and 119.1 percent respectively over 1992. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20354 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar024___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  10 November 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   Export Strategy in Response to NAFTA Outlined </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Export Strategy in Response to NAFTA Outlined </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0325B Beijing SHIJIE ZHISHI [WORLD AFFAIRS] in Chinese 
No 11, 10 Nov 93 pp 51-55 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0325B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing SHIJIE ZHISHI [WORLD AFFAIRS] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhao Shuming (6392 2562 2494) and Zhu Nongfei </F>
(2612 6593 7378) from Nanjing University's Institute of 
International Business: "Impact of North American Free Trade 
Zone on China's Economy and Countermeasures That We Should Take" 
-- First paragraph is SHIJIE ZHISHI's introduction and the 
editor responsible for this article is Fan Xinyu (5400 2450 
1342)] 
  [Excerpts] Forming regional groups for developing economy 
and trading is a new trend for the promotion of world economy 
and trading since the mid 1980's. This article analyzes the 
background in the establishment of the North American Free Trade 
Agreement (NAFTA), the current economic and trade situation 
between China and the NAFTA countries and the impact of NAFTA on 
China's economy. It also proposes a development strategy that 
China should adopt. [passage omitted] 
<H5>  II. Establishment of NAFTA and Its Impact on China's Economy </H5>
  Due to the fact that North America has always been a key 
district in which China carries out its economic and trading 
activities and makes investments, our nation has maintained fine 
relations and close contacts with the United States, Canada and 
Mexico for a long time. From Table I, we can see that the share 
of China's imports and exports in this district ranks third, 
only next to Hong Kong, Macao and Japan. Furthermore it also has 
a fairly high rate of growth. 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table I. China's Exports to World's Major Countries and Districts            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Nation or D-|Hong Kong a-|Japan       |EEC         |NAFTA       |World       | 
|istrict     |nd Macao    |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Year        |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1990        |2665006     |901103      |473045      |572038      |6209141     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|            |42.92|14.51|7.62|9.21|100| 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1991        |3213719     |1021911     |573892      |680024      |7184254     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|            |            |44.73|14.22|8.00|9.47|100| 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Source: 1991 China Statistics Yearbook                                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  However, following the signing of NAFTA, import duties are 
eliminated, quotas abolished and production costs lowered. This 
will produce a direct or indirect impact on China's economy and 
its enterprises. We can see this impact from three different 
angles: 
  A. On Sino-U.S. Trade 
  1. China's trading pattern to the United States is 
basically unilateral. From Table II, we can see that the total 
amount of China's exports to the United States has continuously 
increased in recent years. 


---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table II Share of China's Exports to the United States                    | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Year          |1989          |1990          |1991          |              | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Nation        |              |              |              |              | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|USA           |338176 (7.1) |439101 (8.3) |517946 (8.3) |615851 (8.5) | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|World         |4751584 (100)|5253809 (100)|6209141 (100)|7184254 (100/| 
|              |              |              |              |)             | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Source: 1991 Yearbook of Foreign Trade and Economic Relations             | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  The aforementioned percentage will be even greater if 
transit 
trade is also taken into consideration. Moreover, the annual 
rate of growth of China's exports to the United States exceeds 
that of China's total amount of exports. It has reached 20 
percent, 4 percent higher than the average figure. In addition, 
most of China's exports depend on the U.S. market. For example, 
the rate of dependence for the service trade reaches 20.14 
percent, that for toys 12.42 percent and that of cotton textile 
8.13 percent. However, the average tariffs among the United 
States, Canada and Mexico will drop and the volume of trade 
within the free trade zone increase after the signing of NAFTA. 
Particularly in Mexico where there are plenty of raw materials 
and minerals, NAFTA will further reduce production costs and 
help these three NAFTA nations enjoy comparative advantage 
within the free trade zone. As seen from the execution of the 
free trade agreement between the United States and Canada, which 
went into effect in 1989, the volume of trade among the United 
States, Canada and Mexico will definitely grow. Relatively 
speaking, the volume of trade outside the free trade zone is 
expected to drop. This is particularly true for the supply and 
demand of primary products. The share of Chinese products in the 
U.S., Canadian and Mexican markets is expected to decline. 
  2. The United States remains the main resource from which 
China attracts its foreign investments. Table III shows that 
except for Hong Kong, Macao and Japan, the United States ranks 
top among all other countries and districts. What is more, its 
rate of growth ranks top among all the nations, exceeding Hong 
Kong, Macao and Japan. It accounts for 13.31 percent of the 
negotiated foreign investments in China. However, after the 
signing of NAFTA, investments from any country outside the free 
trade zone in the other two NAFTA countries will enjoy the 
national treatment [of the third NAFTA country]. In addition, 
the NAFTA nations will make more direct investments in each 
other's territories. Especially Mexico needs a large amount of 
construction funds. It also shares a long boundary line with the 
United States. This will attract more U.S. factories and 
businessmen to make investments and run factories in Mexico, 
causing a shift of investments and eventually affecting China's 
attraction of foreign investments. 


---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table III. Amount of Negotiated Foreign Investments in China              | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Nation        |Hong Kong and |Japan         |U.S.          |World         | 
|              |Macao         |              |              |              | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1988          |209520 (65.61|51453 (16.11)|24198 (7.58) |319368 (100) | 
|              |)             |              |              |              | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1989          |207759 (61.24|35634 (10.50)|30122 (8.88) |339257 (100) | 
|              |)             |              |              |              | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1990          |191342 (54.87|50338 (14.44)|46403(13.31) |348771 (100) | 
|              |)             |              |              |              | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Source: Same as Table II                                                  | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  From this table, we believe that the signing of NAFTA will 
affect China's foreign trade, its attraction of foreign 
investments, its import of technology from abroad and its 
trading and investments. 
  B. On Sino-Mexican Economic Relations and Trading 
  1. As seen from the trade pattern, the main exports from 
Mexico to the United States include fish, fruits, coffee, 
petroleum, chemicals, products made of metallic materials, 
clothing, electronic parts and transport equipment. This kind of 
export mix is similar to China's export mix to the United 
States. It is mainly composed of labor-intensive products. The 
signing of NAFTA is of great disadvantage to China's exports. 
Let us take cotton textile and clothing as an example in the 
following table: 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table IV. Cotton Textile and Clothing Exported From China to World's Major C-| 
|ountries and Districts ()                                                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|            |Year        |Hong Kong   |Japan       |NAFTA       |Others      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Cotton Text-|1990        |24.92       |11.99       |15.71       |47.38       | 
|iles        |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|            |1991        |36.33       |14.67       |15.87       |33.13       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Clothing    |1990        |31.09       |18.31       |22.98       |27.62       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|            |1991        |39.05       |16.98       |19.62       |24.35       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Source: Same as Table II                                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  From this table, we can see that the share of China's cotton 
textiles and clothing exported to the North American Free Trade 
Zone is 15.87 percent and 19.62 percent respectively which are 
considerably large. After the signing of NAFTA, some of China's 
share on the North American market will be replaced by NAFTA 
nations (particularly Mexico). Moreover, it is not likely that 
China will be able to shift its export of cotton textiles and 
clothing to other markets due to limitation of the tariffs and 
the quota system. Therefore, China will face a fierce challenge. 
Furthermore, Mexico is located at the center of the North 
American market. It has maintained traditional ties with the 
United States. It is a country with a strong industrial 
foundation with which foreign investors often attain higher 
profits from their investments. As a NAFTA nation, Mexico enjoys 
preferential treatments which make its products much more 
competitive. 
  2. Due to the fact that NAFTA nations ordinarily enjoy 
national treatment in making direct investments in each other's 
territory, they may shift their investments in non-NAFTA nations 
to NAFTA nations. This is of disadvantage to China's attraction 
of foreign investments and its opening-up policy. 
  3. Because of the signing of NAFTA, various countries 
(particularly the third world nations) will make investments to 
run factories in Mexico in the hope to enter the two major 
markets in the United States and Canada through Mexico. This 
will become a strong external barrier to China's enterprises in 
entering the Mexican market and the U.S. market via Mexico. 
  C. On Sino-Canadian Economic and Trade Relations 
  Canada is the largest trade partner of the United States. 
However, Canada's exports have already reached 18 percent of the 
total volume of U.S. imports. Moreover, the average of tariff 
rate between the two countries is only 3.5 percent, while some 
of the products are already duty-free on the basis of the 
U.S.-Canadian free trade agreement which went into effect in 
1989. Therefore, it is not likely that people would favor 
Canadian products more because of the elimination or further 
reduction of tariffs. Thus, there will be little effect on any 
third nation to take action for "trade diversion." 
  On the other hand, by comparing what China exports to the 
United States with Canadian products, we can see that China's 
exports to the United States are mainly composed of clothing, 
woodwork, rubber products, shoes, porcelain and other 
labor-intensive products, while Canadian exports to the United 
States are mainly composed of auto-parts, foodstuff, raw 
materials and automobiles. The comparative earnings of the 
Canadian exports are on automobiles, auto-parts and its abundant 
natural resources. Therefore, there are not much products 
exported by China to the United States that are duplicating 
Canadian exports. Thus the impact of the NAFTA is not so sharp 
on China as far as Canada is concerned. 
<H5>  III. Development Strategy That China Should Adopt </H5>
  On the basis of the aforementioned analysis, China should 
adopt the following development strategy to promote its export 
business, trade and overseas investments in light of the 
establishment of NAFTA: 
  1. Due to the fact that the United States has always been 
China's major trade partner for a long time, China should 
continue to expand its export market in the United States, 
promote its trade whenever possible and avoid shifting its 
investments. Many people blame China's difficulties in expanding 
its exports to the United States on U.S. trade protectionism. 
This view is subjective and unfair. If we judge the situation on 
the basis of the indexes such as the average tariff rate, the 
percentage of import restrictions and the rate of market 
penetration by imports, U.S. trade protectionism is still not so 
severe among the developed countries, particularly in its trade 
with the developing nations. Although the United States 
practices trade protectionism in automobile, textile and shoe 
industries, it is quite common that some quotas have not been 
fully used up for some of the products now placed under 
protection. Meantime, the U.S. market is the largest one in the 
world. During the 1980's it has absorbed about 40 percent of the 
products turned out by developing countries, about one-fifth of 
the total exports of these countries. At the same time, we 
should carry out multilateral cooperation with U.S. 
transnational companies at different levels, and encourage such 
companies to make direct investments in China to manufacture 
products which we must produce with high marginal costs or buy 
import substitutes at all times. While letting such companies 
have access to a part of our market, we must strive to gain 
access to their U.S. sales channels and use their influence to 
increase the volume of our exports to the United States. 
  2. As seen from the situation in Canada, our enterprises 
should energetically increase their exports to Canada. According 
to statistics compiled by a department concerned, Canada has 
always had a trade surplus with China. We may try to increase 
our exports to Canada through bilateral trade talks between the 
two countries. Naturally we must also make sure that our own 
enterprises understand what the Canadian consumers need and turn 
out more products that cater to the needs of the Canadian people. 
  3. In addition to increasing our exports to the United 
States and Canada, we should also make use of our available high 
technology to make direct investments in the United States and 
Canada. We may invest in the United States and Canada to 
manufacture high-tech products and those products that are not 
so easy to copy or imitate. We may also manufacture, in Mexico, 
those products that we will be able to produce by using the 
local cheap labor such as clothing, shoes and light industrial 
products. The main objective is to acquire high technology and 
avoid tariff barriers. It is quite difficult for an investment 
enterprise to acquire high technology on the market, because 
high technology is often protected by intellectual property 
rights. By making direct investments, it is relatively easy for 
any investment enterprise to acquire such technology. Our 
experience shows that the proceeds of such investment are often 
higher than the actual investment cost. Also, direct investment 
is a more effective method to avoid paying high customs duties. 
By making direct investments in the United States and Canada, we 
will increase our ability in "market penetration." Once we gain 
a strong hold in these two countries, it will be quite easy to 
export our products to Mexico and other Latin American countries 
through the North American Free Trade Zone. Naturally the 
production costs are high in these two areas. Therefore, we must 
select high-tech industries to make our investments. 
  4. In addition, we cannot pay attention to the United States 
and Canada only. We should also realize that Mexico will become 
China's new trading partner. With the establishment of NAFTA, 
Mexico will become a place contested by the strategists from all 
the countries in the world. The entrepreneurs in China should 
seize this favorable opportunity as soon as possible to build 
their own base areas in Mexico as a springboard to enter the 
United States and Canada. Considering the actual situation among 
our enterprises and the characteristics of the North American 
Free Trade Zone, we can see that there are two types of 
enterprises which will become our main force in entering the 
North American Free Trade Zone. One type of enterprises 
comprises large and medium-sized industrial enterprises or 
enterprise groups in the manufacturing industry and the textile 
industry. After accumulating experiences and absorbing imported 
technology for the past several years, most of these enterprises 
and enterprise groups have become large in size and advanced in 
technology. However, their further development is restricted by 
the saturated domestic market and the dwindling natural 
resources. All this forces them to compete with other countries 
on the international market. Another type of enterprises 
comprises large and medium-sized enterprises in trading and 
service trades including trading companies of all kinds of 
specialties. They have been doing import and export businesses 
for a long time, and they are predominant in handling business 
transactions and making full use of their financial resources. 
If they are given preferential treatments by the government, 
they can quickly enter the United States, Mexico and Canada on a 
large scale. They may also enter Mexico in the form of joint 
ventures or cooperative enterprises, because the economies in 
China and Mexico are complementary to a greater extent, and 
there are many opportunities to cooperate with each other. 
Furthermore, Mexico does not demand very high standards for 
engineering goods. It is also comparatively flexible in 
conducting performance and quality tests. Its standards are 
similar to those of China for its export products. This will 
provide Chinese products and enterprises an excellent 
opportunity to enter the Mexican market. 
  5. When China's multinational enterprises select the 
Mexican market as a springboard to enter the U.S. and Canadian 
markets, they should pay attention to the following issues. One 
is the issue on the point of origin. In an effort to prevent any 
third country from using Mexico as a "springboard" to sell its 
goods in the United States, America has joined Mexico and Canada 
in formulating strict rules and regulations on the place of 
origin to guard against the import of such goods. As for those 
sensitive goods such as textile products, the United States may 
possibly limit their imports by imposing a certain quota. 
According to the NAFTA provisions, foreign products are duty 
free only when more than 50 percent of the production cost of 
such foreign goods are from U.S. and Canadian sources. Another 
issue is that we cannot regard the Mexican market as a 
springboard for transit trade. Nor should we concentrate all our 
efforts in transit trade only. This will prevent us from 
improving our production quality and increasing varieties. We 
should regard the Mexican market as our major market and the 
needs of the U.S. and Canadian markets as our guidance to 
manufacture our products to satisfy the needs of the consumers 
there. We should also provide better services before, during and 
after the sales. Only by doing so will it be possible for us to 
open up the U.S. and Canadian markets. 
  6. When attempts are being made to set up factories in the 
North American Free Trade Zone, the Chinese government should 
energetically support the banking industry to establish branches 
there to directly serve Chinese multinational corporations. The 
government should also provide long-term low-interest loans to 
support large- and medium-sized enterprises to make investments 
there. It must help these enterprises in various ways to 
understand the local investment climate and political geography 
as well as the local policies, laws, taxes and cultural 
background. It should promptly supply them with various business 
information and forecasts and make things convenient for the 
staff members of the multinational corporations to go abroad on 
business trips. 
  7. Regional economic integration has become a trend of world 
development. While seeking to join multilateral trade 
organizations such as the GATT, China must energetically help 
develop the regional economy or organize its own regional trade 
group. Recently some people put forward the concept of "economic 
China." This merits our attention. That is aimed at combining 
the production factors of Mainland China, Taiwan, Hong Kong and 
Macao such as the mainland's science and technology and cheap 
labor, Taiwan's financial resources and technology, and the 
experiences of Hong Kong and Macao in banking, service trade and 
market economy; reducing man-made obstacles among the three 
sectors; and enhancing mutual understanding and trust to work 
hard for the economic interests of all the Chinese and contend 
with the world's various major regional blocs. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20355 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar024___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  15 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   Strategic Tasks In Foreign Trade Adjustment </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Strategic Tasks In Foreign Trade Adjustment </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0326A Beijing GUOJI MAOYI [INTERTRADE] in Chinese No 
144, 15 Dec 93 pp 4-9 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0326A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI MAOYI [INTERTRADE] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wang Zixin (3769 1311 0341) of the Ministry of </F>
Foreign Trade and Economic Development Trade Development Office: 
"Strategic Tasks in Foreign Trade Adjustment"] 
  [Text] China is in the process of working out a new 
industrial policy to meet the needs of further opening itself to 
the outside world and building a socialist market economy. It is 
one of the four major goals of China's national industrial 
policy in the 1990's to adjust the foreign trade structure 
properly, accelerate the upgrading of the industrial structure, 
and enhance its international competitiveness. Since reform went 
under way and the open policy began, foreign trade has played an 
increasingly important strategic role in promoting economic 
growth, optimizing the industrial structure, and raising the 
quality of the economy. During the 1990's, as the Chinese 
economy accelerates its integration into the world economy and 
as China continues to take big strides toward a socialist open 
market economy, foreign trade will play an even more prominent 
strategic part in modernization. In the 1990's there will be a 
series of changes, including opportunities and challenges, in 
both the internal and external conditions in which economic 
development and foreign trade take place. Thus further adjusting 
the foreign trade structure and creating even more favorable 
conditions for economic development in order to meet the 
requirements of the new situation has become a major topic 
facing us. We believe that depending on the needs and 
possibilities, the adjustment of the foreign trade structure in 
the 1990's will involve three major strategic tasks. First, to 
take advantage of our "latecomer" status and speed up the 
transition of the mode of economic development from extensive to 
intensive, we must continue to ensure that foreign trade, 
particularly exports, expands at a fast pace and contributes 
even more to economic growth and the adjustment of the 
industrial structure. Second, we must speed up the upgrading of 
the export industries and the optimization of the export mix in 
light of the evolving trends in the global industrial structure 
and China's own capabilities. The goal is an export mix 
dominated by multiple-processed products and articles with high 
added value. Third, by accelerating the reform of the import 
system, we must set up an import regulating system that is in 
line with China's national conditions, satisfies the 
requirements of GATT, spurs the optimization of the import mix, 
and raises the proportion of imports consisting of advanced 
technology and equipment in order to bring about technological 
advances in China. At the same time, the domestic market should 
be opened systematically and selectively, an appropriate measure 
of international competition should be introduced, and the 
adjustment of the industrial structure and pattern of regional 
distribution should be brought under greater pressure so as to 
further the well-being of the people and improve the overall 
efficiency of the national economy. Below we discuss the goals 
and means of the three major strategic tasks of adjusting the 
foreign trade structure: 
<H5>  I. Increase Contribution of Foreign Trade to Economic </H5>
Growth, Industrial Structure Adjustment 
  Since reform went under way and the open policy was 
introduced, foreign trade has contributed progressively more and 
more to economic development as it experienced rapid growth, a 
trend that has been particularly striking since 1988. Dependency 
on imports and exports has increased substantially. Foreign 
demand as indicated by exports also showed signs of rising 
relative to gross social demand, as did the increase in exports 
relative to the increase in gross demand. The expansion of 
foreign demand is becoming an increasingly important force 
fueling economic growth. Rising exports contribute to economic 
growth immensely. The significant change in the standing of 
imports and exports in national economic processes symbolize the 
historic changes in the way the Chinese economy operates. 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 1. China's Foreign Trade Dependency Since 1980()                    | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Year              |Exports and Impor-|Exports           |Imports           | 
|                  |ts                |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1978              |9.9               |4.7               |5.2               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1980              |12.8              |6.0               |6.8               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1985              |24.2              |9.5               |14.7              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1988              |27.2              |12.6              |14.6              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1989              |26.0              |12.4              |13.6              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1990              |31.4              |17.0              |14.4              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1991              |35.8              |19.5              |16.3              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1992              |38.0              |19.5              |18.5              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 




------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 2. Exports as Percentage of Total Demand Structure Since 1988          | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Year                                  |Exports as Percentage of Total Social | 
|                                      |Demand                                | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1988                                  |10.48                                 | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1989                                  |11.14                                 | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1990                                  |14.44                                 | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1991                                  |16.17                                 | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1992                                  |15.75                                 | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  Judging from the practice in recent years, imports and 
exports spur economic development also in the following ways. 
First, the increase in exports has accelerated the adjustment of 
the product mix and the upgrading of products. Second, the 
increase in exports had set the stage for the realization of 
economies of scale by some enterprises, which helps widen their 
margin of profit. Third, exporting and taking part in 
international competition have pushed many enterprises at home 
to improve the quality of their products, introduce more variety 
in their product design and lineup, and lower costs, which all 
help improve the quality of Chinese enterprises and enhance 
their international competitiveness. Fourth, the growth in 
exports has put to use China's comparative advantage in capital 
goods such as manpower through participation in international 
division of labor, which helps improve our macroeconomic 
efficiency. Fifth, the multiplier effects of foreign trade have 
powerfully fueled the development of related sectors. Sixth, the 
importing of raw materials, goods, and consumer products in 
short supply in China has met the requirements of industrial and 
agricultural production as well as the daily needs of the people 
and helped ease the constraints of the bottleneck sector on 
economic development. Seventh, the importation of advanced 
technology and equipment and intermediate inputs has helped 
accelerate technological advances in China, improve the 
input-output ratio, enhance economic efficiency, speed up 
industrial upgrading, and strengthen the momentum for lasting 
economic growth. Eighth, competing imports have demonstrative 
effects and exert pressure on domestic enterprises to speed up 
their "learning, absorption, assimilation, and improvement" 
process and become more adaptable. All in all, the rapid 
development of foreign trade makes it possible for China to 
better utilize foreign markets, resources, funds, technology, 
and qualified personnel. 
  As the supply-demand conditions in the national economy 
evolve and following the resumption of China's status as a 
signatory to GATT, foreign trade will play an even more 
important role in balancing the total volume and the structure 
of the economy in the 1990's. On the one hand, when the demand 
structure goes upscale and the demand for newer and better 
consumer goods swells, the demand for capital goods and 
intermediate goods with a high technical content would intensify 
by the day. On the other hand, there are signs of deterioration 
in supply conditions, particularly the availability of 
resources. There is also extensive plant duplication in light 
industry, processing industry, and durable consumer goods 
industry. In these industries the scale is not economical and 
there is a good deal of production overcapacity, which makes it 
hard to improve product quality and raise profitability, which, 
in turn, would lead to diminished international competitiveness. 
Moreover, since the resumption of China's membership in GATT is 
irreversible, many domestic industries would be affected to 
varying extents. These factors make it even more imperative that 
China use foreign trade in the 1990's to close the gap between 
supply and demand at home and speed up industrial upgrading. And 
economic structural reform, particularly the deepening of 
foreign trade reform, will pave the way for foreign trade to 
play an important strategic role in the national economy. 
Moreover, international conditions in the 1990's more and more 
favor the drive to increase the contribution of foreign trade to 
the national economy. First of all, with the global economy and 
world trade gradually recovering in the near and medium term, 
China may face a more favorable international market in the late 
1990's. Second, the world-wide industrial structure is in the 
midst of readjustment right now, with developed nations and the 
newly industrialized countries [NIC's] hiving off traditional 
industries at an accelerated pace, which provides a favorable 
external environment for China's move to accelerate industrial 
upgrading and gradually replace light and textile industries 
with heavy industry, chemical industry, and new durable consumer 
goods industry as the leading export-oriented industries. 
  Based on the universal laws of industrialization and 
modernization worldwide and the requirements and possibilities 
of the development of foreign trade in the 1990's, we should set 
the following goals for the first strategic task of the 
adjustment of foreign trade structure in the 1990's. 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 3. A Comparison of China's Foreign Trade and GDP Growth Rates 1979-1992| 
|()                                                                          | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Year                     |Exports and Imports      |GDP                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1979                     |42.2                     |7.6                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1980                     |28.9                     |7.8                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1981                     |15.4                     |6.8                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1982                     |-5.4                     |4.5                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1983                     |4.8                      |8.5                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1984                     |22.8                     |10.2                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1985                     |30.0                     |12.9                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1986                     |6.1                      |8.5                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1987                     |11.9                     |11.1                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1988                     |24.4                     |11.2                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1989                     |8.7                      |4.3                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1990                     |3.4                      |3.9                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1991                     |17.5                     |7.7                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1992                     |22.0                     |12.8                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1979-1992                |16.0                     |8.9                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  1) Foreign trade should continue to grow faster than the 
economy by an appropriate margin. A widespread trend among 
industrializing nations as they take off economically as well as 
a major characteristic of global economic development today is 
for foreign trade to grow reasonably faster than the economy. 
Since reform began and the open policy was introduced, the 
development of China's foreign trade has basically been 
consistent with this principle. As the Chinese economy takes off 
in the 1990's, it is entirely necessary and possible to keep 
foreign trade expanding 3 to 5 percentage points ahead of GNP. 
  2) Imports should roughly equal or slightly exceed exports. 
Most NIC's ran some sort of a trade deficit during their 
economic take-off so that they had considerable foreign 
resources and technology at their disposal to accelerate 
economic development. China's medium- and long-term foreign 
trade policy in the 1990's is to achieve a rough balance between 
imports and exports, but considering the needs of modernization 
and the fact that we have a net surplus of capital projects, it 
would also be normal to run a small deficit in some years. 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 4. A Comparison of Foreign Trade and GNP Growth Rates of Some Newly In-| 
|dustrialized Countries (Regions) During Economic Take-Off ()                | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |Exports                  |GNP                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|South Korea              |27.2                     |9.9                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hong Kong                |9.1                      |8.6                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Brazil                   |9.3                      |9.0                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Indonesia                |9.6                      |7.0                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  3) The extent of participation in international division of 
labor will increase further, gradually creating an open 
resource-balancing mechanism. The fast growth of foreign trade 
inevitably implies greater involvement by China in international 
division of labor and exchange based on the principle of 
comparative advantage and opening up China economically even 
further to the outside world. As foreign trade dependency 
increases in the 1990's, the integration of the Chinese economy 
into the world economy will quicken and an open optimal 
resource-allocation and balancing mechanism will gradually come 
into existence. 


Table 5. Trade Balances of Some Newly Industrialized Countries and Regions 
(unit: in $10,000) 

Year            1950        1960        1970         1980         1983 

South Korea     -0.31       -3.11       -11.49       -47.87       17.47 

Brazil          2.49        -1.93       -1.10        -48.29       50.98 

Chile           0.36        -0.1        2.86         -4.53        10.82 

Mexico          0.12        4.24        -10.09       -41.15       128.11 

Argentina       -0.2        -1.70       0.79         -25.2        33.3 

Taiwan          -0.16       -1.33       -0.96        0.78         48.35 

Japan           -1.54       -4.36       4.36         107.12       202.76 

Singapore       -0.63       -1.96       -9.07        -42.13       -63.25 


  Source: Chinese Foreign Economic Relations and Trade 
Yearbook 1985 
  To achieve the above-mentioned objectives, the right 
macroeconomic policies and institutional safeguards are needed, 
primarily the following: 
  1) Strengthen the macroeconomic policy to manage demand. A 
high savings rate and a rising foreign trade contribution rate 
are preconditions a developing nation must meet to achieve fast 
economic growth and improve the quality of its economic 
development. As a developing nation, China too must work to keep 
savings rate and foreign trade contribution at a high rate if it 
is to accelerate economic take-off. Accordingly, it is 
imperative that macroeconomic regulation and control be 
tightened and improved and the appropriate monetary and fiscal 
policies be adopted in order to hold down gross domestic demand 
as appropriate and check inflation. To do all that is to set the 
stage for raising the accumulation level in the national economy 
and ensuring the steady long-term expansion of exports, 
basically reversing a longstanding phenomenon in which export 
growth is hampered by the boom-and-bust cycle in the domestic 
economy. 
  2) Deepen reform and gradually allow the market to play a 
basic role in resource allocation. This is an institutional 
guarantee of putting comparative advantage to the utmost use and 
obtaining the optimal comparative advantage through foreign 
trade. 
  3) Establish a foreign trade system featuring fair 
competition and deregulation that conforms with the norms of 
international trade. Instead of making the earning of foreign 
exchange their principal objective, foreign trade enterprises 
must now be profit-driven, a transition that must be effected as 
soon as possible. Over time they should be operated exclusively 
in accordance with the principle of profitability. Property 
rights relations should be sorted out and a modern enterprise 
system should be put widely in place. 
  4) Gradually create a new body of policies consistent with 
international practices that will encourage exporting and give 
the export drive all necessary support. 
<H5>  II. Accelerate Upgrading of Export Industries; Optimize </H5>
Export Mix 
  Accelerating the upgrading of the mix of export industries 
and optimizing the export mix are major conditions for improving 
the terms of trade, enhancing China's international 
competitiveness, and heightening its staying power as an 
exporter. It is also an important driving force behind better 
utilizing the changing mechanism of the international market to 
facilitate the adjustment of China's industrial structure. It is 
the second major strategic task facing China in the 1990's as it 
seeks to adjust its foreign trade structure. 
  1) The need to accelerate the upgrading of export industries 
and optimize the export mix 
  Since reform began and the open policy went under way, 
China's mix of export commodities has improved enormously. 
According to customs statistics, industrial manufactured goods 
accounted for 80 percent of all Chinese exports in 1992. At 
$19.55 billion, electrical machinery products made up 23 percent 
of all exports. The mix of countries (regions) to which Chinese 
exports are destined has been improved. There has been stable 
development in export growth using a variety of trading methods. 
The optimization of the export mix has been instrumental in 
promoting the adjustment of the mix of industries. However, we 
should also see that China's leading export industries remain 
resource-and labor-intensive industries with little multiple 
processing and limited added value. We are still a long long way 
from fully exploiting our economic and technical edge and our 
strength in elements of production. There are little differences 
between the export mix of one locality compared to the next. 
Production of export commodities takes place on a small scale 
and is fragmented, which militates against the effort to make 
exporting more profitable, diminishes the staying power of 
export growth, and encourages panic purchasing at home even at 
inflated prices and cut-throat price-slashing overseas. The 
optimization of the export mix and the adjustment of the 
industrial structure should have a mutual stimulating effect, 
but because of the above-mentioned factors, such a relationship 
has not been fully operational. The optimization of the export 
mix has done little to further the adjustment of the industrial 
structure, which it should. Although China's current export mix, 
dominated by labor-intensive products, is favored in some ways, 
it also faces grim challenges given the international climate 
today. 
  To begin with, competition among the nations world-wide will 
become more ferocious in the 1990's even as global economic 
interdependency increases. As the new-tech and high-tech 
revolution accelerates, high tech and new tech will be the 
principal theatre where nations vie for supremacy in overall 
national power. As the internationalization and 
industrialization of high-tech and new technology quicken their 
pace, the global industrial structure will undergo dizzying 
changes, with technology- and knowledge-intensive industries 
increasingly gain the upper hand in international competition, 
while the terms of trade for resource- and labor-intensive 
industries will worsen in contrast. External conditions do exist 
for the further participation by China's labor-intensive 
industries, which enjoy an edge, in international division of 
labor. At the same time, however, China's export mix, heavily 
dependent on labor-intensive products, also faces grim 
challenges. 
  Another important trend in world economic development in the 
1990's is that regional economic blocs have been taking shape at 
an accelerating pace, profoundly impacting the movement of 
commodities, capital, technology, and qualified personnel among 
nations. In Europe, a huge unified market became operative 
starting in early 1993. The United States, Canada, and Mexico 
have signed the North American Free Trade Agreement. In the 
Asian and Pacific region, economic cooperation is moving in the 
direction of institutionalization and sub-regional groups have 
proliferated. Elsewhere, too, economic cooperation associations 
of all forms and shapes are being planned or put together 
enthusiastically. To a certain extent, economic regionalization 
will stimulate economic growth and trade around the world, thus 
creating some opportunities for China. But such opportunities 
will be accompanied by protectionism and an expanded flow of 
commodities, capital, technology, and personnel among developed 
nations and developing nations within a particular regional 
bloc, which will adversely affect the development of China's 
foreign economic relations and trade. 
  Third, the adjustment of the global industrial structure 
will 
continue and international division of labor will intensify in 
the 1990's. The outward transfer of labor-intensive industries 
from developed nations and the NIC's will pick up steam. 
Meanwhile, however, member-nations of ASEAN and countries in 
South Asia, Latin America, the Commonwealth of Independent 
States, and East Europe are also in a hurry to reform and open 
up themselves to the outside world. As their international 
competitiveness improves over time, they will become tough 
competitors for China. 
  Summing up the preceding paragraphs analytically, 
traditionally it is the labor- and resource-intensive 
industries, including light industry and the textile industry, 
that have sustained the scale of China's exports. However, any 
major expansion in exports will be hard to come by if we fail to 
upgrade our industries technologically and continue to compete 
essentially on price. We can no longer afford to delay giving 
special support to and developing on a priority basis such 
technology-intensive industries as heavy industry, chemical 
industry, and instrument-making industry in which China already 
has a foundation in place and where it enjoys a dynamic 
comparative advantage. 
  2) Developing technology-intensive industries for export: 
strengths and practical feasibility 
  More than 40 years after the PRC was founded, China has 
basically put together a coherent industrial system and a 
complete scientific research system. It boasts a full line-up of 
industries, a large number of technical personnel, and a massive 
army of scientific researchers. Right now about 2 million 
scientific research personnel are engaged in research and 
development, more than anywhere else in the world, generating 
scientific research achievements in the tens of thousands each 
year. In such S&amp;T fields as aviation and space technology, 
biotechnology, genetic engineering, fiber optical 
communications, shipbuilding, iron and steel, domestic 
electrical appliance industry, and petrochemical industry, China 
matches the best in the world or is closing in on it. 
  China is also heavily favored to develop 
technology-intensive 
industries for export in that it can compete on the costs of 
elements of production. Vast in territory, China abounds with 
strategic resources like non-ferrous metals and ferrous metals, 
coal, and petroleum. It has an ample supply of inexpensive 
labor. Infrastructural facilities like water supply, 
communications, and transportation have also reached a 
substantial scale. 
  Even more important, after more than 40 years of 
construction, particularly after reform began and the open 
policy was introduced, China has greatly enhanced its production 
capability and level of technology by attracting foreign 
capital, importing advanced technology and whole plants, and 
developing industries using high and new technology. No doubt 
this has laid a solid foundation for the drive by China to push 
its exports to a higher level of technology. 
  In light of the characteristics of China's economic 
development and the trends in the development of international 
economic relations and trade, we should firmly commit ourselves 
to achieving the following as objectives of the adjustment of 
the mix of export commodities and the establishment of strategic 
industries. In the short haul, rely on the agricultural 
byproducts industry, light industry, and textile industry as the 
mainstay export industries, while concentrating on increasing 
the technical content of export commodities, improving product 
quality, and moving to the upper end of the market, forming a 
host of products with international brand-name recognition. In 
the medium term, take the electrical machinery, food, and 
chemical industries as the leading export industries and 
concentrate on developing mature technologies and whole plants 
for export in order to increase China's international 
competitiveness and elevate them to the nation's leading exports 
after five to seven years of hard work. In the long run, make 
high-tech industries and the next generation of chemical, heavy, 
and instrument-making industries our strategic export 
industries, treating them preferentially on a policy level and 
giving them all-out support to ensure that new export growth 
targets are met one after another. Everything must be done to 
make sure these industries are exporting a substantial amount of 
their output by the late 1990's, joining the ranks of China's 
key export industries. 
  3) Policies and measures to strategically adjust the mix of 
China's export commodities 
  a) The government must conduct scientific planning and 
formulate the appropriate laws. The adjustment of the export mix 
embraces a range of fields, including those in 
production--industry, scientific research, foreign trade, and 
agriculture--and circulation. No unit acting alone can draw up a 
comprehensive plan. It is proposed that comprehensive agencies 
under the State Council take the lead in initiating systems 
research in conjunction with the functional departments involved 
and drawing up an export industry strategy for each of the three 
industry clusters as presently conceived--current mainstay 
industry cluster, near-term leading industry cluster, and future 
strategic industry cluster--setting goals and outlining the 
steps to be taken at each stage and introducing them as soon as 
possible. Moreover, when the conditions exist, we should 
consider drawing up the corresponding legislation such as a 
technology import-export law, a high-tech and new technology 
industry law, and a strategic industry vitalization law, among 
others. Enlist the help of the law to spur the upgrading of 
export industries. 
  b) Expedite economic structural reform and S&amp;T reform 
vigorously and establish a mechanism that promotes the effective 
integration of trade, industry, agriculture, and technology. In 
the short run, there are two ways to integrate industry, 
agriculture, technology, and trade. One approach is to go all 
out to develop large-scale enterprise groups in the form of 
comprehensive conglomerates that combine trade, industry, and 
technology under one roof with foreign trade playing the 
dominant role. In matters of technology, these enterprises 
should go in for self-absorption, self-improvement, and 
self-development with one helping the other in an endless cycle. 
The other approach is to vigorously develop multinational 
corporations that combine industry, S&amp;T, and foreign trade 
under 
one roof, with leading industries playing the dominant role. The 
industrialization and internationalization of high-tech will be 
completed within the industrial corporations themselves. In the 
medium and long term, the problem of dissociation between 
industry and trade must be solved at its root by deepening 
economic structural reform and S&amp;T reform. 
  c) Formulate policies to single out certain industries for 
preferential treatment, thereby bolstering the optimization of 
the mix of export commodities. In preparing its industrial 
policy for the 1990's, the state must consider the overall 
industrial adjustment strategy and guide the optimization of the 
mix of export commodities. Among the major policies and measures 
are the following: 1) Fund credit support system; 2) 
import-export policy; 3) a sound tariff policy; 4) export 
drawback and other tax policies; 5) technology and qualified 
personnel development policy. 
  d) Strengthen export industrial organizations. In the 
transitional period of economic structural reform, the 
government should take administrative, legal, and, if necessary, 
administrative measures to step up intervention in export 
industrial organizations. Not only should it guide the 
rationalization of the structure of the increase in properties, 
but it must work harder to adjust the structure of existing 
properties. Enterprises in export production commonly operate on 
a small scale, which prevents them from benefiting from 
economies of scale. This and other problems must be overcome. On 
the other hand, the government must promote the rationalization 
of the distribution of export production, gradually putting 
together an export production system that takes advantage of 
each region's resource, economic, and technical strengths and 
marries specialization with cooperation. At the same time, the 
government should further the trend toward the formation of 
foreign trade enterprise groups to enhance China's 
competitiveness, forming an intelligent operational pattern 
where the regions practice division of labor even as they 
cooperate. 
  III. Decontrol Importation, Optimize Import Mix, and 
Intensify Pressure To Adjust Structure 
  The irrationality of China's import mix manifests itself 
primarily in the following ways: First, advanced technology and 
equipment, particularly software technology, account for only a 
limited share of total Chinese imports. According to statistics, 
technology imports constitute a mere 8.5 percent of all imports 
during the Seventh Five-Year Plan and only 8.2 percent in 1992. 
Second, the importing of luxury consumer goods has not been 
reined in successfully. Consumer goods and capital goods 
imported through a variety of illegal channels have been 
battering the domestic market. Third, unplanned importation and 
duplicate importation are commonplace, severely hampering 
industrial production and the adjustment of the industrial 
structure at home. Even more serious, they complicate the drive 
to increase the staying power of economic development and raise 
profitability. 
  The irrationality of the import commodity mix has its roots 
in the existing import management system, which also has given 
rise to excessive import protection, hindering the full 
exploitation of China's comparative advantage and its more 
extensive participation in international division of labor. 
Moreover, it takes away a major incentive to upgrade the 
country's industries and undermines the effort to enhance 
international competitiveness and profitability. 
  The move to gradually decontrol importation and optimize the 
import mix in the 1990's has enormous strategic significance for 
upgrading the industrial structure and would help solve some of 
the deep-seated problems in China's industrial organizations: 
low standard, small-scale operations, inefficiency, overlapping 
industrial distribution and fragmentation. First of all, by 
reforming the import management system, we can create the 
conditions for extensively importing advanced foreign technology 
that is applicable in China and increasing the efficacy of 
technological application, which would spur technological 
advances in export industries and leading industries, speed up 
the upgrading of export products, and build future industries 
with a dynamic comparative advantage that are oriented to both 
the domestic and international markets. Second, introducing into 
China an appropriate measure of international competitive 
pressure would help put an end to a pattern common to industrial 
development in China; namely, small as well as large enterprises 
seeking to have a full lineup of products; eliminate inefficient 
and backward enterprises; hasten the adjustment of the existing 
volume of assets; and maximize comparative advantage by 
furthering participation in international division of labor. The 
end result would be to optimize resource allocation and steer 
China onto the road of intensive operations, which is the way to 
high-efficiency development. Third, introducing into China an 
appropriate degree of foreign competition would also help 
dismantle local barriers within the Chinese market, weaken local 
protectionism, and advance the rationalization of the pattern of 
regional distribution and the formation of a large nationwide, 
unified market, greatly checking project overlapping, import 
overlapping, and other unsound phenomena in economic 
construction. Fourth, although basic changes in the mechanism 
for forming and adjusting the industrial structure ultimately 
depend on the creation of a new market economy, a gradual effort 
to steer China's leading industries onto the road of open 
development is also a necessary requirement for the creation of 
a highly efficient mechanism for forming and adjusting the 
industrial structure as well as an efficient way to remove 
"existing structural pitfalls" in the near term. ("Existing 
structural pitfalls" refers to the phenomenon in which the 
structure of the existing volume of properties determines the 
structure of any additional properties, making the industrial 
structure even more irrational.) It can also further 
comprehensive reform relating to the direction of the domestic 
market. 
  China has now adopted a policy of speeding up the creation 
of 
a socialist market economy. A new round of reform centered on 
public finance, banking, investment, and the management of 
public properties will lead to major changes in China's resource 
allocation mechanism. If import reform and the opening up of the 
market can be coordinated with and integrated into the new round 
of reform, we may possibly be able to eliminate the old 
industrial structure formation and adjustment mechanism and 
tentatively create a new one. If that should come to pass, 
deep-seated structural contradictions that have long plagued the 
national economy and their accompany problem of low 
profitability will largely be solved. Economic cyclical 
fluctuations, essentially a byproduct of those contradictions, 
and the resulting enormous waste of resources, will also 
correspondingly be held in check. When that happens, the 
upgrading of China's industries and the enhancement of its 
international competitiveness will be basically ensured. These 
are the objectives to strive for as we optimize the import mix 
and admit international competition into China in the 1990's. 
First, increase the proportion of advanced technology and 
equipment imports significantly to over 40 percent. Between 1978 
and 1988 machinery and equipment imports accounted for 25.68 
percent of all imports on the average. Corresponding figures for 
1989 and 1990 were 30.8 percent and 33.0 percent, respectively, 
far below the 40 percent recorded between 1950 and 1965. Second, 
take measures consistent with GATT to check the importing of 
luxury consumer goods properly. Also, take effective steps to 
firmly prohibit imports through a variety of illicit channels, 
particularly smuggling in all shapes and forms. Third, decontrol 
importation in conjunction with import reform. Introduce into 
China a proper measure of foreign competition. Create an open 
resource allocation and industrial structure adjustment 
mechanism in most of the maturing light industries and textile 
industry and a few of the chemical and heavy industries. With 
such a mechanism, these industries will more fully participate 
in international division of labor and exchange in accordance 
with the principle of comparative advantage, thereby becoming 
the first in the nation to achieve the goal of 
internationalization. Fourth, by regularizing import management 
tools, we should gradually move toward the use of tariffs, 
general exceptions, and security exceptions authorized under 
GATT to regulate imports. A new import management system where 
the national industrial policy guides importation is the basic 
solution to the problems of duplicate importation and unplanned 
importation and other irrationalities in the import mix and will 
help reconcile competition with protection and hasten the 
development of national industries. The idea is to create a 
situation in which the import mix an industrial structure foster 
each other with good results, bringing an early end to the low 
standard of industrial organizations and the structural 
inefficiency in the national economy. 
  To ensure the realization of the above objectives, we should 
pay attention to the following as we go about regularizing the 
import system and opening up the market: 
  First, accelerate import reform. Replace without delay the 
existing import control measures which have not worked too well 
with a new set of practices that are effective and consistent 
with GATT rules. The technical adjustment of import control 
methods should be completed before the conclusion of the 
negotiations on China's accession to GATT, thus paving the way 
for the resumption of China's membership in GATT and further 
improving import management. 
  Second, regularize economic tools such as tariffs and 
exchange rates. Lower the overall tariff level as appropriate to 
coincide with negotiations on the resumption of China's 
membership in GATT and the Uruguay round of talks. Moreover, 
adjust the tariff system with despatch and gradually abolish all 
sorts of illegal tariff waivers and cuts to set the stage for 
the elevation of tariffs into the principal tool of import 
regulation. Grasp the favorable opportunity to accelerate 
exchange rate reform and foreign exchange reform so that the 
current two tracks in the exchange system are merged into one as 
soon as possible and a regularized managed floating rate system 
is created. 
  Third, create a mechanism that uses the industrial policy to 
guide importation. Under the new industrial policy, the 
intelligent adjustment of the foreign trade structure (including 
the import mix) has become a major objective. The key issue now 
is organization and implementation. The industrial policy must 
be coordinated with fiscal, financial, tax, investment, and 
foreign exchange policies and carried all the way through so 
that it truly guides the optimal allocation of resources and 
ensures the rationalization of the import mix. 
  Fourth, immediately set up a security system to mitigate the 
negative effects of opening up the market. China should waste no 
time in creating an import security system in accordance with 
the anti-dumping and anti-subsidy provisions of GATT and its 
rules on dealing with a sharp increase in imports. To create 
such a system, we need to draw up anti-dumping and anti-subsidy 
regulations and safeguard provisions with despatch, set up a 
special agency to implement them, and reform and improve related 
social security policies at home. Only thus can we ensure a 
smooth transition to the adjustment of the industrial structure 
and reduce to a minimum the negative effects of opening up the 
market. 
  Fifth, turning to the strategy of opening up the market, we 
must take pains to organically combine China-initiated market 
opening with negotiated market opening, incremental opening with 
wholesale opening, and opening with protection. First open up 
those industries that are already mature and are fairly 
competitive internationally while giving fledgling industries a 
transitional period. This is the only way to avoid the excessive 
social costs that may be incurred when the market is opened 
improperly and to ensure that some potential industries will not 
be deprived of a chance to survive and develop because the 
external impact has been too strong, even as we admit foreign 
competition into China and effectively accelerate the upgrading 
of the industries and the adjustment of the industrial structure. 
  It needs to be emphasized that it is an extremely complex 
task to stimulate the adjustment of the industrial structure by 
decontrolling importation as appropriate and introducing foreign 
competition. There is a need to incorporate it into the overall 
planning for reform, opening, and modernization in the interest 
of design cohesiveness and push ahead with it in tandem with 
others. 
  To sum up, the three strategic tasks central to the 
intelligent adjustment of the foreign trade structure are one 
major issue that must be tackled as part of the national 
industrial policy and national economic development. They can be 
realized over time only through the efforts of every sector 
under the centralized direction of the state. In conjunction 
with other comprehensive agencies concerned, agencies in charge 
of foreign economic relations and trade should waste no time in 
formulating a foreign trade policy for each particular industry 
to serve as a basis for solving the major issue. Cooperating 
actively with other departments, they should also aggressively 
ensure the implementation of the national industrial policy, 
particularly the foreign trade policy for each specific 
industry, so that foreign trade develops faster and better and 
contributes even more to modernization. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20356 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar024___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  21 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reasons for Contracted Foreign Capital Not Arriving </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reasons for Contracted Foreign Capital Not Arriving </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0325A Beijing GUOJI SHANGBAO in Chinese 21 Jan 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0325A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI SHANGBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhou Maosheng (0719 5399 3932): "Carefully Guard </F>
Against `White IOU Slips' From Foreign Investors"] 
  [Text] In recent years, China has opened its doors wider to 
the outside world, vigorously developed its export-oriented 
economy and actively attracted foreign investments. This has 
brought about rapid development of the Sino-foreign joint 
ventures and cooperative and wholly foreign-funded enterprises, 
and instilled vitality into its economy. However, a considerably 
amount of funds from foreign investors have not arrived on time. 
Some foreign businessmen have not contributed all their 
investments and repeatedly delayed their payments, while others 
have refused to pay. This has left some of the joint ventures 
with signboards of joint ventures only. 
  In late 1992, a department concerned in a certain city 
conducted a survey on how much foreign investors were paying 
toward their share of their registered capital. Among the 52 
enterprises surveyed, their foreign investors owed a total of 
US$9.2 million, accounting for 70.9 percent of the total 
investment. Five of the wholly foreign-funded enterprises owed 
as much as 83.9 percent of their registered capital. One 
enterprise with foreign investment has gone into operation for 
more than two years, but the foreign investor has not paid 
anything yet. Right now, only 14 of the 52 enterprises have 
subscribed their capital, accounting for 26.9 percent of the 
total number of enterprises surveyed. In addition, there are a 
dozen or more enterprises with foreign investors with problems. 
Some of them have already stopped production (closed) and made 
preparations to nullify their registration, while others have 
ceased to exist except in name. 
  There are many reasons for the issuance of "white IOU slips" 
from foreign investors. In order to fulfill the targets in the 
development of Sino-foreign joint ventures and cooperative and 
wholly foreign-funded enterprises and score "political 
achievements" in attracting foreign investments, some districts, 
departments and enterprises have vied with one another in making 
joint investments with foreign investors. They are eager to 
attract foreign funds. They are so hungry that they are not 
choosy about their food. They blindly start operation without 
carefully checking the credentials of their foreign partners. At 
times, the Chinese side of some joint ventures only outwardly 
signed the agreement of joint operation with foreign businessmen 
in order to put on the joint venture "red cap" and enjoy the 
preferential treatment given by the state policy to any 
enterprise with foreign investment, while some foreign 
businessmen are making use of the eagerness of the Chinese side 
to develop joint ventures and availing themselves the loopholes 
in the management to run "fake joint ventures." As a result, 
this has made the Chinese side of the joint venture suffer and 
lose money. 
  In order to put an end or reduce the number of "white IOU 
slips" from foreign businessmen, it is necessary to further 
improve the investment climate. In addition, I believe that the 
following measures should be adopted: 
  1. In screening and approving any application from any 
enterprise with foreign investment, the department concerned 
must strictly check and verify the reputation of the foreign 
businessman. 
  2. In the course of forming the joint venture, the Chinese 
side should, first of all, ascertain the foreign investor's 
ability in fulfilling the contract and his reputation in doing 
business first; and stipulate clearly in the contract the time 
limit for him to subscribe the capital and his responsibility 
for delaying payments or breaching the contract. 
  3. In dealing with those enterprises which have not been 
paying for their investment contributions on time, it is 
necessary to send a "notice of overdue payment for registered 
capital" to foreign investors via mail, FAX or telephone to urge 
them to make payments before the deadline. 
  4. It is necessary to strictly implement the "Regulations on 
Capital Subscription for Sino-Foreign Joint Ventures," 
strengthen check-ups on how foreign investors are making 
financial contributions to their joint ventures, and place them 
under strict control. It is essential to nullify, according to 
law, the registration of those enterprises with foreign 
investments which have not subscribed their capital for a long 
time, although they have been repeatedly reminded of their 
overdue payments. 
  The establishment of the Sino-foreign joint ventures and 
cooperative and wholly foreign-funded enterprises is something 
inevitable in history. We should strive to become more matured 
and smarter in the course of dealing with foreign businessmen, 
and help enterprises with foreign investments further develop 
themselves in a healthy way. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20357 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar024___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  28 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Guizhou 1993 Meat Output </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Guizhou 1993 Meat Output </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0397G Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO in Chinese 28 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0397G </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] Gross output of meat in Guizhou Province in 1993 
was 888,900 tons, a 3.39 percent increase over 1992. Egg output 
was 50,000 tons, a 4.3 percent increase over 1992. At present, 
Guizhou has over 300 feed processing plants and 33,000 people 
engaged in veterinary services. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20358 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar024___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  9 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Heilongjiang Bank Loans Used To Repay Beet Farmers </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Heilongjiang Bank Loans Used To Repay Beet Farmers </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0397E Harbin HEILONGJIANG RIBAO in Chinese 9 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0397E </F>
<F P=104>  Harbin HEILONGJIANG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] The Heilongjiang Industrial and Commercial Bank 
has allocated 80 million yuan in loans to sugar mills to repay 
farmers for beets purchased in 1993. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20359 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar024___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  24 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Heilongjiang Reports Soybean Prices </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Heilongjiang Reports Soybean Prices </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0344M Harbin HEILONGJIANG JINGJI BAO in Chinese 24 Feb 
94 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0344M </F>
<F P=104>  Harbin HEILONGJIANG JINGJI BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] Prior to the Spring Festival soybean prices 
remained stable at 1700 yuan per ton, but prices are expected to 
increase. Compared to last year export prices have increased 
250 yuan per ton because the state procurement price increased 
more than 10 fen, and domestic and international demand has 
increased. The forward price for April and May is 2300 yuan per 
ton. Because demand for red bean exports has increased, and 
output has declined in some areas due to natural disasters, the 
price has risen to 5400-5600 yuan per ton. The price of mung 
beans has remained stable, at present it is 2800 yuan per ton. 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20360 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpcar024___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  22 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hunan 1993, 1996 Cotton Area </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hunan 1993, 1996 Cotton Area </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0344W Changsha HUNAN RIBAO in Chinese 22 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0344W </F>
<F P=104>  Changsha HUNAN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] In 1993 the cotton area in Hunan Province was 
2,580,900 mu, the per mu yield was 81.6 kilograms, and gross 
output 210,700 tons. In 1996 the planned cotton area is 7 
million mu, the per mu yield 75 kilograms, and gross output 
525,000 tons. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20361 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar024___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  22 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hunan, Heilongjiang 1993 Farmer Income </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hunan, Heilongjiang 1993 Farmer Income </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Hunan Farmer Income </H4>

<F P=102> 94CE0344V Changsha HUNAN RIBAO in Chinese 22 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0344V </F>
<F P=104>  Changsha HUNAN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] In 1993 per capita net income of farmers in 
Hunan Province was 851 yuan, an increase of 112 yuan, or 15.2 
percent over 1992. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20362 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar024___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  16 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hunan, Heilongjiang 1993 Farmer Income </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hunan, Heilongjiang 1993 Farmer Income </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Heilongjiang Farmer Income </H4>

<F P=102> 94CE0397I Harbin HEILONGJIANG RIBAO in Chinese 16 Mar 94 p 6 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0397I </F>
<F P=104>  Harbin HEILONGJIANG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] In 1993 per capita net income of farmers in 
Heilongjiang Province was 1028 yuan. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20363 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar024___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  14 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning Sets Goals for Agricultural Outputs </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Liaoning Sets Goals for Agricultural Outputs </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0397B Shenyang LIAONING RIBAO in Chinese 14 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0397B </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang LIAONING RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] Liaoning has set the following agricultural 
goals for 1994: grain output 15 million tons; cotton 
40,000-50,000 tons; oil crops 260,000 tons; beets 550,000 tons; 
flue-cured tobacco 40,000 tons; vegetables 10 million tons, the 
vegetable area 700,000 mu; and fruit 2,300,000 tons. The per 
capita net income of farmers will reach 1300 yuan. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20364 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar024___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  22 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning Cotton Procurement </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Liaoning Cotton Procurement </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0344N Shenyang LIAONING JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 22 Feb 
94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0344N </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang LIAONING JINGJI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] In 1993 the cotton area in Liaoning Province was 
530,000 mu, and the average per mu yield was 55 kilograms, an 
increase of 30.7 kilograms over 1992. 
  As of 22 February national cotton procurement totaled 45 
million dan, a decrease of 22,350,000 dan from the same period 
in 1993. As of 22 February Liaoning had procured 200,000 dan, a 
decrease of 225,000 dan from the same period in 1993. 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20365 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpcar024___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  9 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Zhejiang, Guangdong Procurement Price for Rice </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Zhejiang, Guangdong Procurement Price for Rice </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Zhejiang Procurement Price </H4>

<F P=102> 94CE0397F Hangzhou ZHEJIANG RIBAO in Chinese 9 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0397F </F>
<F P=104>  Hangzhou ZHEJIANG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] The procurement price for early rice in Zhejiang 
Province will be 42 yuan per 50 kilograms with an added price of 
3.74 yuan. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20366 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar024___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  29 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Zhejiang, Guangdong Procurement Price for Rice </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Zhejiang, Guangdong Procurement Price for Rice </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Guangdong Procurement Price </H4>

<F P=102> 94CE0397H Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO in Chinese 29 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0397H </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] The procurement guaranteed price for rice in 
Guangdong Province has increased from 35 yuan per dan in 1993 to 
70 yuan. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20367 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar024___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SOCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Obstacles' to Effective Procuratorate Work </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Obstacles' to Effective Procuratorate Work </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0232B Beijing LIAOWANG [OUTLOOK] in Chinese No 5, 31 Jan 
94 pp 24-25 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0232B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing LIAOWANG [OUTLOOK] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Gao Jianyuan (7559 1696 0337): "Procuratorial </F>
Work: Guarantee for Just and Fair Law Enforcement"] 
  [Excerpt] The following are presently some of the major 
difficulties and obstacles that are still commonly encountered 
in the investigative work of procuratorial organs: 
  Ineffective measures of legal supervision. 
Legislation on legal supervision is still not sufficiently 
developed in China, and further explicit clarifications are 
required as to procedure, methods, and the effects of legal 
supervision. For instance, the procuratorial organs find it very 
difficult to straighten out problems in cases involving human 
relations, cases of favoritism, and imposition of fines instead 
of criminal punishment. The procuratorial organs merely 
investigate and give approval for arrest, but do not supervise 
the execution of the arrest, so that the execution of the arrest 
order will not be subject to effective supervision. In the 
supervision of trials, procuratorial organs have no means of 
supervising cases which have been referred back for further 
investigation. For instance, in 1992, in the case of 85 percent 
of the appeals filed by the procuratorate of Jilin Province, the 
law courts did not convene any sessions to hear the cases. There 
do not exist, therefore, even the preconditions for 
procuratorial organs conducting legal supervision of cases of 
the second instance. In cases of reduction of sentences or 
release on parole, the procuratorial organs can also only 
conduct supervision after the fact. A supervisory system for the 
review of death sentences has not yet been established. 
Obstacles are also great in the case of crimes that are to be 
prosecuted only on the petition of the injured party, also in 
civil litigation, and in administrative proceedings. All these 
facts adversely affect the conduct of legal supervision by the 
procuratorial organs. 
  In some places the leadership as well as the judicial 
organs have confused ideas about the functions and intentions of 
legal supervision by the procuratorial organs. In some 
places the leadership regards the procuratorial organs merely as 
departments that initiates cases or as administrative 
departments of the government. The position and functions of the 
procuratorial organs is not yet fully understood, with the 
result that the procuratorial organs cannot fully exercise their 
functions. 
  Serious insufficiency of funds budgeted for the 
prosecution of cases. The insufficiency of funds has all 
along been an old problem that has never been adequately 
resolved. In recent years, the problem of insufficient funds for 
the prosecution of cases has become even more acute. Many big 
cases could not be investigated because of a shortage of funds. 
When initiating cases, the basic level procuratorates will 
generally adopt the method of recovering procedural expenses 
from out of the confiscated money or materials of the case in 
question, or will obtain funds from the unit that initiated the 
case in the first place. Although the superior procuratorates 
repeatedly tried to stop this procedure, it could not be 
completely eradicated and has resulted in certain negative 
consequences. 
  Besides these difficulties, much resistance is 
encountered by the procuratorial organs in the prosecution of 
cases of graft and bribery, especially when leading cadres are 
involved. In some places, party and government leaderships 
are not sufficiently aware of the dangerous and serious nature 
of such economic crimes as graft and bribery. There is anxiety 
that prosecution of such cases could jeopardize the key 
undertaking of economic construction; action is therefore held 
up. Some places have gone even so far as to decree that 
such-and-such must not be investigated and such-and-such must 
not be reported. Some leading cadres are themselves not clean 
and afraid that they themselves may be found out if these cases 
of graft and bribery are investigated. They will therefore use 
manpower, finance, and material power to make things difficult 
for the procuratorial organs, and as a consequence some cases 
cannot be dealt with justly and fairly. 
  Then there is also local protectionism that seriously 
and adversely affects prosecution of cases according to 
law. In a small number of places, party and government 
leaderships, out of considerations for the interests of their 
local department or local district, ignore party discipline and 
state law. They use their power to suppress the law, they make 
their word, rather than the law, count as decisive, and they 
interfere in the investigation of particular cases that are 
being pursued by the procuratorial organs. In criminal cases 
involving so-called "able persons [neng ren 5174 0086]," who in 
some way have made contributions to the local economy, the local 
party and government leaderships are afraid that bringing down 
these "able persons" will cause the enterprises concerned to 
collapse. They fear that this would then also adversely affect 
the economic development of the local district, and for this 
reason they will obstruct prosecution of such cases. 
  In yet another type of situation, the units will not 
report criminal cases that might have occurred in their units, 
but will dispose of such cases by somehow "absorbing" them 
themselves. Their various anxieties are: First, they fear 
that confiscated money will have to be turned over and will not 
be returned to them. Some units, especially those that are badly 
off economically, will rather deal with such cases themselves, 
because they fear after they transfer the cases to the 
procuratorial organs, the confiscated money will not be promptly 
returned to them. Second, they fear that the case may adversely 
affect their reputation. Third, they fear that they will be 
"rejected by one negative vote [yi piao fou jue 0001 4384 0694 
0414]." In some places, the system has willfully expanded the 
scope of the "rejection by one negative vote" responsibility 
system. Regardless of how well the unit may be doing with regard 
to all other norms, if there happens only one security, 
criminal, or other case, each one will result in "rejection by 
one negative vote," when even welfare items accrued to cadres, 
staff, and workers will be cancelled. As soon as that kind of a 
problem arises in a unit, they will therefore always raise 
obstructions in every way possible and settle the matter in some 
other, perfunctory way. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20368 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar024___94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-024 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  24 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Trade Imbalance With Japan Evaluated </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Trade Imbalance With Japan Evaluated </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0328A Hong Kong CHING-CHI TAO-PAO [ECONOMIC REPORTER] in 
Chinese No 2355, 24 Jan 94 pp 33-34 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0328A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong CHING-CHI TAO-PAO [ECONOMIC REPORTER] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Tsao Hsiao-heng (2580 1420 5899): "Taiwan's </F>
Trade Deficit With Japan Hits Another Record High"] 
  [Text] Measures Are Available, But Strength Is 
Lacking To Remedy the Situation 
  Taiwan's trade deficit with Japan has been a longstanding 
problem. The annual deficit was roughly between $2.1 and 3.7 
billion for the first seven years of the 1980's, but has soared 
dramatically since 1987. It rose from $4.862 billion in 1987 to 
$9.7 billion in 1991. The figure nearly doubled in five years, 
averaging a 39.8 percent increase annually. Calculated on the 
basis of the 1991 figure, which was already high, the 1992 
deficit surged further by more than 24 percent. As for 1993, 
Taiwan's trade deficit with Japan for the first 11 months 
already totaled $12.9 billion. An estimate made by Taiwan's 
"Board of Foreign Trade" puts the whole year's deficit at $14 
billion, which is a new record high, standing 8.5 percent above 
the $12.9 billion deficit registered in 1992. 
  Over the past few years, the Taiwan authorities have left no 
stone unturned to solve the trade deficit with Japan. To explore 
new markets, Taiwan's "Ministry of Economic Affairs" formed a 
"Commission for Reduction of the Trade Deficit With Japan" in 
early 1993. Since then, several Taiwan commodity sales 
exhibitions have been held in Japan, and delegations have been 
sent there for sales promotion purposes. Other actions taken 
include establishing the Taiwan Trade Center and the Joint 
After-Sale Service Center in Japan, requesting Japanese 
manufacturers in Taiwan to sell their products back to their 
home country, diversifying sources of imports, and removing 
trade barriers. With respect to industrial structural 
adjustment, the Taiwan authorities have adopted seven measures, 
namely, assisting industries in raising their product quality, 
helping improve industrial designs, strengthening the 
central-and-satellite-plant system, beefing up quality control 
and inspection, encouraging manufacturers to develop their own 
technology and make key parts and components independently, 
actively introducing advanced technology from abroad, and 
promoting investment. In implementing the above measures, the 
"Industrial Development Bureau of the Ministry of Economic 
Affairs" in Taiwan has, among other things, energetically 
promoted the production of 66 key products, parts, and 
components to ensure the independence of the island's industry 
and free it from Japan's control in a bid to radically solve the 
trade deficit problem. The results are not so effective, however. 
  What is noteworthy is the relations of trade between Taiwan 
on the one hand and Japan, the United States, and the Chinese 
mainland on the other. Generally speaking, in the mid-1980's, 
Taiwan's trade deficit with Japan was offset by its trade 
surplus with the United States. When the trade deficit with 
Japan increased, the trade surplus with the United States 
generally went up; that is, they changed directly with each 
other. In those years, Taiwan's exports to the United States 
rose with its increased imports from Japan. After 1987, Taiwan's 
trade deficit with Japan continued to climb each year, but its 
trade surplus with the United States kept declining, except for 
a slight pickup in 1989. In 1993, Taiwan's trade deficit with 
Japan continued to surge sharply while there was only a slight 
upturn in its trade with the United States. In contrast, 
Taiwan's direct trade with Hong Kong and indirect trade with the 
mainland both shot up considerably. In 1992 the total of these 
two trade sectors reached $17.2 billion, accounting for over 12 
percent of Taiwan's external trade. The trade surplus with Hong 
Kong and the mainland that year totaled $13.6 billion, way above 
the $7.8 billion surplus with the United States. As of the end 
of November 1993, Taiwan's trade surplus with Hong Kong and the 
mainland already reached $15 billion, up 23.9 percent over the 
corresponding period of the preceding year. That was roughly 2.5 
times the $6.3 billion surplus registered with the United States 
for January-November 1993. It is estimated that the 1993 trade 
surplus with Hong Kong and the mainland will exceed $16.5 
billion. As can be seen, Taiwan's trade surplus with Hong Kong 
and the mainland in the 1990's has been approximately equivalent 
to its trade deficit with Japan, playing a key role in 
maintaining Taiwan's overall trade balance. 
<H5>  The State of Over-Reliance on Japan Cannot Be Changed Shortly </H5>
  Economic and trade relations between Taiwan and Japan are 
centered on vertical international division of labor. Japan is 
moving overseas its industries and enterprises with decreasing 
comparative profits, whereas Taiwan's economic and other 
conditions are suited to the acceptance of such Japanese 
industries and technologies. This has resulted in Taiwan's 
sizable trade deficit with Japan and the relatively large amount 
of Japanese investment on the island. 
  From 1952 to December 1991, Japan's direct investment in 
Taiwan was $4.2 billion, accounting for 32.7 percent of the 
direct investment the island received from overseas. During this 
period, Japan made 2,181 technology transfers to Taiwan, or 60.4 
percent of the technology transfers Taiwan received from 
abroad--an indication of Taiwan's heavy reliance on Japanese 
technology. After the third post-war surge in its overseas 
investment in the mid-1980's, however, the share of Japan's 
investment in Taiwan in its total overseas investment has been 
declining. In 1985, Japan's investment in Taiwan accounted for 
1.19 percent of its direct overseas investment, which totaled 
$12.2 billion. In 1989, its direct overseas investment surged to 
$67.5 billion, while only 0.95 percent of this amount was 
invested in Taiwan. In other words, while its overseas 
investment expanded 5.5 times, the share of its investment in 
Taiwan dropped 20 percent. The first half of 1993 saw only 29 
new Japanese investment projects in Taiwan, with a 60 percent 
drop in the total investment amount compared with the record 
registered a year ago. Technological cooperation projects 
numbered only 39, down by 20 percent from the 1992 record. As 
can be seen, the Taiwan authorities' policy of absorbing 
Japanese technology to upgrade the island's industry has not 
produced any appreciable results. 
  On the surface, Japan's investment and technological 
cooperation projects have enabled Taiwan manufacturers to 
purchase more raw materials, spare parts, machinery, and 
equipment from Japan. Moreover, while Taiwan is changing its 
economic mode, high-tech enterprises on the island have to rely 
more on Japan for the supply of parts and components for making 
high-tech products. On the other hand, most of the export 
products made with Japanese technology, materials, parts, and 
components are not sold back to Japan, but are destined for 
European and American countries. This is why Taiwan's trade 
deficit with Japan has become greater each year. 
  A radical analysis reveals that the development and 
structure 
of economic and trade relations between Taiwan and Japan are 
principally subject to the following factors: 
  Firstly, as far as Taiwan's economic and industrial 
structures are concerned, small and medium-sized enterprises are 
the main producers of export products. Many of them are 
original-equipment manufacturers (OEM) for big Japanese 
companies, which manipulate their raw material supply and sales 
channels. Under such circumstances, these small and medium-sized 
enterprises can hardly free themselves from the Japanese 
companies' control. Given the current technological and 
industrial conditions in Taiwan, there are two reasons for 
Taiwanese manufacturers to choose Japan instead of any other 
country for their OEM operation: Either the Japanese products 
are of good quality or they are more competitive in price. It 
may be said that Taiwan-Japan economic and trade relations are 
founded on the comparative advantage of international division 
of labor necessitated by industrial development. Such relations 
can give some benefits to both sides within a certain period of 
time. 
  Secondly, the Japanese market is of a closed nature, which 
is 
seldom seen in Western economic systems. Its quality and 
specification requirements and the inspection system are almost 
overcritical, and its marketing process and practice are highly 
intricate. Certainly, without a thorough knowledge of the 
Japanese market and a sufficient strength, it will be difficult 
to enter into that market. What is more, most of the Japanese 
companies doing business or making investment in Taiwan are 
aimed at exploiting the local market or using Taiwan as a place 
to manufacture or process their products to be sold to the 
United States. They are different from those American investment 
projects in Taiwan whose products are by and large sold back to 
the United States. Such being the case, it is, of course, 
inevitable for a double imbalance to exist between the two 
countries--Taiwan suffers a trade deficit with Japan, and 
Japan's investment in Taiwan far exceeds Taiwan's investment in 
that country. 
  Thirdly, in the field of science and technology, Taiwan's 
research and development are still at a relatively low level and 
cannot form a foundation for upgrading its industry. As Taiwan 
has been inclined to follow Japan's example in every aspect of 
its post-war economic development, it still relies on technology 
imports from Japan even today. Taiwan manufacturers import from 
Japan a sizable portion of their raw materials, parts, 
components, machinery, and equipment for making products to be 
exported. Take the electronics industry as an example. Taiwan's 
export of electronics amounted to some $18 billion in 1991, 
ranking the sixth in the world. However, it should be noted that 
Taiwan's electronics design and manufacturing capabilities are 
still rather inadequate despite its 30 years of development 
efforts and the decision made in 1982 by the authorities to 
designate the electronics industry as a "strategic industry." Of 
the parts and components required by the electronics industry, 
only a fraction is made domestically. For the industry's 
downstream sector, over 80 percent of the parts and components 
have to be imported, especially from Japan. As a striking 
example, over 90 percent of Taiwan's requirement for integrated 
circuits--an essential component for information electronics--is 
met by imports. 
  Taiwan's economic development is not accompanied by the 
optimization of the entire economy, nor is it a process 
associated with a gradual progress in science and technology. 
Instead, it is a quantitatively expanding profit-making process 
through continuous absorption, but not digestion, of foreign 
technology and capital to make products for export. This process 
has resulted in the present pattern of economic and trade 
relations between Taiwan and Japan. 
<H5>  Despite the Environmental Change, the Prospect Is Not </H5>
Optimistic 
  Taiwan's industry is in the course of upgrading. Industrial 
upgrading and product updating will certainly boost the demands 
for new technology, equipment, parts, and components. In recent 
years, over 80 percent of Taiwan's imports from Japan are 
machinery, equipment, and various parts and components. Such 
imports are prerequisites for Taiwan's survival and development. 
Meanwhile, Taiwan has adopted the following measures to improve 
its economic and trade relations with Japan: 1) exploring 
markets in Japan for Taiwanese goods so as to cut trade deficit; 
2) adjusting industrial structure to reduce reliance on Japan; 
and 3) improving the status of export-processing zones, 
diversifying markets, and exploring new sources of technology 
and equipment through "liberalization and internationalization" 
measures. 
  Development of Taiwan-Japan economic and trade relations are 
affected by the following external factors: 
  In the first place, it is affected by the slowdown of 
economic growth of Western developed countries. According to 
forecast by international organizations and research institutes, 
the economic growth rates of the seven major Western developed 
countries for the 1990's will be lower than the 1980's. During 
the late 1980's and the early 1990's, Japan's economic situation 
is that following a 4.6 percent growth rate in 1988, a rather 
quick growth was scored in 1990, pushing the growth rate to 5.2 
percent. In 1991, however, the economic growth rate fell to 3.3 
percent. Following that, the growth rate is expected to remain 
at a level below 4 percent, as forecast by most people. This 
provides a favorable condition for Taiwan to import Japan's 
technology and equipment to meet its industrial-upgrading 
requirements. But the negative effect is that Taiwan will 
encounter hard-to-overcome obstacles in exploring markets in 
Japan. 
  Secondly, the acceleration of global economic 
regionalization 
will also have some impact on Taiwan-Japan economic and trade 
relations. Progress in building a Single European Market and the 
signing of the North American Free Trade Agreement have made it 
a general trend of the times that countries of the central 
Pacific-Asia region want to cooperate in checking and balancing 
the control and blockade imposed upon them by European and 
American countries. For this reason, both Taiwan and Japan have 
deliberately strengthened their ties, adjusted their bilateral 
relations, made a number of proposals, and sent delegations to 
visit each other from time to time in a bid to reinforce and 
improve their economic and trade relations. 
  In addition, the 1990's will witness the acceleration of 
science and technology advance in the world. Accordingly, the 
international diffusion of technology will also become faster. 
Based on its relatively large foreign exchange reserve and 
fairly sound economic and technological foundation, Taiwan will 
speed up the absorption of advanced technology from abroad. It 
will become a major potential recipient that Japan will consider 
for further accelerating nonsophisticated technology transfers 
in the Pacific-Asia region. 
  From the above it follows that before Taiwan completes its 
industrial upgrading, there will be no radical change in its 
unfavorable trade balance with Japan. Because of its limited 
market capacity, however, Taiwan's trade deficit with Japan will 
slide down slowly after attaining a certain level. What is worth 
mentioning is that the two sides of the Taiwan Straits, with 
their increasing contacts, will enter a new phase of economic 
and trade relations in the late 1990's. Escalation of their 
economic cooperation will assist Taiwan in upgrading its 
industry, thereby reducing its reliance on Japan. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20369 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  7 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Analysis of 1994 Integrated Circuit Market </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Analysis of 1994 Integrated Circuit Market </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0360A Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 28 Feb, 7 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0360A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article in two installments: "Analysis of 1994 Chinese </F>
Integrated Circuit Market"] 
<H5>  [28 Feb 94 p 7] </H5>
  [Text] According to information provided by the relevant 
department in the Ministry of Electronics Industry, China's 
integrated circuit market will have the following 
characteristics in 1994: Integrated circuits in home appliances 
will become rather popular; the share of such investment 
products as communications that utilize integrated circuits will 
greatly increase; design of application specific integrated 
circuits by China itself could reach something of a 
breakthrough; and in the large market and high technology set 
up, the competition of the integrated circuit area will open up 
in every direction; science, industry, and trade. 
  It is estimated that this year, 569 million integrated 
circuits will be sold on the consumer market and 445 million 
investment type integrated circuits will be sold, for a total of 
1.014 billion. 
  The use of integrated circuits in home appliances has become 
more popular, opening up a vast area for the integrated circuit 
market. According to analysis, with television producing 
factories further improving the grades of products and 
increasing various functions, the use of integrated circuits in 
televisions can only increase. In 1994 it is estimated that 10 
million color television sets and 11 million black-and-white 
sets will be sold, and the demand for television integrated 
circuits is expected to be 110 million to 120 million. 
  In 1993, audio equipment factories quickly adjusted and 
upgraded their products as a result of improved technology and 
changing consumer demand. The products are pocket-sized and 
portable digital recorders with CDs and displays and 
remote-control stereos. So, they use such circuits as noise 
reduction circuits, Dolby circuits, and amplification circuits. 
By the same token, radios also require multiple bands and 
multiple functions. So, they need circuits such as time control 
circuits. This trend will not change in 1994. It is estimated 
that 138 million audio circuits will be required in 1994. 
  Electronic departments that make video tape-recorders 
emphasize major administrative projects. Domestic production of 
complete sets of CKD forms will formally commence and sound 
cameras have been initially designated for test production 
domestically at six sites: Beijing JVC, Guangzhou JVC, Shanghai 
Sony, and Fuji Company, as well as Xiaxin and Shangguang. In 
1994 batch products also could be promoted. Total estimated use 
will be 161 million. 
  Camera circuits. Annual domestic production of cameras is 
1.5 
million, requiring such things as electronic focus and 
electronic shutters. As the world's third largest electronic 
clock and watch maker, circuits used in clocks and watches along 
with those processed in Hong Kong together come to approximately 
35 million. 
  The product types and the market for electronic games and 
electronic toys will still expand in 1994. Total use of circuits 
for such language circuits as electronic musical instruments to 
make up Christmas and New Year's cards, handicrafts, and 
electronic colored light control systems are 60 million to 65 
million. 
  In 1994 home appliance integrated circuits will take a big 
step. From January through October 1993, 4.69 million washing 
machines were sold, 48 percent of them fully automatic. 
Beijing's Longfu Building sold 1,094 washing machines in 
October, 935 of them fully automatic for an 85.5 percent share. 
A great many brands, such as Hefei's Rongshida [2837 0057 6671], 
one after another are promoting microcomputer controlled fully 
automatic models of washing machines. Shanghai's Shuixian [3055 
0103] brand has a digital automatic checking system and Aide 
[1947 1795] AQB45-2D brand utilizes six patents and initiates 
six processes at once. It also can automatically arrange the 
washing process and has four electronic clocks to set the time. 
Jiangmen's Jinling Bawang [6855 6875 7218 3769] machine 
automatically dispenses washing detergent. The Xiaoya Shengji'ao 
[1420 7700 5110 0679 1159] fully automatic washing machine 
controls the water level and turns on the machine and adds its 
own washing detergent and even can add heat. Hangzhou's Jinsong 
[6855 2646] brand uses fuzzy logic controls and can 
automatically set the water level, automatically set the time, 
automatically adjust the water flow and the washing process, and 
automatically implement overheating protection. The Whirlpool 
extra-sensitive washing machine can sense the fiber type and 
automatically correct and can accelerate the speed. There 
currently are some firms supplying the domestically designed 
washing machine control circuits popular overseas. Southeastern 
University's Microelectronic Center is researching and 
developing all of this themselves from integrated circuits to 
control panels. 
  Such things as wireless remote control air conditioners 
(with 
liquid crystal displays), highly sensitive gas sensors 
triggering exhaust fans, computer fire protected hot water 
heaters, microcomputer controlled dishwashers, safety 
videotelephone doorbells, and fully automatic vacuum cleaners 
are too numerous to mention. It is estimated that by the end of 
1994, there will be as many as 50 million integrated circuits 
used to control home appliances. 
<H5>  [7 Mar 94 p 7] </H5>
  According to information provided by the relevant department 
in the Ministry of Electronics Industry, the use of integrated 
circuits for such investment products as communications also 
will greatly increase this year. 
  The development of high technology communications products 
is 
one of the basic conditions for an information national economy. 
The year 1994 is an important one for China's communications 
industry to form an economy of scale. 
  1. Programmable switchboards. It is estimated that 1994's 
annual production of programmable switchboards will be 12 
million lines, with 100 million to 110 million complete sets of 
integrated circuits. 
  2. Telephones. China's current annual telephone production 
capability has reached 30 million and actual production for 
domestic and foreign sales is about 20 million. It is an area 
that is ripe for batch production of a scale relative to the 
market. Now ringing circuits, dialing circuits, voice circuits, 
circuits to avoid raising the voice, liquid crystal drive 
circuits, and recorded response circuits for use in telephones 
all are being developed. The scale of this market is 
approximately 67 million to 71 million. 
  3. Facsimile. According to a continuous line of planning 
thought, this type of cooperative stock company is being planned 
in the country. Facsimile integrated circuits have a high 
technology content and metal content, and are rather difficult. 
With each instrument calculated at 20 chips, a 300,000 
instrument market can be figured at 8 million chips. 
  4. BP machines, dageda [1129 0766 1129], photoelectric 
terminals, fiber-optic connector meters and other communications 
instruments, and satellite earth stations will use 12 million to 
16 million. 
  5. In addition there are automotive electronics, ship 
electronics, traffic control projects, and mining electronics, 
as well as electronics to control the electrical load to save 
energy, electronic scales, electric meter circuits, medical 
instruments, personal home computers, and textile electronics. 
  The various things listed above are provisionally estimated 
at 240 million integrated circuits. From that it is forecast 
that 445 million integrated circuits will be used in investment 
type products and the share of investment type products will 
rise to 43 percent from 39 percent in 1992. 
  This year, China's self-design of application specific 
integrated circuits will reach something of a breakthrough. 
  China's integrated circuit microelectronics technology is 
now 
at a design breakthrough. Qinghua's 1 micrometer research and 
development line is developing the fax machine thermo-sensor 
head's LSI and the Qinghua Huahuan Electronics Company, Limited 
is striving to research parts for use in the fourth and fifth 
group of optical fiber equipment. The Southeast University 
National Asic System Engineering Technology Research Center is 
developing a Chinese BP machine circuit and the TP3040 and 
TP3057 customer coding board circuits for the programmable 
switchboard. The Shanghai National Microelectronic Engineering 
Research Center has developed the Santana automobile oil 
pressure warning circuit, the electronic speedometer circuit, 
bank and telephone magnetic strip circuits, and touch on and off 
circuits. The Central Research Institute of the Huajing 
Electronic Group has developed the four bit microcomputer 
circuit, the EWSD programmable switchboard circuit, the CTS-130W 
color television remote control integrated circuit, and the 
digital remote control tuning and sound circuits. The Beiling 
[6296 1545] Company is developing a color television remote 
control circuit and the 1240 programmable switchboard circuit. 
The Beijing Integrated Circuit Design Center has developed the 
world's highest grade 89C51 single chip processing circuit and a 
liquid crystal drive circuit. Beijing University's 
microelectronics department is working on a kilomega high speed 
ECL circuit. China is presently making a concentrated effort to 
research and test 2 micrometer, 1.65/1.2 micrometer, 1 
micrometer, and even 0.8 micrometer product technology. 
Moreover, units are closely integrating design and application 
and linking them to domestic and foreign processing. 
  In addition, in the large market and in the high technology 
set-up, competition in the area of integrated circuits will open 
up in all directions; science, industry, and trade. 
  In 1994 foreign companies will take advantage of the 
integrated circuit market, relying on their superior technology 
and finances, and they will pay a great deal of attention to 
service, even opening up the market for door to door service. 
So, in 1994 integrated circuit market competition will not be 
with illegally imported goods, but with authentic foreign 
products and their agents, competition in science and 
technology, between state enterprise and joint venture 
production, in trade and information service, and in every 
direction; science, industry, and trade. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20370 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  18 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Statistics on Light Industrial Output in February </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Statistics on Light Industrial Output in February </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK1803114894 Beijing CEI Database in English 18 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK1803114894 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS) -- Following is a list of the output 
of China's light industry in February 1994, released by the 
State Statistical Bureau: 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Item              |Unit              |2/94              |2/93              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Bicycle           |10,000s           |239.73            |301.80            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Sewing machine    |10,000s           |45.93             |64.81             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Watch             |10,000            |1094.88           |499.12            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Camera            |10,000s           |137.76            |35.36             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|TV set            |10,000s           |191.83            |209.76            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Color TV          |10,000s           |96.87             |85.15             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Video recorder    |10,000s           |11.51             |8.00              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Radio             |10,000s           |126.55            |110.12            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tape recorder     |10,000s           |219.68            |209.24            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hi-fi             |10,000pc          |42.43             |19.70             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Washing machine   |10,000s           |77.50             |66.03             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Electric fan      |10,000s           |356.57            |386.90            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Refrigerator      |10,000s           |48.13             |36.22             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Freezer           |10,000s           |18.11             |12.54             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Air conditioner   |10,000s           |33.09             |17.77             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Vacuum cleaner    |10,000s           |10.38             |7.61              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Electric cooker   |10,000s           |106.18            |76.32             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Sugar             |10,000t           |151.01            |158.28            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Salt              |10,000t           |58.94             |61.00             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Cigarettes        |10,000c           |198.60            |282.49            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Beer              |10,000t           |65.40             |67.30             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Liquor            |10,000t           |45.01             |44.98             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Canned food       |10,000t           |9.87              |12.70             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Dairy products    |t                 |26213.84          |22977             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Feed              |10,000t           |166.86            |274.52            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Machine-made and  |10,000t           |97.06             |106.64            | 
|kraft             |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Newsprint         |10,000t           |5.26              |4.77              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Relief printing p-|10,000t           |4.56              |4.47              | 
|aper              |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Synthetic deterge-|10,000t           |11.24             |13.87             | 
|nt                |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Daily fine alumin-|t                 |6932.20           |5063.00           | 
|ium products      |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Plastic products  |10,000t           |39.10             |37.09             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Farming film      |10,000t           |4.23              |6.94              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Notes: s - set, pc - piece, t - ton, c - carton, m pc - million piece      | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20371 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  18 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Output of Mechano-Electronic Products in February </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Output of Mechano-Electronic Products in February </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK1803115194 Beijing CEI Database in English 18 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK1803115194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS) -- following is a list of the output 
of China's major mechano-electronic products in February 1994, 
released by the State Statistical Bureau: 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Item              |Unit              |2/94              |2/93              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Power equipment   |10,000 kw         |50.14             |59.09             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|AC motor          |10,000 kw         |465.17            |444.45            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Industrial boiler |ton               |3454.60           |5594.00           | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Machine tool      |10,000 set        |1.30              |1.97              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Including: NC mac-|set               |511.00            |769               | 
|hine tool         |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Precision machine |set               |111               |67                | 
|tool              |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Large machine tool|set               |227               |335               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Automobile        |10,000            |8.46              |10.42             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Including: Bus    |10,000            |0.57              |0.65              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Car               |10,000            |1.53              |1.83              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Truck             |10,000            |4.32              |4.51              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Motorbike         |10,000            |23.78             |51.90             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tractor (20hp/abo-|10,000            |0.35              |0.43              | 
|ve)               |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Small tractor     |10,000            |8.43              |8.95              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Locomotive        |set               |61                |67                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Including: Diesel |set               |48                |47                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Steam             |set               |2                 |2                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Electric          |set               |11                |18                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Passenger coach   |set               |116               |164               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Freight wagon     |set               |2386              |2455              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Internal combusti-|10,000 kw         |623.31            |858.50            | 
|on engine         |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Fishing ship      |                  |-                 |-                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Civil steel ship  |10,000 ton        |5.77              |5.05              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Computer          |set               |4                 |37                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Micro computer    |set               |4591              |3662              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Color crt         |10,000            |94.19             |50.60             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Program-controlle-|10,000 set        |59.55             |27.44             | 
|d switchboard     |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20372 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  18 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Statistics on Raw Material Output in February </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Statistics on Raw Material Output in February </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK1803114994 Beijing CEI Database in English 18 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK1803114994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS) -- Following is a list of the output 
of raw materials in February 1994, released by the State 
Statistical Bureau: 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Item              |Unit              |2/94              |2/93              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Iron ore          |10,000t           |1441.24           |1553.00           | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Pig iron          |10,000t           |681.24            |604.90            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Steel             |10,000t           |727.40            |689.10            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Rolled steel      |10,000t           |639.23            |608.02            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ferro alloys      |10,000t           |16.41             |16.35             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Coking coal       |10,000t           |500.25            |456.33            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ten nonferrous me-|10,000t           |26.78             |25.08             | 
|tals              |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Of: Copper        |10,000t           |4.93              |5.39              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Aluminium         |10,000t           |10.71             |9.54              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Copper products   |10,000t           |3.68              |5.32              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Aluminium products|10,000t           |3.42              |4.23              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Alumina           |10,000t           |14.49             |14.10             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Sulphuric-iron ore|10,000t           |74.25             |78.34             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Phosphorus ore    |10,000t           |139.66            |129.79            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Timber            |10,000cu m        |332.79            |406               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Artificial board  |10,000cu m        |29.21             |31.79             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Cement            |10,000t           |2410.82           |2425.30           | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Plate glass       |10,000c           |960.41            |878.47            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Notes: t - ton, cu m - cubic meter, c - case                               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20373 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  24 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Urges Balance, Diversity in Foreign Investment </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Article Urges Balance, Diversity in Foreign Investment </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0378A Beijing GUANLI SHIJIE [MANAGEMENT WORLD] in 
Chinese No 52, 24 Jan 94 pp 152-157 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0378A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUANLI SHIJIE [MANAGEMENT WORLD] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Mu Haiping (1970 3189 1627): "Analysis of Direct </F>
Foreign Investment Problems, Trends"] 
  [Text] 1. Analysis Of Basic Trends 
  Direct foreign investment in China has soared in the past 
two 
years, resulting in another surge in the utilization of foreign 
investment, the second since the 1980's, and ushering in a new 
era in foreign investment. A number of new trends is detectable. 
  1) Scale Of Investment 
  In terms of the overall scale of foreign investment, 40,264 
projects were approved nationwide in all of 1992 with a total 
negotiated value of $57.51 billion, while the amount actually 
invested was $11.3 billion, up 180 percent, 280 percent, and 60 
percent, respectively, from a year ago. The rapid increase in 
the overall scale of foreign investment has been accompanied by 
an increase in the scale of individual projects. According to 
preliminary statistics, the average negotiated investment of a 
project in 1992 was $1.2 million, compared to $900,000, the 
average four years ago. In the three provinces of Jiangsu, 
Guangdong, and Shandong, all leaders in the utilization of 
foreign capital, there were 254, 200, and 152 large and 
medium-sized projects, respectively, each with a price tag over 
$10 million. The simultaneous expansion of the overall scale of 
investment and the scale of individual projects is one of the 
salient features of the latest surge in foreign investment in 
China. 
  The major causes of the surge in foreign investment are not 
external but have to do with changes in China's internal 
economic climate. While economic growth in the rest of the world 
remains sluggish, trade imbalances widen, and funds are short in 
recent years, the Chinese economy has been racing ahead full 
steam, its economic system beginning to operate like a socialist 
market economy, its large- and medium-sized enterprises 
transforming their operating mechanism with despatch, its other 
economic sectors booming, and its foreign trade flourishing. All 
of that has vastly improved China's investment climate, further 
tapped its market potential, and created even better conditions 
for foreign investment. 
  2) Investment Mix 
  Guided by the adjustment of the nation's industrial policy, 
the composition of foreign investments also changed 
substantially in 1992. Foreign investment in the infrastructure, 
in basic industries, in capital- and technology-intensive 
industries, in technological transformation, and in the tertiary 
sector, including banking, commerce, tourism, and real estate, 
rose proportionately, thus broadening the area open to foreign 
capital. In the geographical distribution of foreign investment, 
the trend is for foreign capital to move north and west. The 
coastal economic region, anchored by Pudong, Shanghai; the 
economic zone surrounding Bohai, with its relatively 
sophisticated industrial structure; and many provincial capitals 
and border areas have become the new hot spots for foreign 
investors. All in all, although the generalization that foreign 
investment is concentrated in the southeastern coastal region 
and in processing industries remains basically valid, we can see 
trends toward dispersal and diversification. 
  Changes in the direction and composition of foreign 
investment are a function of the implementation of China's 
across-the-board open policy, the decision by the government to 
ease restrictions on foreign investment in some areas, and, most 
important, on shifts in comparative advantage at home. Already 
China has set up a whole range of foreign investment 
preferential zones, including special economic zones, economic 
and technical development zones, opened ports along the coast, 
rivers, and borders, economic development zones, and tax 
protection zones; and further delegated the power to examine and 
approve foreign investment projects, the result of which is to 
narrow the comparative advantage of one locality vis-a-vis the 
next in policy power. Changes in the costs of capital goods like 
labor, land, and resource, in particular, have forced a number 
of localities which have been major destinations of foreign 
capital to accelerate industrial upgrading and outward 
dispersal. Hence the objective trend of an increase in scale 
leading to structural upgrading. 
  3) Forms of Investment 
  Of all direct foreign investment in China in 1992, 
Sino-foreign joint ventures accounted for $6.1 billion, or 55 
percent; Sino-foreign contractual joint ventures, $2.1 billion, 
or 18 percent; wholly foreign-funded enterprises, $2.5 billion, 
22 percent; and others (including cooperative development, 
international leasing, compensation trade, processing and 
assembling), $500 million, or 5 percent. If we look at the 
various forms of investment one by one, Sino-foreign joint 
ventures first constituted over 50 percent of total investments 
in 1987 and have always fluctuated between 50 and 55 percent 
ever since. Wholly foreign-funded enterprises accounted for a 
minor share of total investment throughout the 1980's and have 
shown notable growth only after 1990, rising from less than 10 
percent in 1989 to 25 percent. The absolute value of 
Sino-foreign contractual joint ventures consistently hovered 
around $700 million between 1986 and 1991. As the overall scale 
of foreign investment expanded, however, its share of total 
investment headed downward only to rebound sharply in 1992, 
climbing more than 178 percent. Changes in the other forms of 
investment have been insignificant because they account for a 
tiny share of all investments. 
  The above analysis shows that there are three major forms of 
direct foreign investment in China, namely the Sino-foreign 
joint venture, Sino-foreign contractual joint venture, and 
wholly foreign-funded enterprise, which between them make up 75 
percent of all foreign investment. At present, foreign-funded 
enterprises in the north are more likely to be Sino-foreign 
joint ventures, while foreign investment along the southeastern 
coast typically takes the form of wholly foreign-funded 
enterprises. This also reflects on an objective level the 
differences between north and south China in economic structure, 
institutional characteristics, and degree of openness. 
  4) Results of Investment 
  China utilizes direct foreign investment in order to expand 
the scale of capital formation, raise the enterprises' product 
standard and technical level, increase foreign exchange-earning 
exports, enhance national income, and learn managerial and 
administrative experiences. Judging from the present situation, 
it has achieved these objectives to varying degrees despite much 
unevenness in development. 
  To begin with, as its scale expands, direct foreign 
investment is playing an increasingly important role in 
supplementing fixed assets investment in all society. Actually 
utilized foreign capital accounted for 3 percent or so of all 
social fixed assets in the 1980's, rose to 4.5 percent in 1991, 
and exceeded 8 percent in 1992. Secondly, the three kinds of 
enterprises either partially or wholly foreign-funded that are 
already in business have filled part of the void in China's 
lineup of industry, boosted the upgrading of the industrial 
structure, and greatly narrowed the technical gap between China 
and the world. The southern Chinese coast, where the 
manufacturing industry used to be relatively weak, is now the 
nation's leader in some processing technologies, product design, 
and other areas. By attracting foreign funds and importing 
foreign technology, 63 percent of the technical equipment in 
Beijing's industrial enterprises have now reached the 
international standards in the late 1980's, leaping through 30 
years of technological progress in less than eight years. The 
utilization of foreign capital has striking effects in the 
technical advances China has made in optical fiber and cable 
communications equipment, automated instruments and meters, 
color kinescope, elevator, large-scale integrated circuitry, 
microcomputer, automobile, new building materials, and drugs. 
Thirdly, the three kinds of enterprises that are either 
partially or wholly foreign-funded have spurred the development 
of China's foreign trade. In 1992, they accounted for 26 percent 
of the nation's total exports and imports, or $41.8 billion, an 
increase of 51 percent, including $17.4 billion in exports and 
$26.4 billion in imports, 20 percent and 44 percent, 
respectively, of China's total exports and imports. Finally, 
following the expansion of the production scale of the three 
kinds of enterprises, the state is also collecting more 
revenue--$10.7 billion in 1992, up 53 percent over 
1991--generated by foreign economic activities. Meanwhile, 
employment at the three kinds of enterprises has also been 
climbing year after year, accompanied by a notable increase in 
workers' wages. As of late 1992, almost 140,000 people were on 
the payroll of the three kinds of foreign-funded enterprises in 
Beijing, their per capita wage exceeding that of their 
counterparts in domestic enterprises of the same industry by 
more than 30 percent. Xiamen Shi has adopted regulations 
explicitly mandating that wages in the three kinds of 
enterprises exceed those in comparable Chinese enterprises by 
more than 20 percent. The three kinds of enterprises have become 
a key avenue for workers in pursuit of higher incomes. Then 
there are the many intangible ways in which the three kinds of 
enterprises have been a boon. With their management model based 
on the market economy and depending on their source of capital, 
they provide a good example for Chinese enterprises trying to 
transform their operating mechanism. By serving as a bridge 
linking the domestic and international markets and disseminating 
information, the three kinds of enterprises are helping to shape 
public thinking and mode of conduct. 
  2. Major Problems 
  Substantial progress has been made in the utilization of 
direct foreign investment. However, as the national economy 
develops and the macroeconomic situation changes, the further 
development of the three kinds of enterprises still faces many 
problems that need to be worked out. 
  1) While the scale of foreign investment has expanded 
rapidly, the composition of investment is less than sound. 
According to statistics, it was the industrial sector soaking up 
foreign capital in a big way that accounted for the sharp jump 
in the utilization of foreign capital since the 1980's. In 1985, 
the negotiated amount of direct foreign investment was $6.333 
billion of which $2.384 billion, or 37.6 percent, went to 
industry. Corresponding figures in 1990 were $6.986 billion 
$5.943 billion and 85 percent, respectively; and in 1991, 
$12.422 billion, $10.055 billion, and 80.9 percent, 
respectively. Within the industrial sector itself, direct 
foreign investment is concentrated in labor-intensive processing 
and manufacturing industries. This investment pattern changed 
somewhat in 1992, with the tertiary sector gaining strength 
relative to total investments, but there has been no basic shift 
in the overall situation. 
  According to the conventional development theory of the 
utilization of direct foreign investment, it is necessary for 
the production sector to dominate the investment mix. However, 
two points are noteworthy. First, the mix of foreign investment 
should be compatible with the stage of economic development the 
country is in at a given time. In other words, when foreign 
investment reaches a certain scale, other fields should 
gradually be opened up and made more attractive to foreign 
capital. The comprehensive planning capability of the three 
kinds of enterprises should be enhanced. Second, the mix of 
foreign investment must not be considered in isolation from the 
constraints of the domestic economic structure. At the present 
stage, most of such constraints are found in the basic 
industries and the infrastructure. Make use of foreign capital 
to relieve the bottlenecks instead of pursuing ill-considered 
development that will wind up exacerbating the bottlenecks. 
Direct foreign investment in the processing industry these days 
is increasing too rapidly, objectively requiring us to further 
broaden the scope of investment. In particular, we should step 
up measures to make the infrastructure and basic industries more 
attractive to foreign investors. 
  It is also worth noting that of all direct foreign 
investment 
in traditional industries, most goes to the finished products of 
the processing and assembling industries while relatively little 
goes to capital goods and intermediate products. We can get a 
glimpse of this pattern from the imports and exports of the 
three kinds of enterprises that are either partially or wholly 
foreign-funded. In 1992, those enterprises ran up a deficit of 
$9 billion in their foreign trade. Most of their imports were 
machinery, equipment, raw materials, and parts and components. 
This also shows that China's utilization of foreign capital is 
concentrated in downstream industries with the upstream 
industries lagging in development. 
  2) While foreign-funded projects are hotly pursued, there 
are 
no coordinated measures to manage a project after the deal is 
clinched. 
  Against a backdrop of runaway growth, every locality 
strapped 
for funds looks to foreign capital to close the gap in its 
funding sources. At one point all jurisdictions were scrambling 
to introduce preferential policies to attract foreign capital 
and delegate power to manage foreign projects. In a certain 
sense, preferential treatment and delegation are inherent in 
China's drive to open itself up to the outside world, attract 
foreign capital, and advance economic development. But this does 
not mean that we should go easy on management and pursue 
projects to the exclusion of everything else. In our 
investigations, we discovered there is indeed a tendency 
everywhere to scramble for projects. Some even set a specified 
number of foreign-funded projects as target to be fulfilled by 
the levels below. How well they meet the targets has become the 
yardstick by which their performance is judged. 
  Major problems that occur after a deal is struck are: 
  First, while the amount of foreign investment negotiated is 
large, the sum actually realized is on the low side. Many 
contracts are drawn up and signed, but the percentage that opens 
for business is not high enough. In the Beijing area, for 
instance, direct foreign investment amounted to $8.11 billion on 
paper by 1992, but only $3.95 billion, or 48.2 percent, were 
actually realized. During the same period, Beijing approved a 
total of 3,769 projects involving the three kinds of enterprises 
either partially or wholly foreign-funded. In reality, a mere 
942 companies opened for business, for a business start-up rate 
of 25 percent. In Fujian Province, only 30 percent of the three 
kinds of foreign-funded enterprises were fully capitalized in 
accordance with the terms of their contracts. In Zhejiang 
Province, the contract investment compliance rate is just 45.7 
percent or so. 
  Furthermore, land is being occupied illegally and there are 
no economies of scale. To attract foreign investors, some 
localities have been treating land as a cheap resource, setting 
land prices in development zones at excessively low levels. 
Farmland is being taken in a big way and the interests of local 
peasants are not properly safeguarded. Some localities have even 
introduced investment incentive policies under which an investor 
is free to "decide its own project and pick the plant site." 
There is no overall planning. Many small-time and highly 
opportunistic foreign investors take advantage of policy 
loopholes at every turn to profit themselves. The result is a 
scale of operations that is highly uneconomical with no external 
economies. 
  In addition, losses are mounting and tax under-reporting and 
evasion are widespread. By 1991, over 2,500 enterprises either 
wholly or partially foreign-funded were in operation in Fujian. 
Of these 2,500 enterprises, more than 1,200, or 48 percent, were 
losing money to the tune of 400 million yuan in all. By 1992, 
2,338 foreign-funded enterprises had opened for business in 
Zhejiang, of which 37 percent were unprofitable, their combined 
losses amounting to almost 100 million yuan. Meanwhile, 50 
percent of the three kinds of foreign-funded enterprises in 
Beijing were losing money. There are various reasons for the 
unprofitability of foreign-funded enterprises, some 
policy-related, some having to do with the way they are operated 
and managed. However, a good number of these enterprises claim 
to be losing money but are actually making a profit. By 
falsifying their books and importing at high prices and 
exporting at low prices, they hope to evade paying taxes. In an 
audit on 1,311 enterprises either partially or wholly 
foreign-funded, the tax department in Shanghai identified 447 
tax cheaters, or 34 percent. 
  3) The importation of "hardware" is stressed, but the 
importation of "software" is neglected. In particular, there are 
no mechanisms for absorption, assimilation, innovation, and 
dissemination. 
  A key objective of the utilization of direct foreign 
investment is to import advanced foreign technology and 
introduce into China advanced foreign managerial experience. 
Only when such "software" is mastered can we consider the 
utilization of foreign capital to have basically achieved its 
objective. Judging from the reality in the development of the 
three kinds of foreign-funded enterprises, the infusion of 
foreign capital has indeed introduced into the country a 
considerable amount of advanced machinery and equipment. 
However, most of this equipment consists of processing and 
assembling production lines. Apparently what we have been 
getting is the final product, not technology or management. This 
leads to a host of problems. First, it increases the import 
content of the final product. To a large extent, it is our 
desire to increase exports and earn more foreign exchange that 
lies behind the development of the three kinds of foreign-funded 
enterprises. But since both capital goods and intermediate 
products consist heavily of imports, they in effect cause us to 
spend more foreign exchange, thus lowering the 
foreign-exchange-earning rate of exports. Second, it multiplies 
the costs of attracting a project. Without absorption and 
assimilation, it is very hard to avoid project duplication and 
excessive competition in the utilization of foreign capital. To 
facilitate the effective application of "hardware," we are also 
forced to increase the importation of related materials and 
parts correspondingly. Third, it lowers the efficiency with 
which hardware is applied. Advanced machinery and equipment need 
to be backed up by advanced management. In China, the operating 
mechanism of enterprises is less than perfect and the level of 
enterprise management is low. If the development of the three 
kinds of foreign-funded enterprises cannot break new ground in 
these areas, then we would have trouble realizing the benefits 
of the utilization of foreign capital. The dissociation between 
technology and management may even cause an enterprise to lose 
money and go bankrupt. 
  4) The distribution of the three kinds of foreign-funded 
enterprises is over-concentrated and the geographical division 
of labor does not make much sense. 
  By and large the three kinds of enterprises are 
over-concentrated in south and east China, which is consistent 
with the objective reality of uneven economic development in 
China. But this is not the only problem. Even more serious, the 
three kinds of enterprises everywhere share a basically similar 
structural distribution. As power is delegated, moreover, 
development zones and opened zones, with their heavy 
concentration of foreign capital, also tend to converge 
functionally. Local characteristics are being overlooked and the 
lines of division of labor are being blurred, problems that will 
only continue to worsen. 
  The adverse consequences of this kind of regional division 
of 
labor are twofold. On the one hand, there is no coordination 
between one region and the next when it comes to development. On 
the contrary, they impose a blockade against one another and 
engage in cut-throat competition. For the most minor local 
benefits, they would launch a project helter-skelter, without 
considering whether it is within the capability of the 
macroeconomy. Hence the overcapacity in some foreign-funded 
enterprises, worsening the bottleneck effects in the 
macroeconomy as a whole. On the other hand, it has prevented the 
many potential strengths of the localities from being tapped. 
The interior abounds with resources, but since only a tiny 
trickle of funds makes its way into the interior and it lacks 
processing capability, its edge in resources has not been 
converted into a strong industry that will back up the 
development of the entire economy. Furthermore, although the 
heavy and chemical industries of north China are a leader in the 
nation, the absence of funds to finance technological 
transformation and the lack of foreign capital to overhaul the 
mechanism have prevented them from generating as much profits as 
they should, which, in turn, has complicated their effort to 
adjust the industrial structure or upgrade the export mix more 
successfully. 
  The nonspecialization tendency of the three kinds of 
enterprises in the various economic regions may exacerbate the 
inter-regional development imbalance, complicating industrial 
development planning and macroeconomic management, and possibly 
enable foreign investors to "fish among troubled waters." 
  3. Future Strategic Choices 
  All in all China's macroeconomic environment has now changed 
enormously. Under the stimulus of the market mechanism, the 
national economy has been growing by leaps and bounds, new 
industry hot spots have been springing up endlessly, traditional 
industries are coming under mounting competitive pressure, and 
the existing infrastructure and basic industries fall far short 
of meeting the requirements of opening China to the outside 
world. Changes in foreign economic relations too seem to have 
been just as striking. To speed up its accession to GATT, for 
instance, China has taken a number of new steps that would bring 
itself more in line with international practices in such areas 
as market accessibility, intellectual property rights, 
imports-exports management, national treatment, and service 
trade. Meanwhile, new moves are constantly being made to prepare 
a coherent body of laws pertaining to foreign economic 
relations, overhaul government functions, and improve foreign 
capital service organizations. It was precisely against this 
backdrop that the utilization of direct foreign investment in 
China entered a period of runaway expansion. How should we 
review our experience, overcome existing problems, and step up 
guidance, regulation, and control to enable it to continue to 
grow healthily in a sustained manner in balance with national 
economic growth? This is an issue that every quarter should pay 
close attention to. 
  Given the present situation, we believe we should adjust the 
way we utilize foreign capital and develop the three kinds of 
foreign-funded enterprises from a strategic high ground. Instead 
of quantitative growth and extensive management, we should go 
after qualitative upgrading and intensive management. Enhance 
the economic and social benefits of the utilization of direct 
foreign investment across the board and lift the development of 
the three kinds of foreign-funded enterprises to a new plateau. 
  1) Based on the changes specific to a particular stage in 
the 
opening of China, we should replace the unitary strategy of 
foreign capital utilization with one that is diversified. There 
are three basic points. First, preserve and further the key role 
played by labor-intensive processing industry in attracting 
foreign capital, expanding exports, and earning foreign 
exchange, but take care to improve quality and increase added 
value so that the industry performs even better as a source of 
accumulation. Second, increase the proportions of direct foreign 
investment that go to the infrastructure, basic industry, 
technological upgrading, and the tertiary industry. Improve the 
industrial distribution of the three kinds of foreign-funded 
enterprises as a way of upgrading the industrial structure. 
Third, encourage the two-way flow of funds. Localities and 
enterprises with the necessary wherewithal should be allowed to 
develop multinational operations and set up joint ventures 
overseas. Increase the mobility of capital goods to tie in with 
the all-out opening of China. 
  2) Strive to improve the geographical distribution of 
foreign 
capital even as we adopt a diversification strategy to balance 
its industrial distribution. At present the most popular 
destinations of foreign investment remain concentrated in the 
southeastern coastal region. As the rivers and borders become 
more and more open, therefore, foreign investors are poised to 
strike out in a northern and western direction. Accordingly, we 
should take advantage of this trend and consider offering 
liberal preferential policies in the north and the interior so 
that the foreign investment fever now centered on the Zhu Jiang 
delta, southern Fujian, and the Chang Jiang delta would soon 
spread to north China and the interior, with more foreign-funded 
enterprises emerging in the backward areas in the 1990's. In the 
course of seeking balanced regional development, we should pay 
attention to regional characteristics and practice 
specialization and division of labor on an economic regional 
basis. Make the areas around Bohai and northeastern China the 
focus of the "northern push." The development strategy there is 
to use the existing edge in chemical industry, heavy industry, 
and electrical machinery industry to develop in a big way 
export-oriented and capital- or technology-intensive enterprises 
that are either partially or wholly foreign-funded, upgrade the 
industrial structure, and effect import substitution. [As 
published] The development strategy is to rely on central 
cities, exploit its ample resources, go all out to make the 
region along Chang Jiang and the Gansu-Hainan railroad the focus 
of the importation of foreign capital and technology, develop 
foreign-funded enterprises of the resource-processing type in 
order to enhance China's own resource-supplying capability, and 
manufacture capital goods and intermediate articles domestically 
to substitute imports. 
  3) To bring about strategic adjustments in the utilization 
of 
foreign capital, we should make more extensive use of the 
industrial policy as a guide. This essentially means three 
things. First, encourage large-scale projects, 
technology-intensive projects, and high-added-value projects. 
Scale back and perhaps abolish preferential treatments for 
low-grade low-end industrial projects in order to make good use 
of the policy of utilizing foreign investment. Second, to carry 
the industrial policy through, the state may consider gradually 
changing the examination and approval of a foreign-funded 
project by scale to examination and approval by industry 
(product), and cut back on projects in industries that need to 
be curbed while thoroughly deregulating those projects in 
industries that need to e encouraged. Support may be given at a 
policy level to projects that would help ease the bottlenecks 
hampering economic development. Evaluation work in the 
utilization of foreign capital should put more stress on the 
profitability target and quality target. Avoid the tendency 
among grassroots units to pursue quantity exclusively through 
administrative intervention at cross purposes with the 
industrial policy. That way, the development of the three kinds 
of foreign-funded enterprises, the construction of development 
zones, and the introduction of preferential policies would 
become more compatible with the requirements of the industrial 
policy. 
  4) Turning to the methods of foreign investment utilization, 
we should concentrate on the Sino-foreign joint venture format. 
In particular, we should encourage large and medium-sized state 
enterprises to form joint ventures with multinational 
corporations. The Sino-foreign joint venture is the one form of 
cooperation in the utilization of direct foreign investment 
where its management is most amenable to the influence of the 
Chinese partner and where the Chinese side can gain access to 
technology and managerial experience. Large and medium-sized 
state enterprises embody the level of technology and management 
direction at home, in the same way that multinational 
corporations embody the level of technology and development 
direction globally. Accordingly, joint ventures combining the 
two can result in the upgrading of foreign-funded enterprises 
and make the utilization of foreign capital a more powerful 
stimulant of the national economy as a whole. Change the methods 
of foreign capital utilization, from small to large, from 
low-end to upscale. The idea is to put an end to a pattern of 
conduct--short-sighted and speculative--existent in the three 
kinds of enterprises, namely "emphasizing importation but 
overlooking absorption and assimilation"; accelerate the 
transformation of the operating mechanism of large and mid-sized 
state enterprises; and give them greater development strength to 
open up the international market. 
  5) Invigorate the management of foreign capital utilization 
in the later stage and carry through with the foreign investment 
strategy centered on the increase of profitability to the point 
where it really matters. On the one hand, simplify and 
standardize the examination and approval procedures for the 
three kinds of enterprises and improve work efficiency so that 
both the Chinese side and its foreign counterpart get the 
project off the ground without delay in accordance with the 
contract. On the other hand, set a firm date based on the 
circumstances of the case by which a foreign funded enterprise 
must go into operation. If the enterprise fails to do so, its 
business license may be revoked in accordance with the law. 
Alternatively, the department in charge may review its 
application. A corresponding effort should be made to revise the 
pertinent policies, laws, and regulations. Furthermore, where 
management policies are discriminatory in nature, for instance, 
disparities exist between the preferential policy of one region 
and that of another or when the setting of foreign sales ratios 
is discriminatory, we should proceed to even up or eliminate the 
disparities and gradually achieve national treatment for the 
three kinds of enterprises in accordance with international 
practice, creating an orderly competitive environment with a 
level playing field. 
  6) Improve the basic climate for attracting foreign 
investment and better comprehensive services for the three kinds 
of foreign-funded enterprises. Essentially this will involve the 
following: 
  First, set up without delay a unified nation-wide 
information 
service network which foreign-funded enterprises can tap into 
for a fee. The network should provide the enterprises with 
information on overseas market movements and on prices of raw 
materials and products to help them make the right decisions. It 
will also help the Chinese manager familiarize himself with the 
situation and effectively prevent the foreign managers of 
foreign-funded enterprises from importing at high prices and 
exporting at low prices and shifting profits around to avoid 
paying taxes. 
  Second, raise the standard of management and administration 
at foreign-funded enterprises. Augment training for Chinese 
managerial personnel. On the one hand, we should take pains to 
review the managerial experiences and methods of different kinds 
of foreign-funded enterprises. Work hard to assimilate and 
innovate upon them to benefit tangibly from the utilization of 
foreign capital. On the other hand, we should tackle the 
improvement of the quality of Chinese managerial personnel as a 
basic task in foreign capital utilization. Offer on-the-job 
training for the personnel of foreign-funded enterprises in a 
variety of ways and at all levels to meet the requirements of 
achieving a new high in foreign capital utilization. 
  Third, accelerate the socialized management of 
foreign-funded 
enterprises. In areas with a heavy concentration of foreign 
capital, in particular, we should create an economy to go with 
the three kinds of foreign-funded enterprises by doing a good 
job in regional planning and social service coordination, 
thereby making things more convenient for the three kinds of 
foreign-funded enterprises in daily life, health care, 
education, and culture. 
  Fourth, accelerate fiscal reform, financial reform, and 
foreign trade reform. Sort out the relations among tax rates, 
interest rates, and exchange rates step by step in accordance 
with the requirements of the development of a market economy. 
Optimize the macroeconomic climate so that foreign-funded 
enterprises can operate and do business in a better 
institutionalized and statutory environment. 
  (Writer's unit: Economic Research Center, State Planning 
Commission; responsible editor: Wang Yun [3769 5366]) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20374 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  24 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   Suggestions for Foreign Investment Policy Changes </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Suggestions for Foreign Investment Policy Changes </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0379A Beijing GUANLI SHIJIE [MANAGEMENT WORLD] in 
Chinese No 52, 24 Jan 94 pp 163-168 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0379A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUANLI SHIJIE [MANAGEMENT WORLD] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Summary of "International Forum on Beijing's 1993 </F>
Transnational Corporations and China": "On Further Improving 
China's Foreign Investment Climate and Attracting Investment 
by Transnational Corporations"] 
  [Excerpt] [passage omitted] 
<H5>  III. A Reassessment of China's Investment Climate, and </H5>
Policy Suggestions 
  The participating delegates held that in the broad setting 
of 
the evolving new world economic order and the appearance of an 
international production-network system, in order to adapt to 
the ever-changing climate and its new demands and opportunities, 
and to get onto track with the open international economic 
situation and become more internationally competitive, China 
needs to reassess its climate and policy framework for direct 
foreign investment in China. It was precisely in line with 
that constructive spirit that this forum made a number of 
suggestions for consideration by the Chinese government, aimed 
at helping China to further improve its current 
foreign-investment-policy laws and regulations, so that it can 
attract more foreign investment to speed up its economic growth 
and development, particularly direct investment by large 
transnational corporations. 
  The delegates' general line of thinking was that on the 
occasion of China's transition from a planned to a market 
economy, China's economic reform should be focused on building a 
market-oriented macroeconomic climate suited to both foreign and 
Chinese investment, whose climate ought to be both stable and 
predictable. This will mean establishing the appropriate 
legal framework and system structure for the sound operation of 
a market economy; a convertible currency; an effective finance 
and banking system; a competitive market structure; 
transportation and communications infrastructures to aid 
commercial transactions; and constantly improving human capital 
and technical skills. It will also require policy measures and 
management plans that will put all domestic and international 
economic activities on the same track. As to long-range 
objectives, the pertinent policy laws and regulations on direct 
foreign investment should be transparent, grant enterprises 
decisionmaking power, guarantee national treatment without 
ethnic discrimination, provide procedures for resolving 
disputes, and permit the outward remittance of bonuses. 
  In order to gradually realize these objectives, the 
delegates 
made many suggestions, which were quite constructive and 
definitely feasible, so that we should pay them adequate 
attention, to pave the way for choosing the best ones to follow. 
<H5>  1. On Adopting a Policy Slanted Toward Large Investment </H5>
Projects 
  As to large investment projects in line with China's 
industrial structural-adjustment orientation (such as high-tech, 
power, and transportation), we need to provide full 
encouragement and support, by making a transition of 
preferential policy from a regional to an industrial slant. 
<H5>  2. On Allowing the Establishment of Holding Companies </H5>
  The forum welcomed the suggestion made by China's 
foreign-investment management sector to allow the establishment 
of holding companies. Based on established holding companies, 
such as the U.S. Hewlett-Packard Co, IBM, Du Pont, and Motorola, 
and the Netherlands Philips B. V., we could gradually expand the 
experimental scope, to allow these types of companies to 
practice effective and integrated management of their 
subordinate joint-venture enterprises, and to enjoy a nationwide 
corporate status, in order to bring their overall operating and 
comprehensive advantages into full play. 
<H5>  3. On Further Opening Up Markets </H5>
  China's current market capacity and market openness are out 
of proportion, leaving us with the problem of "a large market 
with a low degree of openness." Except for industries, such as 
food, industrial and agricultural machinery, metal goods, toys, 
and sporting goods, where we have no restrictions on foreign 
investment, we subject all other industries to varying degrees 
of restrictions. It was suggested that except for projects 
that involve national security, military affairs, harm to 
physical health, or destruction of the ecology, all other 
industrial sectors should be opened up to foreign investment. 
As China's transnational enterprises have free access to 
foreign markets, foreign transnational corporations ought also 
to have relatively free access to the Chinese market. 
  We should let capital- or technology-intensive transnational 
corporations sell part or all of their products on China's 
domestic market, and not put any hard limitations on their 
production scale. To attract high-tech and export-oriented joint 
ventures, local-content provisions (made-in-country provisions) 
and raw materials and parts import-restrictions should be eased. 
<H5>  4. On Encouraging Access by Transnational Service Companies </H5>
  As production activities and production services are closely 
linked, introducing transnational service companies will help to 
attract direct foreign investment in our manufacturing industry. 
  Meanwhile, transnational service company access will promote 
competition in our local service-trade market, to stimulate 
tertiary industry growth. China should encourage foreign 
investment activity in banking, insurance, air carriers, 
communications, advisory service, accounting, quality 
authentication, and other commercial service sectors. When 
conditions are ripe, we should consider allowing foreign firms 
to set up trade subsidiaries, to be granted the authority to 
engage directly in foreign trade. 
<H5>  5. On Reforming Examination and Approval Formalities </H5>
  The Chinese Government revises its project catalog yearly 
and 
openly encourages the use of foreign investment, to guide 
foreign-investment orientation. We need examination and 
approval jurisdiction based on varying industrial categories 
instead of on varying overall investment provisions. While we 
have taken certain steps to speed up the examination and 
approval process (such as setting up a window investment-service 
center), the process still needs further streamlining, 
acceleration, and more transparency. The respective 
obligations of the central and local governments need to be set 
forth as clearly as possible in pertinent issued documents. Once 
a project is approved, the legal documents (such as 
joint-venture enterprise contracts) should be subject to only 
legitimate acceptance inspection. 
<H5>  6. On Making Policy-Related Laws and Regulations More </H5>
Transparent 
  All domestic laws and regulations directly relating to 
investment in China by foreign firms should be easy obtainable, 
or openly published. As this process has been started, it needs 
to be speeded up and continued. Such transparency will 
contribute on a nationwide basis to the continuity of business 
and trade policy, and to the consolidation and standardization 
of laws and regulations, to keep policies from being made in too 
many places. 
  The current FIE Law should be dovetailed and matched with 
other laws. We now need to accelerate our formulation of laws 
and regulations such as a corporation law, an anti-monopoly law, 
an anti-dumping law, a fair competition law, and a joint-stock 
company law. As the Uruguay Round has expanded the 
GATT-standardization field to investment related to trade, we 
now need to conscientiously study ways to ensure that China's 
foreign-investment policy is more in line with pertinent GATT 
regulations and international practice, in order to get it on 
track with the international direct-investment market. 
<H5>  7. On Ensuring National Treatment </H5>
  Enterprises in China that are part of transnational 
corporations expect to be able to take part in fair competition 
on the Chinese market as Chinese enterprises. FIEs should 
be treated equally without discrimination just as China's state 
enterprises in areas, such as raw materials supply, prices, and 
loan acquisition. The government ought to eliminate subsidies 
and protection for state enterprises. 
<H5>  8. On Protecting IPRs </H5>
  While we have made great progess in protecting intellectual 
property rights [IPRs], we still need supplemental agencies and 
formalities that can effectively prevent trademark infringement 
and fake products (grey commodities). In this area, the 
Beijing IPR Court that was established in the summer of 1993 is 
a typical example of such actions that need taken. 
<H5>  9. On Foreign Exchange and Finance </H5>
  In order to help FIEs (particularly transnational 
corporations investing in large projects) balance their foreign 
exchange, to raise their foreign exchange availability, we 
should allow certain high-tech enterprises to collect foreign 
exchange directly when making domestic market sales; formalities 
for the acquisition of foreign exchange need to be made more 
effective. In this area, the greatest hopes are that 
foreign-exchange conversion markets throughout China will be 
coordinated, and that a transregional 
foreign-exchange-transaction computer network will be allowed to 
be linked up. 
  A consolidated diversified exchange-rate system should be 
completed as much as possible, with the conditions created to 
make the yuan a convertible currency. As Vietnam was able to 
consolidate its currency conversion rates in such a short period 
of time, it is obvious that this problem is not mainly one of 
development level, but rather of policy. We should permit 
foreign banks to operate RMB services. 
  Thee Chinese banking system needs to raise its work 
efficiency. As its current telegraphic accounts transfer that 
actually takes 3 weeks is unimaginable, foreign banks could 
provide technical assistance in this area. 
  As about 50 percent of current global overseas investment is 
through stock markets, we ought to make securities investment a 
key means of attracting investment in China by transnational 
corporations. So it is suggested that we expand the offering 
of B shares by China's large and midsize listed state companies, 
to pave the way for access by transnational corporations 
through purchases; we should expand the experimental scope and 
offering volume of listed stock offerings by wholly 
foreign-owned or joint-venture joint-stock companies, with their 
listed offerings of B shares not subject to domestic 
restrictions on annual stock-offering volume. 
<H5>  10. On Upgrading Infrastructures </H5>
  The most important task is to reinforce our existing 
transport system, particularly the transport system that links 
up China's key cities. Raw materials arriving at our ports now 
require more than 1 month to get to consumers. Our 
public-transport scheduling is also very difficult, with it 
being very hard to know accurate delivery dates in railway 
transport, many water-transport stoppages, and our long-distance 
truck transport network being very incomplete, affecting timely 
and steady provision of products to customers and consumers. 
<H5>  11. On Increasing Labor Mobility </H5>
  Foreign subsidiaries in China should not be subject to 
obstructions in hiring qualified employees in any area, as well 
as being without wage-barrier restrictions, and FIE employees 
should have the right to take their dependents with them. In 
addition, as FIE local or foreign employees need better housing 
and related facilities, FIEs that want to improve their employee 
housing should be allowed to do so through having foreign 
construction companies do the building. 
  Chinese employees of joint-venture enterprises who need to 
be 
sent abroad for training or to engage in commercial activities 
should be able to obtain very quickly the necessary travel 
documents (passports and visas); qualified FIE employees sent 
abroad should be trusted and, when necessary, be provided 
guarantees. 
<H5>  12. On Emphasizing Education and Training </H5>
  Education and training to develop host-country local human 
resources, to provide full categories of talent qualitatively 
and quantitatively, is one of the most important regional terms 
to attract transnational corporations (particularly high-tech 
companies). China needs to invest more resources in education 
and training at all levels, so that the efforts made by 
transnational corporations in the areas of technical and 
management training can be fully assimilated throughout China. 
We now need to focus on post-graduate training, in an attempt 
to ensure that China's younger generation has favorable 
qualifications for being more competitive in international 
business circles as the next century approaches. Transnational 
corporations need graduate students from schools, such as the 
China-Europe Management Center and the Nanjing U-John Hopkins 
China-U.S. Cultural Studies Center, to train into tomorrow's 
managers and leaders. 
<H5>  13. On Adopting International Criteria </H5>
  It is hoped that China will adopt international criteria to 
support the development of enterprises set up in China by 
transnational corporations. In particular, the Chinese 
Government should adopt current international safety and 
anti-pollution standards, applying them equally to state and 
foreign-invested enterprises; all industrial enterprises should 
adopt uniform international quality and engineering standards, 
in order to produce high-quality and high-standard raw materials 
and parts for supply to local purchases by FIEs. 
<H5>  14. On Macroeconomic Stability </H5>
  Transnational corporations are even more hopeful that 
China's 
economic development will be steady, and not just fast. 
Macroeconomic regulation and control needs to consist more of 
regular fine tuning, in order to keep the economy out of 
cyclical fluctuations of volatile overheating and overcooling. 
We need to note the currently existing severe inflation rate, 
rapid growth of the money supply, plummeting value of the yuan, 
enormous fiscal budget deficits, large amount of nonproductive 
real estate speculation and fund misplacement, and huge 
state-enterprise losses and subsidies. All of these problems 
are in need of serious government attention. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20375 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  15 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   Coordinating Foreign Trade, Investment Policies </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Coordinating Foreign Trade, Investment Policies </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0327A Beijing GUOJI MAOYI [INTERTRADE] in Chinese No 
144, 15 Dec 93 pp 29-31 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0327A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI MAOYI [INTERTRADE] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Gu Kejian (6253 0344 7003), Faculty of Economics </F>
and Trade, Zhongnan University of Finance and Economics: 
"Macroeconomic Coordination of Foreign Trade and Foreign 
Investment Policies"] 
  [Text] In implementing China's policy of reform and 
opening, foreign investment in our enterprises has become a 
positive force which incrementally expands our export-import 
boundary. In the first three quarters of this year, the total 
export value of foreign-funded enterprises as a percentage of 
China's total export value has increased to 26.4 percent from 
19.8 percent of the same period of the year before. In China's 
foreign trade area, foreign-funded enterprises now play an 
increasingly important role, leading to calls for relaxing the 
current foreign trade policy controls and enlarging the foreign 
trade policy sphere to include foreign investment activities, 
particularly in terms of effectively using the mechanism for 
coordinating the two closely related production models utilizing 
foreign capital, namely, import substitution and foreign 
exchange earning exports. 
  I. Theoretical Inquiry Into Coordination of Foreign 
Investment and Foreign Trade Policies 
  In terms of China's foreign trade objectives and choice of 
methods in the utilization of foreign capital, we should use as 
foundation the best macroeconomic approaches for raising capital 
and handling returns on investment. Generally speaking, in the 
process of attracting foreign investment, the macroeconomic 
approaches to capitalization and returns on investment involves 
the creation and outflow of national income. The main factors 
which influence this process include: 1) the basic structure and 
changes in enterprises as a function of the production; 2) 
determination of the points of competition; 3) the risk of 
imbalance in foreign exchange receipts and expenditures 
accounts. We should consider the composite effect of the 
above-mentioned three main factors in deciding how foreign 
investment policy should be coordinated within the foreign trade 
policy area. 
<H5>  1. Foreign investment policy and the objective of an </H5>
export-oriented foreign trade policy 
  The exports of China's foreign-funded enterprises are geared 
to markets of developed countries, and some products are even 
exported directly back to the investors' home countries; because 
of fierce competition in developed countries and in order to 
remain reasonably competitive in their marketing environment, 
foreign investors in China must fully exploit the two major 
advantages in establishing and operating any enterprises, 
namely, host country's low costs and investors' own relatively 
superior managerial standards. In considering the various ways 
for utilizing foreign capital, direct foreign investment which 
transfers a series of key components of capital, technology, 
management and operating procedures, particularly the "surplus" 
managerial component of multinational companies, can help our 
enterprises expand their exports and rapidly realize the goal of 
earning foreign exchange via exports. This year, China's 
external trade has shown a sharp decline, but exports are 
booming for the export-oriented foreign-funded enterprises or 
processing enterprises in which foreign capital plays a leading 
role, which clearly demonstrates the stable relationship or 
linkage between direct foreign investment and the scale of 
exports. On the other hand, indirect foreign investment which 
uses a resource-matching method and transfers only needed single 
components can hardly help our enterprises increase their 
overall competitiveness for exports in terms of their marketing, 
technology and domestic channels, and can only serve the single 
function of raising capital, replenishing domestic savings or 
filling foreign exchange gaps. 
  For foreign investment policy to serve the objective of an 
export-oriented foreign trade policy, foreign capital should be 
used in ways which are compatible with foreign exchange earning 
exports; various foreign investment policy measures should be 
used to attract and guide foreign investors to correctly utilize 
production factors of low costs and labor supply which are 
clearly in China's advantage, and to promote these variables in 
enterprise production function to achieve maximum effect in 
terms of production quantity and exports. If China's foreign 
investment policy seeks to attract foreign capital only on the 
basis that China offers relatively advantageous conditions, the 
result will not only prevent China from realizing maximum trade 
benefits but also easily lead to national income loss and, 
through theoretical projections of the nonfarm production cycle, 
to a quagmire in which any long term improvements of trade 
conditions will be difficult to achieve and China prevented from 
competing and winning in the evolving system of international 
division of labor by rationalizing and upgrading our export 
enterprise structure. Therefore, mindful of China's foreign 
trade policy goals within the international arena, China's 
foreign investment policy must vigorously and quickly upgrade 
the export product structure of foreign-funded enterprises, 
conclude the third stage of the nonfarm production cycle, 
encourage foreign investment in the second stage of this cycle 
and, through enterprises with competitive export advantage, 
quickly take a commanding lead in the first stage of a new 
nonfarm production cycle by seizing the rare opportunity early 
on where the supply-demand price elasticity has not yet 
escalated, improve the export trading conditions faced by 
China's foreign-funded enterprises, and through an open economy 
model vigorously strive to open up abroad new directions in the 
nonfarm production cycle which match the "win through quality" 
export strategy now being pursued and implemented by China. 
Otherwise, in the competitive export production of 
foreign-funded enterprises, the foreign investors' ability to 
accumulate and retain earnings will be hamstrung by the current 
export structure. Furthermore, since China's naturally endowed 
production advantages are in flux and evolving, and once the 
labor cost advantage becomes less decisive or even disappears 
entirely, the simple processing-for-export model of 
foreign-funded enterprises will face a dim future. At present, 
many foreign investors already consider China's labor intensive 
model to be less attractive and therefore are giving up their 
plans to invest further in China. 
<H5>  2. Foreign investment policy and the objective of an </H5>
import-substitution foreign trade policy 
  Import substitution involves confining foreign capital 
utilization and the market it generates to within the host 
country, even though the host country's economic conditions are 
backward and the competitive standards set by the foreign-funded 
enterprises cannot match those in the investors' home countries. 
Because monopolistic enterprises control the supply-demand curve 
in making decisions regarding production quantity, they can lead 
to improper allocation of resources; China's utilization of 
foreign capital in practice also clearly demonstrates that 
without adequate competition, the managerial factor brought in 
by foreign investors is minimally utilized in the host country. 
A typical factual example which provides a basis for observation 
and judgment is the fact that China, through joint domestic and 
foreign funding, has established several automobile production 
lines, but their scale of production is considerably below not 
only that in the investors' home country but also the 
competitive standard recognized internationally. Aside from the 
joint funding of research and development costs and their 
separate usage, it hardly reflects the quality of an effective 
economic model. It can conclusively be stated that in the early 
stages of China's import substitution policy, the growth of 
foreign-funded enterprises in this area was mainly due to 
increased inputs of single component of labor or capital, and 
productivity based on a composite of important managerial and 
economic factors was still very low. In many localities, the 
so-called foreign investment was in reality investment of 
personal savings, not corporate investment, to say nothing of 
investment of the surplus managerial factor. Because China as 
host country has a vast potential market, unless the foreign 
investment was clearly irrational, any foreign investment in 
short-term joint venture projects invariably involved no risk at 
all. 
  To prevent any long-term imbalance in international balance 
of payments, foreign investors should not be allowed to earn an 
excessively high rate of investment return; at the same time, 
because of relatively low competitive level of enterprises in 
the import substitution area, and the fact that re-establishing 
these enterprises is uneconomical, the managerial factor 
introduced by multinational companies is only partly effective 
and the economy of scale only partially realized. Therefore, in 
attracting foreign capital to the import substitution area, 
China's reliance on investment in single, separate production in 
effect is using indirect foreign investment to fill the 
technological gaps created by the process of upgrading China's 
enterprise structure. In the 1980s, China initially approved 
bringing in some 2,000 technology projects which vigorously 
supported the development of China's electronic industry, 
basically satisfied the consumption demands of our domestic 
market and enabled our enterprises to begin developing the 
ability to penetrate the world market. 
  In calling for more indirect investment in the import 
substitution area or for using foreign capital in stages, it 
does not mean that foreign- funded enterprises are excluded. In 
this regard, we should take note of two kinds of situations: 
First, promoting basic reform in state-owned enterprises by 
bringing in new management factors through direct foreign 
investment is essentially going outside of the reform sphere and 
does not relate to any foreign trade and investment policies; 
second, to develop technologically advanced enterprises which 
will maintain a leading edge for a relatively long period of 
time, we should allow direct foreign investment in those 
domestic enterprises which have developed the basic competitive 
capacity, especially those producing high-grade capital goods in 
the import substitution area. 
  II. Contradiction in Carrying Out Coordination of 
Foreign Trade and Foreign Investment Policies and Possible 
Remedies 
  The boom of foreign investments in China has revealed 
numerous contradictions between China's foreign trade and 
foreign investment policies, and maintaining appropriate 
coordination of the two policy goals is an urgent task if 
continued healthy development of foreign- funded enterprises is 
to be assured. 
<H5>  1. Based on foreign trade objectives, implement structural </H5>
adjustment and quantitative control in foreign capital 
utilization 
  In terms of China's current utilization of foreign capital, 
aside from controlling indirect foreign investment by monitoring 
debt repayments and rates of interest payment, which reflect the 
extent to which exports are being restrained by foreign debt 
regulations making the latter serve the implementation of 
foreign trade policy objectives, the types of structural 
adjustment in foreign investment utilization and the scope of 
direct foreign investment are still not well coordinated within 
the foreign trade policy area. Last year, direct foreign 
investment in China for the first time exceeded China's 
borrowing from abroad. But what is a cause of concern is that, 
lacking any clear-cut foreign trade policy guidance, the 
percentage of foreign-funded enterprises oriented toward exports 
and their rate of exports are both very low. Among 
jointly-funded enterprises, these two indices have long been 
kept at around 20 percent; the fact that only 5-8 percent of the 
high-tech enterprises produce foreign exchange earning exports 
or products which can reasonably be used for import substitution 
and the above-mentioned percentage indicate that a total of 
70-80 percent of such enterprises utilize only run-of-the-mill 
technology and produce for domestic sales and consumption; even 
in Shanghai which sets the national standard in this area, the 
sum of the two indices this year is only 53 percent. As a 
result, the foreign exchange transactions of foreign-funded 
enterprises have exerted a negative effect on China's 
international balance of payment, and reduced the efficacy of 
using foreign trade policy to encourage exports. Therefore, we 
should clearly spell out our foreign trade policy objectives on 
import substitution and foreign exchange earning exports, and 
positively encourage direct foreign investment in the foreign 
exchange earning exports area; in the import substitution area, 
we should attract direct foreign investment to those high-tech 
enterprises whose products can clearly substitute for imports of 
technology and can also effectively be used to disseminate the 
technology to all domestic enterprises through their internal 
structural changes. In the broad import substitution area, 
however, we should as appropriate attract indirect foreign 
investment to activities which bear on import substitution, and 
promote multifaceted indirect investment by taking advantage of 
opportunities made possible by the current trend of increased 
credit use in international capital transactions. We should, 
therefore, develop a major structure in which more and more 
indirect foreign investment will be drawn to the import 
substitution area, and more and more direct foreign investment 
to the foreign exchange earning exports area. 
<H5>  2. Using foreign trade policy measures, sweep away </H5>
restrictions on foreign capital transactions in the import 
substitution and foreign exchange earning exports areas 
  Using different foreign trade policy objectives to determine 
methods of foreign capital utilization, because of numerous 
factors, would result in superficial implementation. In reality, 
China has already extended numerous preferential treatments to 
foreign-funded enterprises, with China herself enduring the pain 
of reducing prices to the lowest possible point (such as land 
prices) to encourage foreign investors to establish high-tech 
and exports producing enterprises. Despite the restriction on 
the enterprise financial budget, the government has allowed 
foreign-funded enterprises to maintain foreign exchange receipts 
and expenditures accounts and use various channels including the 
foreign exchange swap centers to remit foreign exchange earnings 
and consolidate compensations for purchasing domestic products 
for exports. The restrictions on enterprise foreign exchange 
budgets are clearly being relaxed, which in the longer term will 
lead to exports falling below the contractually specified export 
ratios. In the past, we have relied on the enterprises 
themselves to find their own ways to maintain foreign exchange 
equilibrium, and we have successfully encouraged foreign-funded 
enterprises, particularly the sole-source investment 
enterprises, to maintain a rather high export ratio in direct 
contrast with other developing countries' experiences with sole- 
source foreign investments. Because of this, we should use our 
foreign trade policy objectives to lead and guide investment 
decisions on production quantity made by foreign-funded 
enterprises. 
  First, we should change the policy of granting preferential 
treatments based on locality, enterprise and even the type of 
enterprise to a policy based on end-results and, guided by our 
foreign trade policy objectives, extend preferential treatments 
to high-tech enterprises and the foreign exchange earning 
exports area. At present, an important adjustment in our foreign 
investment policy is to change the focus from locality to 
enterprise in foreign capital utilization, but in practice 
implementation is still held up by the static protocol of 
policy. In this respect, we have overlooked one basic fact, 
namely the opportunities for promoting economic growth and 
developing export potentials exist not only in certain 
localities or enterprises, but in various types of enterprises 
in the broad context of the economy. An end-result oriented 
policy should give equal rewards and encouragements to all 
localities, departments and enterprises operating within the 
scope of this policy so that they will strive for incremental 
gains consistent with the policy's macroeconomic intent. In 
giving preferential treatments to foreign investment based on an 
end-result oriented foreign trade policy, we should continue to 
incrementally reward any transactions which promote foreign 
exchange earning exports or which increase the technological 
content of import substitution enterprises. In using this 
concept to guide the reform of China's foreign capital taxation 
system, we should request that all localities or departments 
change from giving preferential treatment on income taxes and 
adopt a new system of reducing or rebating indirect taxes and 
customs duties in the export-import cycle in conformance with 
customary international practices to arrive at an indirect tax 
rate which effectively encourages exports. In the past, we have 
made a priori determinations of the export ratio for exporting 
enterprises and the technological standard for import 
substitution enterprises, and these in different degrees 
reflected the directions of our foreign trade policy, but this 
system was ultimately based on an objective of encouraging 
particular enterprises rather than an objective of giving 
even-handed encouragement to increasing the quantitative flow of 
foreign trade. This demonstrates that our foreign trade policy 
was incomplete and lacking in thoroughness. For example, in 1988 
among China's foreign-funded enterprises, the proportion of 
export-oriented enterprises and their export ratio were almost 
identical, at 20.92 percent and 20.75 percent respectively. This 
means that non-exporting enterprises were not given any 
preferential treatments such as the reducing or waiving of 
income taxes enjoyed by export-producing enterprises, and they 
could not achieve the goal of maximizing the export potentials 
of foreign-funded enterprises. 
  Second, change the past policy of keeping trading activities 
of foreign-funded enterprises separate and apart from those of 
domestic enterprises, and implement the foreign trade policy 
goal of encouraging and assisting foreign investors to develop 
strategic export enterprises which enjoy competitive advantage 
internationally. An important external factor in the mushrooming 
growth of foreign-funded enterprises in China is traceable to 
the pressures of currency devaluation and rising costs in 
developed countries and newly industrialized Asian countries 
that force enterprises there which have lost their production 
advantages to relocate abroad. Whether China can seize this 
historic opportunity and carry out its externally oriented 
economic development policy, not only in terms of the extent to 
which foreign investors are attracted to use China's labor 
resource advantage to lower their production costs, but more 
importantly to see, with foreign investment in labor-intensive 
enterprises and their exports replacing exports of 
resource-intensive enterprises, whether foreign investment can 
quickly enter into the stage of developing competitive strategic 
exports, and whether products of foreign-funded enterprises 
produced with benefits of all the advantageous factors will make 
a good start in a new cycle unhampered by low-grade products 
which will avoid pitfalls in the nonfarm production cycle. Last 
year, the export ratio of China's foreign-funded enterprises 
rose to 20.5 percent, much higher than their industrial 
production value of 8.5 percent, and judging by their export 
ratio and their share of the total production value in terms of 
international competitiveness, China's foreign-funded 
enterprises scored 41.46 percent on a comparative index of 
international competitiveness, which is better than even the 
highest standard reached in the 1980s by the Republic of Korea. 
What is astonishing to us is that examining the competitiveness 
index in terms of imports, the 1992 index is a negative value of 
minus 20.64 percent, and even after eliminating foreign 
investment in import facilities, the index still shows a 
negative number. Going one step further in the analysis, because 
we treat foreign investment in our enterprises as an independent 
externally oriented activity, and strictly insist that these 
enterprises maintain balanced foreign exchange accounts, this 
has forced foreign investors to resort to utilizing the 
processing-for-export production method on a large scale, 
resulting in a 1992 ratio of as high as 88.8 percent. Since 
China relies on the low labor cost advantage in its exports, 
this production method which adds minimal value and requires 
only a limited processing cycle makes it difficult for China to 
attract foreign investment and to gain maximum export benefits. 
Therefore, we should follow a strategic foreign trade policy and 
attract or match up foreign investors through a series of 
developmental steps to establish export processing areas, export 
production bases, special plants and factories, and bring 
foreign-funded enterprises on to the track of developing China's 
strategic foreign trade. 
<H5>  3. Correct the operations of foreign-funded enterprises in </H5>
accordance with foreign trade policy objectives 
  First, controlling transfer pricing control. China's 
foreign-funded enterprise rely on transfer pricing which leads 
to shocking and painful foreign exchange losses and national 
income outflows. Transfer pricing in essence is the result of 
market internal operations, and eliminating transfer pricing 
will have a negative effect on the host country; we need to 
externalize our domestic market and let enterprises follow the 
principle of basing transfer pricing on market price and not on 
cost of capital in production. Therefore, through a system of 
open competitive bidding (and foreign partners in any enterprise 
may be given limited preferential treatment and priority in 
bidding) and pricing based on customs estimates which 
approximate open market pricing to promote enterprises in the 
import cycle, we can help strengthen the supply- demand pricing 
elasticity of open market and control the tendency of quoting 
high prices for imports and holding down prices for exports. In 
this way, the customs authorities using their own information 
network can supervise and control any unreasonable export 
transfer prices quoted by foreign-funded enterprises by 
comparing these prices with those of China's specialized 
companies and industrial-commercial firms; in the import cycle, 
a system of open competitive bidding can in varying degrees 
spell out the open market conditions, control foreign businesses 
from cutting into the capital base and profits of jointly- 
funded enterprises through reckless tactics of investment in 
infrastructure facilities, and help establish a strategic, 
alliance type of cooperative enterprises to gain sale outlets 
and channels and speed up product developments. As for the 
structural advantages of multinational companies or allied 
enterprises in lowering their transactional costs in the 
domestic markets, these would not be diminished as a result. 
This is because that permission given to any reasonable internal 
transfer pricing is limited to enterprises determined by 
research as having difficulties to adopt to market conditions or 
to enterprises which nevertheless incur relatively high trading 
costs after searching for reasonable pricing in an open market; 
these technical factors affecting transfer pricing also apply to 
any new or original products or projects, i.e. even though open 
market exposure will not lead to unnecessary increase in 
transaction costs, but precisely because of filtering and 
screening by the open market, they are found to be worthy of 
support because they are well suited to trading in the domestic 
market. In this way, the supervision and control of transfer 
pricing will play an important role in terms of our foreign 
trade policy objectives. 
  Second, estimating the scale of exports. Foreign capital 
utilized in foreign-funded enterprises and exports processing 
enterprises is an effective way to make reasonable use of the 
domestic market, lower transaction costs and search for the most 
advantageous structure among the wide range of international 
productive enterprises. Nevertheless, it is difficult to prevent 
or control foreign-funded enterprises' exports and their 
subsequent re-exports from being included in other countries' 
foreign trade accounts and estimates within the scope of 
international trading activities. We should consult the 
practices in other countries -- particularly regarding 
regulations governing the country of origin for imports, the 
percentage of added value, the percentage of native resources 
used, and what proofs of place of production are required for 
different products of the exporting countries -- and accordingly 
add the exports to the quota of concerned countries trading with 
China, and thereby bring foreign-funded enterprises and export 
processing enterprises within the scope and control of China's 
foreign trade policy. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20376 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  22 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> LABOR </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reversion of Migrating Rural Labor </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reversion of Migrating Rural Labor </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0362A Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 22 Feb 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0362A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Two-part article by Tai Dewen (3141 1795 2429), secretary </F>
of the Fuyang Prefecture CPC Committee, and Gao Lu (7559 6424), 
staff reporter: "Speaking of the Reverse Flow in Season of 
Rising `Tide'--Dialogue on Reverse Flow Phenomenon in `Tide of 
Rural Labor' (Part One)"] 
  [Text] Editor's note: The information conveyed in 
this dialogue is very valuable. On the one hand, in the "tide of 
rural labor" one wave overtopped another wave, but through 
correct "dredging" the flow became orderly; on the other hand, a 
"reversion" phenomenon also appeared. Of course, it is normal 
for a tide to rise and fall, to go out and come back in, but as 
the "phenomenon of the regression of an adverse tide" it has a 
fairly deep connotation. The peasants who went outside their 
native places widened their horizons, changed their ideas, 
increased their knowledge, and learned skills. When they 
returned to their native places they became the backbone in 
developing the economy. This point can help people to recognize 
the positive aspect of the "tide of rural labor." Furthermore, 
this information proves that the base for the broad masses of 
peasants to become well-off is not the city but rather the rural 
areas. 
  Tai: Tai Dewen (secretary of the Fuyang Prefecture CPC 
Committee) Gao: Gao Lu (staff reporter) 
  Gao: In recent years the "tide of rural labor" has became a 
big part of the landscape of China's economic and social life. 
The various issues initiated by this tide have drawn widespread 
attention in all circles of society. Your report on the 
investigation and study of the question of the transfer of the 
surplus labor force in the rural areas of Fuyang prefecture made 
a deep impression on us. 
  Tai: Making an investigation in this aspect was necessitated 
by reality and work. Fuyang Prefecture is a large-population 
region with 1 percent of China's population and a large region 
for traditional agriculture. Following the deepening of rural 
reform, the development of the market economy, and the raising 
of the degree of agricultural mechanization, the rural surplus 
labor force has become larger and larger. There are now about 3 
million members of the rural surplus labor force in Fuyang 
Prefecture. This a superiority of our prefecture's economic 
development. In 1992 our prefecture exported 1 million members 
of the labor force. We cannot but consider the question of 
"where the million-strong army is heading." 
  Gao: Of the two investigation reports you provided, I feel 
that the investigation of the phenomenon of "reverse flow" in 
the "tide of rural labor" was most enlightening. 
  Tai: In the process of investigating the question of the 
transfer of rural surplus labor, we discovered that over the 
past two years a phenomenon of the "regression of an adverse 
tide" has appeared in exported labor. Workers, making use of the 
skills they learned on the outside, have returned to their 
native places and set up and run a large number of township-town 
enterprises. 
  Gao: In what numbers and on what scale? 
  Tai: According to the initial investigation, there are in 
the 
prefecture more than 700 enterprises of this type, and they have 
a certain influence and are on a considerable scale; some of 
them have become the backbone of township-town enterprises on 
the two levels of county and township. The township-town 
enterprises set up and run by workers who were formerly exported 
and who have returned to their native places are becoming a new 
"growing point" in our prefecture's development of township-town 
enterprises. 
  Gao: According to our investigations, in the provinces of 
Anhui, Sichuan, Hubei, and Hebei, in some prefectures in which 
there fairly many rural workers who were in the outward flow, 
there has appeared in the past two years this phenomenon of the 
"regression of an adverse tide." Of the more than 2,000 peasants 
of Jinniu Town in Dazhi County, Hubei Province who engaged in 
trade or worked outside the town, more than 700 of them have 
returned to the town. It's too bad that the meaning of this 
phenomenon of "regression" has not yet drawn sufficient 
attention from the people. 
  Tai: Looking at it from the angle of the future, we see that 
the development and use of this returning labor force is more 
important than the current export of labor. 
<H5>  Returnees: Putting Their Ability to Good Use in the Family </H5>
  Gao: In your investigation of typical examples, were any 
patterns discovered? 
  Tai: In our investigation of typical examples, we selected 
throughout the prefecture 50 persons who were part of the 
"regression of an adverse tide" and who set up and are running 
township-town enterprises. The results of the investigation 
were: 1) by age, 23 percent were in the 20-30 age bracket, 71 
percent were in the 30-40 age bracket, and 6 percent were in the 
over 40 age bracket; 2) by education, 35 percent had a senior 
middle school education, 46 percent had a junior middle school 
education, 10 percent had an elementary school education, and 9 
percent were illiterate or semiliterate; 3) by time worked 
outside their native places, in general this was five to 10 
years; and 4) by skill level, these people have basically 
mastered and even become proficient in one or more skills, about 
60 percent of them when outside being the skilled backbone 
elements of the units they worked in, and about 20 percent of 
them when outside being both skilled backbone elements and 
middle-level managerial personnel. 
  Gao: That is to say, among these pioneers who "regressed" to 
their native places, the great majority are young and 
middle-aged (more than 90 percent being in the 20-40 age 
bracket), their educational level is fairly high (more than 80 
percent having a junior middle school or senior middle school 
education), their time outside was fairly long, and they have 
mastered skills. 
  Tai: Shui Xinyou [3055 2450 0645], a peasant from Aiting 
Town 
in Linquan County, in 1987 went to work in a leather shoe 
factory in Wujiang County, Jiangsu Province. By his practice 
there he gained consumate skill, and the uppers and soles of the 
shoes that he stripped could bear a strength of as much as 18 
kilograms, far exceeding the ministry-issued standard; they were 
given a good appraisal at a national comparison and appraisal 
meeting. After staying outside his native place for six or seven 
years, he returned in 1993 and set up the Aiting Leather Shoe 
Factory, after which the supply of its products could not meet 
the demand. 
  Gao: There are surely not a few such examples. In starting 
an 
undertaking, for these "regressors" it is indispensable to have 
an eye and head for business. 
  Tai: For the most part, they possess a keen insight into 
markets, an insight that was nurtured when they were working on 
the outside. For the most part, the rural labor of our 
prefecture that flowed outside went to the coastal regions, 
where the market economy is fairly developed. From the time that 
they began to leave their families, these people placed 
themselves in the crests and troughts of the waves of the market 
economy. 
  Gao: In an environment full of competition and risk, it is 
fairly easy to learn by experience what the role of market 
mechanisms is, thereby forming a consciousness of competition 
and an insight into markets. 
  Tai: A peasant from Ningxiao Village, Wangdian Town, Fuyang 
City in 1989 went to Dongyuan [a county in Guangdong Province] 
to work in a furniture factory. When he returned to his native 
place he discovered through a market survey that the factory's 
products, in his province and neighboring provinces, had a good 
market, so he set up his own furniture factory. The supply of 
its products could not meet the demand for them. After being in 
business for over nine months, the factory achieved an output 
value of more than 520,000 yuan and obtained a net profit of 
120,000 yuan. Niu Wei [3662 0251], a peasant from Guantang town, 
Haozhou city, went to the Northeast to work at an agrotechnical 
popularization center, where he learned the skill of duplicating 
and mixing agricultural chemicals. When he learned that his 
native place lacked this kind of product, he became aware that 
there was a big market for it that was worth developing. He 
returned to his native place and set up a chemical plant that 
produced many new agricultural chemical products. The plant 
achieved an annual output value of 740,000 yuan and a profits 
tax of 60,000 yuan. 
  Gao: The "regressors" who start undertakings in their native 
places are bound to form economic radiating circles with them as 
the core, thereby spurring the development of the township-town 
enterprises there and the entire economy there, raising the 
income of peasants there, and spurring the adjustment of the 
rural industrial structure there. 
  Tai: These radiating radii are at the least one or several 
villages and at the most a dozen kilometers. Zhang Dezhi [1728 
1795 5347], a peasant from Taihe County, in 1987 returned to his 
native place and set up a silk mill, which now is a product base 
of considerable size. More than 1,000 peasants in the county 
engage in sales promotion work for the mill's products, and the 
sales promotion contingent has spread to several provinces and 
autonomous regions. These peasant sales-promoters have an annual 
net income of at the least between 3,000 and 4,000 yuan and at 
the most over 10,000 yuan. Examples of this kind are 
innumerable. There is now gradually being formed a new pattern 
in the village and district economy that has the "regressor" 
pioneers at its core and that breaks through regional boundaries. 
<H5>  Reasons for Return: Unlimited Analysis </H5>
  Gao: Of the peasants who went outside their native places to 
engage in trade or work and who then "regressed" to their native 
places and started undertakings, some either returned to the 
"yellow earth," which is a follow-up phenomenon that is bound to 
accompany the "tide of rural labor." What is needed is to 
investigate and study many questions. First of all, the 
exciting cause of their reverse flow or "regression" must be 
made clear, and then action can be adroitly guided according to 
circumstances. 
  Tai: In our investigation we discovered that the exciting 
cause of the "regression" was many-sided. Thinking of one's 
parents with affection, being reluctant to be away from home, 
and loving one's native place are one of the subjective reasons. 
Deng Min [6772 2404], a peasant from Gongdian Town, Lixing 
County, and more than 10 other young women from neighboring 
villages together went to Wenling in Zhejiang Province to work, 
but because their feelings of affection for their parents became 
stronger each passing day, one by one they returned home. 
Unwilling to return home and still be poor, Deng Min returned to 
her native place in 1993 and facilitated the setting up of a 
handicraft knitwear mill as a joint venture between the local 
government and Zhejiang Province, with herself as mill director. 
The mill has now achieved an output value of many ten thousands 
of yuan and a profit tax of over 80,000 yuan. Zhang Qi [1728 
3825] and Zhang Fangli [1728 7685 0448], peasant sisters from 
Yangchao Town, Yungshang Province, went to Changshu County in 
Jiangsu Province to work at knitting gloves. Their incomes were 
sizable, but they also thought of their parents with affection, 
so they returned home and, raising money by all possible means, 
led their seven sisters to set up a household glove factory. In 
the bodies of Chinese peasants are imbedded strong genes for 
feelings for their relationships and for feelings for their 
native land. "Every happy festival time I double my thoughts of 
affection for my parents," "I feel like going back to my native 
place, just as the stranger bird thinks of his native forest," 
"Lifting my head I gaze at the bright moon; lowering my head I 
long for my native place"--These lines of poetry reveal this set 
of circumstances. 
  Gao: When encountering setbacks or rough spots in human 
relationships, work, hardships, or other aspects, the language 
barrier and the difference in living habits will, because of the 
inhibition of the spirit, intensify the thoughts of affection 
for one's parents and the love of one's home. This is man's 
natural reaction or his reaction under certain circumstances. 
  Tai: Next, the raising of the level of demand is also one of 
the exciting causes of this "regression." Following their 
increase in income, for those who work outside their native 
place the pressure of the requirement for survival lessens day 
by day, and the pressure of safety requirement, emotional 
requirement, social requirement, and requirement for realization 
of self-worth becomes stronger day by day. They become 
dissatisfied with the lifestyle of drifting all over the 
country; and they hope to get greater respect, hope to get for 
their worth fuller realization and social recognition. Returning 
home and starting an undertaking become the optimum choice for 
satisfying these requirements. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20377 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  23 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Net Farmer Income Clarified </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Net Farmer Income Clarified </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0398C Changchun JILIN RIBAO in Chinese 23 Feb 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0398C </F>
<F P=104>  Changchun JILIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yang Molin (2799 1075 2651): "A Correct </F>
Understanding and Application of the Statistical Data `Net 
Farmer Income'"] 
  [Text] "Net farmer income" is an important indicator for 
the degree of prosperity of the peasants and for the degree of 
development in the rural economy. It is an important basis for 
an accurate analysis of rural affairs and for the determination 
of strategy and economic policy in rural development. How are we 
then to accurately understand and effectively apply the 
statistical data "net farmer income"? The following points will 
have to be paid attention to and to be fully mastered: 
  First, sampling network points have representative character 
but are not the same as having sample households all over the 
area. Investigation by sampling is a scientific investigative 
method done by first subjecting only one portion of all the 
units within a whole to investigation, and to infer therefrom 
the properties of the whole. The selection of the 20 sample 
counties and 1,600 sample households of Jilin Province was done 
as required in the uniform scheme of the State Statistical 
Bureau. It used the average per capita income of the preceding 
three years, lined it up upward and downward, compiled it into a 
framework, and adopted the method of random starting points and 
symmetric equidistances. Scientific tests have shown that this 
set of network points enables a better than 95.45 percent 
control, and that error in per capita income is limited to below 
3 percent. Its representative character is not adversely 
affected by the way the samples are distributed. Therefore, when 
using "net farmer income" in analyzing problems, one may have 
confidence in the representative character of the "net farmer 
income" gained from the sampling carried out by the [official] 
statistical agencies. 
  Second, peasant income is not the same as cash income. 
According to the regulations of the State Statistical Bureau, 
"net farmer income" comprises two components: all cash income of 
the peasant household (deducting what has to be deducted) and 
all agricultural and sideline products produced and consumed by 
the peasant himself, converted into money. For instance, the per 
capita income of a peasant in Jilin Province in 1992 was 807.41 
yuan, of which 411.84 yuan was cash income--making up 51 percent 
of his net income--while the remaining 395.57 yuan were material 
income converted into money. Therefore, when using "net farmer 
income" in the analysis of certain problems, it is necessary to 
distinguish between cash income and material income converted to 
money, and to then deal with the proportions of each part, so as 
to gain accurate control of the level of commodity production 
and the purchasing power of the peasants. 
  Third, the net farmer income level is not the same as actual 
degree of prosperity. Net income of peasants is an important 
indicator for the evaluation of the peasants' prosperity, but it 
is not the sole indicator. The peasant's income is the 
comprehensive result of the peasant household's income from 
productive operations and from nonproduction-related income, 
while poverty or prosperity of the peasant household depends on 
many historically related factors. Therefore, when using "net 
farmer income" in the analysis of poverty and prosperity of 
peasant households, it is necessary to simultaneously include in 
the analysis many other conditions, such as financial claims, 
financial obligations, ready cash, deposits in banks and credit 
cooperatives, and production-related or nonproduction-related 
fixed assets. 
  Fourth, the average level of net farmer income is not the 
same as equality of levels. For instance, in 1992, a peasant's 
average net income in Jilin Province was 807.41 yuan, which 
shows, in the overall view, that the living standard of the 
broad masses of peasants in Jilin Province has gone up from 
subsistence level to a comfortably well-off level, but that does 
not mean that every peasant household has reached that level. 
There have been almost 30 percent with incomes of over 1,000 
yuan, and 11 percent under the poverty level (at per capita 400 
yuan). Therefore, when using "net farmer income" in analyzing 
the overall level of the production and living conditions of 
peasant households, attention must be paid to the imbalance 
among the various units under the cover of the average figure. 
Attention must also be paid to the fact that basic data control 
be established as regards the differentials among the units, so 
that guidance is given in a classified way, and that common 
prosperity for all be promoted in order to achieve it as early 
as possible. 
  Fifth, the cash proportion in the peasant's net income is 
not 
the same as actual buying power. Purchasing power of the peasant 
(comprising purchases of means of production and means of 
livelihood) is indeed manifested in the cash portion of the 
peasant's net income, but not all cash income constitutes actual 
purchasing power. Some money is needed by the peasant to repay 
debts, some money is needed for other than commodity-related 
expenditure (for instance, for school and sundry expenses, 
travel expenses, etc.), some money is saved to be later used for 
other purposes, etc. Therefore, when using "net farmer income" 
for analyses in the problems of purchasing power, it is 
necessary to pierce the outer appearances and effect specific 
analyses. The question what proportion within the cash income 
constitutes actual purchasing power must be investigated and 
researched in a thoroughgoing and meticulous way, according to 
market situation and the consumption psychology of the peasant 
households. 
  Sixth, "net farmer income" is not the same as actual output 
value. If we compute "net farmer income" from products of animal 
husbandry, it would comprise income from actual sales and 
products produced but consumed by the peasant himself, converted 
to money. Livestock on hand and increases due to breeding, as 
long as not sold and also not consumed by own household, are all 
not counted as income of that year. However, in some localities 
when testing and verifying "net farmer income" large livestock 
on hand, life pigs and poultry are all converted to money and 
included in that year's income. That is a case of mixing up the 
computation of "income" with the computation of "output value." 
Therefore, when computing and verifying "net farmer income," it 
is absolutely necessary to first clarify the concepts of 
"income" and "output value," and to master the scope and methods 
of measuring each of these different factors, so as to 
accurately use these two indices. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20378 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  13 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Gansu Agricultual S&amp;T Achievements </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Gansu Agricultual S&amp;T Achievements </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0398B Lanzhou GANSU RIBAO in Chinese 13 Feb 94 p 
1 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0398B </F>
<F P=104>  Lanzhou GANSU RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Leading article: "By Closely Integrating Scientific and </F>
Technological Development, the [Gansu] Provincial Academy of 
Agricultural Sciences Accomplished New Achievements"] 
  [Excerpts] In 1993, the Provincial Academy of Agricultural 
Sciences set up 38 rural centers in ecologically different 
regions all over the province. Throughout the year, a scientific 
and technological personnel of 132 persons was hard at work here 
at the forefront of rural work, conducting various experiments, 
as also demonstrating and disseminating superior varieties, and 
helping in the training of technical personnel from among the 
peasants. The area over which such promotion has taken place 
this year has been 3.772 million mu, resulting in 194 million kg 
of additional grain, with an additional output value of 107.7 
million yuan. In 1993, the dissemination, within the province 
and outside of the province, of several excellent varieties 
developed by the provincial agricultural academy has been 
greatly accelerated. Growing the "Long Ya No 7" type "huma" 
[5170 7802] flax was promoted over an area of 2.5 million mu; 
growing the new "long mi No 4" type of "mizi" [4745 1311] millet 
was promoted over an area of 1.22 million mu; spring wheat of 
the "long chun 8139" type was promoted over an area of 1.17 
million mu; and winter wheat of the "long jian 196" type was 
promoted over an area of 1.34 million mu. Altogether these 
promotions exceeded one million mu of varieties and resulted 
last year in an additional output value of 168 million yuan and 
an additional net income of 141 million yuan. 
  Similar achievements of increased production and increased 
income had been accomplished in contractual S&amp;T projects 
undertaken by the provincial agricultural academy in 1993. The 
project "Demonstration of Techniques for High Yield Grain 
Production on 760,000 Mu of Arid Land in Eastern and Southern 
Gansu" has resulted, during its four years, in the additional 
grain production of 219 million kg of grain and a net income of 
156 million yuan. The "Engineering Project for a Good Harvest of 
Grain, Edible Oil, Medicinal Herbs in High-Elevation, Shady, and 
Marshy Areas" had contracted for 2.07 million mu for the growing 
of grain, edible oil, and medicinal herbs and indeed achieved a 
bumper harvest over the whole area. In the area where the 
"Experimental Research of Vegetable Growing Techniques in High 
Efficiency, Energy Saving, Sunlit Green Houses" had been 
promoted, the average per mu yield was almost 5,000 kg, and the 
income over 10,000 yuan. The project "Promoting a Comprehensive 
Technique for the Improvement of the `Mao Xing' Apricots in 
Eastern Gansu" had prepared a demonstration field of 610 mu to 
produce a superior variety, and this has led to the setting up 
of an orchard of 18,000 mu, which was one way of showing the 
people in the old liberated area to escape poverty and attain 
prosperity. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20379 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  25 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Provinces Report Early Rice Area </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Provinces Report Early Rice Area </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Hubei Rice Area </H4>

<F P=102> 94CE0344X Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO in Chinese 25 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0344X </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] In 1994 the early rice area in Hubei Province 
will be 10.5 million mu, an increase of more than 1 million mu 
over 1993. In 1994 the hybrid rice area will be 21 million mu, 
an increase of about 2 million mu over 1993. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20380 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  25 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Provinces Report Early Rice Area </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Provinces Report Early Rice Area </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Hunan Rice Area </H4>

<F P=102> 94CE0344Y Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO in Chinese 25 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0344Y </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] In 1994 the early rice area in Hunan Province 
will be 24 million to 25 million mu. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20381 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  25 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Provinces Report Early Rice Area </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Provinces Report Early Rice Area </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Zhejiang Rice Area </H4>

<F P=102> 94CE0344Z Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO in Chinese 25 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0344Z </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] In 1994 the planned early rice area in Zhejiang 
Province is 13 million mu, an increase of more than 1 million mu 
over 1993. Gross output of grain will reach 30 billion jin. 
Early rice accounts for 40 percent of grain output in Zhejiang, 
and 70 percent of procurement. The provincial government has 
stipulated that the procurement price for contract orders of 
early indica rice will be 42 yuan per 50 kilograms, plus an 
additional price of 3.74 yuan. If the state procurement price is 
lower than 42 yuan, Zhejiang will maintain 42 yuan, if the state 
price is higher than 42 yuan, Zhejiang will implement the state 
price, the additional price will not change. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20382 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  25 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Provinces Report Early Rice Area </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Provinces Report Early Rice Area </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Jiangxi Rice Area </H4>

<F P=102> 94CE0397A Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO in Chinese 25 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0397A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] The planned early rice area in Jiangxi Province 
is 18.5 million mu, of which the hybrid area will be 7.2 million 
mu, an increase of 1.6 million mu over 1993. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20383 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  20 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hunan, Hubei Grain Marketing Reform Surveyed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hunan, Hubei Grain Marketing Reform Surveyed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0316A Beijing ZHONGGUO NONGCUN JINGJI [CHINA'S RURAL 
ECONOMY] in Chinese No 2, 20 Feb 94 pp 45-48 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0316A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO NONGCUN JINGJI [CHINA'S RURAL 
ECONOMY] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Li Xirong (2621 1585 2837) and Dong Yiman (5516 </F>
0001 2581) of the Agricultural Economy Department of the State 
Planning Commission and Sun Meijun (1327 2734 0689) of the 
Agricultural Survey Team of the State Statistics Bureau: "Survey 
of Hunan, Hubei Grain Circulation System Reform"] 
  [Text] I. Background and Main Methods of Implementing 
Grain Reform 
  Hunan and Hubei, major Chinese grain producing provinces, 
have for a long time suffered the constraints of the former 
grain purchasing and selling system, causing the unreasonable 
situation of grain production and business shouldering heavier 
and heavier burdens. Governments at every level shouldering 
heavy financial subsidies burdens in being responsible for grain 
are responsible for shouldering grain burdens. Grain enterprises 
bearing the burden of debts in dealing in grains have even more 
grain burdens. Farmers bearing the burden of low efficiency also 
bear a burden from planting grain. If this vicious circle 
continues, the burdens will become heavier and heavier. 
  Grain reform is imperative and it is precisely the opportune 
time. First because the stable social, political, and economic 
situation throughout the nation provides a good general 
environment for grain reform. Second, because grain resources 
are ample. Both provinces' grain reserves are 10 billion 
jin or more. Third, because market prices for grain 
are steadily declining, essentially approaching the posted 
price, and the market price is even lower than the posted price. 
Fourth, because in recent years with economic development, the 
standard of living of urban residents has greatly improved and 
their tolerance has increased. According to a survey of the two 
provinces, in the last two years , expenses for grain 
consumption only make up about 5 percent of consumer cost of 
living expenses for urban residents. People from all quarters 
agree that now is an opportune time to conduct grain reform and 
the pace of grain reform should be increased. 
  In the grain reform plan implemented throughout Hunan 
Province and in some counties (cities) of Hubei Province, reform 
consists of the following main aspects: 
  A. Grain purchases and sales and prices are opened up 
in all directions and under state macroeconomic control they 
mainly rely on the market adjustment of grain supply and 
demand. Since 1 January 1993, fixed grain purchases have 
been abolished in Hunan Province and the price is determined by 
the market. Most of the counties (cities) in Hubei Province that 
have opened up grain also have abolished fixed purchases and 
because the grain department enters into intended fixed amount 
but no fixed price agricultural commercial contracts with 
agricultural households, the price is determined by the market. 
Agricultural taxes still are levied in kind by grain departments. 
  In grain sales, they have abolished the fixed quantity 
parity 
price supply system and have implemented a new method of supply 
guaranteed in accordance with market prices. At the same time, 
it has been ordered that various types of grain coupon, grain 
certificate, and residential grain inventory permit grain quotas 
no longer be circulated. 
  B. Abolishing parity price grain allocation. Hunan 
Province has come out with a regulation that after grain 
purchases and sales and prices are freed up, they will abolish 
the former provincial parity price system plan for allocating 
rice. The special state grain reserves, the State Council market 
adjusted grain, and the present state turnover grain and 
provincial reserve grain allocation plans will still be 
administered in accordance with state regulations. Counties 
(cities) in Hubei Province that have freed up grain also will 
abolish parity price grain submission tasking. 
  C. Abolishing the "three linkages" preferential 
policy. Hunan Province has stipulated the abolishment of 
the "three linkages" parity price materials supply for farmers 
and will allow the price to be determined by the market. 
Hanchuan County in Hubei Province has changed its "three 
linkages" parity price grain material supply to comprehensive 
price supply with the price determined by the county government. 
Grain advance purchase earnest money has been changed to 
production loans extended by county agricultural banks and 
credit associations. Shishou city has stipulated that they will 
abolish the "three linkages," but give preferential supply of 
fertilizer and diesel below the market price and above the 
parity price and low-interest loans to agricultural households 
that have signed agricultural-commercial grain purchasing 
contracts. 
  D. Implementing grain price subsidies for urban 
residents. After all localities have grain reform, they 
will implement grain price subsidies based on the principle of 
common assumption by the state, enterprises, and individuals. 
Generally, it will be the responsibility of the Ministry of 
Finance to allocate subsidies to the staff of administrative 
institutions and it will be the responsibility of enterprises 
themselves to resolve grain price subsidies for enterprise 
staffs, and subsidies will be allowed to be figured in their 
costs. 
  E. Freeing up operations and enlivening 
circulation. In every locality's grain reform plan it is 
explicitly proposed that they should conduct multi-channel 
operations and enliven circulation. Grain departments should 
convert operating mechanisms as quickly as possible and actively 
participate in market competition, establishing and performing 
the main channel functions in competition. Other state-run, 
collective, and individually-run enterprises, as well as 
individual farmers also can operate retail and wholesale grain 
businesses. 
  F. Establishing a grain risk adjustment fund 
system. Grain is a special commodity directly related to 
the national economy and the people's livelihood and the state 
should enhance macroeconomic controls. So, all localities have 
made the establishment of a grain risk adjustment fund an 
important component and measure of grain reform. Generally they 
have stipulated that on top of the Ministry of Finance grain 
subsidies, "three linkages" material parity-negotiated price 
differential funds, and advance purchase earnest money discounts 
allocated according to policy, in cities and counties, for such 
things as negotiated price operation tax reductions and 
exemptions and payment of service and administrative fees for 
"converting people from agriculture to non-agriculture," 
municipal and county grain bureaus will establish special 
administration and government controls for special use in 
curbing grain market prices in special years and supporting such 
things as structural adjustments in agriculture, resolving grain 
price subsidies for financial subsidy personnel, and dealing 
with the debt burden of grain departments. 
  G. Implementing a special preferential policy to 
support the conversion of grain enterprises. Hunan Province 
has clearly announced that after grain reform, grain enterprises 
will be responsible for their own profits and losses, but the 
wages of grain enterprise staffs will be totally guaranteed by 
the provincial finance department for three years and fees and 
interest on central special grain reserves, current state 
circulating grain, and provincial grain reserves also will be 
borne by the provincial finance department. At the same time, 
they have stipulated that grain enterprises and enterprises 
newly developed after conversion will be exempt from taxes for 
three years, except for taxes on monetary awards, and grain 
enterprise bank loans will continue the originally designated 
preferential interest rates. 
  II. Reflections Following the Grain Reform and Its 
Affect on the Economic Life of Society 
  A. Reflections Following Grain Reform 
  1. Urban residents' spirits are steady. In the last few 
years 
with economic development, the income of urban workers has 
clearly increased and residents' economic tolerance has 
constantly increased. Several residents reflect that grain is 
now plentiful, the market is flourishing, and grain prices are 
steadily declining. Rather good quality grain can be bought 
anywhere and any place for a suitable price, much better than in 
the past. But there also are quite a few of the tiny minority of 
workers seeking support who reflect that following grain reform, 
increased grain consumption cost output has lowered their 
standard of living. 
  2. Rural cadres and masses have mixed feelings. They believe 
that only since grain reform have farmers truly had autonomy in 
production and operations to plant whatever brings in money. But 
at the same time, they also feel that in the past when grain was 
tight the government stimulated sales. Now when grain sales are 
bad, they have abolished the fixed quota purchases. In this 
topsy turvy situation, in the end it is the farmers who suffer 
the losses and are hurt. Rural cadres generally reflect that 
since grains were opened up, planting, reaping, and sales are no 
longer urged, but collecting collective submissions of 
retentions and redeeming loans are rather difficult. In the past 
cadres pursued the masses for grain. Now they pursue the masses 
for money. And a new change has taken place in the relationship 
between rural cadres and masses. 
  II. The Affect of Grain Reform on the Economy and the 
Life of Society 
  A. It encourages changes in the way that government 
departments take responsibility for grains. They have gradually 
changed from mainly relying on planning and administrative 
methods in the past to mainly relying on market methods. In the 
past government departments took responsibility for grains. 
Everything from planting, purchasing, processing, storage, and 
sales was conducted according to the mandatory plan. Grain 
reform can encourage government departments to respect and apply 
economic laws and use market mechanisms to do a good job of 
managing production, purchases, and sales. Relevant departments 
also have paid attention to market surveys and research and 
gradually learned how to set up production and organize 
purchases and sales in accordance with market demands. 
  B. It encourages farmers to adjust the structure of the 
industry. They have gradually changed from being mainly oriented 
to the demands of the plan in the past to being mainly oriented 
to market demands. The first thing is that following grain 
reform market mechanisms have begun to perform a function. 
Farmers one after the other are readjusting the mix of their 
crops based on changes in the market and are diversifying and 
are vigorously developing the production of high grade 
agricultural products. After Chenzhou city freed up grain 
prices, farmers conscientiously adjusted the make up of their 
planting, reducing the area planted in grain and expanding the 
area planted in cash crops; and reducing the area planted in 
early rice which is lacking in quality and expanding the area 
planted in middle and late rice and high grade rice. For the 
year, early rice was reduced by 100,000 mu and high 
grade rice was increased by 400,000 mu and cured 
tobacco was increased by 120,000 mu. Secondly, the 
internal structure of agriculture has been adjusted. As 
reflected in Hanchuan County, since the beginning of autumn, the 
county has stressed three major adjustments: adjusting the 
25,000 mu of low lake fields to develop the aquatic 
products industry; adjusting the 6,000 mu of hilly 
country to develop tea, fruit, and wood; and setting aside 
70,000 mu for grain, cotton, and pod vegetables. As 
income increased, it also caused the internal structure of 
agriculture to become ever more rational. The third thing is 
adjustment of rural industrial structure. According to a 
Hanchuan County survey of 80 rural households, before the price 
of grain was freed up, 202 people, 94.8 percent, engaged in 
agricultural labor and 11 people, 5.2 percent, engaged in 
secondary and tertiary industry. After grain prices were freed 
up, agricultural workers decreased to 169 people, 79.3 percent, 
and those engaged in other industries increased to 44 people, 
20.7 percent. 
  C. It encourages grain enterprises to convert their 
operating 
mechanisms. From simply grinding rice flour in the past, they 
have gradually converted to diversified operations adapted to 
the market. After grain prices and operations were freed up, 
grain departments and enterprises very quickly shifted toward 
the market and accelerated the transformation of operating 
mechanisms and changes in operating methods. Presently, grain 
departments and enterprises at every level are paying close 
attention to changing course and changing their form. The first 
is streamlining the structure; the second is starting 
diversified operations and opening new methods of production; 
the third is doing a good job of serial development of grain 
products; and the fourth is increasing business network points 
and increasing market competitiveness. According to the 
reflections of the Shishou city grain bureau, since grain 
reform, the entire bureau has engaged in risk mortgaged 
contracts for the whole staff to guarantee returns. Of the 
bureau's thirty enterprises, in 1991 nine enterprises lost 7.03 
million yuan. In 1992, after the grain reform, they made a 
profit of 1.095 million yuan and seven enterprises greatly 
reduced their losses. State-run grain enterprises have acquired 
new life and vitality and maintain a leading position in grain 
purchasing and sales. 
  D. Since grain has been freed up, processing industries with 
grain as raw material have expanded their markets even more. It 
can be seen from the cities and counties that have freed up 
operations that freeing up grain prices and operations not only 
has not produced a major impact and a chain reaction on the 
market, but the operations of grain processing enterprises are 
even more flexible. Presently, grain processing enterprises are 
converting from large batch operations to small batch, from 
simple purchases and sales to integrated purchases, sales, and 
processing, and from mainly having commercial grain enterprises 
receive raw materials to mainly having the market receive raw 
materials. These small scale and highly flexible enterprises 
that can process and can diversify operations should indicate 
that freeing up grain prices has injected new vitality into 
these enterprises. 
  III. Major Problems Facing Grain Reform and 
Suggestions 
  Grain reform is a major reform that is strongly policy 
oriented and has broad involvement. In making the transition 
from the old to the new system there will necessarily be a 
series of understanding, system, and operational problems. 
Judging from the situation in Hunan and Hubei provinces, we 
believe that currently the most pronounced problems are mainly 
exhibited in the following respects: 
  The first is that since grain reform, quota purchases and 
the 
"three linkages" preferential policy have been abolished and 
this grain reform is being conducted in a grain buyers' market, 
grain prices are low, purchasing funds are short, grain sale 
difficulties are exacerbated, and farmers' income is reduced. 
Hanchuan County in Hubei Province reflects that in July of this 
year, after grain prices were freed up, the price for 50 
kilograms of early rice dropped to 18-19 yuan and that for 
middle rice fluctuated between 20 and 21 yuan, averaging below 
the state fixed price. Although the market price of wheat was 
higher than the fixed purchasing price and farmers throughout 
the county could earn more than 780,000 yuan, income from early 
and middle rice was down by 6.18 million yuan. So, grain 
farmers' income was down 5.4 million yuan, a per capita 
reduction of 7-8 yuan, because grain prices were freed up. 
According to this calculation, in predominantly grain producing 
regions, farmers' per capita income was reduced between 20 and 
22 yuan because grain prices were freed up. The 1992 farmers' 
net per capita income throughout the province was preliminarily 
estimated at 663 yuan, a 6 percent increase over 1991, 
essentially restoring 1990 levels. But the cash income from 
grain sales was down by 13.3 yuan and grain planting experienced 
an extreme drop. It is reported that Hunan and Hubei provinces 
are prepared to reduce the area planted in grain by 5 million 
mu and 3 million mu, respectively. This 
will have a definite affect on future grain production. 
  The second thing is that grain departments have numerous 
financial debts, a great deal of old grain, and heavy burdens 
and enterprises have a number of difficulties converting. 
Several localities reflect that when grain enterprises currently 
bearing the "three major burdens" of numerous debts, a great 
deal of old grain, and a number of retiring people, go to the 
market, they lack competitiveness. In the past "the emperor's 
daughter did not worry about marriage." Not only were there few 
network points, but several grain stores, stations, and points 
were established in rather out of the way places and the 
infrastructure was backward. Grain departments in every locality 
are striving to come to grips with developing diversified 
operations as an important measure for converting enterprise 
operating mechanisms, but it is generally felt that they lack 
experience, lack skill, lack qualified people, and lack funds, 
and have numerous difficulties. 
  The third thing is that in such respects as ideological 
concepts, business awareness, and understanding of science and 
technology, we still are far from meeting the requirements for 
developing a post-grain reform market economy. Several farmers 
reflect that "in the last few years, when we had no choice we 
planted grain, but when we planted grain, we also had no way, we 
could not sell it off. After grain reform, production was even 
more difficult. They told us that we were allowed to seek our 
own markets and no longer to seek the mayor. But where do we 
farmers go to find a market?" 
  The fourth thing is that the grain market system is not 
fully 
developed and circulation channels are not open. The development 
of such aspects of the infrastructure as both regional and 
national wholesale grain markets, adjustment methods, and land 
and water transportation are very unsuited to what is required 
to reform the grain circulation system. 
  These issues must elicit a great deal of attention and we 
must adopt feasible and effective measures and solutions, 
because how these issues are resolved not only is directly 
related to whether grain reform can be smoothly conducted in the 
two provinces, but also will have a major affect on the national 
grain situation. So, we propose the following suggestions: 
  A. Direct farmers, based on the fundamental stability 
of overall grain production, to make appropriate adjustments in 
the product mix and the make up of cultivation. From the 
overall perspective of China's current grain situation, overall 
supply and overall demand are essentially balanced with a slight 
surplus. But there is a problem with the product mix. There is 
mainly excessive paddy and insufficient high grade rice. But we 
also must notice that the level of China's current grain 
production still is controlled by nature. Overall grain supply 
capabilities still are not strong and per capita levels are not 
high. Strictly speaking, China's grain problem still has not 
been solved. After increases in consumption levels, especially 
rural consumption levels, and gradual adjustments in grain 
varieties and production structure, the overall balance is 
gradually becoming tight. So, after grain reform, we must adopt 
measures to ensure the basic stability of grain production and 
guard against major slippage. We now must adopt a policy of 
"developing production, adjusting structure, guiding 
consumption, and opening markets," and actively organize and 
direct the broad masses of farmers to arrange production based 
on changing market demands and ensuring grain stability and 
strive to develop high-production, high-quality, high-return 
grain varieties suitable to increasing beans, small mixed 
grains, and other famous high-quality varieties with a foreign 
demand, appropriately adjusting the make up of cultivation and 
improving economy returns. 
  B. Pay close attention to solving the financial debt 
problem. We should thoroughly and completely clear up 
current debts and distinguish the funds owed, and then handle 
them differently. Those owed funds that are policy, the Ministry 
of Finance should help to resolve. If they cannot be resolved 
for a while, we should stop the interest, make them 
interest-free debts and not take additional interest or penalty 
interest. For the portion that should have been subsidized by 
the locality and was not subsidized, the local treasury is 
responsible for allocating adequate subsidy. Debts that are 
enterprise business losses should be absorbed by the enterprises 
themselves. At the same time, a financial listing should be made 
of historical policy debts and newly added debts and they should 
have special administration, distinguished from regular 
enterprise business. 
  C. Appropriately resolve the issue of old grain. A 
significant portion of grain currently stored by several 
localities is old grain and it urgently needs to be properly 
handled. As reflected by Hubei Province, about 4 billion 
kilograms, approximately half, of the grain currently stored is 
very hard to sell early long-grained, nonglutinous rice. Of 
that, a considerable portion has been there for three years or 
more, some even more than five years, and is inedible. So, we 
propose permitting early long-grained, nonglutinous rice that 
has been in place more than three years to be used to process 
feed or be sold on the market at the price that it can currently 
be sold. The differential between the cost of this grain and the 
actual selling price would be shared by the central government, 
local government, and enterprises. 
  D. Enhance development of the market system and open 
circulation channels. 1. We should adopt measures helpful 
to accelerating the development of rudimentary grain markets in 
grain producing areas, while selectively doing a good job of 
establishing regional wholesale grain markets in regions that 
mainly produce grain or have rather good conditions. 2. Guide 
the farmers to enter the circulation sphere. We should actively 
organize farmers, rural cooperative economic organizations, 
special transportation and sales collectives, and individuals to 
enter the market and directly engage in grain trading. To reduce 
the current unchecked and arbitrary farmer production and 
business activity, we should actively develop combined serial 
production, supply and sales grain production and business 
voluntarily participated in by the farmers. 3. We should improve 
methods of grain allocation and transfer and do a good job of 
coordinating relations between producing areas and sales areas. 
For the grain required by sales areas, we can adopt such methods 
as contract purchases and sales and purchasing and marketing 
agents, or have production organized and arranged by producing 
regions based on the varieties and volume required by sales 
regions, using sales to determine production and using economic 
forms to determine cooperative relations between producing 
regions and sales regions. 4. Enhance grain infrastructure and 
improve such basic conditions as storage and transportation. 
  E. Improve social services and direct and assist 
farmers in adapting to the requirements of market economy 
development as quickly as possible. Reform of grain 
purchases, sales, and prices is being conducted in the current 
situation where it is difficult to sell grain and it also is 
difficult to sell cotton, oil, and sugar. So, a great many 
farmers feel at their wits ends. Some feel that they cannot look 
to the market and some feel that they cannot look accurately on 
the market. Some look to the market and lack skill. Some, 
although they have found markets and have a certain amount of 
skill, lack funds. All of these need to be further resolved by 
enhanced rural social services. In brief, since the freeing up 
of grains, we must not simply orient farmers to the market, but 
it is important to actively direct and assist them to take new 
steps to adapt to the development of the market economy as 
quickly as possible. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20384 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94026" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  19 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Agricultural Development 1996-2010 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Agricultural Development 1996-2010 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0353A Beijing GUANLI SHIJIE [MANAGEMENT WORLD] in 
Chinese No 1, 1994 pp 172-176 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0353A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUANLI SHIJIE [MANAGEMENT WORLD] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wang Weinong (3769 3634 6593), Zhou Haichun </F>
(0719 3189 2504), and Wu Xiaohua (0702 2556 5478), affiliated 
with the State Planning Commission's Economic Studies Taskforce: 
"China's Agricultural Development From 1996 to 2010"] 
  [Text] At the beginning of the 1990s, China's 
industrialization entered an intermediate stage, with our 
national economic growth order also experiencing corresponding 
changes, and industry becoming our national economic growth 
subject. But while this new stage of growth has brought a clear 
decline in the share of our agricultural output value and of 
agriculture in our national income, this certainly does not 
imply a weakening of the position and role of agriculture as the 
basis of our economic growth, the guarantee of our social 
stability, and the root of our national prosperity and might. 
Precisely the opposite, the arrival of China's intermediate 
industrialization stage means that agriculture not only 
continues to contribute to China's industry, but also will play 
an active role in the thorough conversion to marketization of 
China's economic reforms. The fundamental standing of 
agriculture will grow more important, with agriculture 
undergoing this crucial stage and withstanding severe trials in 
the midst of these profound changes. During the crucial stage of 
the next 15 years (1996-2010), when our national economy is 
fully developing and making the transition to a market economy, 
our agricultural development state will directly affect our 
economic growth and system conversion. So when drawing up 
long-range development plans for our future national economy, we 
need to give key importance to agriculture. 
<H5>  I. The Features, Issues, and Conflicts Involved in Our </H5>
Agricultural Development from 1996 to 2010 
  In order to understand the features of Chinese agriculture 
from 1996 to 2010, it will be necessary to grasp the development 
phases and trends of our whole national economy, as well as the 
relations between industrial and agricultural development, in 
this stage. Various studies show that China's national 
economic growth has entered this intermediate industrialization 
stage, which China's national economy will remain in from 1996 
to 2010, and which will pose a series of new demands on our 
agricultural development. 
  Based on our studies of this intermediate industrialization 
stage, Chinese agriculture will show the following features in 
this stage: 
  1. Agricultural-product demand will grow faster. While the 
cries about the "problems in selling" agricultural products are 
now loud, this certainly does not mean that agricultural-product 
demand has reached its peak. The most crucial cause of these 
"selling difficulties" is that agricultural-product demand is in 
a structural-adjustment stage since the resolution of our food 
and clothing problem. As to the cities, this is mainly that the 
conflict between our farm-product supply and demand structures 
has resulted in inadequate direct demand for traditional farm 
products; and for rural areas, since the food and clothing 
problem was solved, the traditional low-value farm-product 
(mainly grain) demand-elasticity has declined quickly, while 
high-value farm products are in surplus. But the next 15 years 
of population growth, higher incomes, and particularly higher 
peasant incomes and changes in our urban-rural population 
structure, will bring a sharp growth in farm-product demand, 
which growth will be concentrated in animal foods, such as meat, 
eggs, milk, poultry, and aquatic products, as well as in areas, 
such as fruit, beverages, and processed foods. Our studies show 
that average incomes of 1,000-2,500 yuan (at 1990 prices) are 
the stage in which food-spending grows quickest, which fast 
spending-growth results mainly not from increased consumption, 
but rather from consumption of high-value foods. Projections 
for the next 15 years are that average Chinese incomes will be 
in this stage, meaning that demand in the next 15 years for 
high-value foods, such as meat, eggs, milk, and poultry, will be 
in a high-growth stage. As consumer demand for high-value 
foods higher on the food chain will be much larger for 
indirectly-consumed primary farm products than for directly 
consumed ones, this means that demand in the next 15 years will 
grow faster from primary farm products, such as grain, to 
high-value farm products. 
  2. Agricultural development will be faced with a severe 
protracted warfare with market economy. The next 15 years of 
this intermediate industrialization stage will bring a clear 
pickup in nonfarm-industry technological advance and structural 
conversion, sharply raising our resource-return rate and labor 
productivity. But on the other hand, as a traditional 
industry, agriculture will certainly not see a clear improvement 
in its rate of technological advances and higher labor 
productivity before its industrialization is completed as 
compared to its initial stage. Particularly, China is short 
  on agricultural resources and has a weak agricultural base, 
in addition to our current agricultural-operating form of 
sharing cultivated land equally, which further sharpens our 
conflict of slow rates of agricultural technical advances and 
higher labor productivity. This means that agriculture's 
profit-making capability will unavoidably be clearly lower than 
that of nonfarm industry so that, under market-economy 
conditions, unless the state intervenes, the market-economy 
principle of profit maximization will drive a sharp loss of 
agricultural factors, on a scale highly likely to be far larger 
than at present, thus posing a severe protracted warfare to 
agricultural development. 
  3. Agricultural growth will quickly increase material-input 
demand. In Comparative Studies of Industrialization and 
Economic Growth, Chenery and others conducted a simulated 
analysis of input-output relations for countries in varying 
stages of industrialization. This shows that in the initial 
stage of industrialization, when per capita GNP is $100-$200 (in 
1964 dollars), the ratio of agricultural material consumption to 
gross agricultural output is 16.4 percent, which ratio rises to 
32.2 percent after per capita GNP reaches $400, and again to 
45.8 percent when GNP grows to $1,500 in the latter stages of 
industrialization. A regression analysis that we conducted of 
GVAO [Growth Value of Agricultural Output] to agricultural 
material consumption in China for the 1979-1989 time series and 
for a cross-section of 30 provinces, municipalities, and 
autonomous regions in 1991, shows that the elasticity of China's 
GVAO to agricultural material input was up from 0.86 for 
1979-1989 to 0.91 by 1991. This change was absolutely 
predictable. The arrival of the intermediate industrialization 
stage meant that our national economic development had reached 
such a stage, that our form of relying on simple development and 
utilization of natural resources to drive economic growth was 
over, and that our economic growth was increasingly dependant on 
increased input of reproduceable resources which, reflected in 
agriculture, was naturally increased material input. The 
appearance of this feature requires industry to provide the 
material guarantees for agricultural growth on one hand, while 
requiring agricultural fund-input to be raised to a new level on 
the other. 
  4. Agricultural growth will tend to become more difficult. 
One of the key features of structural conversion in the 
intermediate industrialization stage is that while the 
industrial-agricultural structural conversion proceeds, the 
structural conversion within industry clearly accelerates. This 
results in resources flowing on a larger scale toward nonfarm 
industry, making growth harder for agriculture -- as the 
traditional industry -- due to the impact of this large-scale 
loss of resources. In order to confirm this assessment, we 
analyzed agricultural growth in the industrialization process 
for the five countries of the United States, Britain, France, 
Germany, and Japan, as well as using World Bank data to conduct 
a cross-section analysis of industrialization and agricultural 
growth in over 60 countries. This showed that both the 
experiences of the first countries to industrialize and the 
practices of comtemporary countries prove that in the 
intermediate industrialization stage, agriculture is 
characterized by a strong stagnation trend (See the research 
task entrusted by the State Planning Commission's Economic 
Studies Center to the State Planning Commission, Economic 
Studies Institute, Rural Economic Research Office: 
Agricultural Growth Patterns in the Intermediate 
Industrialization Stage). Due to the following factors, 
Chinese agriculture is highly likely to grow slowly or even 
stagnate in the intermediate industrialization stage, just as in 
the first countries to industrialize. 
  A. Once in the intermediate stage, the quantity and quality 
of agricultural natural resources will tend to decrease to a 
greater extent, sharply exacerbating China's conflict of a 
severe shortage of agricultural resources. 
  B. China launched its industrialization on a quite weak 
base. 
As China chose the route of very rapid industrialization 
slanted toward heavy industry, we have never been able to 
rectify the problem of our weak agricultural base. And with 
the arrival of our intermediate industrialization stage, our 
national economic focus will shift toward nonfarm industry, 
making this problem an even more glaring one. 
  C. Our traditional agricultural-growth pattern of a large 
input of live labor to make up our resource-input shortage has 
reached the critical point, so that our abundant agricultural 
workforce not only is no longer an advantage, but even is 
threatening our agricultural growth. 
  D. Our agricultural S&amp;T and technology-dissemination 
system 
is also facing a stiff test from the market-economy tide. 
  The above analyzes China's agricultural-development 
possibilities for the next 15 years from a quantitative 
perspective. This section will set forth a simple quantitative 
description. 
  Based on China's real agricultural-development achievements 
since the founding of the PRC, particularly since 1978, combined 
with the model we chose to analyze our agricultural-development 
features and the key problems and conflicts we will face in the 
next 15 years, we have projected our key agricultural indexes 
for 1996-2010. 


Table 1: GVAO Projections (At 1990 Prices) Unit: 100 Million Yuan 

Year    Agriculture    Farming    Forestry    Livestock    Sideline    Fishery 
                                              Raising      Industry 

1992    9,084.7        5,040.2    422.6       2,457.4      551.0       613.5 

1992    8,452.5        4,684.4    384.0       2,326.4      530.5       509.6 

2000    10,989.9       5,900.3    480.8       3,089.5      848.9       691.3 

2010    14,349.9       7,359.2    611.6       4,227.0      1,224.0     987.0 

Gr.a    3.34%          2.93%      2.85%       3.61%        6.05%       3.88% 

Gr.b    2.70%          2.23%      2.44%       3.18%        3.73%       3.63% 


  [Text] Notes: Gr.a is the 1992-2000 rate of increase; 
Gr.b is the 2000-2010 rate of increase; The first 1992 line is 
calculated at 1992 prices, and the second 1992 line at 1990 
prices. 


Table 2: Agricultural Structure Projections (At 1990 Prices) 

Year    Agriculture    Farming    Forestry    Livestock    Sideline    Fishery 
                                              Raising      Industry 

1992    100%           55.48%     4.65%       27.05%       6.07%       6.75% 

1992    100%           55.42%     4.54%       27.52%       6.28%       6.03% 

2000    100%           53.69%     4.38%       28.11%       7.72%       6.29% 

2010    100%           51.28%     4.26%       29.46%       8.53%       6.88% 




Table 3: Staple Farm-Product Output Trend Projections; Unit: 10,000 Tons 

Year    Grain     Cotton    Edible    Poultry    Pork     Beef      Milk     Aquatic     Fruit 
                            Oil       and Eggs            and                Products 
                                                          Mutton 

1992    44,266    450       1,641     1,019      2,635    305       563      1,557       2,440 

2000    49,590    518       1,990     1,578      3,758    571       885      2,631       3,717 

2010    57,633    611       2,518     2,313      5,205    943       1,324    4,126       5,401 

Gr.a    1.43%     1.77%     2.44%     5.61%      4.54%    8.16%     5.8%     6.78%       5.40% 

Gr.b    1.51%     1.66%     2.38%     3.89%      3.31%    5.14%     4.1%     4.60%       3.81% 


  This shows that our GVAO will reach 1.1 trillion yuan by the 
year 2000, for an average increase of 3.34 percent a year, and 
1.5 trillion yuan by 2010, for an average increase of 2.70 
percent a year. By the year 2000, China will have a cultivated 
land area of 1.368-1.373 billion mu which, at a population of 
1.3 billion, will average out to about 1.05 mu per person. As 
to grain production, this will reach 495.9 million tons by the 
year 2000, for an average increase of 1.34 percent a year, 
giving us 381 kg of grain per person, still under the 1984 
level; by 2010, gross output will reach 576.33 million tons, for 
an average increase of 1.51 percent a year, to give us 412 kg 
per person, slightly higher than the minimum of 800 jin 
[one-half kg] per person. 
<H5>  II. Our Agricultural Development Strategies for 1996-2010 </H5>
  It is not hard to see from the above analysis that China's 
farm-product supply and demand situation will be quite grim from 
1996 to 2010. Unless we resolve this matter appropriately, it 
will very likely affect China's industrialization progress, our 
realization of a comparatively well-off economy, and our rural 
and even overall national stability. So to ensure that our 
agriculture in this period is as suited as possible to our 
national economic-growth needs, we need to take corresponding 
countermeasures starting now. As to the conflicts and problems 
that our agriculture will face in this period, we hold that our 
basic agricultural-development guiding ideology for this period 
should be to adhere to the principle of developing but not 
depending wholly on markets and, with state support, to focus on 
structural adjustment, by relying on S&amp;T, policy, input, and 
service to promote agricultural growth, on which basis to 
appropriately regulate and guide farm-product demand. 
  In the next 15 years, as our farm-product demand will have 
been converted from the traditional quantitative demand to 
qualitative and variety demand, making our traditional planned 
guidance hardly suited to diversified and frequently-changing 
market demand, we will have to persistently move ahead with 
agricultural market-reform. Meanwhile, we need to soberly 
understand that as agriculture is a traditional industry, it 
will suffer much more heavily from the adverse impact of a 
market economy than other industries. Particularly as Chinese 
agriculture is so short on resources and weak in base, so will 
be in a very adverse position in market competition, we will 
have to accompany our adherence to market reforms with a great 
emphasis on state support for agriculture, instead of trying to 
push agriculture completely into markets as in the previous 
stage. 
  With state support, structural adjustment will be our key 
agricultural-development mission for the next 15 years. 
Structural adjustment will enable us to adapt to demand changes 
and achieve overall growth. In farming, structural adjustment 
will raise our percentage of high-yield, quality crops, giving 
us overall farming growth, on which basis we can focus on 
developing livestock, aquatic products, and famous, specialty, 
and superior farm products. 
  Based on the above guiding ideology, we are making the 
following strategic suggestions: 
  1. We should continue to move forward resolutely with market 
reform. 
  A. We need to accelerate our development of diversified 
circulation subjects. Farm-product circulation is a problem 
obstructing our current agricultural development that is in 
urgent need of solution. As the key to rationalizing 
farm-product circulation is to establish plural circulation 
subjects in equal competition, the government needs to avoid 
direct participation in circulation, to treat equally all 
economic entities taking part in farm-product circulation. 
Equal competition among circulation subjects of all components 
will promote market development. The government's key future 
intervention in farm-product circulation should be: 1) To 
establish and perfect market-order and transaction rules, and to 
draw up scientific laws and regulations for farm-product trade. 
2) To set up a regulatory system for staple farm products, 
particularly grain reserves, using this system's volume to 
balance farm-product market supply and demand. So we are 
suggesting the establishment of a Central Grain Reserves 
Regulation Bureau to be directly subordinate to the State 
Council, independent of the commercial system, and fully 
independent in financing, storage capacity, and operation. 
  B. We need to establish a diversified rural money market. We 
need to separate out the policy-bank functions of the 
Agricultural Bank [AB], by upgrading the AB to a genuine 
commercial bank, and upgrading credit cooperatives to a 
peasant-owned and businesslike cooperative bank, while 
supporting rural cooperative foundations and other private 
financial organizations in the formation of a diversified rural 
money market under Agricultural-Policy-Bank leadership. 
  C. While developing a diversified agricultural capital-goods 
market with equal competition, the state needs to enhance its 
management of the agricultural capital-goods market. As to the 
production and sale of important agricultural-use manufactured 
goods, it must exercise the necessary licensing system, do a 
good job of technical oversight, and stop agricultural cheating 
and swindling at the production and sale source. 
  D. We need to establish rational flow mechanisms for our 
cultivated-land resources, to encourage the right scale of 
operation. We suggest strengthening the authority of collective 
economic organizations to allocate cultivated land and, based on 
collective economic organizations developing jobs to transfer 
surplus agricultural manpower, paving the way for the remaining 
agricultural workforce to contract enough cultivated land. 
Meanwhile, to keep our cultivated land from being adjusted too 
frequently and steadily downsized in operating scale, our future 
land-contract terms could be extended to a fixed 30-50 years on 
the principle of "adding people but not land, and reducing 
people but not land," with contract rights being inheritable and 
allowed to be sold at value. 
  2. The state should support farm-product supply. State 
support should be aimed at promoting agrotechnology advances, 
raising agricultural productivity, and improving to a certain 
extent the adverse position of agriculture in market competition. 
  A. Revenue investment in agriculture should go mostly to 
maintain stable economic growth, with profitmaking investment 
reduced as much as possible, and revenues invested mainly in 
basic industries that are unprofitable but play a key role in 
maintaining stable economic growth, thus preparing the material 
foundation for revenue support of basic industries, such as 
agriculture. 
  B. The state needs to include agroscience research and 
S&amp;T 
dissemination in basic academic disciplines, suitably increasing 
its investment and providing priority support, instead of 
overemphasizing the marketization route for agricultural S&amp;T 
dissemination. 
  C. We need to establish and perfect state credit-support for 
agriculture. Once the State Agriculture Policy Bank is 
established, it should apply a preferential interest-rate policy 
to agricultural loans. 
  D. The state should continue to focus some financial 
resources on large-scale water-conservancy capital construction 
on farmland. We need to upgrade our old irrigated zones, by 
giving priority support to the restoration and completion of 
irrigation and drainage projects. Future state investment in 
farmland capital construction of water conservancy works should 
grow faster than or at least as fast as revenue growth. 
  E. For farm-product purchasing, we should practice a minimum 
protective-price system. 
  F. We need to continue to build commodity bases for farm 
products, particularly grain. We could select 500 large 
commodity-grain counties throughout China for preferential state 
funding and technical support. 
  3. With state support, we should turn S&amp;T advances into 
this 
stage's agricultural-growth leader. 
  A. We need to make breakthrough advances in cultivating 
farm-product varieties. The state ought to organize the 
agricultural S&amp;T sector to tackle key S&amp;T problems, by 
developing a batch of high-yield and quality varieties among 
staple farm products, such as rice, wheat, cotton, and 
oil-bearing crops, in order to meet the needs of structural 
change in farm-product demand during this period. 
  B. We need to focus on developing resource-conservation, 
particularly land-conservation, agroproduction technology, with 
our main lines of attack, in addition to breeding, being areas, 
such as planting patterns, cultivation (breeding) technology, 
fertilizer-application technology, crop protection, and 
epidemic-disease prevention and control, to form a 
comprehensive, complete, and mature technology model for 
dissemination and application. 
  C. We need to raise our farmers' S&amp;T levels to new 
heights. 
We should develop agricultural high schools faster, utilizing 
all forms to run agrotechnology training classes. Through these 
measures, we should strive to raise in this period our ratio of 
agricultural growth from S&amp;T applications to all agricultural 
growth from its current 30-40 percent to 50-60 percent. 
  4. We should set up a sound socialized-service system for 
agriculture. In the next 15 years, the state should vigorously 
support the building of a pre-, mid-, and post-production 
agricultural service-organization system. We suggest that the 
state select 100 counties a year from now on, with the 
Agricultural Policy Bank arranging 10 billion yuan in special 
loans, to be specially used to help all rural service 
organizations set up a group of service entities that integrate 
trade, inndustry, and agriculture, as well as cultivation, 
breeding, and manufacturing. This should promote the 
development of our whole rural economy. 
  5. We should open up small- and medium-sized cities faster, 
build small cities and towns in a planned way, and speed up the 
conversion of our agricultural workforce, to pave the way for an 
agricultural economy of scale. 
  6. We need to guide residents in a planned way to evolve a 
food-consumption structure with equal emphasis on plant and 
animal foods. Our studies show that as the economy develops, 
food-structure changes are roughly from mostly plant foods to 
mostly animal foods and then to an equal emphasis on plant and 
animal foods. But in order to resolve China's conflict of a 
shortage of agricultural resources while taking health into 
consideration, we suggest purposely detouring the mostly animal 
foods stage to go straight into the one of equal emphasis on 
plant and animal foods. So we suggest speeding up reform of 
our subsidized supply system for urban life-service facilities, 
to lower farm-product demand. This will include matters, such 
as thoroughly reforming our low-price consumption system for 
farm products, speeding up our housing commercialization, and 
raising our consumer prices for items, such as health care, 
urban transportation and communications, and nongovernmental 
energy use. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20385 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94027" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  15 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Agricultural Product Pricing, Circulation Problems </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Agricultural Product Pricing, Circulation Problems </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0340A Nanchang JIAGE YUEKAN [PRICING MONTHLY] in Chinese 
No 12, 15 Dec 93 pp 40-42 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0340A </F>
<F P=104>  Nanchang JIAGE YUEKAN [PRICING MONTHLY] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Cai Ping (5591 5493): "Problems in the </F>
Agricultural Product Pricing and Circulation Systems and Some 
Solutions"--the authors are affiliated with the Ministry of 
Agriculture's Comprehensive Planning Department] 
  [Text] Looking back at the 15 years of reform of the 
agricultural product pricing and circulation systems, especially 
the very vigorous reform in the last two years, we have had 
amazing results, but there are also some problems. The major 
problems are seen in the following areas: 
  1. There are conflicts between small productions and the big 
market: 
  A basic condition existing in the agricultural sector at 
this 
stage is the contradiction between small productions and the 
big market. In 1992, we had 224.89 million peasant households 
nationwide. They had production, circulation, and management 
autonomy, but limited and constrained by transportation and 
information and other conditions, the small-scale production 
management mode of individual families and households cannot 
really meet the needs of a nationwide big market. Every time 
the wind blows and the grass rustles -- at the slightest sign of 
trouble -- there will be serious supply and demand problems. 
They often lead to all kinds of buying and selling "hardships" 
which obstruct circulation and in turn jeopardize and dampen the 
peasant production enthusiasm. 
  2. The "price scissors" between industrial and agricultural 
products have widened in recent years, and the peasant real 
income have been slow to increase: 
  In 1989, the retail price index of rural industrial products 
rose 18.7 percent; the procurement price index of agricultural 
and sideline products rose 15 percent -- the price scissors 
between industrial and agricultural products widened by 3.2 
percent in a year. Meanwhile the peasant per capita net income 
was 601.51 yuan, 1.6 percent lower than in the previous year. 
This was the first time the peasant income showed negative 
growth since reform began. In 1990, due to lower negotiated and 
market prices of grain, the agricultural and sideline product 
price index fell to 97.4 percent, 2.6 percentage points below 
the 1989 level, and during the same period, the rural industrial 
product price index rose 4.6 percentage points; the "price 
scissors" between industrial and agricultural products widened 
by 7.4 percent. In the same year, the peasant per capita net 
income was 686 yuan, and discounting the price factor, it only 
increased 1.8 percent over the previous year. In 1991, 
agricultural and sideline product procurement prices fell 2 
percent compared to the previous year, but in the same period, 
rural industrial product prices went up 3 percent; the peasant 
per capita net income was 709 yuan, and discounting the price 
factor, income rose only 2 percent compared to the previous 
year. In three years, the peasant per capita net income only 
rose an average of 0.7 percent a year, but based on constant 
prices, the rural population's per capita agricultural output 
value was rising at an average rate of 5.4 percent per year: 
Agricultural output value was increasing much faster than the 
peasant net income. Under the Seventh Five-Year Plan, peasant 
per capita net income rose 9.6 percent, but in the first two 
years of the Eighth Five-Year Plan, their income only increased 
6.9 percent; the rate of increase has clearly slowed. In 1992, 
the peasant per capita net income was 784 yuan, and discounting 
the price factor, their actual income was 5.9 percent higher 
than in 1991. Agriculture's lack of productive momentum 
seriously undermines agricultural input. 
  3. Because of the shortage of procurement funds, the lack of 
storage facilities, and departmental separatism and local 
blockades, the circulation of agricultural products is often 
plagued by "hardships" the handing out of "IOUs" and other 
blockages in the circulation system, and the situation is 
becoming increasingly serious. 
  Statistics show that in the fall of 1992, the nation needed 
more than 90 billion yuan in grain and cotton procurement funds, 
and there was a 50-60 billion yuan shortfall. Many localities 
had no cash at the time they weighed and bought the grain and 
cotton and could only hand out "IOUs." According to the Ministry 
of Agriculture's statistics, at the peak, as much as 3.7 billion 
yuan's worth of "IOUs" were handed out last year for grain and 
cotton procurement nationwide. This seriously dampened the 
peasant and the masses' productive enthusiasm. 
  4. Too large a percentage of the main crops are put under 
state-set prices and centralized management, and their prices 
are too low: 
  Currently, of all the agricultural products procured by the 
state, the prices of five types are set by the state. In some 
cases, the power to set prices have been handed down by the 
higher authorities but not at the lower levels; some prices are 
decontrolled in name but not in fact, and sometimes the central 
government has decontrolled prices but the provinces have not, 
or the provinces have but not the cities. The mandatory nature 
of those prices has not changed. Take grain prices for example. 
Even though 28 provinces and municipalities nationwide have 
partially or completely decontrolled the procurement prices; in 
fact, grain procurement prices must still comply with the 
state-set minimum protection prices and cannot really move up or 
down according to market supply and demand conditions. The power 
to set prices for cotton and tobacco is still in the state's 
hands, which does not mobilize the productive enthusiasm of the 
localities and the peasants. In addition, there is no price 
differential to account for the major farm products' quality 
difference, which does not give expression to the pricing 
principle of higher price for better quality and lower price for 
poorer quality. This does not facilitate high yield, high 
quality, and high efficiency in agricultural production. 
  5. The way the state sets prices causes the peasants to be 
inflexible about demanding higher prices: 
  In recent years, in the wake of the significant increases in 
the price of agricultural means of production, the cost of farm 
production has also been rising at a rate of 10 percent a year. 
The peasants have become increasingly vocal in demanding the 
state to set higher cotton, tobacco, and other agricultural 
product prices. Even though the state has raised cotton prices 
four times since 1987, because of plant diseases and insect 
pests, the comparative advantage of planting cotton has steadily 
declined. In 1992, some localities have shown negative growth in 
the after-tax, per-mu net profit, and the peasant clamor for 
higher cotton procurement price has grown louder. Shandong and 
other localities have even demanded raising cotton price by 
100-150 yuan per dan; otherwise cotton production will continue 
to slip. Although the state readjusted grain procurement prices 
in 1992, many peasants are still complaining that the prices of 
capital goods are increasing too fast and grain prices are still 
too low. Constrained by its financial strength, the state cannot 
raise agricultural procurement prices year after year, and this 
has exacerbated the conflict and contradiction between the 
state's and the peasants' interests. 
  6. There are big loopholes in the pricing mechanism, 
especially in the double-track pricing of some agricultural 
products. 
  When the market price of agricultural products is higher 
than 
the state-set procurement price, not only the peasants look at 
the price differential as an invisible burden and are unwilling 
to fulfill their fixed quota procurement responsibilities but 
even some procurement departments and management units, acting 
in their own interests, will down-grade the products to lower 
prices and dock the peasants' pay and re-buy and resell the 
planned and extra-plan goods to make a profit and add to the 
confusion in the circulation domain. 
  7. Price management of most decontrolled agricultural 
products is in a state of confusion: 
  By the end of 1992, after more than a decade of price 
reform, 
about 90 percent of the prices in the retail sector have been 
decontrolled. More than 75 percent of the agricultural products 
procured by the state now either follow the state's guidance 
prices or market-regulated prices. From the point of further 
reform of the agricultural pricing system in the future, the 
proportion of state-set prices will continue to shrink, and the 
share of market regulated prices will continue to grow, and 
eventually, all prices will be decontrolled. But in the interim, 
the state has not yet set up an indirect macroeconomic 
regulation and control mechanism to regulate market prices, and 
when market prices surge or plunge, it can only resort to even 
more administrative measures to intervene; it cannot truly give 
play to the economic, legal and regulatory, and other 
macroeconomic regulation and control measures. 
  8. In recent years, in the wake of bumper harvests of grain 
and cotton and other major crops, the conflicts between the 
production and sales areas are further exacerbated. 
  In years of bumper grain harvest, the warehouses in the main 
production areas are filled to the brim but cannot transfer the 
grain out while the sales areas are not stocking grain but will 
transfer grain in as their stock is depleted. When cotton 
production is low, out of their self-interest, the production 
areas often ignore the state's allocation and transfer plan, 
forcing the mills in the sales areas to shut down as they wait 
for raw materials. Conversely when there is a bumper cotton 
harvest, the sales areas will ignore state plans to transfer 
cotton in a timely manner, and as a result, cotton is stockpiled 
in the production areas, slowing the fund turnover rate. 
  9. The existing grain policy does not mobilize the peasants' 
enthusiasm in developing agricultural production: 
  Even though China has adopted a protective price system in 
grain procurement this year, judging by actual results, these 
prices have not really protected the peasants' rights and 
privileges. The scope of protection is too narrow: It is limited 
only to the original state contracted grain procurement and 
special grain reserve; other grain purchases at negotiated 
prices are not protected by the state. Moreover, most grain 
produced by the peasants still do not qualify as commodity, and 
under this kind of double-track grain pricing system, when there 
is plenty of grain, the state is unable to buy up everything, 
and it down grades the product to lower prices or issue "IOUs" 
when making purchases, so that the peasants are in effect 
subsidizing the purchases, and when there is a grain shortage, 
the state wants to "monopolize" everything, and the peasants are 
again short-changed. In addition, the state financial subsidies 
are rising sharply year after year, and even though grain sales 
have been made at the procurement price in the last two years, 
state expenditure on subsidizing the circulation of farm 
products has continued to rise. Both the state and the peasants 
are losing money. 
  10. The surge in the prices of means of production has 
seriously dampened the peasants' production enthusiasm. 
  In 1992, the agricultural product price index rose 3.4 
percent while the price of agricultural capital goods went up 
3.7 percent and the cost of living for peasants rose 4.7 
percent. Even though the state has set a maximum ceiling price 
for chemical fertilizers and other means of production this 
year, their prices have continued to surge. The price of 
state-allocated urea rose from 538 yuan a ton in 1991 to 662 
yuan in 1992, a 23 percent increase. The composite price of urea 
rose from around 880 yuan last year to around 1,040 yuan this 
year, rising more than 10 percent. Locally produced small 
batches of carbonic ammonium tanan also rose from 300 yuan last 
year to 340 yuan this year. Meanwhile, the prices of grain and 
cotton and other farm products the peasants sell to the state 
have remained relatively low. The outcry that farming does not 
pay, that farming is a money-losing business has grown 
increasingly loud. 
  11. The market system is unhealthy: 
  Currently, the agricultural product circulation market has a 
small radius; the market's role is seriously curtailed. 
"Hardships" take turns in plaguing the buyers and the sellers, 
and prices either surge or plummet. The bartering position and 
trading conditions for peasants have further deteriorated; the 
cost of exchange and the price of information have risen 
sharply. The price hazards are borne entirely by the state and 
the peasants. 
  The only way to solve the above problems is to deepen the 
reform of the agricultural product pricing and circulation 
systems and further decontrol prices, decontrol management, and 
decontrol the market, so that the market mechanism truly plays a 
role in regulating supply and demand as well as prices. However, 
this does not mean that the state should wash its hands of 
everything; instead it should continue to strengthen the 
macroeconomic regulation and control, as well as management of 
the decontrolled farm products, and gradually set up a sound 
state agricultural reserve system and hazard regulation fund 
system and other price protection systems. Only in this way can 
we gradually set up a new system compatible with the socialist 
market economy and develop the new and necessary agricultural 
product pricing and circulation systems. 
  1. We should continue to implement a contract procurement 
system for key agricultural products: 
  Currently even though grain and most agricultural product 
prices have been decontrolled and are regulated by the market, 
the thousands and hundreds of thousands of peasant households 
who are accustomed to the product economy are having trouble 
adjusting to this sudden transition from the product economy to 
the market economy. The state must provide guide the peasants' 
production management activities to help them cope with the 
risks and the income fluctuations brought by the market economy 
as soon as possible. As far as the state is concerned, it needs 
a relatively stable supply of commodities in order to avoid the 
hazards brought by market volatility. Therefore, the state both 
wants to and also needs to implement the contract procurement 
system with regard to grain and cotton and other major crops 
that affect the national economy and the people's livelihood. 
The contracts should be signed by the peasants with the state on 
a voluntary basis and in accordance with the principle of equal 
exchange and fair negotiation. The state should guarantee 
purchase of agricultural products under contract to further set 
standards for the peasants' production behavior. 
  2. We should continue to implement the agricultural product 
protection price and a host of preferential policies and 
measures: 
  This year, 28 provinces, municipalities, and autonomous 
regions nationwide have partially or completely decontrolled 
their grain procurement prices. Because of reduced output of 
cotton last year, the state's cotton reserve is low and it will 
continue to sign contracts for fixed quota procurements. 
However, as three of the provinces piloting the reform of the 
cotton circulation system, Shandong, Henan, and Jiangsu will 
open up their markets after fulfilling their nationwide 
procurement contracts. In the future, the state should continue 
to expand the pilot project to reform the cotton circulation 
system, striving to decontrol the management, the market, and 
the price of cotton by 1995, and it should gradually set up a 
new system under the state's macroeconomic regulation and 
control which makes market regulation the primary means of 
regulation, links domestic and foreign trade, and creates a 
highly efficient and smooth cotton circulation system. But in 
order to guarantee the sustained and steady development of 
agricultural production, the state must install supportive 
prices for grain and cotton and other major crops that are vital 
to the national economy and the people's livelihood. Each year, 
before the peasants begin planting, the state should announce 
the minimum protection price, and if the market price is higher 
than the minimum price, procurement should be made at market 
price, and if the market price is below the minimum protection 
price, the minimum price should prevail so as to truly protect 
the peasants' interests. The purchased grain and cotton should 
primarily be put into the state's reserve. 
  3. We should set up a key agricultural product price hazards 
fund or price regulation fund system: 
  Setting up a major agricultural product price hazards fund 
or 
price regulation fund is one of the important measures the state 
can use to regulate and control price fluctuations. To impose 
supportive price or protection price for the major agricultural 
products, it is necessary to have a price hazards fund or price 
regulation fund as safeguard; otherwise it would be difficult to 
impose those prices. The funds should be financed primarily by 
the state, and a secondary source may be the local governments. 
In addition, with the elimination of price subsidies for grain 
and cotton and other important crops, the state can use the 
money earmarked for the subsidies to finance the regulation or 
hazard fund. 
  4. We should gradually set up a three-level--central, 
provincial, and prefectural (county)--reserve system. 
  Nature still plays a critical part in China's agricultural 
production. Natural disasters and market supply and demand 
conditions have tremendous impact on farm output. Bumper 
harvests often create large stockpiles; the crops cannot be sold 
at the set prices, which results in lower income for the 
peasants, and this in turn diminishes their production 
enthusiasm. When crops failed, it often leads to panic buying of 
farm products, causing an upsurge in prices and severe ups and 
downs and highs and lows in farm production which have an 
adverse effect on agriculture's sustained, steady, and smooth 
development. Setting up a three-level--state, provincial, and 
prefectural (county)--reserve system for the major crops will 
play a positive role in the state's macro market regulation and 
control, in guiding farm production, and in stabilizing the 
agricultural product markets and product prices. Currently, the 
country already has a reserve of more than 70 billion jin of 
grain, more than 20 million tons of cotton, and more than 2 
million tons of sugar, but they fall far short of the needs of 
the development of the socialist market economy. As the economy 
continues to gather strength, the state must further expand and 
increase its grain, cotton, oil, sugar, and other key 
agricultural product reserves in order to promote steady 
increase in agricultural output. Only in this way can we 
promptly regulate the disequilibrium in the supply and demand of 
grain and cotton and other key agricultural products so as to 
stabilize the market and curb price increases. 
  5. We should further strengthen the macro management and 
regulation and control of the decontrolled agricultural products. 
  In the wake of the ever-deepening reform of the agricultural 
product pricing and circulation systems, the absolute majority 
of the farm products have turned to the market and are regulated 
by the market. Therefore, the state must further strengthen its 
macro management and regulation and control of the decontrolled 
agricultural products, further standardize their market 
behavior, strive to strengthen the supervision and management of 
the agricultural product market, and use legal means to manage 
and rectify market order. It should formulate and announce a 
guidance-oriented plan for the major crops each year and make 
market forecasts, and it should promptly announce the 
guidance-oriented prices and commodity supply-demand information 
each year before the peasants begin production, so that it can 
correctly guide the peasants' production management activities, 
standardize the commodities exchange activities, and advocate 
fair competition, and it can prevent price gouging, deceptive 
and predatory market practices, and monopolistic behaviors. 
  6. We should actively nurture and develop all sorts of 
country fair markets and wholesale markets for agricultural and 
sideline products. 
  Agricultural production management must turn to the market 
and implement market regulation. Amid intense market 
competition, we must ascertain the changes in market demand and 
develop products that sell, that are of high quality, high 
yield, and are highly efficient, and by continuously developing 
the primary processing and deep processing of agricultural 
products, we an increase their added value and continuously 
raise the input-output ratio. This would require us to nurture 
and develop all types of agricultural product country fair and 
wholesale markets, and through these markets, we can guide the 
flow of goods, so that the products truly flow smoothly, and 
then we can promote agricultural development and upgrade the 
product-mix. 
  7. We should actively promote the integration of planting, 
breeding, and processing; commerce, industry, and agriculture; 
peasants, workers, and businessmen and further strengthen the 
socialized system of services to fully coordinate the 
production, supply, and marketing of agricultural products. 
  Actively promoting the whole series of services to integrate 
or seriate planting, breeding, and processing; commerce, 
industry, and agriculture; peasants, workers, and businessman is 
one way to properly resolve the uncoordinated production and 
sales of agricultural products, the separation of town and 
country, and the contradiction between small productions and the 
big market. On the one hand, the leading enterprises and the 
peasants will be guaranteed their own fairly stable source of 
goods and marketing channels, which will greatly relieve the 
"hardships" in the buying and selling of agricultural and 
sideline products. On the other hand, by processing and changing 
the agricultural and sideline products and increasing their 
added value, the peasants can steadily increase their income. 
  8. We should continue to implement the policy of setting 
maximum ceiling prices for chemical fertilizers, diesel, and 
other important agricultural means of production. 
  To maintain the sustained, stable, and smooth development in 
agricultural production and make sure that the peasants do 
benefit from growing crops, in the next few years, the state 
must implement the policy of setting maximum ceiling prices for 
chemical fertilizers, diesel, and other important agricultural 
means of production, so as to truly protect the peasants 
interests. The policy of setting maximum ceiling prices should 
not be limited to factory-exit prices but should extend to 
retail prices too. Today, a ceiling price only applies to the 
factory-exit price but not to the retail price, and this in fact 
cannot curb price increases but actually causes prices to go up. 
Therefore, so long as the prices of factors of production have 
not merged tracks with international prices, we must continue to 
set maximum ceiling prices for chemical fertilizers, diesel, and 
other important means of production. After setting maximum 
prices, the state should subsidize the chemical and industrial 
enterprises that have incurred losses as a result. 
  9. We should continue to perfect the two-tier contract 
management system that integrates centralization and 
decentralization and further develop coordinated services 
before, during, and after production. 
  To resolve the peasants' small production management style 
which is based on a single household or a single family, we must 
further deepen the reform of the rural economic system. In 
particular, we should further perfect the two-tier contract 
management system that integrates the centralization and 
decentralization of agricultural products. We should continue to 
launch a series of coordinated services before, during, and 
after production, so that we can gradually attain economies of 
scale in agricultural production and escape or resolve the 
contradiction between the individual households' or families' 
small-farmer production and the socialist unified great market 
circulation. We should gradually set up a comprehensive, 
coordinated service system extending the entire agricultural 
production process, so that the peasants can adjust to the 
transition and changes from planned agriculture to market 
agriculture as soon as possible. Of course, we will fall short 
if we rely only on the above measures to resolve the 
contradictions in the agricultural product pricing and 
circulation realms. The state must continuously increase its 
investments in agricultural production, improve agricultural 
infrastructure and capital construction, strengthen 
agriculture's fundamental role, and increase agriculture's 
comprehensive productive capacity. Only in this way can 
agricultural production continue its sustained, stable, and 
smooth development. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20386 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94028" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  11 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   National Cultivated Land Area </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    National Cultivated Land Area </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0397K Hefei ANHUI RIBAO in Chinese 11 Mar 94 p 7 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0397K </F>
<F P=104>  Hefei ANHUI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] At present, the cultivated land area in China 
exceeds 1.9 billion mu. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20387 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94029" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  4 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Regional Per Capita Net Income of Farmers in 1993 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Regional Per Capita Net Income of Farmers in 1993 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0397J Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO in Chinese 4 Mar 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0397J </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Text] 


---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Per Capita Net Income of Farmers in 1993 unit:yuan/person year            | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Place         |Per Capita Net Income        |1993 Increase, Decrease From | 
|              |                             |1992                         | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|              |1993          |1992          |Amount        |Percent       | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|National      |921.4         |784.0         |137.4         |17.5          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Shanghai      |2726.98       |2225.87       |501.11        |22.5          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Beijing       |1882.58       |1571.56       |311.02        |19.8          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Zhejiang      |1745.94       |1359.13       |386.81        |28.5          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Guangdong     |1674.78       |1307.65       |367.13        |28.1          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tianjin       |1473.12       |1309.01       |164.11        |12.5          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Jiangsu       |1266.87       |1060.71       |206.16        |19.4          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Fujian        |1210.51       |984.10        |226.41        |23.0          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Liaoning      |1160.98       |995.10        |165.88        |16.7          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Heilongjiang  |1028.36       |949.20        |79.16         |8.3           | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Shandong      |952.74        |802.90        |149.84        |18.7          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hainan        |949.49        |842.79        |106.70        |12.7          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Guangxi       |892.41        |731.69        |160.72        |22.0          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Jilin         |891.61        |807.41        |84.20         |10.4          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Jiangxi       |869.81        |768.41        |101.40        |13.2          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hunan         |851.87        |739.42        |112.45        |15.2          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hebei         |803.80        |682.48        |121.32        |17.8          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hubei         |783.18        |677.82        |105.36        |15.5          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Inner Mongolia|777.95        |672.17        |105.78        |15.7          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Xinjiang      |777.62        |740.44        |37.18         |5.0           | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Anhui         |724.50        |573.58        |150.92        |26.3          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Shanxi        |718.33        |627.01        |91.32         |14.6          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Sichuan       |698.27        |634.31        |63.96         |10.1          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Henan         |695.85        |588.48        |107.37        |18.2          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Yunnan        |674.79        |617.98        |56.81         |9.2           | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Qinghai       |672.56        |603.40        |69.16         |11.5          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Shaanxi       |652.99        |558.79        |94.20         |16.9          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ningxia       |636.39        |591.01        |45.38         |7.7           | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Guizhou       |579.67        |506.13        |73.54         |14.5          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Gansu         |550.83        |489.47        |61.36         |12.5          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20388 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94030" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  19 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SOCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Study Identifies Eleven Social Diseases </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Study Identifies Eleven Social Diseases </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0163C Shanghai SHEHUI [SOCIETY] in Chinese No 108, Jan 
94 p 45 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0163C </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai SHEHUI [SOCIETY] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Gu Chu (6253 0443): "Study Identifies Eleven </F>
Social Diseases"] 
  [Excerpts] Under the organization and direction of Zhang 
Ping [1728 5493], a research associate at the Sociology 
Institute of the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences [CASS], and 
working in their spare time, 13 researchers from the Legal 
Studies Institute, Sociology Institute, Ministry of Supervision, 
Ministry of Public Security, Ministry of Public Health, and the 
China University of Politics and Law, among others, collected 
and analyzed for the first time the social problems facing China 
today and put forward countermeasures. In so doing, they 
accomplished an urgently-needed research mission on China's 
current social ills. 
  They divided China's existing social problems into 11 
categories, the foremost of which is the corruption and 
dereliction of duty by government employees, as when they abuse 
their office to further personal interests, take bribes, 
squander away public funds, wine and dine, and send gifts. The 
second problem is organized crime, which has been on the rise 
since the 1970's and now directly threatens the people's daily 
lives and law and order. The third problem is economic crime, 
the fastest-growing crime. Next is the manufacturing of bogus, 
counterfeit, or shoddy products, a pitfall on the road toward 
creating a socialist market economy in China. The fifth social 
disease is drug-related crime, which has been skyrocketing. The 
sixth disease is prostitution, which goes hand in hand with the 
seventh -- sexually transmitted diseases -- and eighth--the 
proliferation of pornographic materials. The ninth disease is 
the outright buying and selling of women and children, a gross 
violation of their legitimate rights and interests and a cause 
of the tenth disease, namely illegal marriage, which essentially 
means early marriage, arranged marriage, bigamy, concubinage, 
marriage between close relatives, and prohibited marriage. The 
eleventh social disease involves feudal and superstitious 
activities, which at one point were subsiding and diminishing 
only to reappear openly and extensively in a variety of forms in 
recent times. 
  Zhang Ping, the researcher, said that social problems and 
social contradictions exist in any kind of society and that it 
is precisely through the resolution of endless social problems 
that a society matures. From the perspective of social control 
research, the various diseases in China today--widespread 
impermissible behavior, transgressions, and criminal 
conduct--essentially belong at the first level of loss of social 
control, that is, the break-down of methods or means, not bad 
enough to endanger the existence and development of society. 
However, if the break-down of methods is not checked 
effectively and allowed to continue, it will escalate to the 
next level, namely erosion of trust in and declining compliance 
with all social norms, which will undermine the public's sense 
of sacredness about such norms. If the break-down of methods is 
allowed to reach the third level, the "disintegration of basic 
goals," then "absolute lawlessness" will ensue and things will 
get utterly out of control, leading to the collapse of the 
entire body of social institutions. [passage omitted] 
  (Excerpted from SHEKE XINXI and NANBEI QIAO) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20389 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94031" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  1 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SOCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Economic Interpretation of Political Corruption </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Economic Interpretation of Political Corruption </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0208A Hong Kong CHIU-SHIH NIEN-TAI [THE NINETIES] in 
Chinese No 289, 1 Feb 94 pp 48-49 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0208A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong CHIU-SHIH NIEN-TAI [THE NINETIES] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Fang Su (2455 5685): "Is Corruption Harmful to </F>
Economic Development -- Liu Pei-chiung on Mainland China's 
Corruption Problem"] 
  [Excerpts] [passage omitted] Liu Pei-chiung (0491 0160 
3890), director of (?Hong Kong Polytechnic's Business 
Department) [hsiang kang li kung hsueh yuan shang yeh hsi 7449 
3263 3810 1562 1331 7108 0794 2814 4762] and assistant director 
for training of the (?China Commerce Exchange Center) [chung kuo 
shang yeh jiao liu chung hsin 0022 0948 0794 2814 0074 3177 0022 
1800], says that, according to her observation and analysis, 
corruption on the mainland, though a big problem, has not become 
an established practice, nor is it causing tremendous harm. On 
the other hand, she adds, irrational allocation of resources has 
a much more adverse effect on the economy. This article will 
give a summary of her view. [passage omitted] 
  Corruption means that someone gains by taking advantage of 
his or her power or position to control the supply of materials, 
information, or other things. From the viewpoint of economics, 
what he or she gains is an "economic rent," and the act is "rent 
seeking." However, no value is created in this process. In some 
cases, it is legal to receive this kind of "rent." For example, 
a charge can be collected for the supply of information. In 
other cases, to do so is illegal, or in other words, it is not 
permitted by law. Generally speaking, the latter is called 
corruption. 
  Some acts, though illegal, are "good acts" if viewed from 
the 
perspective of economics. For instance, a nascent developing 
country may have too much control over its economic activities. 
Under such circumstances, some corrupt acts can help break 
through man-made control and serve as a "lubricant" for economic 
activities. 
  In nascent developing countries, though corruption is linked 
with the relative shortage of materials, its occurrence is also 
attributable in part to the system that gives officials power to 
manage materials, information, and so forth. For example, some 
officials have the authority to approve the supply of materials 
and control the allocation of resources. This often provides 
opportunities for corruption, such as abusing power for private 
gains and granting business people's requests in exchange for 
money. 
  In developed countries, certain political operations such as 
lobbying are also "rent seeking" activities. However, since 
these countries allow open economic competition, their society 
and politics are relatively institutionalized, and rule by men 
exists only to a small extent, the chances for corruption are 
reduced. 
  As for the situation on the Chinese mainland, everyone knows 
that, more often than not, there are many barriers to pass 
before a task can be accomplished. It is necessary to form good 
relations with various parties, including officials and 
organizations. As a result, instances of bribery, embezzlement, 
and corruption have come into being. Since some corrupt 
activities can serve as an economic "lubricant," many business 
people do not mind them. As long as you have a "clearly marked 
price," I will include that in my operating cost and go on with 
my business. And, matter-of-factly, most of such "transactions" 
are fulfilled as promised; only a few have been aborted. For 
this reason, a lot of business people from Hong Kong and the 
branch offices of many foreign companies in China employ special 
personnel to do diplomatic work. Their job is to promote good 
"public relations," using such methods as holding dinner 
parties, so as to remove barriers and "lubricate" business 
activities. [passage omitted] 
  Through more than a decade of reform and opening-up and with 
the development of the economy, corruption on the Chinese 
mainland has changed its style. In the past, corrupt officials 
often asked for cigarettes, liquors, dinner parties, and 
electrical appliances from business people. As time has passed 
by, few of them are now asking for cigarettes, liquors, or 
electrical appliances, and dinner parties are not so welcome as 
before. On the one hand, this is because they earn a higher 
income and no longer have a strong demand for such things. On 
the other hand, they have shifted their demand to other areas, 
like traveling overseas in the name of making observations and 
sending their children to study in foreign countries. 
  As can be seen from numerous reports and instances, 
corruption on the Chinese mainland occurs mostly in government 
departments and state-owned enterprises and institutions. 
Corrupt departments and personnel can be roughly divided into 
four categories: 1) cadres in charge of economic work, such as 
managers and factory directors of state-owned enterprises, and 
certain government departments, such as the State Land 
Administration Bureau, urban construction departments, and other 
units that control the use of land--these government departments 
have relatively more corruption problems; 2) judicial and 
law-enforcing departments, such as public security police and 
courts; 3) departments of public utilities that have long 
experienced shortage of supply or inadequate capacities, such as 
transportation, water, electricity, and telephone departments; 
and 4) bank personnel responsible for loan business. 
  The above government departments and state-owned enterprises 
and institutions either enjoy privileges or hold a monopoly in 
their respective fields of operations. Privileges and monopoly 
have not only created corruption, but also resulted in seriously 
inappropriate allocation of resources. For instance, most 
state-owned enterprises are suffering losses either overtly or 
covertly and have to rely on state support to survive. Another 
example is that the government's manner in approving 
appropriations cannot achieve effective use of funds. In fact, 
there are not so many instances of embezzlement in 
fund-approving departments and units, and the amounts of 
embezzlement are limited. However, the economic losses caused by 
them due to inappropriate allocation of resources are enormous. 
The harm done to the economy is more serious than corruption. 
  The primary reason for this state of affairs is that for a 
long time economic questions have been dealt with by 
non-economic methods. Another reason is that property rights are 
not clearly defined. Under the public ownership system, what is 
dealt with by economic policymakers are not their own property, 
and they are not held responsible for any economic consequence 
if their policies are wrong. If a deficit has occurred, they can 
ask for subsidies from the higher authorities. A similar logic 
applies to extravagant wining and dining at public expense. 
Anyway, the money spent is from the public coffer. [passage 
omitted] 
  Has corruption become an established practice on the Chinese 
mainland? The answer is that it has not reached such a terrible 
extent. In the first place, the regulations stipulate that those 
in charge of economic work are not allowed to do government 
work. This "distinction between government and economic work" 
has greatly cut the political power of those running state-owned 
enterprises and managing state assets, thus reducing the 
possibility of simultaneous monopoly of political and economic 
powers. 
  Second, at present the economic power is not so centralized 
as in the past, but is being gradually delegated to departments 
in various localities. Although local party and government 
cadres have a lot of substantive power in political and economic 
affairs, there is a local election system, and officials are 
accountable to the collective. So it is impossible that they can 
act without scruple. 
  Third, most people grumbled seriously when they saw children 
of high-level cadres do business or conduct other activities by 
taking advantage of their privileges. These activities are, of 
course, unhealthy, but they have not become an established 
practice and created a corrupt regime with monopolized political 
power as former Filipino autocrat Marcos did. 
  Fourthly, the Chinese Communist Party's discipline still has 
a binding force on cadres, though its effect is diminishing. 
Generally speaking, high-level cadres are well-disciplined, 
while most problems occur in local governments. Since they are 
far away from the central authorities, "local emperors" have 
come into being. As for launching movements to strike at 
corruption, the reason is that a discipline-inspection movement 
is more effective than law. When law must be used, because of 
the high cost involved, the method adopted is to "deal with 
typical cases" so as to "punish one as a warning to a hundred." 
[passage omitted] 
  After the Chinese mainland has opened itself to the outside 
world, foreign capital has flowed in. Has this induced more 
corrupt activities? This is not necessarily the case. On the 
contrary, market competition has been introduced along with the 
in-flow of foreign capital, smashing the disastrous monopoly. 
Now, all localities on the mainland are rushing to solicit 
capital from outside, aren't they? Before competition is 
introduced, you had to give someone benefits if you wanted to do 
something. Now, there is competition. In one locality, you are 
required to give out benefits; in another locality, you may find 
this is not necessary. In one locality, you must go through a 
number of departments; in another locality, you may find that 
all departments related to foreign investment are located in one 
place, and they serve your needs from beginning to end. This has 
reduced the instances of corruption. 
  By studying the problem of corruption as an economic issue, 
we have arrived at this conclusion: Building a market system to 
promote open competition will not only raise efficiency in 
utilizing resources, but also reduce the possibility of 
corruption. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20390 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94032" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  19 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SOCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Survey on Why College Teachers Quit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Survey on Why College Teachers Quit </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0231A Shanghai SHEHUI [SOCIETY] in Chinese No 110, Mar 
94 pp 45-46 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0231A </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai SHEHUI [SOCIETY] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Shan Liang (0830 5328): "The Festive Candle </F>
Drops Blobs of Wax Like Tears -- A Look at the Loss of Teachers 
at Shanghai's Institutions of Higher Learning," excerpted by Lao 
He (0525 0149) from SHANGHAI RENCAI SHICHANG BAO (SHANGHAI 
TALENT MARKET JOURNAL) 1993, trial publication No 43] 
  [Excerpt] [passage omitted] A certain relevant party 
conducted a large-scale survey of 116 institutions of higher 
learning in 24 cities, among them also Beijing and Shanghai, 
with the result that 28.5 percent of the teachers at these 
institutions subscribed to "will definitely move, if I have a 
chance," 44.3 percent were for "thinking of moving but have 
certain concerns" and "thinking of moving but am unable to do 
so," and only 5.8 percent subscribed to "do not intend to move, 
the present place is ideal." 
  Taking only Fudan University, "the top-ranking university 
south of the Changjiang," as example: During the entire 1980's, 
this university hired 1,442 new young teachers, of whom 402 have 
by now again left the university. Among these, 384 went abroad 
for further studies, and 28 [sic!] transferred domestically to 
other positions with better salary and welfare conditions. The 
total number of young teachers that left the university 
accounted for 28.2.percent of those newly higher during the 
corresponding period. The well-known International Journalism 
Institute of the said university's Department of Journalism had 
been famous in China and abroad for its teachers, who, all in 
the prime of their lives, had displayed outstanding talent. 
However, in the short space of a few years, they were gone, 
leaving an empty place where only one lonely teacher remains, so 
that many subjects can no longer be taught. A responsible staff 
of the personnel department told this reporter that the 
university is now loosing about 200 teachers every year. An 
analysis of these shows that by age groups most are middle-aged 
and young, by specializations most are teachers of presently 
crucial subjects and subjects with practical applications, and 
as to their quality, most are outstanding teachers proficient in 
key subjects. The loss of all these teachers is indeed having an 
ever more evident adverse effect on the quality of instructions. 
  During the interviews and investigations, this reporter 
found 
out that because many teachers could make their own arrangements 
about time, they decided on a more practical way out, namely 
taking up concurrent jobs. Concurrent jobs are of various 
different patterns: some jobs require fixed attendances so many 
times a week, in some cases offices are set up at home, while 
remuneration is by salary, by pieces, or by time, and incomes 
vary. According to incomplete statistics, among teachers aged 
below 40 in Shanghai institutions of higher learning, 40 percent 
have concurrent jobs; the purpose of these is two-fold, namely: 
first, to improve the economic situation, and second, to achieve 
a certain self-worth. If these two tracks should collide at any 
time, the decision in eight, nine out of ten times is "better 
quit and go elsewhere." These people constitute an unsteady 
element among university teachers and are of a proportion that 
must not be ignored. In the first half of 1993, an outstanding 
young teacher in the physics department of Fudan University was 
faced with an uneven scale, to weigh between a 200 yuan and a 
2,000 yuan income, and he chose the latter. He abandoned his 
speciality and abruptly flung himself into the ocean of 
commercial affairs, to become a salesman, roaming all over the 
country. For a time this made big waves in society, but whether 
he was praised or berated for it, the fact remains that he was 
gone. 
  The specific places to which these Shanghai college and 
university teachers are actually moving are the "three capital" 
enterprises, and the financial, banking, tax, industrial, and 
commercial sectors, where they vie with each other for 
positions. This shows that individual income is the most weighty 
argument that determines the moves of the teachers. 
  Another one is: going abroad for further studies. In the 
last 
two years the frenzy for the TOEFL [Test of English as a Foreign 
Language] has somewhat cooled down, but going abroad is still a 
major aim that college and university teachers, especially the 
younger ones, aspire to, and they now begin to extend the scope 
of their destinations for studying abroad beyond the United 
States to Singapore and other small countries. There is also a 
new trend in this rush to go abroad, when they formerly went 
abroad it was purely to pursue studies, but now many directly go 
to take up employment. According to statistics, for almost half 
of those who go abroad on state stipend or at own expense it is 
like in the old verse "the yellow-crane flies off, never to 
return." Even among those college and university teachers that 
go abroad on scholarly exchanges or scholarly cooperative 
activities, many settle down in the foreign countries. 
  The great loss of college and university teachers actually 
is 
due to complex and manifold reasons. When college and university 
teachers in 116 institutions were questioned, "what is the main 
reason for your decision to quit?" the answers were, in this 
order: "unsatisfactory social environment," "no prospects for 
advancement in sight," "poor living conditions and family 
considerations," etc. 
  One teacher expressed it this way: The reason why our group 
of people endured in poverty is none other than the idea of 
making a contribution to instruction and research. We make no 
high demands, maintaining a somewhat higher than middle level in 
society and having a relatively quiet environment for study and 
private life, that is all. If these demands cannot be met with, 
we cannot see any value in our profession and should make a 
change. However, when it really comes to change the old habitat, 
there is much inner conflict and pain; discarding 20-odd years 
of work is like cutting off a "first love." 
  There was a certain Li, a young teacher of modern literature 
at a certain teachers training college in Shanghai. As an 
excellent graduate, he was kept on by the college, and for a 
time he was happy and proud to wear the red college badge. 
However, we don't know when it started, but the color and lustre 
of the badge faded. Last year, he took his family back to the 
countryside. There, some puny, average-grade former schoolmates 
of his were spending money 600 yuan at a time, visiting 
sing-song places and dance halls, and there again spending lots 
of money, all that left this highly talented man speechless with 
surprise and suddenly feeling that he cannot associate with them 
anymore. This matter really stirred him up inwardly, although he 
was ordinarily of a quiet disposition. Formerly, he lived the 
quiet life of a man devoted to studies, who after class would 
discuss the present state of literature with groups of students, 
obsessed with literature, and in fact he was extremely happy. 
However, now his frame of mind is quite different. If he could, 
he would warn youngsters who are full of poetic sentiment and 
picturesque ideas that literature cannot take the place of life, 
but may only be an embellishment of life. Look at yourself, at 
your low status of literary types within the system, when will 
you ever amount to anything in the pecking order according to 
qualifications. Finally, this teacher who is long over the age 
of 30, who had delved into the books and passed the examination 
of graduate student at another university, decided to change his 
profession. 
  An old professor of economics at a famous university had 
formerly always thought it shameful to talk of money, but has 
recently had good reason to worry about money. He had some 
manuscripts on his specialty, which were the fruit of many 
years' painstaking labor, and which he wanted to present to the 
university as his valuable gift on retirement. However, since 
they were mostly on theory and too highbrow to be popular, the 
publishing company told him: either you underwrite the sale of 
5,000 copies, or contribute 10,000 yuan to the expenses. This 
sum is not a small amount for a teacher who has been poor all 
his life, and was completely beyond the old teacher's means. 
Later, a very farsighted industrialist generously came to the 
rescue at the last moment. After this, the professor was 
painfully regretting: "If I would be 20 years younger, I would 
also move out." [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20391 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94033" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SOCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Widespread Feudal Superstitious Activities </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Widespread Feudal Superstitious Activities </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0231B Beijing LIAOWANG [OUTLOOK] in Chinese No 6, 7 Feb 
94 pp 45-46 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0231B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing LIAOWANG [OUTLOOK] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Li Guodong (2621 0948 2767), Legal Work </F>
Committee of the Standing Committee, People's Representative 
Committee of Minquan County, Henan Province: "Severely Combat 
Feudal Superstitions Leading to the Commission of Crimes"] 
  [Excerpt] [passage omitted] Feudal superstitions, a kind of 
decadent ideology, had already been contained over a vast area 
during the early years of New China. However, these days the 
recurrence of feudal superstitions has again become in certain 
areas a public menace to social security. 
  The Obnoxious Growth of the "Fortune-Telling 
Craze." Fortune-telling, predicting the so-called "lucky or 
unlucky fate" by means of planchette or palmistry, has in the 
olden days been the way some people made a living. Nowadays, we 
again see their footmarks almost everywhere, from Chongqing's 
first avenue to in front of the Yellow-Crane Tower in Wuhan, 
from the shores of Yueya Lake in Dunhuang to the roadsides on 
Qingdao's Laoshan Mountain. In Shaoyang County of Hunan 
Province, there is Heyecun Village with 1,900 people of whom an 
astounding 13 percent make a living by fortune-telling. In 
Minquan County, Henan Province, a peasant woman became mentally 
deranged when divination for her came up with a bad omen. She 
first killed her husband and then herself. In the Nantang 
district of Lufeng County, Guangdong Province, it happened 
within not quite one year that eight girls lightly believed in 
the nonsense of the fortune-teller and committed suicide. 
  Outrages Committed by the "Witch Doctor Gang." 
According to statistics, approximately 1.8 million witch doctors 
operate in the various cities and villages; they pretend to be 
inspired and able to control demons. They practice black magic; 
they "eliminate misfortunes and heal sicknesses" for people, and 
they practice quite openly. About 71 percent of them are 
illiterate or semi-literate. In the countryside, 73.9 percent of 
sick people ask a witch doctor to cure them, and, as a 
consequence, a large number of people are harmed by them. A 59.2 
percent of male witch doctors have violated women, and 10.6 
percent of the witch doctors have caused the death of people. A 
peasant woman in Yangxin County, Hubei Province, believed a 
witch doctor when he told her that she is "bound to die on 7 
July, unless she prevents the calamity by finding someone to 
take her place." She thereupon poisoned the son and daughter of 
a peasant. A couple in Mengjin County, Henan Province, believed 
a witch doctor when he told them, "your daughter is a `star of 
disaster,' a `patricidal woman,' only a show of blood can ward 
off your disaster." The peasant thereupon cruelly killed his 
daughter with a sickle and displayed her corpse at the street 
corner. 
  Stirring Up Trouble With "Geomancy." In recent 
years feudal clan power is raising its head in the rural areas, 
and such activities as "cleansing the landscape," "identify 
one's clan cemetery," and "repairing the ancestral temples" are 
being taken up one after the other. In the end, every 
opportunity is given the practitioners of geomancy "show off 
their specialty." They not only obstruct the spread of science 
and technology in the rural areas, but constantly stir up 
disputes and armed clashes between neighbors, thus constituting 
a hidden menace to social stability. In a certain county of 
Jiangsu Province, it was due to the absurd nonsense of the 
geomancer who said: "If you grow grapes in your courtyard, your 
women will give birth to `grape-like monsters' [hydatids], that 
the practical and useful technique of grape-growing in that 
courtyard was never allowed to be spread. When the chief of the 
Ma clan died in a certain Taipingxiang village, his descendants 
asked in a geomancer who found a "`dragon and phoenix 
propitiated" plot in the cemetery of the Li clan, which the Ma 
clan forcefully occupied by mere strength of their superior 
numbers, but as a result a big fight ensued, and it all ended 
with one person dead and five injured. 
  Deceiving People With Ghost Stories Under the Pretext 
of Doing "Missionary Work." China's Constitution guarantees 
its citizens freedom of religious beliefs, but strictly forbids 
to confuse people's minds with "religious missionary 
activities," thereby sabotaging the society's production and 
orderly daily life. Many kinds of religious activities that have 
a strong feudal superstitious coloring are poisonous to the 
extreme for the uninformed masses and are cause of great 
tragedies. A villager by the name of You Shengji in Sixian 
County, Anhui Province, posing as a "believer in Jesus," started 
a so-called "religious training class," for the alleged purpose 
of spreading the message of the Holy Bible. He loudly 
proclaimed: "The spirit borrows my physical body to be married 
with people, you are all wed to the spirit." This deceitful 
nonsense provided him with opportunity to rape or deduce 16 of 
his female followers. A peasant of Xiangcheng County, Henan 
Province, a believer in the "White Robe Religion," followed the 
entreaties of his daughter: "The last day is near, earlier death 
is the way to paradise," and cut off her head. 
  Setting Themselves Up as Emperors and Kings and 
Inciting to Riot. Some reactionary elements are taking 
advantage of legitimate religious organizations to wantonly 
conduct inflammatory counterrevolutionary propaganda. They 
enlist believers, assume titles of kings and emperors, oppose 
state policy and state law, and wait for an opportune moment to 
unleash a rebellion. Peasant Li Chengfu and his cronies in 
Fudicun Village at Funiushan Mountain [Henan Province] started a 
fund drive ostensibly to rebuild the Hongchun Temple at 
Laomanchang, the site of an old Tang Dynasty temple, but 
actually to set up a "Wanshun [all-favorable] Heavenly Kingdom." 
On the pretext of geomantic inspection, he visited six counties 
and recruited soldiers, bought horses, and organized a 
counterrevolutionary armed force. According to his slogan: 
  "Not the intercalary seventh month, but the intercalary 
eighth month is right, that is when we will start our fight." 
  His secret plan was to start a rebellion in the intercalary 
eighth month [of the lunar calendar] which will occur in 1995. 
He was later punished according to law by the public security 
organs. In Yongcheng county in the east of Henan Province there 
was a "howler sect" [hu han pai 0729 0815 3175], a religious 
organization, that called its leader "the Living Christ." They 
distributed a large amount of reactionary propaganda and loudly 
proclaimed they will rule all the world. Before they were 
suppressed in July of 1993, they had established over 100 
activity centers and had several hundred core members. 
  New Characteristics of Present Feudal Superstitious 
Activities 
  The deceit was in the past carried out by the activity of 
single persons, but it has now developed into the action of 
organized groups. In "simultaneous operations" they recruit 
followers, continuously expand their contingents, and form a 
professional stratum. They also do not use only one type of 
tricks, such as fortune-telling, necromancy, geomancy, but are 
"experts in one thing and good at many." Their operations get 
more and more comprehensive and modernized. In some places, for 
instance, fortune-telling is done by means of a "computerized 
fortune-telling sutra." The pattern of their activities has also 
changed from the former sedentary, localized way to dashing 
around to commit their crimes hither and thither. The periods of 
activities have changed from the former preference for the slack 
farming season to regular activities in all four seasons of the 
year, and membership has changed from formerly being in the 
majority older people to now a combination of old, middle-aged, 
and young people. 
  According to the analysis of parties concerned, the 
resurgence of feudal superstitions in the 1990's started in the 
economically developed southeastern coastal regions. The Central 
Committee of the Communist Youth League found out in an 
investigation at Lufeng County in Guangdong Province that 
various types of feudal superstitious activities were now being 
conducted completely openly on a very widespread scale, and that 
a surprisingly large number of people were working in the 
production and sale of articles used for feudal superstitious 
purposes. In Jieshizhen township a man called his factory 
"People's Bank of the Underworld," and had over 200 persons 
working especially to manufacture various kinds of articles for 
feudal superstitious purposes, which he widely marketed 
domestically and abroad. One item in the records of the Shanghai 
Public Security Bureau said, that over 2,000 people in Shanghai 
from in and around the three counties of Chongming, Chuansha, 
and Jiading are specially engaged in feudal superstitious 
activities. A news item broadcast in July of 1992 by the Central 
Broadcasting Stations said that it was considered fashionable by 
some people in Wenzhou City, Zhejiang Province, to build during 
their lifetime luxurious mausoleums for themselves, for which 
the maximum expenditure had been as much as several hundred 
thousand yuan. 
  Feudal superstition finds a market already among middle 
school students. An investigation by the Youth Center of the 
China Welfare Association revealed that 60 percent of the middle 
school students believe that man's life is determined by fate. 
They pray: May the light of Buddha shine everywhere, may a 
Bodhisattva make his power felt, and are boy scouts that kneel 
in prayer before Buddhist altars. One student, in the second 
class of higher middle school, had on his desk the following 
motto for his personal guidance: "Having not yet passed my 
examination, I still need a Bodhisattva's assistance." A very 
bright student in lower middle school in Anhua County, Hunan 
Province, was told by the fortune-teller that he was not 
destined for book studies. He thereupon secretly took 400 yuan 
from home and went to a place in the southeast, as directed by 
the fortune-teller, to engage in business. The result was that 
after eight days he begged to be allowed home again. 
  There are rather serious incidents of even some party 
members 
and cadres participating in, supporting, and organizing feudal 
superstitious activities. Somewhere in Yuzhou City, Henan 
Province, some party cadres participated in temple construction 
and collected money from the peasants to build an earth god 
temple, a temple to the goddess, etc., for each village at least 
one. A village party secretary in Fangcheng County did not call 
a doctor when his wife fell sick, but determined that she was 
possessed by an "evil spirit." To "suppress the evil spirit" he 
went to Wudangshan Mountain [in Hubei]" and brought back a 
"spirit-venerating statue" and a "treasured sword," which he 
displayed in the main room of his house. On the first of every 
month he also went to the village temple to burn incense and 
pray to ward off the illness. Moreover, the RENMIN MINZHU BAO 
reported in November of 1993: In recent years, some personnel 
from a powerful organ of the National People's Congress also 
began to play the "mystery chain" game [shen bi lian 4377 4434 
6969]. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>
